Connecticut, session 2026, SB00001.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective July 1, 2026) The amounts appropriated for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, in section 1 of public act 25-168,
regarding the GENERAL FUND are amended to read as follows:
2026-2027
LEGISLATIVE
LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT
Personal Services [64,296,079] 64,246,079
Other Expenses 24,954,131
Equipment 3,295,000
Flag Restoration 65,000
Minor Capital Improvements 4,000,000
Interim Salary/Caucus Offices 591,748
Connecticut Academy of Science and [226,000] 276,000
Engineering

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Old State House 900,000
Translators 150,000
Wall of Fame 10,000
Interstate Conference Fund 529,095
New England Board of Higher Education 226,488
AGENCY TOTAL 99,243,541
AUDITORS OF PUBLIC ACCOUNTS
Personal Services 16,701,328
Other Expenses [451,727] 951,727
AGENCY TOTAL [17,153,055] 17,653,055
COMMISSION ON WOMEN, CHILDREN,
SENIORS, EQUITY AND OPPORTUNITY
Personal Services 1,227,933
Other Expenses 60,000
AGENCY TOTAL 1,287,933
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
GOVERNOR'S OFFICE
Personal Services [3,983,704] 3,994,533
Other Expenses 635,401
National Governors' Association 121,522
AGENCY TOTAL [4,740,627] 4,751,456
SECRETARY OF THE STATE
Personal Services [5,402,637] 4,511,688
Other Expenses [3,517,936] 6,227,936
Commercial Recording Division 5,419,159
Early Voting 1,320,000
Bridgeport Election Monitor 150,000
AGENCY TOTAL [15,809,732] 17,628,783
LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR'S OFFICE
Personal Services [865,598] 874,649
Public Act No. 26-68 2 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Other Expenses 46,323
AGENCY TOTAL [911,921] 920,972
ELECTIONS ENFORCEMENT
COMMISSION
Elections Enforcement Commission [4,255,296] 4,280,767
OFFICE OF STATE ETHICS
Office of State Ethics [2,059,779] 2,238,902
FREEDOM OF INFORMATION
COMMISSION
Freedom of Information Commission [2,283,813] 2,307,423
STATE TREASURER
Personal Services [3,543,056] 3,552,107
Other Expenses 359,854
AGENCY TOTAL [3,902,910] 3,911,961
STATE COMPTROLLER
Personal Services [30,478,063] 30,487,114
Other Expenses [18,417,000] 18,517,000
Various Grants 250,000
AGENCY TOTAL [48,895,063] 49,254,114
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE SERVICES
Personal Services [54,700,984] 54,871,282
Other Expenses 4,617,358
AGENCY TOTAL [59,318,342] 59,488,640
OFFICE OF GOVERNMENTAL
ACCOUNTABILITY
[Other Expenses] [25,098]
Child Fatality Review Panel 139,183
Contracting Standards Board 859,334
Judicial Review Council 191,511
Public Act No. 26-68 3 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Judicial Selection Commission 117,678
Office of the Child Advocate 1,032,892
Office of the Victim Advocate 519,674
Board of Firearms Permit Examiners 148,193
Office of the Correction Ombuds [763,692] 1,219,274
[Office of the Educational Ombudsperson] [180,000]
AGENCY TOTAL [3,977,255] 4,227,739
OFFICE OF POLICY AND MANAGEMENT
Personal Services [21,379,691] 22,777,279
Other Expenses [3,305,422] 2,703,635
Automated Budget System and Data Base 20,438
Link
Justice Assistance Grants 865,967
Tax Relief For Elderly Renters 25,020,226
Private Providers 156,000,000
Reimbursement Property Tax - Disability 364,713
Exemption
Distressed Municipalities 1,500,000
Property Tax Relief Elderly Freeze Program [4,000] 2,000
Property Tax Relief for Veterans [2,708,107] 1,708,107
Municipal Restructuring 300,000
Various Municipal Grants 22,178,100
America250 250,000
AGENCY TOTAL [211,468,564] 233,690,465
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' AFFAIRS
Personal Services [23,687,289] 23,802,446
Other Expenses [4,106,113] 5,521,457
SSMF Administration 560,345
Veterans' Opportunity Pilot 245,047
Veterans' Rally Point 512,764
Burial Expenses 6,666
Headstones [307,834] 207,834
Various Grants 341,000
AGENCY TOTAL [29,426,058] 31,197,559
Public Act No. 26-68 4 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE
SERVICES
Personal Services 100,780,339
Other Expenses [31,251,286] 32,331,302
Loss Control Risk Management 88,003
Employees' Review Board 32,611
Refunds Of Collections 20,381
Rents and Moving 4,136,035
W. C. Administrator 5,562,120
Claims Commissioner Operations 460,499
State Insurance and Risk Mgmt Operations 21,830,588
IT Services [67,732,158] 69,273,016
Firefighters Fund 400,000
State Properties Review Board [337,113] 527,113
State Marshal Commission [365,556] 417,680
[Office of the Claims Commissioner] [460,499]
AGENCY TOTAL [232,996,689] 235,859,687
ATTORNEY GENERAL
Personal Services [40,234,183] 41,093,234
Other Expenses 1,054,810
AGENCY TOTAL [41,288,993] 42,148,044
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE
Personal Services 58,219,053
Other Expenses [5,102,201] 5,002,201
Witness Protection [200,000] 300,000
Training And Education 147,398
Expert Witnesses 135,413
Medicaid Fraud Control [1,509,942] 1,602,442
Criminal Justice Commission 409
Cold Case Unit 292,041
Shooting Taskforce 1,427,286
AGENCY TOTAL [67,033,743] 67,126,243
Public Act No. 26-68 5 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
REGULATION AND PROTECTION
DEPARTMENT OF EMERGENCY
SERVICES AND PUBLIC PROTECTION
Personal Services [180,361,731] 180,561,731
Other Expenses [34,715,572] 43,032,873
Fleet Purchase [7,782,053] 8,317,320
Criminal Justice Information System 4,763,320
CRISIS [1,800,000] 2,050,000
Law Enforcement Training Partnerships 2,050,000
Fire Training School - Willimantic [242,176] 262,176
Maintenance of County Base Fire Radio 19,528
Network
Maintenance of State-Wide Fire Radio 12,997
Network
Police Association of Connecticut 172,353
Connecticut State Firefighter's Association [176,625] 306,625
Fire Training School - Torrington [172,267] 192,267
Fire Training School - New Haven [108,364] 128,364
Fire Training School - Derby [50,639] 70,639
Fire Training School - Wolcott [171,162] 191,162
Fire Training School - Fairfield [127,501] 147,501
Fire Training School - Hartford [176,836] 196,836
Fire Training School - Middletown [70,970] 90,970
Fire Training School - Stamford [75,541] 95,541
Various Grants 2,858,112
Volunteer Firefighter Training 140,000
AGENCY TOTAL [233,189,635] 245,660,315
MILITARY DEPARTMENT
Personal Services [3,305,492] 3,530,455
Other Expenses 2,144,823
Honor Guards 561,600
Veteran's Service Bonuses 379,500
JEEP Program 338,600
[Governor's Guards] [330,000]
Public Act No. 26-68 6 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Governor's Foot Guards 10,000
Governor's First Horse Guard 160,000
Governor's Second Horse Guard 160,000
AGENCY TOTAL [7,060,015] 7,284,978
DEPARTMENT OF CONSUMER
PROTECTION
Personal Services [16,807,275] 17,656,994
Other Expenses [757,940] 1,269,330
Funeral Services Compensation 1,000,000
AGENCY TOTAL [17,565,215] 19,926,324
LABOR DEPARTMENT
Personal Services [17,911,298] 17,892,149
Other Expenses [4,693,827] 2,014,638
CETC Workforce 606,460
Workforce Investment Act [29,938,610] 26,993,197
Job Funnels Projects 712,857
Connecticut's Youth Employment Program [10,268,488] 10,493,488
Jobs First Employment Services 13,173,620
Apprenticeship Program [604,369] 763,254
Connecticut Career Resource Network 152,112
STRIVE 88,779
Opportunities for Long Term Unemployed 5,121,184
Second Chance Initiative 327,038
Cradle To Career [100,000] 150,000
New Haven Jobs Funnel 750,000
Manufacturing Pipeline Initiative [4,627,698] 6,627,698
Domestic Workers Education and Training 400,000
Grant Program
Various Grants 5,470,000
AGENCY TOTAL [89,476,340] 91,736,474
COMMISSION ON HUMAN RIGHTS AND
OPPORTUNITIES
Personal Services [8,768,241] 9,043,421
Public Act No. 26-68 7 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Other Expenses [398,527] 428,719
Martin Luther King, Jr. Commission 5,977
AGENCY TOTAL [9,172,745] 9,478,117
CONSERVATION AND DEVELOPMENT
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Personal Services [4,713,414] 4,818,414
Other Expenses [2,373,332] 693,332
Senior Food Vouchers 518,418
Dairy Farmer - Agriculture Sustainability 1,000,000
WIC Coupon Program for Fresh Produce 247,938
Various Grants 1,767,000
AGENCY TOTAL [8,853,102] 9,045,102
DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY AND
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION
Personal Services [23,865,954] 24,348,753
Other Expenses [1,602,261] 1,007,261
Mosquito and Tick Control 284,240
State Superfund Site Maintenance 399,577
Laboratory Fees 122,565
Dam Maintenance 151,902
Emergency Spill Response 7,657,024
Solid Waste Management 4,078,312
Underground Storage Tank 1,085,420
Clean Air 4,449,309
Environmental Conservation 4,893,567
Environmental Quality 7,056,504
Fish Hatcheries 3,004,540
U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission 278,315
Interstate Environmental Commission 3,333
New England Interstate Water Pollution 26,554
Commission
Northeast Interstate Forest Fire Compact 3,082
Public Act No. 26-68 8 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Connecticut River Valley Flood Control 30,295
Commission
Thames River Valley Flood Control 45,151
Commission
Various Grants 1,045,000
AGENCY TOTAL [59,037,905] 59,970,704
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC AND
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
Personal Services [9,842,148] 10,185,290
Other Expenses 611,278
Spanish-American Merchants Association 442,194
Office of Military Affairs 181,521
CCAT-CT Manufacturing Supply Chain 2,585,000
Capital Region Development Authority 10,845,022
Manufacturing Growth Initiative 178,133
Hartford 2000 20,000
Office of Workforce Strategy [1,303,046] 2,003,046
Black Business Alliance 442,194
Hartford Economic Development 442,194
Corporation
CONNSTEP 500,000
Various Grants [20,176,930] 30,338,490
[MRDA] Connecticut Municipal [1,300,000] 1,420,000
Development Authority (CMDA)
AdvanceCT 2,000,000
Futures Inc 85,000
Forge City Works [300,000] 600,000
CT Community Empowerment Foundation 100,000
City Seed 300,000
AGENCY TOTAL [51,654,660] 63,279,362
DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING
Personal Services [2,649,343] 3,401,351
Other Expenses [157,210] 137,210
Elderly Rental Registry and Counselors 1,011,170
Homeless Youth 3,235,121
Public Act No. 26-68 9 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Outreach Services for Norwich [250,000] 500,000
Rental Assistance Program 94,082,152
Subsidized Assisted Living Demonstration 3,402,000
Congregate Facilities Operation Costs 12,864,700
Elderly Congregate Rent Subsidy 2,172,786
Housing/Homeless Services [114,398,923] 29,456,771
Various Grants 2,883,000
Project Longevity - Housing 2,491,355
Housing/Homeless Services - Municipality 692,651
AGENCY TOTAL [143,325,259] 156,330,267
AGRICULTURAL EXPERIMENT STATION
Personal Services 7,197,533
Other Expenses 1,081,499
Mosquito and Tick Disease Prevention 857,623
Wildlife Disease Prevention 133,357
AGENCY TOTAL 9,270,012
HEALTH
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH
Personal Services [40,640,559] 43,329,915
Other Expenses [8,939,228] 9,235,270
Gun Violence Prevention [4,404,299] 4,654,299
Lung Cancer Detection and Referrals 479,137
Pancreatic Cancer Screening 127,161
[Public Health Response] [720,931]
Community Health Services [2,398,494] 1,898,494
Rape Crisis 616,233
Various Grants 2,034,000
Local and District Departments of Health [8,213,916] 8,341,658
School Based Health Clinics [14,400,721] 15,102,721
AGENCY TOTAL [80,940,679] 85,818,888
OFFICE OF HEALTH STRATEGY
[Personal Services] [3,370,606]
Public Act No. 26-68 10 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
[Other Expenses] [1,170,255]
[AGENCY TOTAL] [4,540,861]
OFFICE OF THE CHIEF MEDICAL
EXAMINER
Personal Services 9,036,394
Other Expenses 2,479,935
Equipment 24,846
Medicolegal Investigations 22,150
AGENCY TOTAL 11,563,325
DEPARTMENT OF DEVELOPMENTAL
SERVICES
Personal Services 224,654,418
Other Expenses 21,019,245
Housing Supports and Services 1,400,000
Family Support Grants 3,700,840
Clinical Services [2,337,724] 2,437,724
Behavioral Services Program 12,857,593
Supplemental Payments for Medical 2,558,132
Services
ID Partnership Initiatives 2,528,138
Emergency Placements 5,980,932
Rent Subsidy Program 5,262,312
Employment Opportunities and Day 407,451,072
Services
Community Residential Services 938,815,100
AGENCY TOTAL [1,628,565,506] 1,628,665,506
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HEALTH
AND ADDICTION SERVICES
Personal Services 257,078,417
Other Expenses [37,617,895] 37,636,645
Housing Supports and Services [29,716,445] 30,716,445
Managed Service System [77,687,785] 83,962,785
Legal Services 764,660
Connecticut Mental Health Center 9,229,406
Public Act No. 26-68 11 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Professional Services 23,400,697
Behavioral Health Recovery Services [26,407,864] 26,694,864
Nursing Home Screening 652,784
Young Adult Services 95,902,326
TBI Community Services 9,443,717
Behavioral Health Medications [8,170,754] 9,470,754
Medicaid Adult Rehabilitation Option 4,419,683
Discharge and Diversion Services [43,157,991] 46,382,991
Home and Community Based Services [26,723,158] 27,413,158
Nursing Home Contract 1,152,856
Katie Blair House 17,016
Forensic Services [11,544,887] 13,444,887
Grants for Substance Abuse Services [37,103,118] 42,853,118
Grants for Mental Health Services 77,117,159
Employment Opportunities 9,873,631
AGENCY TOTAL [787,182,249] 807,627,999
PSYCHIATRIC SECURITY REVIEW
BOARD
Personal Services 367,270
Other Expenses 24,943
AGENCY TOTAL 392,213
HUMAN SERVICES
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL SERVICES
Personal Services [159,660,660] 160,022,138
Other Expenses [168,068,200] 168,607,200
Genetic Tests in Paternity Actions 81,906
HUSKY B Program [32,760,000] 33,190,000
Substance Use Disorder Waiver Reserve [18,370,000] 7,265,000
Medicaid [3,950,330,000] 3,942,934,000
Old Age Assistance [56,900,000] 62,600,000
Aid To The Blind [657,800] 960,000
Aid To The Disabled [56,020,000] 59,300,000
Temporary Family Assistance - TANF [75,400,000] 54,000,000
Public Act No. 26-68 12 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Emergency Assistance 1
Food Stamp Training Expenses 9,341
DMHAS-Disproportionate Share 108,935,000
Connecticut Home Care Program [51,180,000] 56,180,000
Human Resource Development-Hispanic 1,070,348
Programs
Safety Net Services 1,500,145
Refunds Of Collections 89,965
Services for Persons With Disabilities 309,661
Nutrition Assistance [6,020,994] 3,020,994
State Administered General Assistance [19,000,000] 15,056,000
Connecticut Children's Medical Center 13,138,737
Community Services [10,992,162] 17,284,299
Human Services Infrastructure Community [4,274,240] 7,174,240
Action Program
Teen Pregnancy Prevention 1,394,639
Domestic Violence Shelters 8,650,381
[Hospital Supplemental Payments] [778,300,000]
[Regional Hospice of Western CT] [1,000,000]
Teen Pregnancy Prevention - Municipality 98,281
AGENCY TOTAL [5,524,212,461] 4,722,872,276
DEPARTMENT OF AGING AND
DISABILITY SERVICES
Personal Services [8,626,272] 9,242,629
Other Expenses [2,182,575] 1,222,575
Educational Aid for Children - Blind or 5,036,360
Visually Impaired
Employment Opportunities – Blind & 416,974
Disabled
Vocational Rehabilitation - Disabled [7,895,382] 7,947,786
Supplementary Relief and Services [97,251] 44,847
Special Training for the Deaf Blind 264,045
Connecticut Radio Information Service 70,194
Independent Living Centers 1,025,528
Programs for Senior Citizens [5,036,165] 6,296,165
Various Grants 951,825
Public Act No. 26-68 13 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Elderly Nutrition [5,141,074] 5,294,406
Communication Advocacy Network 200,000
AGENCY TOTAL [35,991,820] 38,013,334
EDUCATION
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
Personal Services 18,557,641
Other Expenses [28,295,963] 3,920,963
Development of Mastery Exams Grades 4, 6, 10,571,192
and 8
Primary Mental Health [335,288] 314,288
Leadership, Education, Athletics in 312,211
Partnership (LEAP)
Adult Education Action [169,534] 159,534
Connecticut Writing Project 95,250
CT Alliance of Boys and Girls Clubs 1,000,000
Sheff Settlement 18,721,292
Parent Trust Fund Program 350,000
Commissioner's Network [9,869,398] 9,817,398
Local Charter Schools 957,000
Bridges to Success 27,000
Talent Development [2,068,449] 4,068,449
School-Based Diversion Initiative 900,000
EdSight [1,140,690] 1,640,690
Sheff Transportation 80,326,212
Curriculum and Standards [4,215,782] 6,215,782
Non-Sheff Transportation 14,275,787
Aspiring Educators Scholarship Program [6,000,000] 4,000,000
Dual Credit 6,000,000
Local Food for Local Schools Incentive 3,430,000
Program
Office of Dyslexia [680,000] 1,180,000
Special Education Initiatives 3,300,000
American School For The Deaf [12,357,514] 12,757,514
Regional Education Services [262,500] 254,500
Public Act No. 26-68 14 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Family Resource Centers 7,000,000
Charter Schools [144,122,548] 147,337,541
Child Nutrition State Match [2,354,000] 2,877,755
Health Foods Initiative 4,151,463
Various Grants 15,746,000
Rose City Learning [159,000] 240,185
SERC 1,000,000
Teacher Residency RESC Alliance 750,000
Vocational Agriculture [26,295,732] 26,132,180
Adult Education [25,953,382] 25,356,130
Health and Welfare Services Pupils Private [6,447,702] 3,438,415
Schools
Education Equalization Grants 2,456,935,081
Bilingual Education 3,832,260
Priority School Districts 30,818,778
Interdistrict Cooperation 1,537,500
School Breakfast Program [2,158,900] 14,158,900
Excess Cost - Student Based 221,119,782
Open Choice Program 31,472,503
Magnet Schools [344,345,603] 339,255,603
After School Program 5,750,695
Extended School Hours 2,919,883
School Accountability 3,412,207
High Dosage Tutoring Grants [5,000,000] 2,000,000
Special Education and Expansion 30,000,000
Development
High Quality Special Ed Incentives [9,900,000] 8,900,000
Learner Engagement and Attendance 7,000,000
Program
School Based Behavioral Health Grants 5,000,000
AGENCY TOTAL [3,593,605,722] 3,601,295,564
CONNECTICUT TECHNICAL
EDUCATION AND CAREER SYSTEM
Personal Services [175,558,658] 177,213,906
Other Expenses [31,957,461] 37,957,461
AGENCY TOTAL [207,516,119] 215,171,367
Public Act No. 26-68 15 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
OFFICE OF EARLY CHILDHOOD
Personal Services 9,926,912
Other Expenses [8,294,731] 7,919,731
Birth to Three [36,093,626] 38,493,626
Evenstart 545,456
2Gen - TANF [575,685] 672,390
[Nurturing Families Network] [14,469,995]
OEC Parent Cabinet 152,264
Capitol Child Development Center 263,000
CT Home Visiting System 14,469,995
Head Start Services 5,833,238
Care4Kids TANF/CCDF 151,227,096
Child Care Quality Enhancements 5,954,530
Early Head Start-Child Care Partnership 1,500,000
Early Care and Education 201,845,725
Various Grants 850,000
Smart Start 6,325,000
AGENCY TOTAL [443,007,258] 445,978,963
STATE LIBRARY
Personal Services 5,419,751
Other Expenses [1,460,515] 772,336
State-Wide Digital Library 1,709,210
Interlibrary Loan Delivery Service 380,136
Legal/Legislative Library Materials 674,540
Library for the Blind 100,000
Support Cooperating Library Service Units 124,402
Various Grants 960,000
Grants To Public Libraries 225,000
Connecticard Payments 703,638
AGENCY TOTAL [10,572,192] 11,069,013
OFFICE OF HIGHER EDUCATION
Personal Services 1,855,031
Other Expenses [3,142,258] 179,166
Public Act No. 26-68 16 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Minority Advancement Program 1,674,835
National Service Act 320,151
Minority Teacher Incentive Program 570,134
CT Loan Reimbursement [6,000,000] 5,000,000
Alternate Route to Certification 300,000
Roberta B. Willis Scholarship Fund 41,288,637
Various Grants 4,313,092
Health Care Adjunct Grant Program 260,000
AGENCY TOTAL [55,111,046] 55,761,046
UNIVERSITY OF CONNECTICUT
Operating Expenses [250,543,874] 250,103,874
Veterinary Diagnostic Laboratory 250,000
Institute for Municipal and Regional Policy 550,000
UConn Veterans Program 250,000
Health Services - Regional Campuses 1,400,000
Puerto Rican Studies Initiative 500,000
Student Success Software 800,000
Learn and Earn 175,000
Kirklyn M. Kerr Grant Program 600,000
Various Grants 2,320,000
AGENCY TOTAL [253,493,874] 256,948,874
UNIVERSITY OF CONNECTICUT
HEALTH CENTER
Operating Expenses [136,673,524] 135,508,524
AHEC 429,735
Neuromodulation Treatment 2,000,000
Various Grants 1,940,000
Endometriosis Biorepository 1,015,000
Migraine Study 150,000
AGENCY TOTAL [139,103,259] 141,043,259
TEACHERS' RETIREMENT BOARD
Personal Services 2,291,080
Other Expenses 482,003
Public Act No. 26-68 17 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Retirement Contributions - Normal Cost [299,800,000] 328,073,000
Retirement Contributions - UAL [1,405,300,000] 1,403,546,000
Retirees Health Service Cost 44,356,000
Municipal Retiree Health Insurance Costs 8,840,000
AGENCY TOTAL [1,761,069,083] 1,787,588,083
CONNECTICUT STATE COLLEGES AND
UNIVERSITIES
Charter Oak State College [4,041,029] 3,541,029
Community Tech College System [241,998,796] 242,918,796
Connecticut State University [201,697,946] 201,556,926
Board of Regents 519,512
Developmental Services 10,190,984
Outcomes-Based Funding Incentive 1,374,425
O'Neill Chair 315,000
Debt Free Community College [34,150,000] 36,450,000
[Expanded PACT] Finish Line Scholars 7,700,000
Disabilities Study 250,000
Learn and Earn 175,000
Various Grants 2,600,000
AGENCY TOTAL [502,237,692] 507,591,672
CORRECTIONS
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTION
Personal Services [470,144,513] 474,490,513
Other Expenses [89,528,616] 99,828,616
Inmate Medical Services [150,129,165] 154,554,165
Board of Pardons and Paroles 6,822,490
STRIDE 80,181
HITEC [644,174] 764,174
Aid to Paroled and Discharged Inmates 3,000
Legal Services To Prisoners 797,000
Volunteer Services 87,725
Community Support Services 47,566,468
Reentry Centers 1,500,000
Public Act No. 26-68 18 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
AGENCY TOTAL [767,303,332] 786,494,332
DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND
FAMILIES
Personal Services [303,233,500] 304,598,000
Other Expenses [31,137,956] 34,075,956
Family Support Services 1,064,233
Differential Response System 9,367,256
Regional Behavioral Health Consultation 1,838,167
Community Care Coordination 8,957,944
Health Assessment and Consultation 1,596,776
Grants for Psychiatric Clinics for Children [17,880,105] 18,748,105
Day Treatment Centers for Children 8,219,601
Child Abuse and Neglect Intervention 9,988,016
Community Based Prevention Programs 9,657,655
Family Violence Outreach and Counseling 4,009,230
Supportive Housing [21,180,221] 21,680,221
No Nexus Special Education 2,452,640
Family Preservation Services 7,242,683
Substance Abuse Treatment [10,073,982] 11,708,982
Child Welfare Support Services 2,854,163
Board and Care for Children - Adoption 106,884,511
Board and Care for Children - Foster [123,521,818] 125,021,818
Board and Care for Children - Short-term [65,628,396] 69,628,396
and Residential
Individualized Family Supports [3,871,304] 4,021,304
Community Kidcare 61,011,129
Covenant to Care 185,911
Various Grants 575,000
Juvenile Review Boards 6,043,187
Youth Transition and Success Programs [1,016,220] 1,266,220
[Love146] [500,000]
Youth Service Bureaus [2,733,240] 2,747,240
Youth Service Bureau Enhancement 1,115,161
AGENCY TOTAL [823,265,005] 836,559,505
Public Act No. 26-68 19 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
JUDICIAL
JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
Personal Services [385,678,706] 404,420,575
Other Expenses [74,997,164] 75,735,354
Forensic Sex Evidence Exams 1,348,010
Alternative Incarceration Program [70,000,000] 73,990,000
Justice Education Center, Inc. 516,287
Juvenile Alternative Incarceration [35,768,876] 34,518,876
Probate Court [3,634,932] 455,812
Workers' Compensation Claims 6,042,106
Victim Security Account 8,792
Children of Incarcerated Parents [542,683] 792,683
Legal Aid 4,397,144
Youth Violence Initiative 5,592,428
Youth Services Prevention [8,293,132] 8,033,132
Children's Law Center [150,000] 200,000
Project Longevity [4,221,255] 3,471,255
Juvenile Planning 945,000
Juvenile Justice Outreach Services 27,945,080
Board and Care for Children - Short-term 12,953,332
and Residential
LGBTQ Justice and Opportunity Network 256,382
Counsel for Domestic Violence 1,250,000
Outreach Services for Norwich 675,000
Various Grants 3,920,024
AGENCY TOTAL [645,216,309] 667,467,272
PUBLIC DEFENDER SERVICES
COMMISSION
Personal Services 58,383,519
Other Expenses 1,589,903
[Assigned Counsel - Criminal] Assigned [41,354,960] 41,008,344
Counsel
Expert Witnesses [2,775,604] 3,122,220
Training And Education 119,748
Public Act No. 26-68 20 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
AGENCY TOTAL 104,223,734
NON-FUNCTIONAL
DEBT SERVICE - STATE TREASURER
Debt Service [2,041,951,996] 2,039,989,119
UConn 2000 - Debt Service [213,698,862] 233,226,362
CHEFA Day Care Security 4,000,000
Pension Obligation Bonds - TRB 284,364,458
Municipal Restructuring [47,778,925] 47,058,347
AGENCY TOTAL [2,591,794,241] 2,608,638,286
STATE COMPTROLLER -
MISCELLANEOUS
Nonfunctional - Change to Accruals 65,278,956
STATE COMPTROLLER - FRINGE
BENEFITS
Unemployment Compensation [4,049,400] 4,047,500
Higher Education Alternative Retirement [101,569,100] 50,620,000
System
Pensions and Retirements - Other Statutory 2,433,850
Judges and Compensation Commissioners [31,587,446] 31,945,712
Retirement
Insurance - Group Life 9,736,350
Employers Social Security Tax [227,326,623] 228,500,654
State Employees Health Service Cost [708,024,030] 800,787,930
Retired State Employees Health Service Cost [957,183,800] 996,028,080
Tuition Reimbursement - Training and 150,000
Travel
Other Post Employment Benefits [65,073,558] 65,541,816
SERS Defined Contribution Match [27,991,712] 28,163,281
State Employees Retirement Contributions - [201,080,536] 201,019,273
Normal Cost
State Employees Retirement Contributions - [1,324,870,699] 1,330,298,497
UAL
AGENCY TOTAL [3,661,077,104] 3,749,272,943
Public Act No. 26-68 21 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
RESERVE FOR SALARY ADJUSTMENTS
Reserve For Salary Adjustments 186,551,369
WORKERS' COMPENSATION CLAIMS -
ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Workers' Compensation Claims 6,509,800
Workers' Compensation Claims – University 2,271,228
of Connecticut
Claims – University of Connecticut Health 3,460,985
Center
Workers' Compensation Claims – Board of 3,289,276
Regents Higher Ed
Claims – Department of Children and 10,036,952
Families
Workers' Compensation Claims Mental 18,061,027
Health & Addiction Serv
Claim Department of Emergency Services 3,723,135
and Public Protection
Claims – Department of Developmental 12,073,417
Services
Workers' Compensation Claims – 37,722,823
Department of Correction
AGENCY TOTAL 97,148,643
TOTAL - GENERAL FUND [25,455,622,254] 24,968,235,361
LESS:
Unallocated Lapse -73,710,570
Unallocated Lapse - Judicial -5,000,000
Targeted Savings -15,000,000
NET - GENERAL FUND [25,361,911,684] 24,874,524,791
Sec. 2. (Effective July 1, 2026) The amounts appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, in section 2 of public act 25-168, regarding the
SPECIAL TRANSPORTATION FUND are amended to read as follows:
Public Act No. 26-68 22 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
2026-2027
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
OFFICE OF POLICY AND MANAGEMENT
Personal Services 770,498
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE
SERVICES
Personal Services 2,937,990
State Insurance and Risk Mgmt Operations [17,467,920] 20,467,920
IT Services 1,619,686
AGENCY TOTAL [22,025,596] 25,025,596
REGULATION AND PROTECTION
DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES
Personal Services 53,959,126
Other Expenses [19,778,262] 20,367,072
Equipment 668,756
DMV Modernization 3,000,000
Commercial Vehicle Information Systems 324,676
and Networks Project
AGENCY TOTAL [77,730,820] 78,319,630
CONSERVATION AND DEVELOPMENT
DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY AND
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION
Personal Services 3,781,576
Other Expenses 665,006
AGENCY TOTAL 4,446,582
TRANSPORTATION
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Personal Services 236,076,271
Public Act No. 26-68 23 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Other Expenses [63,434,586] 63,534,586
Equipment [1,376,329] 2,176,329
Minor Capital Projects 449,639
Highway Planning And Research [3,060,131] 3,905,131
Rail Operations [318,803,218] 341,466,521
Bus Operations [301,407,448] 325,065,967
ADA Para-transit Program [51,982,687] 53,535,914
Non-ADA Dial-A-Ride Program 576,361
Pay-As-You-Go Transportation Projects 18,054,208
Transportation Asset Management 3,004,254
Transportation to Work [2,370,629] 2,500,629
AGENCY TOTAL [1,000,595,761] 1,050,345,810
NON-FUNCTIONAL
DEBT SERVICE - STATE TREASURER
Debt Service [1,025,610,574] 962,448,294
STATE COMPTROLLER -
MISCELLANEOUS
Nonfunctional - Change to Accruals 5,337,671
STATE COMPTROLLER - FRINGE
BENEFITS
Unemployment Compensation 360,000
Insurance - Group Life 401,600
Employers Social Security Tax 21,697,231
State Employees Health Service Cost [65,927,200] 80,108,200
Other Post Employment Benefits 4,321,112
SERS Defined Contribution Match 1,835,222
State Employees Retirement Contributions - [23,334,444] 23,327,335
Normal Cost
State Employees Retirement Contributions - [136,192,810] 136,648,679
UAL
AGENCY TOTAL [254,069,619] 268,699,379
RESERVE FOR SALARY ADJUSTMENTS
Public Act No. 26-68 24 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Reserve For Salary Adjustments 19,864,541
WORKERS' COMPENSATION CLAIMS -
ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Workers' Compensation Claims 6,723,297
TOTAL - SPECIAL TRANSPORTATION [2,417,174,959] 2,421,981,298
FUND
LESS:
Unallocated Lapse -12,000,000
NET - SPECIAL TRANSPORTATION FUND [2,405,174,959] 2,409,981,298
Sec. 3. (Effective July 1, 2026) The amounts appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, in section 3 of public act 25-168, regarding the
MASHANTUCKET PEQUOT AND MOHEGAN FUND are amended
to read as follows:
2026-2027
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
OFFICE OF POLICY AND MANAGEMENT
Grants To Towns [52,541,796] 54,141,796
CONSERVATION AND DEVELOPMENT
DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY AND
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION
Various Grants 150,000
TOTAL - MASHANTUCKET PEQUOT AND [52,541,796] 54,291,796
MOHEGAN FUND
Public Act No. 26-68 25 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 4. (Effective July 1, 2026) The amounts appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, in section 4 of public act 25-168, regarding the
BANKING FUND are amended to read as follows:
2026-2027
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE
SERVICES
Personal Services [413,105] 462,372
Fringe Benefits [307,747] 346,176
IT Services 360,334
AGENCY TOTAL [1,081,186] 1,168,882
REGULATION AND PROTECTION
DEPARTMENT OF BANKING
Personal Services [15,496,809] 13,667,742
Other Expenses [1,375,510] 1,345,510
Equipment 44,900
Fringe Benefits [12,399,055] 10,438,126
Indirect Overhead 1,404,178
AGENCY TOTAL [30,720,452] 26,900,456
LABOR DEPARTMENT
Opportunity Industrial Centers [738,708] 813,708
Customized Services 965,689
AGENCY TOTAL [1,704,397] 1,779,397
CONSERVATION AND DEVELOPMENT
DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING
Fair Housing 670,000
EDUCATION
Public Act No. 26-68 26 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
OFFICE OF HIGHER EDUCATION
Personal Services 279,800
Other Expenses 30,000
Fringe Benefits 222,500
AGENCY TOTAL 532,300
JUDICIAL
JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
Foreclosure Mediation Program 2,158,656
NON-FUNCTIONAL
STATE COMPTROLLER -
MISCELLANEOUS
Nonfunctional - Change to Accruals 261,199
TOTAL - BANKING FUND [36,595,890] 33,470,890
Sec. 5. (Effective July 1, 2026) The amounts appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, in section 5 of public act 25-168, regarding the
INSURANCE FUND are amended to read as follows:
2026-2027
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
OFFICE OF POLICY AND MANAGEMENT
Personal Services 374,039
Other Expenses [6,012] 9,253,008
Fringe Benefits 277,130
AGENCY TOTAL [657,181] 9,904,177
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE
SERVICES
Personal Services [905,796] 1,006,493
Public Act No. 26-68 27 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Fringe Benefits [656,984] 735,528
IT Services 514,136
AGENCY TOTAL [2,076,916] 2,256,157
REGULATION AND PROTECTION
INSURANCE DEPARTMENT
Personal Services [17,428,950] 17,328,253
Other Expenses [1,609,489] 1,809,489
Equipment 62,500
Fringe Benefits [13,071,712] 13,528,237
Indirect Overhead [1,594,604] 1,411,492
AGENCY TOTAL [33,767,255] 34,139,971
OFFICE OF THE HEALTHCARE
ADVOCATE
Personal Services [1,947,836] 2,053,260
Other Expenses 292,991
Equipment 5,000
Fringe Benefits [1,831,655] 1,718,526
Indirect Overhead [79,775] 44,424
AGENCY TOTAL [4,157,257] 4,114,201
CONSERVATION AND DEVELOPMENT
DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING
Crumbling Foundations 182,977
HEALTH
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH
Needle and Syringe Exchange Program 513,515
Children's Health Initiatives 3,389,838
AIDS Services 5,366,231
Breast and Cervical Cancer Detection and 2,563,100
Treatment
Public Act No. 26-68 28 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Immunization Services 50,845,097
X-Ray Screening and Tuberculosis Care [971,849] 871,849
Venereal Disease Control 203,256
AGENCY TOTAL [63,852,886] 63,752,886
OFFICE OF HEALTH STRATEGY
[Personal Services] [1,487,574]
[Other Expenses] [10,398,780]
[Equipment] [10,000]
[Fringe Benefits] [1,406,339]
[AGENCY TOTAL] [13,302,693]
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HEALTH
AND ADDICTION SERVICES
Managed Service System 462,699
HUMAN SERVICES
OFFICE OF THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
ADVOCATE
[Personal Services] [387,000]
[Other Expenses] [65,500]
[Fringe Benefits] [401,000]
[Indirect Overhead] [22,500]
[AGENCY TOTAL] [876,000]
OFFICE OF THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
ADVOCATE
Personal Services 387,000
Other Expenses 65,500
Fringe Benefits 401,000
Indirect Overhead 22,500
AGENCY TOTAL 876,000
DEPARTMENT OF AGING AND
DISABILITY SERVICES
Fall Prevention 382,660
Public Act No. 26-68 29 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
NON-FUNCTIONAL
STATE COMPTROLLER -
MISCELLANEOUS
Nonfunctional - Change to Accruals 391,026
TOTAL - INSURANCE FUND [120,109,550] 116,462,754
Sec. 6. (Effective July 1, 2026) The amounts appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, in section 6 of public act 25-168, regarding the
CONSUMER COUNSEL AND PUBLIC UTILITY CONTROL FUND are
amended to read as follows:
2026-2027
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
OFFICE OF POLICY AND MANAGEMENT
Personal Services 200,396
Other Expenses 2,000
Fringe Benefits 196,074
AGENCY TOTAL 398,470
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE
SERVICES
Personal Services 96,173
Fringe Benefits 88,135
AGENCY TOTAL 184,308
REGULATION AND PROTECTION
OFFICE OF CONSUMER COUNSEL
Personal Services [2,288,944] 2,468,944
Other Expenses 461,482
Equipment 2,200
Public Act No. 26-68 30 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Fringe Benefits [1,724,601] 1,844,601
Indirect Overhead [157,648] 124,209
AGENCY TOTAL [4,634,875] 4,901,436
PUBLIC UTILITIES REGULATORY
AUTHORITY
Personal Services 10,758,487
Other Expenses 335,000
Fringe Benefits 8,316,311
AGENCY TOTAL 19,409,798
CONSERVATION AND DEVELOPMENT
DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY AND
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION
Personal Services [17,340,038] 6,581,551
Other Expenses [1,479,367] 1,144,367
Equipment 19,500
Fringe Benefits [12,689,262] 5,087,538
Indirect Overhead [489,330] 354,058
AGENCY TOTAL [32,017,497] 13,187,014
NON-FUNCTIONAL
STATE COMPTROLLER -
MISCELLANEOUS
Nonfunctional - Change to Accruals 284,112
TOTAL - CONSUMER COUNSEL AND [37,519,262] 38,365,138
PUBLIC UTILITY CONTROL FUND
Sec. 7. (Effective July 1, 2026) The amounts appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, in section 7 of public act 25-168, regarding the
WORKERS' COMPENSATION FUND are amended to read as follows:
2026-2027
Public Act No. 26-68 31 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE
SERVICES
Personal Services [663,688] 781,925
Fringe Benefits [528,600] 620,825
IT Services 199,938
AGENCY TOTAL [1,392,226] 1,602,688
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE
Personal Services 474,947
Other Expenses 10,428
Fringe Benefits 489,396
AGENCY TOTAL 974,771
REGULATION AND PROTECTION
LABOR DEPARTMENT
Occupational Health Clinics 708,113
WORKERS' COMPENSATION
COMMISSION
Personal Services [9,841,921] 9,868,493
Other Expenses 2,476,091
Equipment 1
Fringe Benefits [8,561,814] 8,513,611
Indirect Overhead [1,586,205] 1,134,936
AGENCY TOTAL [22,466,032] 21,993,132
HUMAN SERVICES
DEPARTMENT OF AGING AND
DISABILITY SERVICES
Personal Services 634,783
Other Expenses 48,440
Rehabilitative Services 595,631
Public Act No. 26-68 32 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Fringe Benefits 467,987
AGENCY TOTAL 1,746,841
NON-FUNCTIONAL
STATE COMPTROLLER -
MISCELLANEOUS
Nonfunctional - Change to Accruals 149,142
TOTAL - WORKERS' COMPENSATION [27,437,125] 27,174,687
FUND
Sec. 8. (Effective July 1, 2026) The amounts appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, in section 9 of public act 25-168, regarding the
TOURISM FUND are amended to read as follows:
2026-2027
CONSERVATION AND DEVELOPMENT
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC AND
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
Statewide Marketing 4,500,000
Hartford Urban Arts Grant [242,371] 440,252
New Britain Arts Council 39,380
Westville Village Renaissance Alliance 145,000
Neighborhood Music School 200,540
Greater Hartford Community Foundation 150,000
Travelers Championship
CT Convention & Sports Bureau 500,000
Nutmeg Games 40,000
Discovery Museum 196,895
National Theatre of the Deaf 78,758
Connecticut Science Center [546,626] 746,626
CT Flagship Producing Theaters Grant 360,000
Performing Arts Centers 787,571
Performing Theaters Grant [900,600] 1,044,639
Public Act No. 26-68 33 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Arts Commission 1,497,298
Art Museum Consortium 887,313
Litchfield Jazz Festival 29,000
Arte Inc. [20,735] 70,735
CT Virtuosi Orchestra 15,250
Barnum Museum 50,000
Various Grants [1,090,000] 1,122,000
Creative Youth Productions 300,000
Music Haven 100,000
West Hartford Pride 80,000
Amistad Center for Arts and Culture 100,000
Leffingwell House Museum 50,000
CT Main Street Center 350,000
Norwalk International Cultural Exchange – 50,000
NICE Festival
Ball & Socket Arts [300,000] 650,000
[CT Main Street Center] [350,000]
Greater Hartford Arts Council 74,079
Stepping Stones Museum for Children 80,863
Maritime Center Authority 803,705
Connecticut Humanities Council [1,360,000] 2,400,000
Amistad Committee for the Freedom Trail 36,414
New Haven Festival of Arts and Ideas 414,511
New Haven Arts Council 77,000
Beardsley Zoo 400,000
Mystic Aquarium 472,397
Northwestern Tourism 400,000
Eastern Tourism 400,000
Central Tourism 400,000
Twain/Stowe Homes 81,196
Cultural Alliance of Fairfield 52,000
Stamford Downtown Special Services District 50,000
AGENCY TOTAL [18,709,502] 20,723,422
Sec. 9. (Effective July 1, 2026) The amounts appropriated for the fiscal
Public Act No. 26-68 34 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
year ending June 30, 2027, in section 12 of public act 25-168, regarding
the MUNICIPAL REVENUE SHARING FUND are amended to read as
follows:
2026-2027
GENERAL GOVERNMENT
OFFICE OF POLICY AND MANAGEMENT
Supplemental Revenue Sharing Grants 85,932,470
Motor Vehicle Tax Grants [127,496,890] 111,581,971
Tiered PILOT [345,980,314] 354,284,704
AGENCY TOTAL [559,409,674] 551,799,145
Sec. 10. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions of
subsection (j) of section 45a-82 of the general statutes, any balance in the
Probate Court Administration Fund on June 30, 2026, shall remain in
said fund and shall not be transferred to the General Fund.
Sec. 11. Section 31 of public act 25-168 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
The sum of $500,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of [this
act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the State Library, for
Other Expenses, for [each of the fiscal years] the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, and $500,000 of the amount appropriated in said section to the
State Library, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
shall be made available for grants in equal amounts to the following
library-related programs: (1) United Way of Central and Northeastern
Connecticut, for the Dolly Parton Imagination Library; (2) Read to
Grow; and (3) Reach Out and Read.
Sec. 12. Section 36 of public act 25-168, as amended by section 179 of
public act 25-174, is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
Public Act No. 26-68 35 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(a) The sum of $3,000,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
[this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for [Other Expenses] Various Grants, for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in said fiscal year to
provide a grant to EastCONN Regional Educational Service Center.
(b) The sum of $900,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
[this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for [Other Expenses] Various Grants, for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in said fiscal year to
provide a grant to EdAdvance Regional Educational Service Center.
(c) The sum of $20,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of [this
act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, [and June 30, 2027] and the sum of $20,000 of the
amount appropriated in said section to the Department of Education,
for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Norwalk
MLK Scholarship Fund.
(d) The sum of $100,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
and the sum of $100,000 of such amount appropriated in said section to
the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in said fiscal years for
robotics.
(e) The sum of $800,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
[this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $800,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Public Act No. 26-68 36 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Brother Carl
Institute.
(f) The sum of $150,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
[this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $150,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Artists
Collective.
(g) The sum of $100,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
[this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $100,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Girls on the
Run Greater Connecticut.
(h) The sum of $350,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
[this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $350,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Big Brothers
and Big Sisters of Connecticut for mentoring in the cities of Hartford and
New Haven.
(i) The sum of $200,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
[this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Public Act No. 26-68 37 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $200,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to the town of
Middletown for youth programming.
(j) The sum of $100,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
[this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $100,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to the Boys and
Girls Club of Lower Naugatuck Valley for operational support.
(k) The sum of $100,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
[this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $100,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Hartford
Knights.
(l) The sum of $15,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of [this
act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $15,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Hartford
Youth Programming.
Public Act No. 26-68 38 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(m) The sum of $150,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
[this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $150,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Active City
for youth athletics.
(n) The sum of $100,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
[this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $100,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Serving All
Vessels Equally (SAVE), Inc. in Norwalk.
(o) The sum of $2,000,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
[this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $2,000,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years for electrical and computer
engineering recruitment and after school K-2 reading tutoring.
(p) The sum of $25,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
[this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $25,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to EdAdvance
Public Act No. 26-68 39 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
School Readiness Council.
(q) The sum of $210,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
[this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $210,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Stamford
Public Education Foundation.
(r) The sum of $1,000,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
[this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $1,000,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Full Circle
Youth Empowerment.
(s) The sum of $100,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
[this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $100,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Bridgeport
Youth Lacrosse.
(t) The sum of $200,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
[this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $200,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Public Act No. 26-68 40 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to New Haven
Reads.
(u) The sum of $200,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
[this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Other Expenses, for [each of] the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $200,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Thompson
Alliance District.
(v) The sum of $150,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
[this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
and the sum of $200,000 of [such] the amount appropriated in said
section to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in said fiscal years to
provide a grant to Big Brothers Big Sisters.
(w) The sum of $20,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
[this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June 30,
2026, and the sum of $70,000 of the amount appropriated in said section
to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in [each of] said fiscal years
to provide a grant to Girls on the Run Greater Connecticut.
(x) The sum of $450,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
[this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
and the sum of $350,000 of [such] the amount appropriated in said
section to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal
Public Act No. 26-68 41 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in said fiscal years to
provide a grant to Effective School Solutions.
(y) The sum of $100,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
[this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
shall be made available in said fiscal year to provide a grant to Athlife.
(z) The sum of $100,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
[this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June 30,
2026, and the sum of $100,000 of the amount appropriated in said section
to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in [each of] said fiscal years
to provide a grant to the Connecticut Association of Boards of Education
for boards of education training.
[(AA)] (aa) The sum of $400,000 of the amount appropriated in
section 1 of [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the
Department of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, and the sum of $200,000 of [such] the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in said fiscal years to provide a grant to the Connecticut
Association of Schools/Connecticut Interscholastic Athletic Conference
for Curriculum Development.
[(BB)] (bb) The sum of $200,000 of the amount appropriated in section
1 of [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the
Department of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, shall be made available in said fiscal year to provide a
grant to Free Agent Now.
[(CC)] (cc) The sum of $5,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1
Public Act No. 26-68 42 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
of [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department
of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June
30, 2026, [and June 30, 2027,] shall be made available in [each of] said
fiscal [years] year to provide a grant to Martin Luther King Scholarship
Committee of Greater Middletown.
[(DD)] (dd) The sum of $175,000 of the amount appropriated in
section 1 of [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the
Department of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $175,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in said fiscal years to provide a grant to VR Sim.
[(EE)] (ee) The sum of $10,000 of the amount appropriated in section
1 of [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the
Department of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, shall be made available in said fiscal year to provide a
grant to Greenwich YMCA Scholarship Program.
[(FF)] (ff) The sum of $30,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1
of [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department
of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June
30, 2026, and the sum of $30,000 of the amount appropriated in said
section to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in said fiscal years to
provide a grant to the town of Waterford for school lunch debt.
[(GG)] (gg) The sum of $36,000 of the amount appropriated in section
1 of [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the
Department of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $36,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
Public Act No. 26-68 43 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to the town of
Montville for school lunch debt.
[(HH)] (hh) The sum of $25,000 of the amount appropriated in section
1 of [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the
Department of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $25,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Fairfield
River-Lab.
[(II)] (ii) The sum of $200,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1
of [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department
of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June
30, 2026, and the sum of $200,000 of the amount appropriated in said
section to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in [each of] said fiscal
years to provide a grant to Bridgeport Caribe Youth Leaders.
[(JJ)] (jj) The sum of $175,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1
of [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department
of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June
30, 2026, and the sum of $175,000 of the amount appropriated in said
section to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in [each of] said fiscal
years to provide a grant to Elevate Bridgeport.
[(KK)] (kk) The sum of $75,000 of the amount appropriated in section
1 of [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the
Department of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $75,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
Public Act No. 26-68 44 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to the
[Bridgeport Board of Education] United Way of Coastal Fairfield
County for the Bridgeport Public Schools Debate League.
[(LL)] (ll) The sum of $25,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1
of [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department
of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year ending June
30, 2026, and the sum of $25,000 of the amount appropriated in said
section to the Department of Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in [each of] said fiscal
years to provide a grant to Yellow Mill Scholarship Fund.
[(MM)] (mm) The sum of $1,500,000 of the amount appropriated in
section 1 of [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the
Department of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $1,500,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Waterbury
Promise.
[(NN)] (nn) The sum of $250,000 of the amount appropriated in
section 1 of [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the
Department of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $250,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Meriden Boys
and Girls Club.
[(OO)] (oo) The sum of $10,000 of the amount appropriated in section
1 of [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the
Department of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, [and June 30, 2027,] shall be made available in
Public Act No. 26-68 45 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
[each of] said fiscal [years] year to provide a grant to Newington Public
Schools for diverse library circulation materials.
[(PP)] (pp) The sum of $25,000 of the amount appropriated in section
1 of [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the
Department of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $25,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Boys and
Girls Club of Milford for AI training.
[(QQ)] (qq) The sum of $500,000 of the amount appropriated in
section 1 of [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the
Department of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $500,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to New London
Public Schools Pre-K and early childhood, including transitional
kindergarten.
[(RR)] (rr) The sum of $90,000 of the amount appropriated in section
1 of [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the
Department of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $90,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Stamford
Public Education Foundation.
[(SS)] (ss) The sum of $50,000 of the amount appropriated in section
1 of [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the
Department of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year
Public Act No. 26-68 46 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $50,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Sound
Waters, [Summer Camp] $25,000 of which shall be used for summer
camp and $25,000 of which shall be used for job training.
[(TT)] (tt) The sum of $250,000 of the amount appropriated in section
1 of [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the
Department of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $250,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to Windham
Public Schools.
[(UU)] (uu) The sum of $750,000 of the amount appropriated in
section 1 of [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the
Department of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $750,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Teacher Residency RESC Alliance, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2027, shall be made available in [each of] said fiscal years for a teacher
residency program operated by the RESC Alliance.
[(VV)] (vv) The sum of $500,000 of the amount appropriated in
section 1 of [this act] public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the
Department of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal [years] year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $500,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in [each of] said fiscal years to provide a grant to the State
Education Resource Center for disconnected youth programming.
Public Act No. 26-68 47 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(ww) The sum of $75,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
shall be made available in said fiscal year to provide a grant to DT Cares.
(xx) The sum of $150,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
shall be made available in said fiscal year to provide a grant to African
Caribbean American Parents of Children with Disabilities.
(yy) The sum of $200,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
shall be made available in said fiscal year to provide a grant to
CIAC/CAS.
(zz) The sum of $100,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
shall be made available in said fiscal year to provide a grant to Athlife.
(A) The sum of $500,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Magnet Schools, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
shall be made available in said fiscal year to provide a grant to Goodwin
University Magnet Schools.
(B) The sum of $125,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
shall be made available in said fiscal year to provide a grant to Big
Brothers Big Sisters.
(C) The sum of $150,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
Public Act No. 26-68 48 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
shall be made available in said fiscal year to provide a grant to CAS.
(D) The sum of $30,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
shall be made available in said fiscal year to provide a grant to Bethel
High School All Sports Booster Club.
(E) The sum of $80,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
shall be made available in said fiscal year to provide a grant to Plainville
Public Schools.
(F) The sum of $100,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
shall be made available in said fiscal year to provide a grant to
Waterford Public Schools.
(G) The sum of $75,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
shall be made available in said fiscal year to provide a grant to Scotland
Elementary School Extended School Year Program.
(H) The sum of $75,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
shall be made available in said fiscal year to provide a grant to Parent
Leadership Training Institute.
(I) The sum of $80,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
Public Act No. 26-68 49 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
shall be made available in said fiscal year to provide a grant to Rocky
Hill Board of Education to enclose library and art spaces at West Hill
School.
(J) The sum of $100,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
shall be made available in said fiscal year to provide a grant to
Newington Board of Education for Nor'easter Academy.
(K) The sum of $250,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of
Education, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
shall be made available in said fiscal year to provide a grant to
Middletown Public Schools for school security.
Sec. 13. (Effective from passage) Up to $100,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by this act, to the Department of Economic and Community
Development, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and
made available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, to provide a
grant to CFAL for Digital Inclusion for literacy training.
Sec. 14. (Effective from passage) Up to $250,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by this act, to the Department of Economic and Community
Development, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and
made available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, to provide a
grant to RESC Alliance.
Public Act No. 26-68 50 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 15. (Effective from passage) The sum of $200,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to
the Department of Education, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, and made available to provide a grant to Free
Agent Now, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and such funds shall be
carried forward and made available during the fiscal year ending June
30, 2027, for the same purpose.
Sec. 16. (Effective from passage) The following sums from the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to
the Judicial Department, for Youth Services Prevention, for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, shall be made available in said fiscal year as
follows:
(1) $75,000 to Dominican American Coalition of Connecticut, Inc.;
(2) $30,000 to Intempo Organization, Inc.;
(3) $200,000 to My Architecture Workshops, Inc.;
(4) $50,000 to Second Chance Re-entry Initiative Program (SCRIP);
and
(5) $55,000 to Tri-Town Youth Services.
Sec. 17. Section 9 of public act 26-1 is amended to read as follows
(Effective from passage):
The sum of $1,500,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of
public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Department of Social
Services, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
and the sum of $1,000,000 of such amount appropriated for the fiscal
year ending June 20, 2027, shall be made available in said fiscal years for
grants [to] in support of school districts in Newington, Wethersfield,
Cromwell, Rocky Hill and Middletown for the support or establishment
Public Act No. 26-68 51 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
of high acuity, school-based mental health programming. For purposes
of this section, (1) "high acuity, school-based mental health
programming" means programming offered by a qualified provider that
includes (A) clinical care to prevent the need for out-of-district
placements for students with intensive behavioral health challenges or
return such students from such placements to their home districts, (B)
in-person therapeutic services provided in a designated school space by
mental health clinicians who have attained at least a master's degree in
a related mental health education program, and (C) therapeutic support
capabilities, including, but not limited to, regular clinical supervision,
quality and risk management data analysis and monitoring and specific
interventions meant to reduce chronic student absenteeism; and (2)
"qualified provider" means a provider of high acuity, school-based
mental health programming that is designated as an outpatient
psychiatric clinic for children by the Department of Children and
Families and certified or contracted to bill Medicaid or commercial
insurance in the state.
Sec. 18. (Effective from passage) Up to $500,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to
the Department of Economic and Community Development, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not lapse
on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and made available
during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-in-aid to the town
of Glastonbury for parks and recreation.
Sec. 19. (Effective from passage) Up to $50,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to
the Department of Economic and Community Development, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not lapse
on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and made available
during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-in-aid to PARC,
Inc. in the town of Plainville.
Public Act No. 26-68 52 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 20. (Effective from passage) Up to $85,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to
the Department of Economic and Community Development, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for projects in
the town of Newington, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be
carried forward and made available during the fiscal year ending June
30, 2027, for such projects as follows: (1) Up to $15,000 for town pools
project planning; (2) up to $30,000 for fire department planning; (3) up
to $20,000 for animal shelter planning; and (4) up to $20,000 for Lucy
Robbins Welles Library renovation planning.
Sec. 21. (Effective from passage) Up to $10,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to
the Department of Economic and Community Development, for
Various Grants, to provide a grant-in-aid to A Little Compassion, for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and
shall be made available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, to
provide a grant-in-aid to Tri-Town Youth Services Bureau.
Sec. 22. (Effective from passage) Up to $50,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to
the Department of Economic and Community Development, for
Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not lapse
on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and made available
during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, to provide a grant-in-aid to
the Stratford Veterans Museum.
Sec. 23. (Effective from passage) Up to $250,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to
the Department of Energy and Environmental Protection, for Other
Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not lapse on June
30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and made available during the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, to provide a grant-in-aid to Sustainable
CT.
Public Act No. 26-68 53 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 24. (Effective from passage) Up to $1,000,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to
the Office of Policy and Management, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be
carried forward and made available during the fiscal year ending June
30, 2027, to provide a grant-in-aid to the city of Hartford for outdoor
recreation.
Sec. 25. (Effective from passage) Up to $50,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to
the State Library, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and
made available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, to provide a
grant-in-aid to the town of Middletown for Russell Library.
Sec. 26. (Effective from passage) Up to $4,730,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to
the Department of Energy and Environmental Protection, for Other
Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not lapse on June
30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and made available during the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, to reimburse the city of Hartford for
work performed at Batterson Park.
Sec. 27. (Effective from passage) (a) The sum of $1,750,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to
the Judicial Department, for Legal Aid, for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, and made available for the Right to Counsel program, shall not
lapse on June 30, 2026, and such funds shall be carried forward and
made available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for the same
purpose.
(b) Up to $2,500,000 of the amount appropriated in section 1 of public
act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Judicial Department, for Legal
Aid, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, and made available for the
Public Act No. 26-68 54 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Right to Counsel program, shall not lapse on June 30, 2027, and such
funds shall be carried forward and made available during the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2028, for the same purpose.
Sec. 28. (Effective from passage) The unexpended balance of funds
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to
the Office of Early Childhood, for Early Care and Education, for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and
shall be transferred to the Office of Early Childhood, for Care4Kids
TANF/CCDF, and made available during the fiscal year ending June 30,
2027, for the family child care provider agreement.
Sec. 29. (Effective from passage) Up to $200,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by this act, to the Department of Economic and Community
Development, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and
made available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-
in-aid to Southend Senior Center in the city of Hartford.
Sec. 30. (Effective from passage) Up to $200,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by this act, to the Department of Economic and Community
Development, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and
made available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-
in-aid to Parkville Senior Center.
Sec. 31. (Effective from passage) Up to $200,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by this act, to the Department of Economic and Community
Development, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and
made available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-
Public Act No. 26-68 55 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
in-aid to Wethersfield Senior Center.
Sec. 32. (Effective from passage) Up to $90,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by this act, to the Department of Economic and Community
Development, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and
made available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-
in-aid to Hartford Communities That Care for musical instruments and
instruction.
Sec. 33. (Effective from passage) Up to $90,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by this act, to the Department of Economic and Community
Development, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and
made available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-
in-aid to SAND Elementary School in the city of Hartford for musical
instruments and instruction.
Sec. 34. (Effective from passage) Up to $90,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by this act, to the Department of Economic and Community
Development, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and
made available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-
in-aid to Kennelly School in the city of Hartford for musical instruments
and instruction.
Sec. 35. (Effective from passage) Up to $90,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by this act, to the Department of Economic and Community
Development, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and
Public Act No. 26-68 56 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
made available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-
in-aid to Naylor School in the city of Hartford for musical instruments
and instruction.
Sec. 36. (Effective from passage) Up to $250,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by this act, to the Department of Economic and Community
Development, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and
made available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-
in-aid to Wethersfield Early Childhood Collaborative for recruitment
ambassadors.
Sec. 37. (Effective from passage) Up to $525,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by this act, to the Department of Economic and Community
Development, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and
made available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-
in-aid to Clay Arsenal CDC.
Sec. 38. (Effective from passage) Up to $500,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by this act, to the Department of Emergency Services and
Public Protection, for Other Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be transferred to the
Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection, for Various
Grants, and made available, during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
for a grant-in-aid to the city of Bridgeport for its police department
drone program.
Sec. 39. (Effective from passage) Up to $200,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by this act, to the Department of Economic and Community
Public Act No. 26-68 57 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Development, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and
made available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-
in-aid to the Naugatuck American Legion.
Sec. 40. (Effective from passage) Up to $450,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by this act, to the Department of Education, for Other
Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not lapse on June
30, 2026, and shall be transferred to the Department of Education, for
Various Grants, and made available during the fiscal year ending June
30, 2027, for a grant-in-aid to Effective School Solutions.
Sec. 41. (Effective from passage) Up to $1,150,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by this act, to the Department of Economic and Community
Development, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and
made available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-
in-aid to Working Cities Challenge/Middletown Works.
Sec. 42. (Effective from passage) Up to $600,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by this act, to the Department of Economic and Community
Development, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and
made available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-
in-aid to Milford Founders Walk.
Sec. 43. (Effective from passage) Up to $100,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by this act, to the Judicial Department, for Youth Services
Prevention, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not lapse on
June 30, 2026, and shall be transferred to the Department of Economic
Public Act No. 26-68 58 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
and Community Development, for Various Grants, and made available
during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-in-aid to My
Architecture Workshops.
Sec. 44. (Effective from passage) Up to $20,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by this act, to the Judicial Department, for Other Expenses, for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and
shall be carried forward and made available during the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-in-aid to Middletown Racial Justice.
Sec. 45. (Effective from passage) Up to $1,000,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by this act, to the Department of Economic and Community
Development, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and
made available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-
in-aid to the town of Manchester for parks and recreation.
Sec. 46. (Effective from passage) Up to $250,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by this act, to the Department of Economic and Community
Development, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and
made available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-
in-aid to the town of Bolton for parks and recreation.
Sec. 47. (Effective from passage) The sum of $500,000 appropriated in
section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to Connecticut
State Colleges and Universities, for Charter Oak State College, for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and
shall be transferred to the Connecticut State Colleges and Universities,
for Various Grants, and made available during the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2027, for AI Academy.
Public Act No. 26-68 59 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 48. (Effective from passage) Up to $150,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by this act, to the Department of Economic and Community
Development, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and
made available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-
in-aid to Middletown Board of Education.
Sec. 49. (Effective from passage) Up to $1,500,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by this act, to the Department of Social Services, for Other
Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not lapse on June
30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and made available during the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-in-aid to Effective School
Solutions.
Sec. 50. (Effective from passage) Up to $90,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by this act, to the Department of Economic and Community
Development, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and
made available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-
in-aid to Connecticut AI Alliance for an AI symposium grant.
Sec. 51. (Effective from passage) Up to $25,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
amended by this act, to the Department of Education, for Other
Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not lapse on June
30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and made available during the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, for a grant-in-aid to Burns Latino
Academy for musical instruments and instruction.
Sec. 52. (Effective July 1, 2026) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management shall distribute
Public Act No. 26-68 60 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
$250,000 as a regional performance incentive program grant to the
Southeastern Connecticut Council of Governments for a pilot program
to consolidate public service answering points.
Sec. 53. (Effective July 1, 2026) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management shall distribute
$800,000 as a regional performance incentive program grant to the
Capitol Region Council of Governments for CTFastrak east expansion.
Sec. 54. (Effective from passage) In addition to payments due to
municipalities and districts under subsection (e) of section 4-66p of the
general statutes, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, each
municipality listed below shall receive the following supplemental
revenue sharing grant from the General Fund:
Grantee Grant Amount
Waterbury 3,000,000
Manchester 800,000
Vernon 500,000
Sec. 55. (Effective from passage) Section 9 of public act 26-42 shall take
effect July 1, 2027.
Sec. 56. Subsection (e) of section 8-169jj of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(e) The authority shall have the power to negotiate, and, with the
approval of the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management and
the legislative body of the municipality in which a development district
is located, or when the legislative body is the town meeting, the board
of selectmen, to enter into an agreement with any private developer,
owner or lessee of any building or improvement located on land in a
Public Act No. 26-68 61 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
development district providing for payments to the authority in lieu of
real property taxes. Such an agreement shall [be made a condition of any
private right of development within the development district, and shall]
include a requirement that such private developer, owner or lessee
make good faith efforts to hire, or cause to be hired, available and
qualified minority business enterprises, as defined in section 4a-60g, to
provide construction services and materials for improvements to be
constructed within the development district in an effort to achieve a
minority business enterprise utilization goal of ten per cent of the total
costs of construction services and materials for such improvements.
Such payments to the authority in lieu of real property taxes shall have
the same lien and priority, and may be enforced by the authority in the
same manner, as provided for municipal real property taxes. Such
payments as received by the authority shall be used to carry out the
purposes of the authority set forth in subsection (a) of this section.
Sec. 57. Subsection (a) of section 8-169ll of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) (1) Any municipality, except the city of Hartford or the town of
East Hartford, may, by certified resolution of the legislative body of the
municipality, or by the board of selectmen in a municipality where the
legislative body is the town meeting, opt to join the Connecticut
Municipal Development Authority as a member municipality, provided
such municipality holds a public hearing or otherwise provides for
public comment prior to any vote on such certified resolution.
(2) Any municipality that opts to join the authority as a member
municipality or that is deemed a member municipality pursuant to this
subsection shall enter into a memorandum of agreement with the
authority [for the establishment of] to establish one or more
development districts.
Public Act No. 26-68 62 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 58. Subsection (b) of section 8-37x of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(b) The Commissioner of Housing may: (1) Collect and correlate
information regarding housing projects of authorities in the state and
upon request to furnish the authorities, in matters of common interest,
information, advice and the services of expert personnel; (2) study state-
wide needs for the elimination of substandard housing to stimulate state
and city planning involving housing, and otherwise to study housing
needs, both rural and urban, and to formulate proposals for meeting
these needs; (3) study methods of encouraging investment of private
capital in low rent housing; (4) study the necessity, feasibility and
advantage of the use of state credit by way of loan or subsidy to assist
the financing of housing projects for persons of low income; [and] (5)
accept grants-in-aid of any of said commissioner's powers made
pursuant to the provisions of any state or federal law and, for the
purpose of complying with the requirements or recommendations of
any such law, to prepare such plans and specifications and to make such
studies, surveys, reports or recommendations concerning existing or
contemplated housing conditions or projects in the state as may be
necessary or appropriate; and (6) provide for the planning and
construction of a housing project, as defined in section 8-39.
Sec. 59. Section 47a-4d of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) As used in this section, "tenant screening report" means a credit
report, a criminal background report, an employment history report, a
rental history report or any combination thereof, used by a landlord to
determine the suitability of a prospective tenant.
(b) No landlord, third party acting on behalf of a landlord, or third
party acting on behalf of the state may demand from a prospective
Public Act No. 26-68 63 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
tenant any payment, fee or charge for the processing, review or
acceptance of any rental application, or demand any other payment, fee
or charge before or at the beginning of the tenancy, except a security
deposit pursuant to section 47a-21, advance payment for the first
month's rent or a deposit for a key or any special equipment, or a fee for
a tenant screening report as provided in subsection (c) of this section.
No landlord may charge a tenant a move-in or move-out fee.
(c) On and after [October 1, 2023] the effective date of this section, a
landlord, a third party acting on behalf of a landlord, or a third party
acting on behalf of the state may charge a fee not exceeding fifty dollars
plus an adjustment reflecting any increase in the consumer price index
for urban consumers, as determined by the Commissioner of Housing
on an annual basis, for a tenant screening report concerning a
prospective tenant.
(d) A landlord, a third party acting on behalf of a landlord, or a third
party acting on behalf of the state that charges a fee for a tenant
screening report concerning a prospective tenant shall provide the
prospective tenant with (1) a copy of the tenant screening report or, if
the landlord, third party acting on behalf of a landlord, or third party
acting on behalf of the state is prohibited from providing such a copy,
information concerning such report that would allow such tenant to
request a copy of such report from the service provider that produced
such report, and (2) a copy of the receipt or invoice from the entity
conducting the tenant screening report concerning the prospective
tenant.
Sec. 60. Subsection (b) of section 12-263s of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes, as amended by section 361 of public act 25-168, is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026, and applicable to calendar quarters commencing on or after July 1, 2026):
(b) Each taxpayer doing business in this state shall, on or before the
Public Act No. 26-68 64 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
last day of January, April, July and October of each year, render to the
commissioner a quarterly return, on forms prescribed or furnished by
the commissioner and signed by one of the taxpayer's principal officers,
stating specifically the name and location of such taxpayer, the amount
of its net patient revenue [, nursing facility service revenue, intermediate
care facility service revenue] or resident days during the calendar
quarter ending on the last day of the preceding month and such other
information as the commissioner deems necessary for the proper
administration of this section and the state's Medicaid program. The
taxes and fees imposed under section 12-263q or 12-263r shall be due
and payable on the due date of such return. Each taxpayer shall be
required to file such return electronically with the department and to
make such payment by electronic funds transfer in the manner provided
by chapter 228g, irrespective of whether the taxpayer would have
otherwise been required to file such return electronically or to make
such payment by electronic funds transfer under the provisions of said
chapter.
Sec. 61. Sections 359, 363 and 364 of public act 25-168 are repealed.
(Effective from passage)
Sec. 62. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) On and after July 1, 2026, the
Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall issue Pizza State commemorative
number plates of a design to enhance public awareness of the state's
pizza-making tradition and to provide funding to Connecticut
Foodshare. The design shall be determined by the commissioner. No use
shall be made of such plates except as official registration marker plates.
(b) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall charge a fee of sixty-
five dollars for Pizza State commemorative number plates, in addition
to the regular fee or fees prescribed for the registration of a motor
vehicle. The commissioner shall deposit fifteen dollars of such fee into
an account controlled by the Department of Motor Vehicles to be used
for the cost of producing, issuing, renewing and replacing such number
Public Act No. 26-68 65 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
plates, and fifty dollars of such fee into the Pizza State commemorative
account established under subsection (d) of this section. Except as
provided in subsection (f) of this section, no additional fee shall be
charged in connection with the renewal of such number plates. No
transfer fee shall be charged for transfer of an existing registration to or
from a registration with Pizza State commemorative number plates.
Such number plates shall have letters and numbers selected by the
Commissioner of Motor Vehicles. The commissioner may establish a
higher fee for number plates: (1) That contain the numbers and letters
from a previously issued number plate; (2) that contain letters in place
of numbers, as authorized by section 14-49 of the general statutes, in
addition to the fee or fees prescribed for registration under said section;
and (3) that are low number plates issued in accordance with section 14-
160 of the general statutes, in addition to the fee or fees prescribed for
registration under said section. All fees established and collected
pursuant to this section, except moneys designated for administrative
costs of the Department of Motor Vehicles, shall be deposited in the
Pizza State commemorative account.
(c) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles may adopt regulations, in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes, to
establish standards and procedures for the issuance, renewal and
replacement of Pizza State commemorative number plates.
(d) There is established an account to be known as the "Pizza State
commemorative account", which shall be a separate, nonlapsing
account. The account shall contain any moneys required by law to be
deposited in the account. Moneys in the account shall be distributed
annually by the Department of Motor Vehicles to Connecticut
Foodshare. The commissioner may receive private donations to the
account and any such receipts shall be deposited in the account.
(e) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles may provide for the
reproduction and marking of the Pizza State commemorative number
Public Act No. 26-68 66 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
plates image for use on clothing, recreational equipment, posters,
mementoes or other products or programs deemed by the commissioner
to be suitable as a means of supporting the Pizza State commemorative
account. Any moneys received by the commissioner from such
marketing shall be deposited in the account.
(f) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles may allow a registrant to
make an additional voluntary donation of fifteen dollars at the time of
registration renewal for any motor vehicle bearing a Pizza State
commemorative number plate. Any such donation shall be deposited in
the Pizza State commemorative account.
Sec. 63. Subsection (a) of section 29-1r of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(a) There is established a Department of Emergency Services and
Public Protection. Said department shall be the designated emergency
management and homeland security agency for the state. The
department head shall be the Commissioner of Emergency Services and
Public Protection, who shall be appointed by the Governor in
accordance with sections 4-5 to 4-8, inclusive, with the powers and
duties prescribed in said sections. The commissioner shall be
responsible for providing a coordinated, integrated program for the
protection of life and property and for state-wide emergency
management and homeland security. The commissioner shall appoint
not more than [two] three deputy commissioners who shall, under the
direction of the commissioner, assist in the administration of the
department. The commissioner may do all things necessary to apply for,
qualify for and accept any federal funds made available or allotted
under any federal act for emergency management or homeland security.
Sec. 64. Subsection (d) of section 14-21cc of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
Public Act No. 26-68 67 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(d) The funds in the account shall be distributed [quarterly] annually
by the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management to Hispanic-
American Veterans of Connecticut, Inc.
Sec. 65. Subsection (a) of section 4-65a of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(a) There shall be an Office of Policy and Management which shall be
responsible for all aspects of state staff planning and analysis in the
areas of budgeting, management, planning, [energy policy
determination and evaluation,] intergovernmental policy, criminal and
juvenile justice planning and program evaluation. The department head
shall be the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, who shall
be appointed by the Governor in accordance with the provisions of
sections 4-5, 4-6, 4-7 and 4-8, with all the powers and duties therein
prescribed. The Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management shall
be the employer representative (1) in collective bargaining negotiations
concerning changes to the state employees retirement system and health
and welfare benefits, and (2) in all other matters involving collective
bargaining, including negotiation and administration of all collective
bargaining agreements and supplemental understandings between the
state and the state employee unions concerning all executive branch
employees except (A) employees of the Division of Criminal Justice, and
(B) faculty and professional employees of boards of trustees of
constituent units of the state system of higher education. The secretary
may designate a member of the secretary's staff to act as the employer
representative in the secretary's place.
Sec. 66. Subsection (b) of section 7-74 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
Public Act No. 26-68 68 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(b) (1) The fee for a certified copy of a certificate of marriage or death
shall be twenty dollars. Such fees shall not be required of the
department.
(2) Any fee received by the Department of Public Health for a
certificate of death shall be deposited in the neglected cemetery account,
established in accordance with section 19a-308b.
(3) On or before October 31, 2026, and quarterly thereafter, the
Commissioner of Public Health shall certify to the Secretary of the Office
of Policy and Management the amount of fees collected in accordance
with subdivision (1) of this subsection during the immediately
preceding calendar quarter and the balance in the neglected cemetery
account, established in accordance with section 19a-308b, as of the last
day of the immediately preceding calendar quarter.
Sec. 67. Section 46a-52 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The commission shall consist of nine persons. On and after
October 1, 2000, such persons shall be appointed with the advice and
consent of both houses of the General Assembly. (1) On or before July
15, 1990, the Governor shall appoint five members of the commission,
three of whom shall serve for terms of five years and two of whom shall
serve for terms of three years. Upon the expiration of such terms, and
thereafter, the Governor shall appoint either two or three members, as
appropriate, to serve for terms of five years. On or before July 14, 1990,
the president pro tempore of the Senate, the minority leader of the
Senate, the speaker of the House of Representatives and the minority
leader of the House of Representatives shall each appoint one member
to serve for a term of three years. Upon the expiration of such terms, and
thereafter, members so appointed shall serve for terms of three years.
(2) If any vacancy occurs, the appointing authority making the initial
appointment shall appoint a person to serve for the remainder of the
Public Act No. 26-68 69 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
unexpired term. The Governor shall select one of the members of the
commission to serve as chairperson for a term of one year. The
commission shall meet at least once during each two-month period and
at such other times as the chairperson deems necessary. Special
meetings shall be held on the request of a majority of the members of
the commission after notice in accordance with the provisions of section
1-225.
(b) Except as provided in section 46a-57, the members of the
commission shall serve without pay, but their reasonable expenses,
including educational training expenses and expenses for necessary
stenographic and clerical help, shall be paid by the state upon approval
of the Commissioner of Administrative Services. Not later than two
months after appointment to the commission, each member of the
commission shall receive a minimum of ten hours of introductory
training prior to voting on any commission matter. Each year following
such introductory training, each member shall receive five hours of
follow-up training. Such introductory and follow-up training shall
consist of instruction on the laws governing discrimination in
employment, housing, public accommodation and credit, affirmative
action and the procedures of the commission. Such training shall be
organized by the managing director of the legal division of the
commission. Any member who fails to complete such training shall not
vote on any commission matter. Any member who fails to comply with
such introductory training requirement within six months of
appointment shall be deemed to have resigned from office. Any member
who fails to attend three consecutive meetings or who fails to attend
fifty per cent of all meetings held during any calendar year shall be
deemed to have resigned from office.
(c) On or before July 15, 1989, the commission shall appoint an
executive director who shall be the chief executive officer of the
Commission on Human Rights and Opportunities to serve for a term
Public Act No. 26-68 70 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
expiring on July 14, 1990. Upon the expiration of such term and
thereafter, the executive director shall be appointed for a term of four
years. The executive director shall be supervised and annually
evaluated by the commission. The executive director shall serve at the
pleasure of the commission but no longer than four years from July
fifteenth in the year of his or her appointment unless reappointed
pursuant to the provisions of this subsection. The executive director
shall receive an annual salary within the salary range of a salary group
established by the Commissioner of Administrative Services for the
position. The executive director (1) shall conduct comprehensive
planning with respect to the functions of the commission; (2) shall
coordinate the activities of the commission; and (3) shall cause the
administrative organization of the commission to be examined with a
view to promoting economy and efficiency. In accordance with
established procedures, the executive director may enter into such
contractual agreements as may be necessary for the discharge of the
director's duties.
(d) The executive director may appoint no more than two deputy
directors with the approval of a majority of the members of the
commission. The deputy directors shall be supervised by the executive
director and shall assist the executive director in the administration of
the commission, the effectuation of its statutory responsibilities and
such other duties as may be assigned by the executive director. Deputy
directors shall serve at the pleasure of the executive director and
without tenure. The executive director may remove a deputy director
with the approval of a majority of the members of the commission.
[(e) The commission shall be within the Labor Department for
administrative purposes only.]
Sec. 68. Subsection (d) of section 1-84 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
Public Act No. 26-68 71 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(d) No public official or state employee or employee of such public
official or state employee shall agree to accept, or be a member or
employee of a partnership, association, professional corporation or sole
proprietorship which partnership, association, professional corporation
or sole proprietorship agrees to accept any employment, fee or other
thing of value, or portion thereof, for appearing, agreeing to appear, or
taking any other action on behalf of another person before the
Department of Banking, the Office of the Claims Commissioner, the
Health Systems Planning Unit of the [Office of Health Strategy]
Department of Public Health, the Insurance Department, the
Department of Consumer Protection, the Department of Motor Vehicles,
the State Insurance and Risk Management Board, the Department of
Energy and Environmental Protection, the Public Utilities Regulatory
Authority, the Connecticut Siting Council or the Connecticut Real Estate
Commission; provided this shall not prohibit any such person from
making inquiry for information on behalf of another before any of said
commissions or commissioners if no fee or reward is given or promised
in consequence thereof. For the purpose of this subsection, partnerships,
associations, professional corporations or sole proprietorships refer
only to such partnerships, associations, professional corporations or sole
proprietorships which have been formed to carry on the business or
profession directly relating to the employment, appearing, agreeing to
appear or taking of action provided for in this subsection. Nothing in
this subsection shall prohibit any employment, appearing, agreeing to
appear or taking action before any municipal board, commission or
council. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as applying (1) to
the actions of any teaching or research professional employee of a public
institution of higher education if such actions are not in violation of any
other provision of this chapter, (2) to the actions of any other
professional employee of a public institution of higher education if such
actions are not compensated and are not in violation of any other
provision of this chapter, (3) to any member of a board or commission
who receives no compensation other than per diem payments or
Public Act No. 26-68 72 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
reimbursement for actual or necessary expenses, or both, incurred in the
performance of the member's duties, or (4) to any member or director of
a quasi-public agency. Notwithstanding the provisions of this
subsection to the contrary, a legislator, an officer of the General
Assembly or part-time legislative employee may be or become a
member or employee of a firm, partnership, association or professional
corporation which represents clients for compensation before agencies
listed in this subsection, provided the legislator, officer of the General
Assembly or part-time legislative employee shall take no part in any
matter involving the agency listed in this subsection and shall not
receive compensation from any such matter. Receipt of a previously
established salary, not based on the current or anticipated business of
the firm, partnership, association or professional corporation involving
the agencies listed in this subsection, shall be permitted.
Sec. 69. Subsection (c) of section 1-84b of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(c) The provisions of this subsection apply to present or former
executive branch public officials or state employees of an agency who
hold or formerly held positions which involve significant decision-
making or supervisory responsibility. Such positions shall be
designated as such by the agency concerned, in consultation with the
Office of State Ethics, except that such provisions shall not apply to
members or former members of the boards or commissions who serve
ex officio, who are required by statute to represent the regulated
industry or who are permitted by statute to have a past or present
affiliation with the regulated industry. On or before November [1, 2021,
and not less than] first annually, [thereafter,] the head of each agency
concerned, or his or her designee, shall submit the designation of all
positions in existence on such date that are subject to the provisions of
this subsection to the office electronically, in a manner prescribed by the
Public Act No. 26-68 73 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Citizen's Ethics Advisory Board. If an agency creates such a position
after its annual submission under this subsection, the head of such
agency, or his or her designee, shall submit the designation of the newly
created position not later than thirty days after the creation of such
position. As used in this subsection, "agency" means the Health Systems
Planning Unit of the [Office of Health Strategy] Department of Public
Health, the Connecticut Siting Council, the Department of Banking, the
Insurance Department, the Department of Emergency Services and
Public Protection, the office within the Department of Consumer
Protection that carries out the duties and responsibilities of sections 30-
2 to 30-68m, inclusive, the Public Utilities Regulatory Authority,
including the Office of Consumer Counsel, and the Department of
Consumer Protection and the term "employment" means professional
services or other services rendered as an employee or as an independent
contractor.
(1) No public official or state employee in an executive branch
position designated pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall
negotiate for, seek or accept employment with any business subject to
regulation by his agency.
(2) No former public official or state employee who held such a
position in the executive branch shall, within one year after leaving an
agency, accept employment with a business subject to regulation by that
agency.
(3) No business shall employ a present or former public official or
state employee in violation of this subsection.
Sec. 70. Subsection (b) of section 2-137 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(b) The committee shall consist of the following members:
Public Act No. 26-68 74 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(1) The chairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to public health, human services, children and appropriations
and the budgets of state agencies, or their designees;
(2) Three appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives,
one of whom shall be a member of the General Assembly and two of
whom shall be providers of behavioral health services for children in the
state;
(3) Three appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate, one
of whom shall be a member of the General Assembly and two of whom
shall be representatives of private advocacy groups that provide
services for children and families in the state;
(4) (A) Two appointed by the chairperson of the committee selected
by the speaker of the House of Representatives pursuant to subsection
(e) of this section, one of whom shall be a child or youth advocate; (B)
two appointed by the chairperson of the committee selected by the
president pro tempore of the Senate pursuant to subsection (e) of this
section, one of whom shall be a child or youth advocate; and (C) two
jointly appointed by the three chairpersons of the committee, as
described in subsection (e) of this section, who shall be providers of
substance use treatment services to young adults;
(5) Two appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives, who shall be representatives of children's hospitals;
(6) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate, who shall be
a representative of public school superintendents in the state;
(7) Two appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives, who shall be representatives of families with children
who have been diagnosed with behavioral health disorders;
Public Act No. 26-68 75 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(8) Two appointed by the minority leader of the Senate, who shall be
providers of behavioral health services;
(9) Two jointly appointed by the chairpersons of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to appropriations and the budgets of state agencies, each of
whom shall be a representative of one of the two federally recognized
Indian tribes in the state;
(10) The Commissioners of Children and Families, Correction,
Developmental Services, Early Childhood, Education, Insurance,
Mental Health and Addiction Services, Public Health and Social
Services, or their designees;
[(11) The Commissioner of Health Strategy, or the commissioner's
designee;]
[(12)] (11) The Child Advocate, or the Child Advocate's designee;
[(13)] (12) The Healthcare Advocate and the Behavioral Health
Advocate, or their designees;
[(14)] (13) The executive director of the Court Support Services
Division of the Judicial Branch, or the executive director's designee;
[(15)] (14) The executive director of the Commission on Women,
Children, Seniors, Equity and Opportunity, or the executive director's
designee;
[(16)] (15) The Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, or
the secretary's designee; and
[(17)] (16) One representative from each administrative services
organization under contract with the Department of Social Services to
provide such services for recipients of assistance under the HUSKY
Health program, who shall be ex-officio, nonvoting members.
Public Act No. 26-68 76 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 71. Section 4-5 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
As used in sections 4-6, 4-7 and 4-8, the term "department head"
means the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management,
Commissioner of Administrative Services, Commissioner of Revenue
Services, Banking Commissioner, Commissioner of Children and
Families, Commissioner of Consumer Protection, Commissioner of
Correction, Commissioner of Economic and Community Development,
State Board of Education, Commissioner of Emergency Services and
Public Protection, Commissioner of Energy and Environmental
Protection, Commissioner of Agriculture, Commissioner of Public
Health, Insurance Commissioner, Labor Commissioner, Commissioner
of Mental Health and Addiction Services, Commissioner of Social
Services, Commissioner of Developmental Services, Commissioner of
Motor Vehicles, Commissioner of Transportation, Commissioner of
Veterans Affairs, Commissioner of Housing, Commissioner of Aging
and Disability Services, Commissioner of Early Childhood,
[Commissioner of Health Strategy,] executive director of the Office of
Military Affairs, executive director of the Technical Education and
Career System, Chief Workforce Officer and Commissioner of Higher
Education. As used in sections 4-6 and 4-7, "department head" also
means the Commissioner of Education.
Sec. 72. Subsection (b) of section 4-101a of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(b) Grants, technical assistance or consultation services, or any
combination thereof, provided under this section may be made to assist
a nongovernmental acute care general hospital to develop and
implement a plan to achieve financial stability and assure the delivery
of appropriate health care services in the service area of such hospital,
or to assist a nongovernmental acute care general hospital in
Public Act No. 26-68 77 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
determining strategies, goals and plans to ensure its financial viability
or stability. Any such hospital seeking such grants, technical assistance
or consultation services shall prepare and submit to the Office of Policy
and Management and the Health Systems Planning Unit of the [Office
of Health Strategy] Department of Public Health a plan that includes at
least the following: (1) A statement of the hospital's current projections
of its finances for the current and the next three fiscal years; (2)
identification of the major financial issues which effect the financial
stability of the hospital; (3) the steps proposed to study or improve the
financial status of the hospital and eliminate ongoing operating losses;
(4) plans to study or change the mix of services provided by the hospital,
which may include transition to an alternative licensure category; and
(5) other related elements as determined by the Office of Policy and
Management. Such plan shall clearly identify the amount, value or type
of the grant, technical assistance or consultation services, or
combination thereof, requested. Any grants, technical assistance or
consultation services, or any combination thereof, provided under this
section shall be determined by the Secretary of the Office of Policy and
Management not to jeopardize the federal matching payments under
the medical assistance program and the emergency assistance to
families program as determined by the Health Systems Planning Unit of
the [Office of Health Strategy] Department of Public Health or the
Department of Social Services in consultation with the Office of Policy
and Management.
Sec. 73. Subsection (b) of section 8-37vvv of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(b) The council shall consist of the following regular members:
(1) Two appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate, one of
whom is an individual who is experiencing or has experienced
homelessness and one of whom is a representative of a continuum of
Public Act No. 26-68 78 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
care organization;
(2) Two appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives,
one of whom is a representative of an organization that advocates for
victims of domestic violence or domestic violence prevention and one
of whom is a representative of an organization that provides shelters or
housing for individuals experiencing homelessness;
(3) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate, who is a
representative of a public housing authority;
(4) One appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives, who has expertise in mental health or addiction
treatment;
(5) Two appointed by the minority leader of the Senate, one of whom
is a representative of local government and one of whom is a
representative of a philanthropic organization;
(6) Two appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives, one of whom is a representative of a faith-based
organization and one of whom is a representative of a group that
advocates for housing developers;
(7) Two appointed by the Commissioner of Housing;
(8) The Commissioner of Housing, or the commissioner's designee;
(9) The Commissioner of Aging and Disability Services, or the
commissioner's designee;
(10) The Commissioner of Children and Families, or the
commissioner's designee;
(11) The Commissioner of Correction, or the commissioner's
designee;
Public Act No. 26-68 79 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(12) The Labor Commissioner, or the commissioner's designee;
(13) The Commissioner of Mental Health and Addiction Services, or
the commissioner's designee;
(14) The Commissioner of Social Services, or the commissioner's
designee;
(15) The Commissioner of Veterans Affairs, or the commissioner's
designee;
(16) The Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, or the
secretary's designee;
(17) The executive director of the Court Support Services Division of
the Judicial Department, or the executive director's designee;
[(18) The Commissioner of Health Strategy, or the commissioner's
designee;]
[(19)] (18) The chief executive officer of the Connecticut Housing
Finance Authority, or the chief executive officer's designee; and
[(20)] (19) The Long-Term Care Ombudsman.
Sec. 74. Subdivision (8) of subsection (c) of section 10-222tt of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(8) The commission, in consultation with the [Office of Health
Strategy,] Office of the Healthcare Advocate and Department of Social
Services, shall conduct a study to determine if certain special education
services can be billed to Medicaid or other private insurance.
Sec. 75. Subsections (b) to (d), inclusive, of section 10-532 of the
general statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
Public Act No. 26-68 80 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(b) The Commissioner of Early Childhood, in collaboration with the
Commissioners of Social Services [,] and Public Health, [and Health
Strategy,] shall, within available appropriations, develop a state-wide
program to offer universal nurse home visiting services to all families
with newborns residing in the state to support parental health, healthy
child development and strengthen families.
(c) When developing the program, said commissioners shall (1)
consult with insurers that offer health benefit plans in the state,
hospitals, local public health authorities, existing early childhood home
visiting programs, community-based organizations and social service
providers; and (2) maximize the use of available federal funding.
(d) The program shall provide universal nurse home visiting services
that are (1) evidence-based, and (2) designed to improve outcomes in
one or more of the following areas: (A) Child safety; (B) child health and
development; (C) family economic self-sufficiency; (D) maternal and
parental health; (E) positive parenting; (F) reducing child mistreatment;
(G) reducing family violence; (H) parent-infant bonding; and (I) any
other appropriate area established, in writing, by the Commissioners of
Early Childhood, Social Services [,] and Public Health. [and Health
Strategy.]
Sec. 76. Subsection (b) of section 12-34h of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(b) Any pharmaceutical manufacturer or wholesale distributor that
intends to withdraw an identified prescription drug from sale in this
state shall, at least one hundred eighty days before such withdrawal,
send advance written notice to the [Office of Health Strategy]
commissioner disclosing such pharmaceutical manufacturer's or
Public Act No. 26-68 81 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
wholesale distributor's intention.
Sec. 77. Subparagraph (B) of subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of
section 12-263q of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes, as
amended by section 360 of public act 25-168, is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(B) For purposes of this subdivision, "financially distressed hospital"
means a hospital that has experienced over the five-year period from
October 1, 2011, through September 30, 2016, an average net loss of more
than five per cent of aggregate revenue. A hospital has an average net
loss of more than five per cent of aggregate revenue if such a loss is
reflected in the applicable years of financial reporting that have been
made available by the Health Systems Planning Unit of the [Office of
Health Strategy] Department of Public Health for such hospital in
accordance with section 19a-670. Upon said commissioner's receipt of a
determination by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that
a hospital is not exempt, the total audited net revenue from the
provision of outpatient hospital services for fiscal year 2016 shall be
increased by such hospital's audited net revenue from the provision of
outpatient hospital services for fiscal year 2016 and the effective rate of
the tax due under this section shall be adjusted to ensure that the total
amount of such tax to be collected under subsection (a) of this section is
redistributed, commencing with the calendar quarter next succeeding
the date of the determination by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services.
Sec. 78. Section 17b-59a of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July
1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Electronic health information system" means an information
Public Act No. 26-68 82 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
processing system, involving both computer hardware and software
that deals with the storage, retrieval, sharing and use of health care
information, data and knowledge for communication and decision
making, and includes: (A) An electronic health record that provides
access in real time to a patient's complete medical record; (B) a personal
health record through which an individual, and anyone authorized by
such individual, can maintain and manage such individual's health
information; (C) computerized order entry technology that permits a
health care provider to order diagnostic and treatment services,
including prescription drugs electronically; (D) electronic alerts and
reminders to health care providers to improve compliance with best
practices, promote regular screenings and other preventive practices,
and facilitate diagnoses and treatments; (E) error notification
procedures that generate a warning if an order is entered that is likely
to lead to a significant adverse outcome for a patient; and (F) tools to
allow for the collection, analysis and reporting of data on adverse
events, near misses, the quality and efficiency of care, patient
satisfaction and other healthcare-related performance measures.
(2) "Interoperability" means the ability of two or more systems or
components to exchange information and to use the information that
has been exchanged and includes: (A) The capacity to physically connect
to a network for the purpose of exchanging data with other users; and
(B) the capacity of a connected user to access, transmit, receive and
exchange usable information with other users.
(3) "Standard electronic format" means a format using open electronic
standards that: (A) Enable health information technology to be used for
the collection of clinically specific data; (B) promote the interoperability
of health care information across health care settings, including
reporting to local, state and federal agencies; and (C) facilitate clinical
decision support.
(b) The Commissioner of Social Services, in consultation with the
Public Act No. 26-68 83 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
[Commissioner of Health Strategy] Secretary of the Office of Policy and
Management, shall (1) develop, throughout the Departments of
Developmental Services, Public Health, Correction, Children and
Families, Veterans Affairs and Mental Health and Addiction Services,
uniform management information, uniform statistical information,
uniform terminology for similar facilities and uniform electronic health
information technology standards, (2) plan for increased participation
of the private sector in the delivery of human services, and (3) provide
direction and coordination to federally funded programs in the human
services agencies and recommend uniform system improvements and
reallocation of physical resources and designation of a single
responsibility across human services agencies lines to facilitate shared
services and eliminate duplication.
(c) The [Commissioner of Health Strategy] Secretary of the Office of
Policy and Management shall, in consultation with the Commissioner
of Social Services and the State Health Information Technology
Advisory Council, established pursuant to section 17b-59f, implement
and periodically revise the state-wide health information technology
plan established pursuant to this section and shall establish electronic
data standards to facilitate the development of integrated electronic
health information systems for use by health care providers and
institutions that receive state funding. Such electronic data standards
shall: (1) Include provisions relating to security, privacy, data content,
structures and format, vocabulary and transmission protocols; (2) limit
the use and dissemination of an individual's Social Security number and
require the encryption of any Social Security number provided by an
individual; (3) require privacy standards no less stringent than the
"Standards for Privacy of Individually Identifiable Health Information"
established under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability
Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, as amended from time to time, and contained
in 45 CFR 160, 164; (4) require that individually identifiable health
information be secure and that access to such information be traceable
Public Act No. 26-68 84 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
by an electronic audit trail; (5) be compatible with any national data
standards in order to allow for interstate interoperability; (6) permit the
collection of health information in a standard electronic format; and (7)
be compatible with the requirements for an electronic health
information system.
(d) The [Commissioner of Health Strategy] Secretary of the Office of
Policy and Management shall, within existing resources and in
consultation with the State Health Information Technology Advisory
Council: (1) Oversee the development and implementation of the State-
wide Health Information Exchange in conformance with section 17b-
59d; (2) coordinate the state's health information technology and health
information exchange efforts to ensure consistent and collaborative
cross-agency planning and implementation; and (3) serve as the state
liaison to, and work collaboratively with, the State-wide Health
Information Exchange established pursuant to section 17b-59d to ensure
consistency between the state-wide health information technology plan
and the State-wide Health Information Exchange and to support the
state's health information technology and exchange goals.
(e) The state-wide health information technology plan, implemented
and periodically revised pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, shall
enhance interoperability to support optimal health outcomes and
include, but not be limited to (1) general standards and protocols for
health information exchange, and (2) national data standards to support
secure data exchange data standards to facilitate the development of a
state-wide, integrated electronic health information system for use by
health care providers and institutions that are licensed by the state. Such
electronic data standards shall (A) include provisions relating to
security, privacy, data content, structures and format, vocabulary and
transmission protocols, (B) be compatible with any national data
standards in order to allow for interstate interoperability, (C) permit the
collection of health information in a standard electronic format, and (D)
Public Act No. 26-68 85 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
be compatible with the requirements for an electronic health
information system.
(f) Not later than February [1, 2017, and annually thereafter] first
annually, the [Commissioner of Health Strategy] Secretary of the Office
of Policy and Management, in consultation with the State Health
Information Technology Advisory Council, shall report in accordance
with the provisions of section 11-4a to the joint standing committees of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to human
services and public health concerning: (1) The development and
implementation of the state-wide health information technology plan
and data standards, established and implemented by the
[Commissioner of Health Strategy] secretary pursuant to this section; (2)
the establishment of the State-wide Health Information Exchange; and
(3) recommendations for policy, regulatory and legislative changes and
other initiatives to promote the state's health information technology
and exchange goals.
Sec. 79. Subsections (d) to (g), inclusive, of section 17b-59d of the
general statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(d) (1) The [Commissioner of Health Strategy, in consultation with
the] Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, [and] in
consultation with the State Health Information Technology Advisory
Council, established pursuant to section 17b-59f, shall, upon the
approval by the State Bond Commission of bond funds authorized by
the General Assembly for the purposes of establishing a State-wide
Health Information Exchange, develop and issue a request for proposals
for the development, management and operation of the State-wide
Health Information Exchange. Such request shall promote the reuse of
any and all enterprise health information technology assets, such as the
existing Provider Directory, Enterprise Master Person Index, Direct
Secure Messaging Health Information Service provider infrastructure,
Public Act No. 26-68 86 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
analytic capabilities and tools that exist in the state or are in the process
of being deployed. Any enterprise health information exchange
technology assets purchased after June 2, 2016, and prior to the
implementation of the State-wide Health Information Exchange shall be
capable of interoperability with a State-wide Health Information
Exchange.
(2) Such request for proposals may require an eligible organization
responding to the request to: (A) Have not less than three years of
experience operating either a state-wide health information exchange in
any state or a regional exchange serving a population of not less than
one million that (i) enables the exchange of patient health information
among health care providers, patients and other authorized users
without regard to location, source of payment or technology, (ii)
includes, with proper consent, behavioral health and substance abuse
treatment information, (iii) supports transitions of care and care
coordination through real-time health care provider alerts and access to
clinical information, (iv) allows health information to follow each
patient, (v) allows patients to access and manage their health data, and
(vi) has demonstrated success in reducing costs associated with
preventable readmissions, duplicative testing or medical errors; (B) be
committed to, and demonstrate, a high level of transparency in its
governance, decision-making and operations; (C) be capable of
providing consulting to ensure effective governance; (D) be regulated or
administratively overseen by a state government agency; and (E) have
sufficient staff and appropriate expertise and experience to carry out the
administrative, operational and financial responsibilities of the State-
wide Health Information Exchange.
(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (d) of this section,
if, on or before January 1, 2016, the Commissioner of Social Services, in
consultation with the State Health Information Technology Advisory
Council, established pursuant to section 17b-59f, submits a plan to the
Public Act No. 26-68 87 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management for the establishment
of a State-wide Health Information Exchange consistent with
subsections (a), (b) and (c) of this section, [and such plan is approved by
the secretary, the commissioner] the secretary may implement such plan
and enter into any contracts or agreements to implement such plan.
(f) The [Commissioner of Health Strategy] Secretary of the Office of
Policy and Management shall have administrative authority over the
State-wide Health Information Exchange. The [commissioner] secretary
shall be responsible for designating, and posting on [its] the Office of
Policy and Management's Internet web site, the list of systems,
technologies, entities and programs that shall constitute the State-wide
Health Information Exchange. Systems, technologies, entities, and
programs that have not been so designated shall not be considered part
of said exchange.
(g) The [Commissioner of Health Strategy] Secretary of the Office of
Policy and Management shall adopt regulations in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54 that set forth requirements necessary to
implement the provisions of this section. The [commissioner] secretary
may implement policies and procedures necessary to administer the
provisions of this section while in the process of adopting such policies
and procedures in regulation form, provided the [commissioner]
secretary holds a public hearing at least thirty days prior to
implementing such policies and procedures and publishes notice of
intention to adopt the regulations on the Office of [Health Strategy's]
Policy and Management's Internet web site and the eRegulations System
not later than twenty days after implementing such policies and
procedures. Policies and procedures implemented pursuant to this
subsection shall be valid until the time such regulations are effective.
Sec. 80. Subsection (f) of section 17b-59e of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
Public Act No. 26-68 88 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(f) The [Commissioner of Health Strategy] Secretary of the Office of
Policy and Management shall adopt regulations in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54 that set forth requirements necessary to
implement the provisions of this section. The [commissioner] secretary
may implement policies and procedures necessary to administer the
provisions of this section while in the process of adopting such policies
and procedures in regulation form, provided the [commissioner]
secretary holds a public hearing at least thirty days prior to
implementing such policies and procedures and publishes notice of
intention to adopt the regulations on the Office of [Health Strategy's]
Policy and Management's Internet web site and the eRegulations System
not later than twenty days after implementing such policies and
procedures. Policies and procedures implemented pursuant to this
subsection shall be valid until the time such regulations are effective.
Sec. 81. Section 17b-59f of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) There shall be a State Health Information Technology Advisory
Council to advise the [Commissioner of Health Strategy] Secretary of
the Office of Policy and Management and the health information
technology officer, designated in accordance with section [19a-754a] 4-
66, in developing priorities and policy recommendations for advancing
the state's health information technology and health information
exchange efforts and goals and to advise the [commissioner] secretary
and officer in the development and implementation of the state-wide
health information technology plan and standards and the State-wide
Health Information Exchange, established pursuant to section 17b-59d.
The advisory council shall also advise the [commissioner] secretary and
officer regarding the development of appropriate governance, oversight
and accountability measures to ensure success in achieving the state's
health information technology and exchange goals.
(b) The council shall consist of the following members:
Public Act No. 26-68 89 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(1) One member appointed by the [Commissioner of Health Strategy]
Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, who shall be an
expert in state health care reform initiatives;
(2) The health information technology officer, designated in
accordance with section [19a-754a] 4-66, or the health information
technology officer's designee;
(3) The Commissioners of Social Services, Mental Health and
Addiction Services, Children and Families, Correction, Public Health
and Developmental Services, or the commissioners' designees;
(4) The Chief Information Officer of the state, or the Chief Information
Officer's designee;
(5) The chief executive officer of the Connecticut Health Insurance
Exchange, or the chief executive officer's designee;
(6) The chief information officer of The University of Connecticut
Health Center, or the chief information officer's designee;
(7) The Healthcare Advocate, or the Healthcare Advocate's designee;
(8) The Comptroller, or the Comptroller's designee;
(9) The Attorney General, or the Attorney General's designee;
(10) Five members appointed by the Governor, one each who shall be
(A) a representative of a health system that includes more than one
hospital, (B) a representative of the health insurance industry, (C) an
expert in health information technology, (D) a health care consumer or
consumer advocate, and (E) a current or former employee or trustee of
a plan established pursuant to subdivision (5) of subsection (c) of 29 USC
186;
(11) Three members appointed by the president pro tempore of the
Public Act No. 26-68 90 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Senate, one each who shall be (A) a representative of a federally
qualified health center, (B) a provider of behavioral health services, and
(C) a physician licensed under chapter 370;
(12) Three members appointed by the speaker of the House of
Representatives, one each who shall be (A) a technology expert who
represents a hospital system, as defined in section 19a-486i, (B) a
provider of home health care services, and (C) a health care consumer
or a health care consumer advocate;
(13) One member appointed by the majority leader of the Senate, who
shall be a representative of an independent community hospital;
(14) One member appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives, who shall be a physician who provides services in a
multispecialty group and who is not employed by a hospital;
(15) One member appointed by the minority leader of the Senate, who
shall be a primary care physician who provides services in a small
independent practice;
(16) One member appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives, who shall be an expert in health care analytics and
quality analysis;
(17) The president pro tempore of the Senate, or the president's
designee;
(18) The speaker of the House of Representatives, or the speaker's
designee;
(19) The minority leader of the Senate, or the minority leader's
designee; and
(20) The minority leader of the House of Representatives, or the
minority leader's designee.
Public Act No. 26-68 91 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(c) Any member appointed or designated under subdivisions (11) to
(20), inclusive, of subsection (b) of this section may be a member of the
General Assembly.
(d) (1) The health information technology officer, designated in
accordance with section [19a-754a] 4-66, shall serve as a chairperson of
the council. The council shall elect a second chairperson from among its
members, who shall not be a state official. The chairpersons of the
council may establish subcommittees and working groups and may
appoint individuals other than members of the council to serve as
members of the subcommittees or working groups. The terms of the
members shall be coterminous with the terms of the appointing
authority for each member and subject to the provisions of section 4-1a.
If any vacancy occurs on the council, the appointing authority having
the power to make the appointment under the provisions of this section
shall appoint a person in accordance with the provisions of this section.
A majority of the members of the council shall constitute a quorum.
Members of the council shall serve without compensation, but shall be
reimbursed for all reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of
their duties.
(2) The chairpersons of the council may appoint up to four additional
members to the council, who shall serve at the pleasure of the
chairpersons.
(e) (1) The council shall establish a working group to be known as the
All-Payer Claims Database Advisory Group. Said group shall include,
but need not be limited to, (A) the Secretary of the Office of Policy and
Management, the Comptroller, the Commissioners of Public Health,
Social Services and Mental Health and Addiction Services, the Insurance
Commissioner, the Healthcare Advocate and the Chief Information
Officer, or their designees; (B) a representative of the Connecticut State
Medical Society; and (C) representatives of health insurance companies,
health insurance purchasers, hospitals, consumer advocates and health
Public Act No. 26-68 92 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
care providers. The health information technology officer may appoint
additional members to said group.
(2) The All-Payer Claims Database Advisory Group shall develop a
plan to implement a state-wide multipayer data initiative to enhance the
state's use of health care data from multiple sources to increase
efficiency, enhance outcomes and improve the understanding of health
care expenditures in the public and private sectors.
(f) Prior to submitting any application, proposal, planning document
or other request seeking federal grants, matching funds or other federal
support for health information technology or health information
exchange, the [Commissioner of Health Strategy] Secretary of the Office
of Policy and Management or the Commissioner of Social Services shall
present such application, proposal, document or other request to the
council for review and comment.
Sec. 82. Subsections (a) and (b) of section 17b-59g of the general
statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The state, acting by and through the Secretary of the Office of
Policy and Management, [in collaboration with the Commissioner of
Health Strategy,] shall establish a program to expedite the development
of the State-wide Health Information Exchange, established under
section 17b-59d, to assist the state, health care providers, insurance
carriers, physicians and all stakeholders in empowering consumers to
make effective health care decisions, promote patient-centered care,
improve the quality, safety and value of health care, reduce waste and
duplication of services, support clinical decision-making, keep
confidential health information secure and make progress toward the
state's public health goals. The purposes of the program shall be to (1)
assist the State-wide Health Information Exchange in establishing and
maintaining itself as a neutral and trusted entity that serves the public
Public Act No. 26-68 93 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
good for the benefit of all Connecticut residents, including, but not
limited to, Connecticut health care consumers and Connecticut health
care providers and carriers, and (2) perform, on behalf of the state, the
role of intermediary between public and private stakeholders and
customers of the State-wide Health Information Exchange. [, and (3)
fulfill the responsibilities of the Office of Health Strategy, as described
in section 19a-754a.]
(b) The [Commissioner of Health Strategy] Secretary of the Office of
Policy and Management, in consultation with the health information
technology officer, designated in accordance with section [19a-754] 4-66,
shall design [, and the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management,
in collaboration with said commissioner,] and may establish or
incorporate an entity to implement the program established under
subsection (a) of this section. Such entity shall, without limitation, be
owned and governed, in whole or in part, by a party or parties other
than the state and may be organized as a nonprofit entity.
Sec. 83. Section 17b-312 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
The Commissioner of Social Services shall seek, in accordance with
the provisions of section 17b-8, [and in consultation with the Insurance
Commissioner and the Office of Health Strategy established under
section 19a-754a,] a waiver under Section 1115 of the Social Security Act,
as amended from time to time, to seek federal funds to support the
Covered Connecticut program established under section 19a-754c.
Upon approval by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the
Commissioner of Social Services shall implement the waiver.
Sec. 84. Subsection (c) of section 17b-337 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
Public Act No. 26-68 94 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(c) The Long-Term Care Planning Committee shall consist of: (1) The
chairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing committees of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to human
services, public health, elderly services and long-term care; (2) the
Commissioner of Social Services, or the commissioner's designee; (3)
one member of the Office of Policy and Management appointed by the
Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management; (4) one member from
the Department of Public Health appointed by the Commissioner of
Public Health; (5) one member from the Department of Housing
appointed by the Commissioner of Housing; (6) one member from the
Department of Developmental Services appointed by the Commissioner
of Developmental Services; (7) one member from the Department of
Mental Health and Addiction Services appointed by the Commissioner
of Mental Health and Addiction Services; (8) one member from the
Department of Transportation appointed by the Commissioner of
Transportation; (9) one member from the Department of Children and
Families appointed by the Commissioner of Children and Families; [(10)
one member from the Health Systems Planning Unit of the Office of
Health Strategy appointed by the Commissioner of Health Strategy; and
(11)] and (10) one member from the Department of Aging and Disability
Services appointed by the Commissioner of Aging and Disability
Services. The committee shall convene no later than ninety days after
June 4, 1998. Any vacancy shall be filled by the appointing authority.
The chairperson shall be elected from among the members of the
committee. The committee shall seek the advice and participation of any
person, organization or state or federal agency it deems necessary to
carry out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 85. Subdivision (3) of subsection (f) of section 17b-340 of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(3) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 1992, per diem maximum
Public Act No. 26-68 95 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
allowable costs for each cost component shall be as follows: For direct
costs, the maximum shall be equal to one hundred forty per cent of the
median allowable cost of that peer grouping; for indirect costs, the
maximum shall be equal to one hundred thirty per cent of the state-wide
median allowable cost; for fair rent, the amount shall be calculated
utilizing the amount approved by the [Office of Health Care Access]
Health Systems Planning Unit of the Department of Public Health
pursuant to section 19a-638; for capital-related costs, there shall be no
maximum; and for administrative and general costs, the maximum shall
be equal to one hundred twenty-five per cent of the state-wide median
allowable cost. For the fiscal year ending June 30, 1993, per diem
maximum allowable costs for each cost component shall be as follows:
For direct costs, the maximum shall be equal to one hundred forty per
cent of the median allowable cost of that peer grouping; for indirect
costs, the maximum shall be equal to one hundred twenty-five per cent
of the state-wide median allowable cost; for fair rent, the amount shall
be calculated utilizing the amount approved by the [Office of Health
Care Access] Health Systems Planning Unit pursuant to section 19a-638;
for capital-related costs, there shall be no maximum; and for
administrative and general costs the maximum shall be equal to one
hundred fifteen per cent of the state-wide median allowable cost. For
the fiscal year ending June 30, 1994, per diem maximum allowable costs
for each cost component shall be as follows: For direct costs, the
maximum shall be equal to one hundred thirty-five per cent of the
median allowable cost of that peer grouping; for indirect costs, the
maximum shall be equal to one hundred twenty per cent of the state-
wide median allowable cost; for fair rent, the amount shall be calculated
utilizing the amount approved by the [Office of Health Care Access]
Health Systems Planning Unit pursuant to section 19a-638; for capital-
related costs, there shall be no maximum; and for administrative and
general costs the maximum shall be equal to one hundred ten per cent
of the state-wide median allowable cost. For the fiscal year ending June
30, 1995, per diem maximum allowable costs for each cost component
Public Act No. 26-68 96 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
shall be as follows: For direct costs, the maximum shall be equal to one
hundred thirty-five per cent of the median allowable cost of that peer
grouping; for indirect costs, the maximum shall be equal to one hundred
twenty per cent of the state-wide median allowable cost; for fair rent,
the amount shall be calculated utilizing the amount approved by the
[Office of Health Care Access] Health Systems Planning Unit pursuant
to section 19a-638; for capital-related costs, there shall be no maximum;
and for administrative and general costs the maximum shall be equal to
one hundred five per cent of the state-wide median allowable cost. For
the fiscal year ending June 30, 1996, and any succeeding fiscal year,
except for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2000, and June 30, 2001, for
facilities with an interim rate in one or both periods, per diem maximum
allowable costs for each cost component shall be as follows: For direct
costs, the maximum shall be equal to one hundred thirty-five per cent
of the median allowable cost of that peer grouping; for indirect costs, the
maximum shall be equal to one hundred fifteen per cent of the state-
wide median allowable cost; for fair rent, the amount shall be calculated
utilizing the amount approved pursuant to section 19a-638; for capital-
related costs, there shall be no maximum; and for administrative and
general costs the maximum shall be equal to the state-wide median
allowable cost. For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2000, and June 30,
2001, for facilities with an interim rate in one or both periods, per diem
maximum allowable costs for each cost component shall be as follows:
For direct costs, the maximum shall be equal to one hundred forty-five
per cent of the median allowable cost of that peer grouping; for indirect
costs, the maximum shall be equal to one hundred twenty-five per cent
of the state-wide median allowable cost; for fair rent, the amount shall
be calculated utilizing the amount approved pursuant to section 19a-
638; for capital-related costs, there shall be no maximum; and for
administrative and general costs, the maximum shall be equal to the
state-wide median allowable cost and such medians shall be based upon
the same cost year used to set rates for facilities with prospective rates.
Costs in excess of the maximum amounts established under this
Public Act No. 26-68 97 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
subsection shall not be recognized as allowable costs, except that the
Commissioner of Social Services (A) may allow costs in excess of
maximum amounts for any facility with patient days covered by
Medicare, including days requiring coinsurance, in excess of twelve per
cent of annual patient days which also has patient days covered by
Medicaid in excess of fifty per cent of annual patient days; (B) may
establish a pilot program whereby costs in excess of maximum amounts
shall be allowed for beds in a nursing home which has a managed care
program and is affiliated with a hospital licensed under chapter 368v;
and (C) may establish rates whereby allowable costs may exceed such
maximum amounts for beds approved on or after July 1, 1991, which are
restricted to use by patients with acquired immune deficiency syndrome
or traumatic brain injury.
Sec. 86. Section 17b-356 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
Any health care facility or institution, as defined in subsection (a) of
section 19a-490, except a nursing home, rest home, residential care home
or residential facility for persons with intellectual disability licensed
pursuant to section 17a-227 and certified to participate in the Title XIX
Medicaid program as an intermediate care facility for individuals with
intellectual disabilities, proposing to expand its services by adding
nursing home beds shall obtain the approval of the Commissioner of
Social Services in accordance with the procedures established pursuant
to sections 17b-352, 17b-353 and 17b-354 for a facility, as defined in
section 17b-352, prior to obtaining the approval of the Health Systems
Planning Unit of the [Office of Health Strategy] Department of Public
Health pursuant to section 19a-639.
Sec. 87. Section 19a-6q of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
The Commissioner of Public Health, in consultation with the
Public Act No. 26-68 98 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
[Commissioner of Health Strategy and] local and regional health
departments, shall, within available resources, develop a plan that is
consistent with the Department of Public Health's Healthy Connecticut
2020 health improvement plan and the state healthcare innovation plan
developed pursuant to the State Innovation Model Initiative by the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services Innovation Center. The
Commissioner of Public Health shall develop and implement such plan
to: (1) Reduce the incidence of tobacco use, high blood pressure, health
care associated infections, asthma, unintended pregnancy and diabetes;
(2) improve chronic disease care coordination in the state; and (3) reduce
the incidence and effects of chronic disease and improve outcomes for
conditions associated with chronic disease in the state. The
Commissioner of Public Health shall post such plan on the Department
of Public Health's Internet web site.
Sec. 88. Subsection (b) of section 19a-7 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(b) For the purposes of establishing a state health plan as required by
subsection (a) of this section and consistent with state and federal law
on patient records, the department is entitled to access hospital
discharge data, emergency room and ambulatory surgery encounter
data, data on home health care agency client encounters and services,
data from community health centers on client encounters and services
and all data collected or compiled by the Health Systems Planning Unit
of the [Office of Health Strategy] Department of Public Health pursuant
to section 19a-613.
Sec. 89. Subsection (l) of section 19a-7h of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(l) The commissioner shall, in consultation with the [Office of Health
Public Act No. 26-68 99 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Strategy] Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, adopt
regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, to facilitate
interoperability between the immunization information system and the
State-wide Health Information Exchange established pursuant to
section 17b-59d. The commissioner may implement policies and
procedures necessary to administer the provisions of this section while
in the process of adopting such policies and procedures as regulations,
provided the department posts such policies and procedures on the
eRegulations System prior to adopting them. Policies and procedures
implemented pursuant to this section shall be valid until regulations are
adopted in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54.
Sec. 90. Subsection (a) of section 19a-75a of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(a) On or before January 1, 2023, the Department of Public Health
shall establish and administer a child and adolescent psychiatrist grant
program. The program shall provide incentive grants to employers of
child and adolescent psychiatrists for recruiting and hiring new child
and adolescent psychiatrists and retaining child and adolescent
psychiatrists who are in their employ. The Commissioner of Public
Health shall establish eligibility requirements, priority categories,
funding limitations and the application process for the grant program.
Such priority categories shall include, but need not be limited to,
nonhospital employers. The commissioner [, in consultation with the
Office of Health Strategy,] shall distribute incentive grant funds
equitably with regard to the type of employer and location of such
employer.
Sec. 91. Section 19a-127k of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section:
Public Act No. 26-68 100 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(1) "Community benefit partners" means federal, state and municipal
government entities and private sector entities, including, but not
limited to, faith-based organizations, businesses, educational and
academic organizations, health care organizations, health departments,
philanthropic organizations, organizations specializing in housing
justice, planning and land use organizations, public safety
organizations, transportation organizations and tribal organizations,
that, in partnership with hospitals, play an essential role with respect to
the policy, system, program and financing solutions necessary to
achieve community benefit program goals;
(2) "Community benefit program" means any voluntary program or
activity to promote preventive health care, protect health and safety,
improve health equity and reduce health disparities, reduce the cost and
economic burden of poor health and improve the health status for all
populations within the geographic service areas of a hospital, regardless
of whether a member of any such population is a patient of such
hospital;
(3) "Community benefit program reporting" means the community
health needs assessment, implementation strategy and annual report
submitted by a hospital to the Office of [Health Strategy] the Healthcare
Advocate pursuant to the provisions of this section;
(4) "Community health needs assessment" means a written
assessment, as described in 26 CFR 1.501(r)-(3);
(5) "Health disparities" means health differences that are closely
linked with social or economic disadvantages that adversely affect one
or more groups of people who have experienced greater systemic social
or economic obstacles to health or a safe environment based on race or
ethnicity, religion, socioeconomic status, gender, age, mental health,
cognitive, sensory or physical disability, sexual orientation, gender
identity, geographic location or other characteristics historically linked
Public Act No. 26-68 101 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
to discrimination or exclusion;
(6) "Health equity" means that every person has a fair and just
opportunity to be as healthy as possible, which encompasses removing
obstacles to health, such as poverty, racism and the adverse
consequences of poverty and racism, including, but not limited to, a lack
of equitable opportunities, access to good jobs with fair pay, quality
education and housing, safe environments and health care;
(7) "Hospital" means a nonprofit entity licensed as a hospital
pursuant to chapter 368v that is required to annually file Internal
Revenue Service form 990. "Hospital" includes a for-profit entity
licensed as an acute care general hospital;
(8) "Implementation strategy" means a written plan, as described in
26 CFR 1.501(r)-(3), that is adopted by an authorized body of a hospital
and documents how such hospital intends to address the needs
identified in the community health needs assessment; and
(9) "Meaningful participation" means that (A) residents of a hospital's
community, including, but not limited to, residents of such community
that experience the greatest health disparities, have an appropriate
opportunity to participate in such hospital's planning and decisions, (B)
community participation influences a hospital's planning, and (C)
participants receive information from a hospital summarizing how their
input was or was not used by such hospital.
(b) On and after January 1, 2023, each hospital shall submit
community benefit program reporting to the Office of [Health Strategy]
the Healthcare Advocate, or to a designee selected by the
[Commissioner of Health Strategy] Healthcare Advocate, in the form
and manner described in subsections (c) to (e), inclusive, of this section.
(c) Each hospital shall submit its community health needs assessment
to the Office of [Health Strategy] the Healthcare Advocate not later than
Public Act No. 26-68 102 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
thirty days after the date on which such assessment is made available to
the public pursuant to 26 CFR 1.501(r)-(3)(b), provided the
[Commissioner of Health Strategy, or the commissioner's] Healthcare
Advocate, or the Healthcare Advocate's designee, may grant an
extension of time to a hospital for the filing of such assessment. Such
submission shall contain the following:
(1) Consistent with the requirements set forth in 26 CFR 1.501(r)-
(3)(b)(6)(i), and as included in a hospital's federal filing submitted to the
Internal Revenue Service:
(A) A definition of the community served by the hospital and a
description of how the community was determined;
(B) A description of the process and methods used to conduct the
community health needs assessment;
(C) A description of how the hospital solicited and took into account
input received from persons who represent the broad interests of the
community it serves;
(D) A prioritized description of the significant health needs of the
community identified through the community health needs assessment,
and a description of the process and criteria used in identifying certain
health needs as significant and prioritizing those significant health
needs;
(E) A description of the resources potentially available to address the
significant health needs identified through the community health needs
assessment;
(F) An evaluation of the impact of any actions that were taken, since
the hospital finished conducting its immediately preceding community
health needs assessment, to address the significant health needs
identified in the hospital's prior community health needs assessment;
Public Act No. 26-68 103 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
and
(2) Additional documentation of the following:
(A) The names of the individuals responsible for developing the
community health needs assessment;
(B) The demographics of the population within the geographic
service area of the hospital and, to the extent feasible, a detailed
description of the health disparities, health risks, insurance status,
service utilization patterns and health care costs within such geographic
service area;
(C) A description of the health status and health disparities affecting
the population within the geographic service area of the hospital,
including, but not limited to, the health status and health disparities
affecting a representative spectrum of age, racial and ethnic groups,
incomes and medically underserved populations;
(D) A description of the meaningful participation afforded to
community benefit partners and diverse community members in
assessing community health needs, priorities and target populations;
(E) A description of the barriers to achieving or maintaining health
and to accessing health care, including, but not limited to, social,
economic and environmental barriers, lack of access to or availability of
sources of health care coverage and services and a lack of access to and
availability of prevention and health promotion services and support;
(F) Recommendations regarding the role that the state and other
community benefit partners could play in removing the barriers
described in subparagraph (E) of this subdivision and enabling effective
solutions; and
(G) Any additional information, data or disclosures that the hospital
Public Act No. 26-68 104 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
voluntarily chooses to include as may be relevant to its community
benefit program.
(d) Each hospital shall submit its implementation strategy to the
Office of [Health Strategy] the Healthcare Advocate not later than thirty
days after the date on which such implementation strategy is adopted
pursuant to 26 CFR 1.501(r)-(3)(c), provided the [Commissioner of
Health Strategy, or the commissioner's] Healthcare Advocate, or the
Healthcare Advocate's designee, may grant an extension to a hospital
for the filing of such implementation strategy. Such submission shall
contain the following:
(1) Consistent with the requirements set forth in 26 CFR 1.501(r)-
(3)(b)(6)(i), and as included in a hospital's federal filing submitted to the
Internal Revenue Service:
(A) With respect to each significant health need identified through
the community health needs assessment, either (i) a description of how
the hospital plans to address the health need, or (ii) identification of the
health need as one which the hospital does not intend to address;
(B) For significant health needs described in subparagraph (A)(i) of
this subdivision, (i) a description of the actions that the hospital intends
to take to address the health need and the anticipated impact of such
actions, (ii) identification of the resources that the hospital plans to
commit to address the health need, and (iii) a description of any planned
collaboration between the hospital and other facilities or organizations
to address the health need;
(C) For significant health needs identified in subparagraph (A)(ii) of
this subdivision, an explanation of why the hospital does not intend to
address such health need; and
(2) Additional documentation of the following:
Public Act No. 26-68 105 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(A) The names of the individuals responsible for developing the
implementation strategy;
(B) A description of the meaningful participation afforded to
community benefit partners and diverse community members;
(C) A description of the community health needs and health
disparities that were prioritized in developing the implementation
strategy with consideration given to the most recent version of the state
health plan prepared by the Department of Public Health pursuant to
section 19a-7;
(D) Reference-citing evidence, if available, that shows how the
implementation strategy is intended to address the corresponding
health need or reduction in health disparity;
(E) A description of the planned methods for the ongoing evaluation
of proposed actions and corresponding process or outcome measures
intended for use in assessing progress or impact;
(F) A description of how the hospital solicited commentary on the
implementation strategy from the communities within such hospital's
geographic service area and revisions to such strategy based on such
commentary; and
(G) Any other information that the hospital voluntarily chooses to
include as may be relevant to its implementation strategy, including, but
not limited to, data, disclosures, expected or planned resource outlay,
investments or commitments, including, but not limited to, staff,
financial or in-kind commitments.
(e) On or before October 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, each
hospital shall submit to the Office of [Health Strategy] the Healthcare
Advocate a status report on such hospital's community benefit program,
provided the [Commissioner of Health Strategy, or the commissioner's]
Public Act No. 26-68 106 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Healthcare Advocate, or the Healthcare Advocate's designee, may grant
an extension to a hospital for the filing of such report. Such report shall
include the following:
(1) A description of major updates regarding community health
needs, priorities and target populations, if any;
(2) A description of progress made regarding the hospital's actions in
support of its implementation strategy;
(3) A description of any major changes to the proposed
implementation strategy and associated hospital actions; and
(4) A description of financial resources and other resources allocated
or expended that supported the actions taken in support of the hospital's
implementation strategy.
(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 19a-755a, and to the full
extent permitted by 45 CFR 164.514(e), the Office of [Health Strategy]
Policy and Management shall make data in the all-payer claims
database available to hospitals for use in their community benefit
programs and activities solely for the purposes of (1) preparing the
hospital's community health needs assessment, (2) preparing and
executing the hospital's implementation strategy, and (3) fulfilling
community benefit program reporting, as described in subsections (c) to
(e), inclusive, of this section. Any disclosure made by said office
pursuant to this subsection of information other than health information
shall be made in a manner to protect the confidentiality of such
information as may be required by state or federal law.
(g) A hospital shall not be responsible for limitations in its ability to
fulfill community benefit program reporting requirements, as described
in subsections (c) to (e), inclusive, of this section, if the all-payer claims
database data is not provided to such hospital, as required by subsection
(f) of this section.
Public Act No. 26-68 107 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(h) [On or before April 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, the
Commissioner of Health Strategy] Not later than April first, annually,
the Healthcare Advocate shall develop a summary and analysis of the
community benefit program reporting submitted by hospitals under
this section during the previous calendar year and post such summary
and analysis on its Internet web site and solicit stakeholder input
through a public comment period. The Office of [Health Strategy] the
Healthcare Advocate shall use such reporting and stakeholder input to:
(1) Identify additional stakeholders that may be engaged to address
identified community health needs, including, but not limited to,
federal, state and municipal entities, nonhospital private sector health
care providers and private sector entities that are not health care
providers, including community-based organizations, insurers and
charitable organizations;
(2) Determine how each identified stakeholder could assist in
addressing identified community health needs or augmenting solutions
or approaches reported in the implementation strategies;
(3) Determine whether to make recommendations to the Department
of Public Health in the development of its state health plan; and
(4) Inform the state-wide health care facilities and services plan
established pursuant to section 19a-634.
(i) Each for-profit entity licensed as an acute care general hospital
shall submit community benefit program reporting consistent with the
reporting schedules of subsections (c) to (e), inclusive, of this section,
and reasonably similar to what would be included on such hospital's
federal filings to the Internal Revenue Service, where applicable.
Sec. 92. Section 19a-486 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
Public Act No. 26-68 108 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
For purposes of sections 19a-486 to 19a-486h, inclusive:
(1) "Nonprofit hospital" means a nonprofit entity licensed as a
hospital pursuant to this chapter and any entity affiliated with such a
hospital through governance or membership, including, but not limited
to, a holding company or subsidiary.
(2) "Purchaser" means a person acquiring any assets of a nonprofit
hospital through a transfer.
(3) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation,
limited liability company, association or other entity.
(4) "Transfer" means to sell, transfer, lease, exchange, option, convey,
give or otherwise dispose of or transfer control over, including, but not
limited to, transfer by way of merger or joint venture not in the ordinary
course of business.
(5) "Control" has the meaning assigned to it in section 36b-41.
(6) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of [Health Strategy]
Public Health, or the commissioner's designee.
Sec. 93. Section 19a-486g of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
The Commissioner of Public Health shall refuse to issue a license to,
or if issued shall suspend or revoke the license of, a hospital if the
commissioner finds, after a hearing and opportunity to be heard, that:
(1) There was a transaction described in section 19a-486a that
occurred without the commissioner's approval, [of the Commissioner of
Health Strategy,] if such approval was required by sections 19a-486 to
19a-486h, inclusive;
(2) There was a transaction described in section 19a-486a without the
Public Act No. 26-68 109 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
approval of the Attorney General, if such approval was required by
sections 19a-486 to 19a-486h, inclusive, and the Attorney General
certifies to the [Commissioner of Health Strategy] commissioner that
such transaction involved a material amount of the nonprofit hospital's
assets or operations or a change in control of operations; or
(3) The hospital is not complying with the terms of an agreement
approved by the Attorney General and [Commissioner of Health
Strategy] commissioner pursuant to sections 19a-486 to 19a-486h,
inclusive.
Sec. 94. Section 19a-486h of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
Nothing in sections 19a-486 to 19a-486h, inclusive, shall be construed
to limit: (1) The common law or statutory authority of the Attorney
General; (2) the statutory authority of the Commissioner of Public
Health including, but not limited to, licensing [; (3) the statutory
authority of the Commissioner of Health Strategy, including, but not
limited to, certificate of need authority; or (4)] and certificate of need
authority; or (3) the application of the doctrine of cy pres or
approximation.
Sec. 95. Subsections (d) to (i), inclusive, of section 19a-486i of the
general statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(d) (1) The written notice required under subsection (c) of this section
shall identify each party to the transaction and describe the material
change as of the date of such notice to the business or corporate structure
of the group practice, including: (A) A description of the nature of the
proposed relationship among the parties to the proposed transaction;
(B) the names and specialties of each physician that is a member of the
group practice that is the subject of the proposed transaction and who
Public Act No. 26-68 110 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
will practice medicine with the resulting group practice, hospital,
hospital system, captive professional entity, medical foundation or
other entity organized by, controlled by, or otherwise affiliated with
such hospital or hospital system following the effective date of the
transaction; (C) the names of the business entities that are to provide
services following the effective date of the transaction; (D) the address
for each location where such services are to be provided; (E) a
description of the services to be provided at each such location; and (F)
the primary service area to be served by each such location.
(2) Not later than thirty days after the effective date of any transaction
described in subsection (c) of this section, the parties to the transaction
shall submit written notice to the Commissioner of [Health Strategy]
Public Health. Such written notice shall include, but need not be limited
to, the same information described in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
The commissioner shall post a link to such notice on the [Office of Health
Strategy's] Department of Public Health's Internet web site.
(e) Not less than thirty days prior to the effective date of any
transaction that results in an affiliation between one hospital or hospital
system and another hospital or hospital system, the parties to the
affiliation shall submit written notice to the Attorney General of such
affiliation. Such written notice shall identify each party to the affiliation
and describe the affiliation as of the date of such notice, including: (1) A
description of the nature of the proposed relationship among the parties
to the affiliation; (2) the names of the business entities that are to provide
services following the effective date of the affiliation; (3) the address for
each location where such services are to be provided; (4) a description
of the services to be provided at each such location; and (5) the primary
service area to be served by each such location.
(f) Written information submitted to the Attorney General pursuant
to subsections (b) to (e), inclusive, of this section shall be maintained and
used by the Attorney General in the same manner as provided in section
Public Act No. 26-68 111 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
35-42.
(g) Not later than January [15, 2018, and] fifteenth annually,
[thereafter,] each hospital and hospital system shall file with the
Attorney General and the Commissioner of [Health Strategy] Public
Health a written report describing the activities of the group practices
owned or affiliated with such hospital or hospital system. Such report
shall include, for each such group practice: (1) A description of the
nature of the relationship between the hospital or hospital system and
the group practice; (2) the names and specialties of each physician
practicing medicine with the group practice; (3) the names of the
business entities that provide services as part of the group practice and
the address for each location where such services are provided; (4) a
description of the services provided at each such location; and (5) the
primary service area served by each such location.
(h) Not later than January [15, 2018, and] fifteenth annually,
[thereafter,] each group practice comprised of thirty or more physicians
that is not the subject of a report filed under subsection (g) of this section
shall file with the Attorney General and the Commissioner of [Health
Strategy] Public Health a written report concerning the group practice.
Such report shall include, for each such group practice: (1) The names
and specialties of each physician practicing medicine with the group
practice; (2) the names of the business entities that provide services as
part of the group practice and the address for each location where such
services are provided; (3) a description of the services provided at each
such location; and (4) the primary service area served by each such
location.
(i) Not later than January [15, 2018, and] fifteenth annually,
[thereafter,] each hospital and hospital system shall file with the
Attorney General and the Commissioner of [Health Strategy] Public
Health a written report describing each affiliation with another hospital
or hospital system. Such report shall include: (1) The name and address
Public Act No. 26-68 112 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
of each party to the affiliation; (2) a description of the nature of the
relationship among the parties to the affiliation; (3) the names of the
business entities that provide services as part of the affiliation and the
address for each location where such services are provided; (4) a
description of the services provided at each such location; and (5) the
primary service area served by each such location.
Sec. 96. Section 19a-486j of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) On or before October 31, [2024] 2026, and semiannually thereafter,
each hospital, as defined in section 12-263p, shall submit a semiannual
report to the Commissioner of [Health Strategy] Social Services that
identifies, for each of the two prior calendar quarters, (1) the number of
days of cash on hand, or days cash and cash equivalents otherwise
available to the hospital, and (2) the dollar amount of (A) invoices that
are at least ninety days past due in the reporting period, (B) utility bills
that are at least ninety days past due in the reporting period, (C) fees,
taxes or assessments owed to public entities that are at least ninety days
past due in the reporting period, and (D) unpaid employee health
insurance premiums, including unpaid contributions, claims or other
obligations supporting employees under a self-funded insurance plan
or fully insured plan, that are at least ninety days past due in the
reporting period. The commissioner shall develop a uniform template,
including, but not limited to, definitions of terms used in such template,
to be used by hospitals for the purposes of complying with the
provisions of this subsection and post such template on the [Office of
Health Strategy's] Department of Social Services' Internet web site. A
hospital may request an extension of time to comply with the
requirements of this subsection in a form and manner prescribed by the
commissioner. The commissioner may grant such request for good
cause, as determined by the commissioner. Such template shall be based
on generally accepted accounting principles as prescribed by the
Public Act No. 26-68 113 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Financial Accounting Standards Board.
(b) If a hospital submits a report pursuant to the provisions of
subsection (a) of this section reflecting two consecutive quarters of sixty
days or less of days of cash on hand, or days cash and cash equivalents
otherwise available to the hospital, the commissioner may require the
hospital to provide the [Office of Health Strategy] Department of Social
Services with additional information that the commissioner deems
relevant to understanding the financial health of the hospital.
(c) If a hospital submits a report pursuant to the provisions of
subsection (a) of this section reflecting two consecutive quarters of forty-
five days or less of cash on hand, or days cash and cash equivalents
otherwise available to the hospital, the [Office of Health Strategy]
Department of Social Services shall contact the hospital to offer
assistance.
(d) If a hospital has multiple consecutive quarters of one hundred or
more days of cash on hand, or days cash and cash equivalents otherwise
available to the hospital, the commissioner may waive one of the
hospital's two semiannual reports required pursuant to the provisions
of subsection (a) of this section.
Sec. 97. Subsection (b) of section 19a-490ii of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(b) Not later than March [1, 2025, and] first annually, [thereafter] until
March 1, 2029, each hospital that conducts an analysis pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section shall submit a report, in accordance with
the provisions of section 11-4a, to the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public
health and, not later than March [1, 2026, and] first annually [thereafter]
until March 1, 2029, shall also submit such report to the
Public Act No. 26-68 114 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
[Commissioners] Commissioner of Public Health [and Health Strategy]
and the Healthcare Advocate, regarding its findings and any
recommendations for achieving the goals described in subparagraphs
(A) to (C), inclusive, of subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of this section.
Sec. 98. Subsections (b) and (c) of section 19a-493b of the general
statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective July 1, 2026):
(b) No entity, individual, firm, partnership, corporation, limited
liability company or association, other than a hospital, shall individually
or jointly establish or operate an outpatient surgical facility in this state
without complying with chapter 368z, except as otherwise provided by
this section, and obtaining a license within the time specified in this
subsection from the Department of Public Health for such facility
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, unless such entity, individual,
firm, partnership, corporation, limited liability company or association:
(1) Provides to the Health Systems Planning Unit of the [Office of Health
Strategy] Department of Public Health satisfactory evidence that it was
in operation on or before July 1, 2003, or (2) obtained, on or before July
1, 2003, from the Office of Health Care Access, a determination that a
certificate of need is not required. An entity, individual, firm,
partnership, corporation, limited liability company or association
otherwise in compliance with this section may operate an outpatient
surgical facility without a license through March 30, 2007, and shall have
until March 30, 2007, to obtain a license from the Department of Public
Health.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, no outpatient
surgical facility shall be required to comply with section 19a-631, 19a-
632, 19a-644, 19a-645, 19a-646, 19a-649, 19a-664 to 19a-666, inclusive,
19a-673 to 19a-676, inclusive, 19a-678, 19a-681 or 19a-683. Each
outpatient surgical facility shall continue to be subject to the obligations
and requirements applicable to such facility, including, but not limited
Public Act No. 26-68 115 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
to, any applicable provision of this chapter and those provisions of
chapter 368z not specified in this subsection, except that a request for
permission to undertake a transfer or change of ownership or control
shall not be required pursuant to subsection (a) of section 19a-638 if the
Health Systems Planning Unit of the [Office of Health Strategy]
Department of Public Health determines that the following conditions
are satisfied: (1) Prior to any such transfer or change of ownership or
control, the outpatient surgical facility shall be owned and controlled
exclusively by persons licensed pursuant to section 20-13 or chapter 375,
either directly or through a limited liability company, formed pursuant
to chapter 613, a corporation, formed pursuant to chapters 601 and 602,
or a limited liability partnership, formed pursuant to chapter 614, that
is exclusively owned by persons licensed pursuant to section 20-13 or
chapter 375, or is under the interim control of an estate executor or
conservator pending transfer of an ownership interest or control to a
person licensed under section 20-13 or chapter 375, and (2) after any
such transfer or change of ownership or control, persons licensed
pursuant to section 20-13 or chapter 375, a limited liability company,
formed pursuant to chapter 613, a corporation, formed pursuant to
chapters 601 and 602, or a limited liability partnership, formed pursuant
to chapter 614, that is exclusively owned by persons licensed pursuant
to section 20-13 or chapter 375, shall own and control no less than a sixty
per cent interest in the outpatient surgical facility.
Sec. 99. Subsection (a) of section 19a-507 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 368z, New Horizons,
Inc., a nonprofit, nonsectarian organization, or a subsidiary
organization controlled by New Horizons, Inc., is authorized to
construct and operate an independent living facility for severely
physically disabled adults, in the town of Farmington, provided such
Public Act No. 26-68 116 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
facility shall be constructed in accordance with applicable building
codes. The Farmington Housing Authority, or any issuer acting on
behalf of said authority, subject to the provisions of this section, may
issue tax-exempt revenue bonds on a competitive or negotiated basis for
the purpose of providing construction and permanent mortgage
financing for the facility in accordance with Section 103 of the Internal
Revenue Code. Prior to the issuance of such bonds, plans for the
construction of the facility shall be submitted to and approved by the
Health Systems Planning Unit of the [Office of Health Strategy]
Department of Public Health. The unit shall approve or disapprove such
plans within thirty days of receipt thereof. If the plans are disapproved
they may be resubmitted. Failure of the unit to act on the plans within
such thirty-day period shall be deemed approval thereof. The payments
to residents of the facility who are eligible for assistance under the state
supplement program for room and board and necessary services, shall
be determined annually to be effective July first of each year. Such
payments shall be determined on a basis of a reasonable payment for
necessary services, which basis shall take into account as a factor the
costs of providing those services and such other factors as the
commissioner deems reasonable, including anticipated fluctuations in
the cost of providing services. Such payments shall be calculated in
accordance with the manner in which rates are calculated pursuant to
subsection (i) of section 17b-340 and the cost-related reimbursement
system pursuant to said section except that efficiency incentives shall
not be granted. The commissioner may adjust such rates to account for
the availability of personal care services for residents under the
Medicaid program. The commissioner shall, upon submission of a
request, allow actual debt service, comprised of principal and interest,
in excess of property costs allowed pursuant to section 17-313b-5 of the
regulations of Connecticut state agencies, provided such debt service
terms and amounts are reasonable in relation to the useful life and the
base value of the property. The cost basis for such payment shall be
subject to audit, and a recomputation of the rate shall be made based
Public Act No. 26-68 117 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
upon such audit. The facility shall report on a fiscal year ending on the
thirtieth day of September on forms provided by the commissioner. The
required report shall be received by the commissioner no later than
December thirty-first of each year. The Department of Social Services
may use its existing utilization review procedures to monitor utilization
of the facility. If the facility is aggrieved by any decision of the
commissioner, the facility may, within ten days, after written notice
thereof from the commissioner, obtain by written request to the
commissioner, a hearing on all items of aggrievement. If the facility is
aggrieved by the decision of the commissioner after such hearing, the
facility may appeal to the Superior Court in accordance with the
provisions of section 4-183.
Sec. 100. Subsections (d) to (m), inclusive, of section 19a-508c of the
2026 supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(d) Each initial billing statement that includes a facility fee shall: (1)
Clearly identify the fee as a facility fee that is billed in addition to, or
separately from, any professional fee billed by the provider; (2) provide
the corresponding Medicare facility fee reimbursement rate for the same
service as a comparison or, if there is no corresponding Medicare facility
fee for such service, (A) the approximate amount Medicare would have
paid the hospital for the facility fee on the billing statement, or (B) the
percentage of the hospital's charges that Medicare would have paid the
hospital for the facility fee; (3) include a statement that the facility fee is
intended to cover the hospital's or health system's operational expenses;
(4) inform the patient that the patient's financial liability may have been
less if the services had been provided at a facility not owned or operated
by the hospital or health system; and (5) include written notice of the
patient's right to request a reduction in the facility fee or any other
portion of the bill and a telephone number that the patient may use to
request such a reduction without regard to whether such patient
Public Act No. 26-68 118 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
qualifies for, or is likely to be granted, any reduction. Not later than
October 15, 2022, and annually thereafter, each hospital, health system
and hospital-based facility shall submit to the Health Systems Planning
Unit of the [Office of Health Strategy] Department of Public Health,
established pursuant to section 19a-612, a sample of a billing statement
issued by such hospital, health system or hospital-based facility that
complies with the provisions of this subsection and [which] represents
the format of billing statements received by patients. Such billing
statement shall not contain patient identifying information.
(e) The written notice described in subsections (b) to (d), inclusive,
and (h) to (j), inclusive, of this section shall be in plain language and in
a form that may be reasonably understood by a patient who does not
possess special knowledge regarding hospital or health system facility
fee charges. On and after October 1, 2022, such notices shall include tag
lines in at least the top fifteen languages spoken in the state indicating
that the notice is available in each of those top fifteen languages. The
fifteen languages shall be either the languages in the list published by
the Department of Health and Human Services in connection with
section 1557 of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, P.L. 111-
148, or, as determined by the hospital or health system, the top fifteen
languages in the geographic area of the hospital-based facility.
(f) (1) For nonemergency care, if a patient's appointment is scheduled
to occur ten or more days after the appointment is made, such written
notice shall be sent to the patient by first class mail, encrypted electronic
mail or a secure patient Internet portal not less than three days after the
appointment is made. If an appointment is scheduled to occur less than
ten days after the appointment is made or if the patient arrives without
an appointment, such notice shall be hand-delivered to the patient when
the patient arrives at the hospital-based facility.
(2) For emergency care, such written notice shall be provided to the
patient as soon as practicable after the patient is stabilized in accordance
Public Act No. 26-68 119 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
with the federal Emergency Medical Treatment and Active Labor Act,
42 USC 1395dd, as amended from time to time, or is determined not to
have an emergency medical condition and before the patient leaves the
hospital-based facility. If the patient is unconscious, under great duress
or for any other reason unable to read the notice and understand and
act on his or her rights, the notice shall be provided to the patient's
representative as soon as practicable.
(g) Subsections (b) to (f), inclusive, and (l) of this section shall not
apply if a patient is insured by Medicare or Medicaid or is receiving
services under a workers' compensation plan established to provide
medical services pursuant to chapter 568.
(h) A hospital-based facility shall prominently display written notice
in locations that are readily accessible to and visible by patients,
including patient waiting or appointment check-in areas, stating: (1)
That the hospital-based facility is part of a hospital or health system, (2)
the name of the hospital or health system, and (3) that if the hospital-
based facility charges a facility fee, the patient may incur a financial
liability greater than the patient would incur if the hospital-based
facility was not hospital-based. On and after October 1, 2022, such
notices shall include tag lines in at least the top fifteen languages spoken
in the state indicating that the notice is available in each of those top
fifteen languages. The fifteen languages shall be either the languages in
the list published by the Department of Health and Human Services in
connection with section 1557 of the Patient Protection and Affordable
Care Act, P.L. 111-148, or, as determined by the hospital or health
system, the top fifteen languages in the geographic area of the hospital-
based facility. Not later than October 1, 2022, and annually thereafter,
each hospital-based facility shall submit a copy of the written notice
required by this subsection to the Health Systems Planning Unit of the
[Office of Health Strategy] Department of Public Health.
(i) A hospital-based facility shall clearly hold itself out to the public
Public Act No. 26-68 120 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
and payers as being hospital-based, including, at a minimum, by stating
the name of the hospital or health system in its signage, marketing
materials, Internet web sites and stationery.
(j) A hospital-based facility shall, when scheduling services for which
a facility fee may be charged, inform the patient (1) that the hospital-
based facility is part of a hospital or health system, (2) of the name of the
hospital or health system, (3) that the hospital or health system may
charge a facility fee in addition to and separate from the professional fee
charged by the provider, and (4) of the telephone number the patient
may call for additional information regarding such patient's potential
financial liability.
(k) (1) If any transaction described in subsection (c) of section 19a-
486i results in the establishment of a hospital-based facility at which
facility fees may be billed, the hospital or health system, that is the
purchaser in such transaction shall, not later than thirty days after such
transaction, provide written notice, by first class mail, of the transaction
to each patient served within the three years preceding the date of the
transaction by the health care facility that has been purchased as part of
such transaction.
(2) Such notice shall include the following information:
(A) A statement that the health care facility is now a hospital-based
facility and is part of a hospital or health system, the health care facility's
full legal and business name and the date of such facility's acquisition
by a hospital or health system;
(B) The name, business address and phone number of the hospital or
health system that is the purchaser of the health care facility;
(C) A statement that the hospital-based facility bills, or is likely to bill,
patients a facility fee that may be in addition to, and separate from, any
professional fee billed by a health care provider at the hospital-based
Public Act No. 26-68 121 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
facility;
(D) (i) A statement that the patient's actual financial liability will
depend on the professional medical services actually provided to the
patient, and (ii) an explanation that the patient may incur financial
liability that is greater than the patient would incur if the hospital-based
facility were not a hospital-based facility;
(E) The estimated amount or range of amounts the hospital-based
facility may bill for a facility fee or an example of the average facility fee
billed at such hospital-based facility for the most common services
provided at such hospital-based facility; and
(F) A statement that, prior to seeking services at such hospital-based
facility, a patient covered by a health insurance policy should contact
the patient's health insurer for additional information regarding the
hospital-based facility fees, including the patient's potential financial
liability, if any, for such fees.
(3) A copy of the written notice provided to patients in accordance
with this subsection shall be filed with the Health Systems Planning
Unit of the [Office of Health Strategy] Department of Public Health,
established under section 19a-612. Said unit shall post a link to such
notice on its Internet web site.
(4) A hospital, health system or hospital-based facility shall not collect
a facility fee for services provided at a hospital-based facility that is
subject to the provisions of this subsection from the date of the
transaction until at least thirty days after the written notice required
pursuant to this subsection is mailed to the patient or a copy of such
notice is filed with the Health Systems Planning Unit of the [Office of
Health Strategy] Department of Public Health, whichever is later. A
violation of this subsection shall be considered an unfair trade practice
pursuant to section 42-110b.
Public Act No. 26-68 122 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(5) Not later than July [1, 2023, and] first annually, [thereafter,] each
hospital-based facility that was the subject of a transaction, as described
in subsection (c) of section 19a-486i, during the preceding calendar year
shall report to the Health Systems Planning Unit of the [Office of Health
Strategy] Department of Public Health the number of patients served by
such hospital-based facility in the preceding three years.
(l) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, no hospital,
health system or hospital-based facility shall collect a facility fee for (A)
outpatient health care services that use a current procedural
terminology evaluation and management (CPT E/M) code or
assessment and management (CPT A/M) code and are provided at a
hospital-based facility located off-site from a hospital campus, or (B)
outpatient health care services provided at a hospital-based facility
located off-site from a hospital campus received by a patient who is
uninsured of more than the Medicare rate.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, on and after July
1, 2024, no hospital or health system shall collect a facility fee for
outpatient health care services that use a current procedural
terminology evaluation and management (CPT E/M) code or
assessment and management (CPT A/M) code and are provided on the
hospital campus. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to
(A) an emergency department located on a hospital campus, or (B)
observation stays on a hospital campus and (CPT E/M) and (CPT A/M)
codes when billed for the following services: (i) Wound care, (ii)
orthopedics, (iii) anticoagulation, (iv) oncology, (v) obstetrics, and (vi)
solid organ transplant.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivisions (1) and (2) of this
subsection, in circumstances when an insurance contract that is in effect
on July 1, 2016, provides reimbursement for facility fees prohibited
under the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection, and in
circumstances when an insurance contract that is in effect on July 1,
Public Act No. 26-68 123 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
2024, provides reimbursement for facility fees prohibited under the
provisions of subdivision (2) of this subsection, a hospital or health
system may continue to collect reimbursement from the health insurer
for such facility fees until the applicable date of expiration, renewal or
amendment of such contract, whichever such date is the earliest.
(4) The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to a freestanding
emergency department. As used in this subdivision, "freestanding
emergency department" means a freestanding facility that (A) is
structurally separate and distinct from a hospital, (B) provides
emergency care, (C) is a department of a hospital licensed under chapter
368v, and (D) has been issued a certificate of need to operate as a
freestanding emergency department pursuant to chapter 368z.
(5) (A) On and after July 1, 2024, if the Commissioner of [Health
Strategy] Public Health receives information and has a reasonable belief,
after evaluating such information, that any hospital, health system or
hospital-based facility charged facility fees, other than through isolated
clerical or electronic billing errors, in violation of any provision of this
section, or rule or regulation adopted thereunder, such hospital, health
system or hospital-based facility shall be subject to a civil penalty of up
to one thousand dollars. The commissioner may issue a notice of
violation and civil penalty by first class mail or personal service. Such
notice shall include: (i) A reference to the section of the general statutes,
rule or section of the regulations of Connecticut state agencies believed
or alleged to have been violated; (ii) a short and plain language
statement of the matters asserted or charged; (iii) a description of the
activity to cease; (iv) a statement of the amount of the civil penalty or
penalties that may be imposed; (v) a statement concerning the right to a
hearing; and (vi) a statement that such hospital, health system or
hospital-based facility may, not later than ten business days after receipt
of such notice, make a request for a hearing on the matters asserted.
(B) The hospital, health system or hospital-based facility to whom
Public Act No. 26-68 124 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
such notice is provided pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this
subdivision may, not later than ten business days after receipt of such
notice, make written application to the [Office of Health Strategy]
Department of Public Health to request a hearing to demonstrate that
such violation did not occur. The failure to make a timely request for a
hearing shall result in the issuance of a cease and desist order or civil
penalty. All hearings held under this subsection shall be conducted in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 54.
(C) Following any hearing before the [Office of Health Strategy]
Department of Public Health pursuant to this subdivision, if said [office]
department finds, by a preponderance of the evidence, that such
hospital, health system or hospital-based facility violated or is violating
any provision of this subsection, any rule or regulation adopted
thereunder or any order issued by said [office] department, said [office]
department shall issue a final cease and desist order in addition to any
civil penalty said [office] department imposes.
(6) A violation of this subsection shall be considered an unfair trade
practice pursuant to section 42-110b.
(m) (1) Each hospital and health system shall report not later than
October 1, 2023, and thereafter not later than July 1, 2024, and annually
thereafter, to the Commissioner of [Health Strategy] Public Health, on a
form prescribed by the commissioner, concerning facility fees charged
or billed during the preceding calendar year. Such report shall include,
but need not be limited to, (A) the name and address of each facility
owned or operated by the hospital or health system that provides
services for which a facility fee is charged or billed, and an indication as
to whether each facility is located on or outside of the hospital or health
system campus, (B) the number of patient visits at each such facility for
which a facility fee was charged or billed, (C) the number, total amount
and range of allowable facility fees paid at each such facility
disaggregated by payer mix, (D) for each facility, the total amount of
Public Act No. 26-68 125 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
facility fees charged and the total amount of revenue received by the
hospital or health system derived from facility fees, (E) the total amount
of facility fees charged and the total amount of revenue received by the
hospital or health system from all facilities derived from facility fees, (F)
a description of the ten procedures or services that generated the
greatest amount of facility fee gross revenue, disaggregated by current
procedural terminology (CPT) category code for each such procedure or
service and, for each such procedure or service, patient volume and the
total amount of gross and net revenue received by the hospital or health
system derived from facility fees, disaggregated by on-campus and off-
campus, and (G) the top ten procedures or services for which facility
fees are charged based on patient volume and the gross and net revenue
received by the hospital or health system for each such procedure or
service, disaggregated by on-campus and off-campus. For purposes of
this subsection, "facility" means a hospital-based facility that is located
on a hospital campus or outside a hospital campus.
(2) The commissioner shall publish the information reported
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, or post a link to such
information, on the Internet web site of the [Office of Health Strategy]
Department of Public Health.
Sec. 101. Subsection (c) of section 19a-509b of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(c) Each hospital that holds or administers one or more hospital bed
funds shall make available in a place and manner allowing individual
members of the public to easily obtain it, a one-page summary in
English and Spanish describing hospital bed funds and how to apply for
them. The summary shall also describe any other policies regarding the
provision of charity care and reduced cost services for the indigent as
reported by the hospital to the Health Systems Planning Unit of the
[Office of Health Strategy] Department of Public Health pursuant to
Public Act No. 26-68 126 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
section 19a-649 and shall clearly distinguish hospital bed funds from
other sources of financial assistance. The summary shall include
notification that the patient is entitled to reapply upon rejection, and
that additional funds may become available on an annual basis. The
summary shall be available in the patient admissions office, emergency
room, social services department and patient accounts or billing office,
and from any collection agent. If during the admission process or during
its review of the financial resources of the patient, the hospital
reasonably believes the patient will have limited funds to pay for any
portion of the patient's hospitalization not covered by insurance, the
hospital shall provide the summary to each such patient.
Sec. 102. Section 19a-612 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
[(a)] There is established, within the [Office of Health Strategy,
established under section 19a-754a] Department of Public Health, a unit
to be known as the Health Systems Planning Unit [. The unit, under]
that shall be under the direction of the Commissioner of [Health
Strategy, shall constitute a successor to the former Office of Health Care
Access, in accordance with the provisions of sections 4-38d and 4-39]
Public Health.
[(b) Any order, decision, agreed settlement or regulation of the
former Office of Health Care Access which is in force on July 1, 2018,
shall continue in force and effect as an order or regulation of the Office
of Health Strategy until amended, repealed or superseded pursuant to
law.
(c) If the words "Office of Health Care Access" are used or referred to
in any public or special act of 2009 or in any section of the general
statutes which is amended in 2009, such words shall be deemed to mean
or refer to the Office of Health Care Access division within the
Department of Public Health. If the words "Office of Health Care
Public Act No. 26-68 127 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Access" are used or referred to in any public or special act of 2018 or in
any section of the general statutes which is amended in 2018, such
words shall be deemed to mean or refer to the Health Systems Planning
Unit within the Office of Health Strategy.]
Sec. 103. Section 19a-612d of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
[(a)] The Commissioner of [Health Strategy] Public Health shall
oversee the Health Systems Planning Unit and shall exercise
independent decision-making authority over all certificate of need
decisions.
[(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section,
the Deputy Commissioner of Public Health shall retain independent
decision-making authority over only the certificate of need applications
that are pending before the Office of Health Care Access and have been
deemed completed by said office on or before May 14, 2018. Following
the issuance by the Deputy Commissioner of Public Health of a final
decision on any such certificate of need application, the Commissioner
of Health Strategy shall exercise independent authority on any further
action required on such certificate of need application or the certificate
of need issued pursuant to such application.]
Sec. 104. Subsection (c) of section 19a-613 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(c) The Commissioner of [Health Strategy] Public Health, or any
person the commissioner designates, may conduct a hearing and render
a final decision in any case when a hearing is required or authorized
under the provisions of any statute dealing with the Health Systems
Planning Unit.
Sec. 105. Section 19a-614 of the general statutes is repealed and the
Public Act No. 26-68 128 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
The Commissioner of [Health Strategy] Public Health may employ
and pay professional and support staff subject to the provisions of
chapter 67 and contract with and engage consultants and other
independent professionals as may be necessary or desirable to carry out
the functions of the Health Systems Planning Unit.
Sec. 106. Section 19a-630 of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective July 1, 2026):
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Affiliate" means a person, entity or organization controlling,
controlled by or under common control with another person, entity or
organization. Affiliate does not include a medical foundation organized
under chapter 594b.
(2) "Applicant" means any person or health care facility that applies
for a certificate of need pursuant to section 19a-639a.
(3) "Bed capacity" means the total number of inpatient beds in a
facility licensed by the Department of Public Health under sections 19a-
490 to 19a-503, inclusive.
(4) "Capital expenditure" means an expenditure that under generally
accepted accounting principles consistently applied is not properly
chargeable as an expense of operation or maintenance and includes
acquisition by purchase, transfer, lease or comparable arrangement, or
through donation, if the expenditure would have been considered a
capital expenditure had the acquisition been by purchase.
(5) "Certificate of need" means a certificate issued by the unit.
(6) "Days" means calendar days.
Public Act No. 26-68 129 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(7) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of [Health Strategy]
Public Health.
(8) "Free clinic" means a private, nonprofit community-based
organization that provides medical, dental, pharmaceutical or mental
health services at reduced cost or no cost to low-income, uninsured and
underinsured individuals.
(9) "Large group practice" means eight or more full-time equivalent
physicians, legally organized in a partnership, professional corporation,
limited liability company formed to render professional services,
medical foundation, not-for-profit corporation, faculty practice plan or
other similar entity (A) in which each physician who is a member of the
group provides substantially the full range of services that the physician
routinely provides, including, but not limited to, medical care,
consultation, diagnosis or treatment, through the joint use of shared
office space, facilities, equipment or personnel; (B) for which
substantially all of the services of the physicians who are members of
the group are provided through the group and are billed in the name of
the group practice and amounts so received are treated as receipts of the
group; or (C) in which the overhead expenses of, and the income from,
the group are distributed in accordance with methods previously
determined by members of the group. An entity that otherwise meets
the definition of group practice under this section shall be considered a
group practice although its shareholders, partners or owners of the
group practice include single-physician professional corporations,
limited liability companies formed to render professional services or
other entities in which beneficial owners are individual physicians.
(10) "Health care facility" means (A) hospitals licensed by the
Department of Public Health under chapter 368v; (B) specialty hospitals;
(C) freestanding emergency departments; (D) outpatient surgical
facilities, as defined in section 19a-493b and licensed under chapter
368v; (E) a hospital or other facility or institution operated by the state
Public Act No. 26-68 130 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
that provides services that are eligible for reimbursement under Title
XVIII or XIX of the federal Social Security Act, 42 USC 301, as amended;
(F) a central service facility; (G) mental health facilities; (H) substance
abuse treatment facilities; and (I) any other facility requiring certificate
of need review pursuant to subsection (a) of section 19a-638. "Health
care facility" includes any parent company, subsidiary, affiliate or joint
venture, or any combination thereof, of any such facility.
(11) "Nonhospital based" means located at a site other than the main
campus of the hospital.
(12) ["Office" means the Office of Health Strategy] "Department"
means the Department of Public Health.
(13) "Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation, limited
liability company, association, governmental subdivision, agency or
public or private organization of any character, but does not include the
agency conducting the proceeding.
(14) "Physician" has the same meaning as provided in section 20-13a.
(15) "Termination of services" means the cessation of any services for
a combined total of greater than one hundred eighty days within any
consecutive two-year period.
(16) "Transfer of ownership" means a transfer that impacts or changes
the governance or controlling body of a health care facility, institution
or large group practice, including, but not limited to, all affiliations,
mergers or any sale or transfer of net assets of a health care facility.
(17) "Unit" means the Health Systems Planning Unit.
Sec. 107. Subsection (b) of section 19a-631 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
Public Act No. 26-68 131 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(b) Each hospital shall annually pay to the Commissioner of [Health
Strategy] Public Health, for deposit in the General Fund, an amount
equal to its share of the actual expenditures made by the unit during
each fiscal year including the cost of fringe benefits for unit personnel
as estimated by the Comptroller, the amount of expenses for central
state services attributable to the unit for the fiscal year as estimated by
the Comptroller, plus the expenditures made on behalf of the unit from
the Capital Equipment Purchase Fund pursuant to section 4a-9 for such
year. Payments shall be made by assessment of all hospitals of the costs
calculated and collected in accordance with the provisions of this section
and section 19a-632. If for any reason a hospital ceases operation, any
unpaid assessment for the operations of the unit shall be reapportioned
among the remaining hospitals to be paid in addition to any other
assessment.
Sec. 108. Section 19a-632a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) For purposes of this section, "electronic funds transfer" has the
same meaning as provided in section 12-685.
(b) The [Office of Health Strategy] Department of Public Health may
require a hospital to pay an assessment levied pursuant to section 19a-
632 by way of an approved method of electronic funds transfer.
(c) A hospital making an electronic funds transfer pursuant to this
section shall initiate such transfer in a timely fashion to ensure that a
bank account designated by the department is credited by electronic
funds transfer for the amount of the assessment required to be made by
such method on or before the date such assessment is due.
(d) Where an assessment is required to be made by electronic funds
transfer, any payment made by a method other than electronic funds
transfer shall be treated as an assessment not made in a timely manner,
Public Act No. 26-68 132 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
and any payment made by electronic funds transfer, where the bank
account designated by the department is not credited for the amount of
the assessment on or before the date such assessment is due, shall be
treated as an assessment not made in a timely manner. Any assessment
treated under this subsection as an assessment not made in a timely
manner shall be subject to a penalty in accordance with subsection (e) of
this section.
(e) Where any assessment is treated under subsection (d) of this
section as an assessment not made in a timely manner because it is made
by means other than electronic funds transfer, [there shall be imposed]
the department shall impose a penalty equal to ten per cent of the
assessment required to be made by electronic funds transfer. Where any
assessment made by electronic funds transfer is treated under
subsection (d) of this section as an assessment not made in a timely
manner because the bank account designated by the department is not
credited by electronic funds transfer for the amount of the assessment
on or before the date such assessment is due, [there shall be imposed]
the department shall impose a penalty equal to (1) two per cent of the
assessment required to be made by electronic funds transfer, if such
failure to pay by electronic funds transfer is for not more than five days;
(2) five per cent of the assessment required to be made by electronic
funds transfer, if such failure to pay by electronic funds transfer is for
more than five days but not more than fifteen days; or (3) ten per cent of
the assessment required to be made by electronic funds transfer, if such
failure to pay by electronic funds transfer is for more than fifteen days.
(f) The [office] department shall deposit all payments received
pursuant to this section with the State Treasurer. The moneys so
deposited shall be credited to the General Fund and shall be accounted
for as expenses recovered from hospitals.
Sec. 109. Subsection (a) of section 19a-634 of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
Public Act No. 26-68 133 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The Health Systems Planning Unit shall conduct, on a biennial
basis, within available appropriations, a state-wide health care facility
utilization study. Such study may include an assessment of: (1) Current
availability and utilization of acute hospital care, hospital emergency
care, specialty hospital care, outpatient surgical care, primary care and
clinic care; (2) geographic areas and subpopulations that may be
underserved or have reduced access to specific types of health care
services; and (3) other factors that the unit deems pertinent to health care
facility utilization. Not later than June thirtieth of the year in which the
biennial study is conducted, the Commissioner of [Health Strategy]
Public Health shall report, in accordance with section 11-4a, to the
Governor and the joint standing committees of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to public health and human
services on the findings of the study. Such report may also include the
unit's recommendations for addressing identified gaps in the provision
of health care services and recommendations concerning a lack of access
to health care services.
Sec. 110. Subsections (d) and (e) of section 19a-638 of the general
statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective July 1, 2026):
(d) The Commissioner of [Health Strategy] Public Health may
implement policies and procedures necessary to administer the
provisions of this section while in the process of adopting such policies
and procedures as regulation, provided the commissioner holds a
public hearing prior to implementing the policies and procedures and
posts notice of intent to adopt regulations on the [office's] department's
Internet web site and the eRegulations System not later than twenty
days after the date of implementation. Policies and procedures
implemented pursuant to this section shall be valid until the time final
regulations are adopted.
Public Act No. 26-68 134 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(e) On or before June 30, 2026, a mental health facility seeking to
increase licensed bed capacity without applying for a certificate of need,
as permitted pursuant to subdivision (23) of subsection (b) of this
section, shall notify the [Office of Health Strategy] Department of Public
Health, in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner,
regarding (1) such facility's intent to increase licensed bed capacity, (2)
the address of such facility, and (3) a description of all services that are
being or will be provided at such facility.
Sec. 111. Subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 19a-639 of the
2026 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(1) Whether the proposed project is consistent with any applicable
policies and standards adopted in regulations by the [Office of Health
Strategy] Department of Public Health;
Sec. 112. Subsection (a) of section 19a-639a of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(a) An application for a certificate of need shall be filed with the unit
in accordance with the provisions of this section and any regulations
adopted by the [Office of Health Strategy] Department of Public Health.
The application shall address the guidelines and principles set forth in
(1) subsection (a) of section 19a-639, and (2) regulations adopted by the
department. The applicant shall include with the application a
nonrefundable application fee based on the cost of the project. The
amount of the fee shall be as follows: (A) One thousand dollars for a
project that will cost not greater than fifty thousand dollars; (B) two
thousand dollars for a project that will cost greater than fifty thousand
dollars but not greater than one hundred thousand dollars; (C) three
thousand dollars for a project that will cost greater than one hundred
thousand dollars but not greater than five hundred thousand dollars;
Public Act No. 26-68 135 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(D) four thousand dollars for a project that will cost greater than five
hundred thousand dollars but not greater than one million dollars; (E)
five thousand dollars for a project that will cost greater than one million
dollars but not greater than five million dollars; (F) eight thousand
dollars for a project that will cost greater than five million dollars but
not greater than ten million dollars; and (G) ten thousand dollars for a
project that will cost greater than ten million dollars.
Sec. 113. Subsection (h) of section 19a-639a of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(h) The Commissioner of [Health Strategy] Public Health may
implement policies and procedures necessary to administer the
provisions of this section while in the process of adopting such policies
and procedures as regulation, provided the commissioner holds a
public hearing prior to implementing the policies and procedures and
posts notice of intent to adopt regulations on the [office's] Department
of Public Health's Internet web site and the eRegulations System not
later than twenty days after the date of implementation. Policies and
procedures implemented pursuant to this section shall be valid until the
time final regulations are adopted.
Sec. 114. Subsection (e) of section 19a-639b of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(e) The Commissioner of [Health Strategy] Public Health may
implement policies and procedures necessary to administer the
provisions of this section while in the process of adopting such policies
and procedures as regulation, provided the commissioner holds a
public hearing prior to implementing the policies and procedures and
posts notice of intent to adopt regulations on the [office's] Department
of Public Health's Internet web site and the eRegulations System not
Public Act No. 26-68 136 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
later than twenty days after the date of implementation. Policies and
procedures implemented pursuant to this section shall be valid until the
time final regulations are adopted.
Sec. 115. Subsection (b) of section 19a-639c of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(b) The Commissioner of [Health Strategy] Public Health may
implement policies and procedures necessary to administer the
provisions of this section while in the process of adopting such policies
and procedures as regulation, provided the commissioner holds a
public hearing prior to implementing the policies and procedures and
posts notice of intent to adopt regulations on the [office's] Department
of Public Health's Internet web site and the eRegulations System not
later than twenty days after the date of implementation. Policies and
procedures implemented pursuant to this section shall be valid until the
time final regulations are adopted.
Sec. 116. Subsection (d) of section 19a-639e of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(d) The Commissioner of [Health Strategy] Public Health may
implement policies and procedures necessary to administer the
provisions of this section while in the process of adopting such policies
and procedures as regulation, provided the commissioner holds a
public hearing prior to implementing the policies and procedures and
posts notice of intent to adopt regulations on the [office's] Department
of Public Health's Internet web site and the eRegulations System not
later than twenty days after the date of implementation. Policies and
procedures implemented pursuant to this section shall be valid until the
time final regulations are adopted.
Public Act No. 26-68 137 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 117. Subsection (a) of section 19a-639f of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(a) The Health Systems Planning Unit of the [Office of Health
Strategy] Department of Public Health shall conduct a cost and market
impact review in each case where (1) an application for a certificate of
need filed pursuant to section 19a-638 involves the transfer of
ownership of a hospital, as defined in section 19a-639, and (2) the
purchaser is a hospital, as defined in section 19a-490, whether located
within or outside the state, that had net patient revenue for fiscal year
2013 in an amount greater than one billion five hundred million dollars,
or a hospital system, as defined in section 19a-486i, whether located
within or outside the state, that had net patient revenue for fiscal year
2013 in an amount greater than one billion five hundred million dollars
or any person that is organized or operated for profit.
Sec. 118. Subsection (l) of section 19a-639f of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(l) The Commissioner of [Health Strategy] Public Health shall adopt
regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, concerning
cost and market impact reviews and to administer the provisions of this
section. Such regulations shall include definitions of the following
terms: "Dispersed service area", "health status adjusted total medical
expense", "major service category", "relative prices", "total health care
spending" and "health care services". The commissioner may implement
policies and procedures necessary to administer the provisions of this
section while in the process of adopting such policies and procedures in
regulation form, provided the commissioner publishes notice of
intention to adopt the regulations on the [office's] Department of Public
Health's Internet web site and the eRegulations System not later than
twenty days after implementing such policies and procedures. Policies
Public Act No. 26-68 138 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
and procedures implemented pursuant to this subsection shall be valid
until the time such regulations are effective.
Sec. 119. Subsections (a) and (b) of section 19a-639g of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of sections 19a-630 to 19a-639f,
inclusive, any transacting parties involved in any transfer of ownership,
as defined in section 19a-630, of a hospital requiring a certificate of need
pursuant to section 19a-638 in which (1) the hospital subject to the
transfer of ownership has filed for bankruptcy protection in any court
of competent jurisdiction, and (2) a potential purchaser for such hospital
has been or is required to be approved by a bankruptcy court, may, at
the discretion of the Commissioner of [Health Strategy] Public Health,
apply for an emergency certificate of need through the emergency
certificate of need application process described in this section. An
emergency certificate of need issued by the Health Systems Planning
Unit of the [Office of Health Strategy] Department of Public Health
pursuant to the provisions of this section and any conditions imposed
on such issuance shall apply to the applicant applying for the
emergency certificate of need, the hospital subject to the transfer of
ownership and any subsidiary or group practice that would otherwise
require a certificate of need pursuant to the provisions of section 19a-
638 and that is also subject to the transfer of ownership as part of the
bankruptcy proceeding. The availability of the emergency certificate of
need application process described in this section shall not affect any
existing certificate of need issued pursuant to the provisions of sections
19a-630 to 19a-639f, inclusive.
(b) (1) The unit shall develop an emergency certificate of need
application, which shall identify any data required to be submitted with
such application that the unit deems necessary to analyze the effects of
a hospital's transfer of ownership on health care costs, quality and access
Public Act No. 26-68 139 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
in the affected market. If a potential purchaser of a hospital, described
in subsection (a) of this section, is a for-profit entity, the unit's
emergency certificate of need application may require additional
information or data intended to ensure that the ongoing operation of the
hospital after the transfer of ownership will be maintained in the public
interest. The commissioner shall post any emergency certificate of need
application developed pursuant to the provisions of this subdivision on
the [Office of Health Strategy's] Department of Public Health's Internet
web site and may modify any data required to be submitted with an
emergency certificate of need application, provided the commissioner
posts any such modification to the [office's] department's Internet web
site not later than fifteen days before such a modification becomes
effective.
(2) An applicant seeking an emergency certificate of need shall
submit an emergency certificate of need application to the unit in a form
and manner prescribed by the commissioner.
(3) An emergency certificate of need application shall be deemed
complete on the date the unit determines that an applicant has
submitted a complete application, including data required by the unit
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection. The unit shall determine
whether an application is complete not later than three business days
after an applicant submits an application. If, after making such a
determination, the unit deems an application incomplete, the unit shall,
not more than three business days after deeming such application
incomplete, notify the applicant that such application is incomplete and
identify any application or data elements that were not adequately
addressed by the applicant. The unit shall not review such an
application until the applicant submits any such application or data
elements to the unit.
(4) The unit may hold a public hearing on an emergency certificate of
need application, provided (A) the unit holds such public hearing not
Public Act No. 26-68 140 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
later than thirty days after such application is deemed complete, and (B)
the unit notifies the applicant of such public hearing not less than five
days before the date of the public hearing. Any such public hearing or
any other proceeding related to the emergency certificate of need
application process described in this section shall not be considered a
contested case pursuant to the provisions of chapter 54. Members of the
public may submit public comments at any time during the emergency
certificate of need application process and may request the unit to
exercise its discretion to hold a public hearing pursuant to the
provisions of this subdivision.
(5) When evaluating an emergency certificate of need application, the
unit may consult any person and consider any relevant information,
provided, unless prohibited by federal or state law, the unit includes
any opinion or information gathered from consulting any such person
and any such relevant information considered in the record relating to
the emergency certificate of need application and cites any such opinion
or information and any such relevant information considered in its final
decision on the emergency certificate of need application. The unit may
contract with one or more third-party consultants, at the expense of the
applicant, to analyze (A) the anticipated effect of the hospital's transfer
of ownership on access, cost and quality of health care in the affected
community, and (B) any other issue arising from the application review
process. The aggregate cost of any such third-party consultations shall
not exceed two hundred thousand dollars. Any reports or analyses
generated by any such third-party consultant that the unit considers in
issuing its final decision on an emergency certificate of need application
shall, unless otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, be included in
the record relating to the emergency certificate of need application. The
provisions of chapter 57 and sections 4-212 to 4-219, inclusive, and 4e-
19 shall not apply to any retainer agreement executed pursuant to this
subsection.
Public Act No. 26-68 141 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 120. Section 19a-643 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The [Office of Health Strategy] Department of Public Health shall
adopt regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, to
carry out the provisions of sections 19a-630 to 19a-639e, inclusive, and
sections 19a-644 and 19a-645 concerning the submission of data by
health care facilities and institutions, including data on dealings
between health care facilities and institutions and their affiliates, and,
with regard to requests or proposals pursuant to sections 19a-638 to 19a-
639e, inclusive, by state health care facilities and institutions, the
ongoing inspections by the unit of operating budgets that have been
approved by the health care facilities and institutions, standard
reporting forms and standard accounting procedures to be utilized by
health care facilities and institutions and the transferability of line items
in the approved operating budgets of the health care facilities and
institutions, except that any health care facility or institution may
transfer any amounts among items in its operating budget. All such
transfers shall be reported to the unit not later than thirty days after the
transfer or transfers.
(b) The [Office of Health Strategy] Department of Public Health may
adopt such regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54,
as are necessary to implement this chapter.
Sec. 121. Subsections (a) and (b) of section 19a-644 of the general
statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) On or before February twenty-eighth annually, for the fiscal year
ending on September thirtieth of the immediately preceding year, each
short-term acute care general or children's hospital shall report to the
unit with respect to its operations in such fiscal year, in such form as the
unit may by regulation require. Such report shall include: (1) Salaries
Public Act No. 26-68 142 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
and fringe benefits for the ten highest paid hospital and health system
employees; (2) the name of each joint venture, partnership, subsidiary
and corporation related to the hospital; (3) the salaries paid to hospital
and health system employees by each such joint venture, partnership,
subsidiary and related corporation and by the hospital to the employees
of related corporations; and (4) information and data prescribed by the
[Office of Health Strategy] Department of Public Health concerning
charges for trauma activation fees. For purposes of this subsection,
"health system" has the same meaning as provided in section 33-182aa.
(b) The [Office of Health Strategy] Commissioner of Public Health
shall adopt regulations in accordance with chapter 54 to provide for the
collection of data and information in addition to the annual report
required in subsection (a) of this section. Such regulations shall provide
for the submission of information about the operations of the following
entities: Persons or parent corporations that own or control the health
care facility, institution or provider; corporations, including limited
liability corporations, in which the health care facility, institution,
provider, its parent, any type of affiliate or any combination thereof,
owns more than an aggregate of fifty per cent of the stock or, in the case
of nonstock corporations, is the sole member; and any partnerships in
which the person, health care facility, institution, provider, its parent or
an affiliate or any combination thereof, or any combination of health
care providers or related persons, owns a greater than fifty per cent
interest. For purposes of this subsection, "affiliate" means any person
that directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls
or is controlled by or is under common control with any health care
facility, institution, provider or person that is regulated in any way
under this chapter. A person is deemed controlled by another person if
the other person, or one of that other person's affiliates, officers, agents
or management employees, acts as a general partner or manager of the
person in question.
Public Act No. 26-68 143 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 122. Section 19a-645 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
A nonprofit hospital, licensed by the Department of Public Health,
[which] that provides lodging, care and treatment to members of the
public, and [which] that wishes to enlarge its public facilities by adding
contiguous land and buildings thereon, if any, the title to which it
cannot otherwise acquire, may prefer a complaint for the right to take
such land to the superior court for the judicial district in which such land
is located, provided such hospital shall have received the approval of
the Health Systems Planning Unit of the [Office of Health Strategy]
Department of Public Health in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter. Said court shall appoint a committee of three disinterested
persons, who, after examining the premises and hearing the parties,
shall report to the court as to the necessity and propriety of such
enlargement and as to the quantity, boundaries and value of the land
and buildings thereon, if any, [which] that they deem proper to be taken
for such purpose and the damages resulting from such taking. If such
committee reports that such enlargement is necessary and proper and
the court accepts such report, the decision of said court thereon shall
have the effect of a judgment and execution may be issued thereon
accordingly, in favor of the person to whom damages may be assessed,
for the amount thereof; and, on payment thereof, the title to the land and
buildings thereon, if any, for such purpose shall be vested in the
complainant, but such land and buildings thereon, if any, shall not be
taken until such damages are paid to such owner or deposited with said
court, for such owner's use, [within] not later than thirty days after such
report is accepted. If such application is denied, the owner of the land
shall recover costs of the applicant, to be taxed by said court, which may
issue execution therefor. Land so taken shall be held by such hospital
and used only for the public purpose stated in its complaint to the
superior court. No land dedicated or otherwise reserved as open space
or park land or for other recreational purposes and no land belonging
Public Act No. 26-68 144 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
to any town, city or borough shall be taken under the provisions of this
section.
Sec. 123. Subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 19a-646 of the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(1) "Unit" means the Health Systems Planning Unit within the [Office
of Health Strategy] Department of Public Health, established under
section 19a-612;
Sec. 124. Subsections (a) to (d), inclusive, of section 19a-653 of the
general statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) Any person or health care facility or institution that is required to
file a certificate of need for any of the activities described in section 19a-
638, and any person or health care facility or institution that is required
to file data or information under any public or special act or under this
chapter or sections 19a-486 to 19a-486h, inclusive, or any regulation
adopted or order issued under this chapter or said sections, and
negligently fails to seek certificate of need approval for any of the
activities described in section 19a-638, or to so file within prescribed
time periods, and any person or health care facility or institution that
has agreed to fully resolve a certificate of need application through
settlement and negligently fails to comply with any term or condition
enumerated in the settlement agreement, shall be subject to a civil
penalty of up to one thousand dollars a day for each day such person or
health care facility or institution conducts any of the described activities
without certificate of need approval as required by section 19a-638, for
each day such information is missing, incomplete or inaccurate or for
each day any condition of a settlement agreement is not met. Any civil
penalty authorized by this section shall be imposed by the [Office of
Health Strategy] Department of Public Health in accordance with
Public Act No. 26-68 145 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
subsections (b) to (e), inclusive, of this section.
(b) If the [Office of Health Strategy] Department of Public Health has
reason to believe that a violation has occurred for which a civil penalty
is authorized by subsection (a) of this section or subsection (e) of section
19a-632, [it] the department shall notify the person or health care facility
or institution by first-class mail or personal service. The notice shall
include: (1) A reference to the sections of the statute, regulation or
settlement agreement involved; (2) a short and plain statement of the
matters asserted or charged; (3) a statement of the amount of the civil
penalty or penalties to be imposed; (4) the initial date of the imposition
of the penalty; and (5) a statement of the party's right to a hearing.
(c) The person or health care facility or institution to whom the notice
is addressed shall have fifteen business days [from] after the date of
mailing of the notice to make written application to the unit to (1)
request a hearing to contest the imposition of the penalty, (2) request an
extension of time to file the required data, or (3) comply with
enumerated conditions of an agreed settlement. A failure to make a
timely request for a hearing or an extension of time to file the required
data or a denial of a request for an extension of time shall result in a final
order for the imposition of the penalty. All hearings under this section
shall be conducted pursuant to sections 4-176e to 4-184, inclusive. The
[Office of Health Strategy] Department of Public Health may grant an
extension of time for filing the required data or mitigate or waive the
penalty upon such terms and conditions as, in its discretion, it deems
proper or necessary upon consideration of any extenuating factors or
circumstances.
(d) A final order of the [Office of Health Strategy] Department of
Public Health assessing a civil penalty shall be subject to appeal as set
forth in section 4-183 after a hearing before the unit pursuant to
subsection (c) of this section, except that any such appeal shall be taken
to the superior court for the judicial district of New Britain. Such final
Public Act No. 26-68 146 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
order shall not be subject to appeal under any other provision of the
general statutes. No challenge to any such final order shall be allowed
as to any issue [which] that could have been raised by an appeal of an
earlier order, denial or other final decision by the [office] department.
Sec. 125. Subsections (b) to (g), inclusive, of section 19a-654 of the
general statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(b) Each short-term acute care general or children's hospital shall
submit patient-identifiable inpatient discharge data and emergency
department data to the [Health Systems Planning Unit of the Office of
Health Strategy to fulfill the responsibilities of the unit] Department of
Public Health (1) to assist the department in fulfilling its responsibilities
under chapter 368z, and (2) for the purposes set forth in section 19a-25
and the regulations promulgated thereunder. Such data shall include
data taken from patient medical record abstracts and bills. The [unit]
department shall specify the timing and format of such submissions.
Data submitted pursuant to this section may be submitted through a
contractual arrangement with an intermediary and such contractual
arrangement shall [(1)] (A) comply with the provisions of the Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 P.L. 104-191
(HIPAA), and [(2)] (B) ensure that such submission of data is timely and
accurate. The [unit] department may conduct an audit of the data
submitted through such intermediary in order to verify its accuracy.
(c) An outpatient surgical facility, as defined in section 19a-493b, a
short-term acute care general or children's hospital, or a facility that
provides outpatient surgical services as part of the outpatient surgery
department of a short-term acute care hospital shall submit to the [unit]
department the data identified in subsection (c) of section 19a-634. The
[unit] department shall convene a working group consisting of
representatives of outpatient surgical facilities, hospitals and other
individuals necessary to develop recommendations that address current
Public Act No. 26-68 147 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
obstacles to, and proposed requirements for, patient-identifiable data
reporting in the outpatient setting. [On or before February 1, 2012, the]
The working group shall report, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a, on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to public health and insurance and real estate [. Additional
reporting of] regarding such outpatient data as the [unit] department
deems necessary. [shall begin not later than July 1, 2015. On or before
July 1, 2018, and annually thereafter,] Not later than July first annually,
the Connecticut Association of Ambulatory Surgery Centers shall
provide a progress report to the [Office of Health Strategy] Department
of Public Health, until such time as all ambulatory surgery centers are
in full compliance with the implementation of systems that allow for the
reporting of outpatient data as required by the [commissioner]
Commissioner of Public Health. Until such additional reporting
requirements take effect on July 1, 2015, the department may work with
the Connecticut Association of Ambulatory Surgery Centers and the
Connecticut Hospital Association on specific data reporting initiatives
provided that no penalties shall be assessed under this chapter or any
other provision of law with respect to the failure to submit such data.
(d) Except as provided in this subsection and section 19a-25, and the
regulations promulgated thereunder, patient-identifiable data received
by the [unit] department shall be kept confidential by the department
and shall not be considered public records or files subject to disclosure
under the Freedom of Information Act, as defined in section 1-200. The
[unit] department may release de-identified patient data or aggregate
patient data to the public in a manner consistent with the provisions of
45 CFR 164.514. [Any de-identified patient data released by the unit
shall exclude provider, physician and payer organization names or
codes and shall be kept confidential by the recipient. The unit] The
department may release patient-identifiable data (1) for [medical and
scientific research as provided for in section 19a-25-3 of the regulations
Public Act No. 26-68 148 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
of Connecticut state agencies, and (2) to (A) a state agency for the
purpose of improving health care service delivery, (B)] the purposes set
forth in and pursuant to section 19a-25 and the regulations promulgated
thereunder, and (2) to (A) a federal agency or the office of the Attorney
General for the purpose of investigating hospital mergers and
acquisitions, [(C)] (B) another state's health data collection agency with
which the [unit] department has entered into a reciprocal data-sharing
agreement for the purpose of certificate of need review or evaluation of
health care services, upon receipt of a request from such agency,
provided, prior to the release of such patient-identifiable data, such
agency enters into a written agreement with the [unit] department
pursuant to which such agency agrees to protect the confidentiality of
such patient-identifiable data and not to use such patient-identifiable
data as a basis for any decision concerning a patient, or [(D)] (C) a
consultant or independent professional contracted by the [Office of
Health Strategy] Department of Public Health pursuant to section 19a-
614 to carry out the functions of the [unit] department, including
collecting, managing or organizing such patient-identifiable data. [No]
Except as provided under section 19a-25 and the regulations
promulgated thereunder, no individual or entity receiving patient-
identifiable data may release such data in any manner that may result
in an individual patient, physician, provider or payer being identified.
The [unit] department shall impose a reasonable, cost-based fee for any
patient data provided to a nongovernmental entity.
(e) Not later than October 1, 2018, the [Health Systems Planning Unit]
department shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the
Comptroller that shall permit the Comptroller to access the data set forth
in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, provided the Comptroller
agrees, in writing, to keep individual patient and provider data
identified by proper name or personal identification code and submitted
pursuant to this section confidential.
Public Act No. 26-68 149 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(f) The Commissioner of [Health Strategy] Public Health shall adopt
regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, to carry out
the provisions of this section.
(g) The duties assigned to the [Office of Health Strategy] Department
of Public Health under the provisions of this section shall be
implemented within available appropriations.
Sec. 126. Subdivision (1) of section 19a-659 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(1) "Unit" means the Health Systems Planning Unit within the [Office
of Health Strategy] Department of Public Health, established under
section 19a-612;
Sec. 127. Section 19a-673a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
The Commissioner of [Health Strategy] Public Health shall adopt
regulations, in accordance with chapter 54, to establish uniform debt
collection standards for hospitals.
Sec. 128. Subsection (c) of section 19a-681 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(c) Upon the request of the [Office of Health Strategy, established
under section 19a-754a] Department of Public Health, or a patient, a
hospital shall provide to the [office] department or the patient a detailed
patient bill. If the billing detail by line item on a detailed patient bill does
not agree with the detailed schedule of charges on file with the unit for
the date of service specified on the bill, the hospital shall be subject to a
civil penalty of five hundred dollars per occurrence payable to the state
not later than fourteen days after the date of notification. The penalty
Public Act No. 26-68 150 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
shall be imposed in accordance with section 19a-653. The unit may issue
an order requiring such hospital, not later than fourteen days after the
date of notification of an overcharge to a patient, to adjust the bill to be
consistent with the detailed schedule of charges on file with the unit for
the date of service specified on the detailed patient bill.
Sec. 129. Subsections (b) to (f), inclusive, of section 19a-754b of the
general statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(b) [Beginning on] On and after January 1, 2020, each sponsor shall
submit to the [Office of Health Strategy, established in section 19a-754a]
Department of Public Health, in a form and manner specified by the
[office] department, written notice informing the [office] department
that such sponsor has filed with the federal Food and Drug
Administration:
(1) A new drug application or biologics license application for a
pipeline drug, not later than sixty days after such sponsor receives an
action date from the federal Food and Drug Administration regarding
such application; or
(2) A biologics license application for a biosimilar drug, not later than
sixty days after such sponsor's receipt of an action date from the federal
Food and Drug Administration regarding such application.
(c) (1) Beginning on January 1, 2020, the Commissioner of [Health
Strategy] Public Health may conduct a study, with the assistance of the
Comptroller and not more frequently than once annually, of each
pharmaceutical manufacturer of a pipeline drug that, in the opinion of
the commissioner in consultation with the Comptroller and the
Commissioner of Social Services, may have a significant impact on state
expenditures for outpatient prescription drugs. The [office] Department
of Public Health may work with the Comptroller to utilize existing state
Public Act No. 26-68 151 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
resources and contracts, or contract with a third party, including, but
not limited to, an accounting firm, to conduct such study.
(2) Each pharmaceutical manufacturer that is the subject of a study
conducted pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection shall submit to
the [office] Department of Public Health, or any contractor engaged by
the [office] department or the Comptroller to perform such study, the
following information for the pipeline drug that is the subject of such
study:
(A) The primary disease, condition or therapeutic area studied in
connection with such drug, and whether such drug is therapeutically
indicated for such disease, condition or therapeutic area;
(B) Each route of administration studied for such drug;
(C) Clinical trial comparators, if applicable, for such drug;
(D) The estimated year of market entry for such drug;
(E) Whether the federal Food and Drug Administration has
designated such drug as an orphan drug, a fast track product or a
breakthrough therapy; and
(F) Whether the federal Food and Drug Administration has
designated such drug for accelerated approval and, if such drug
contains a new molecular entity, for priority review.
(d) (1) [On or before] Not later than March [1, 2020, and] first
annually, [thereafter,] the Commissioner of [Health Strategy] Public
Health, in consultation with the Comptroller [,] and the Commissioner
of Social Services, [and Commissioner of Public Health,] shall prepare a
list of not more than ten outpatient prescription drugs that the
Commissioner of [Health Strategy] Public Health, in the commissioner's
discretion, determines are (A) provided at substantial cost to the state,
Public Act No. 26-68 152 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
considering the net cost of such drugs, or (B) critical to public health.
The list shall include outpatient prescription drugs from different
therapeutic classes of outpatient prescription drugs and not less than
one generic outpatient prescription drug.
(2) Prior to publishing the annual list pursuant to subdivision (1) of
this subsection, the [commissioner] Commissioner of Public Health
shall prepare a preliminary list that includes outpatient prescription
drugs that the commissioner plans to include on such annual list. The
commissioner shall make such preliminary list available for public
comment for not less than thirty days. During the public comment
period, any manufacturer of an outpatient prescription drug included
on the preliminary list may produce documentation, as permitted by
federal law, to the commissioner to establish that the wholesale
acquisition cost of such drug, less all rebates paid to the state for such
outpatient prescription drug during the immediately preceding
calendar year, does not exceed the limits established in subdivision (3)
of this subsection. If such documentation establishes, to the satisfaction
of the commissioner, that the wholesale acquisition cost of the drug, less
all rebates paid to the state for such drug during the immediately
preceding calendar year, does not exceed the limits established in
subdivision (3) of this subsection, the commissioner shall, not later than
fifteen days after the closing of the public comment period, remove such
drug from the preliminary list before publishing the annual list
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(3) The [commissioner] Commissioner of Public Health shall not list
any outpatient prescription drugs under subdivision (1) or (2) of this
subsection unless the wholesale acquisition cost of such outpatient
prescription drug (A) increased by not less than sixteen per cent
cumulatively during the immediately preceding two calendar years,
and (B) was not less than forty dollars for a course of treatment.
(4) (A) The pharmaceutical manufacturer of an outpatient
Public Act No. 26-68 153 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
prescription drug included on a list prepared by the [commissioner]
Commissioner of Public Health pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall provide to the [office] Department of Public Health, in
a form and manner specified by the commissioner, (i) a written,
narrative description, suitable for public release, of all factors that
caused the increase in the wholesale acquisition cost of the listed
outpatient prescription drug, and (ii) aggregate, company-level research
and development costs and such other capital expenditures that the
commissioner, in the commissioner's discretion, deems relevant for the
most recent year for which final audited data are available.
(B) The quality and types of information and data that a
pharmaceutical manufacturer submits to the [office] department under
this subdivision shall be consistent with the quality and types of
information and data that the pharmaceutical manufacturer includes in
(i) such pharmaceutical manufacturer's annual consolidated report on
Securities and Exchange Commission Form 10-K, or (ii) any other public
disclosure.
(5) The [office] Department of Public Health shall establish a
standardized form for reporting information and data pursuant to this
subsection after consulting with pharmaceutical manufacturers. The
form shall be designed to minimize the administrative burden and cost
of reporting on the [office] department and pharmaceutical
manufacturers.
(e) The [office] Department of Public Health may impose a penalty of
not more than seven thousand five hundred dollars on a pharmaceutical
manufacturer or sponsor for each violation of this section by the
pharmaceutical manufacturer or sponsor.
(f) The [office] Department of Public Health may adopt regulations,
in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, to carry out the
purposes of this section.
Public Act No. 26-68 154 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 130. Subsections (a) to (c), inclusive, of section 19a-754c of the
general statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) For the purposes of this section:
(1) "Affordable Care Act" has the same meaning as provided in
section 38a-1080;
(2) "Covered Connecticut program" means the program established
under subsection (b) of this section;
(3) "Exchange" has the same meaning as provided in section 38a-1080;
(4) "Health carrier" has the same meaning as provided in section 38a-
1080;
(5) "Individual market" has the same meaning as provided in 42 USC
18024(a), as amended from time to time; and
[(6) "Office of Health Strategy" means the Office of Health Strategy
established under section 19a-754a; and]
[(7)] (6) "Silver level" has the same meaning as provided in 42 USC
18022(d), as amended from time to time.
(b) There is established within the Department of Social Services the
Covered Connecticut program for the purpose of reducing the state's
uninsured rate. The Commissioner of Social Services shall administer
said program in consultation with the [Office of Health Strategy,]
Insurance Commissioner and exchange, and, as part of said program,
the Department of Social Services shall:
(1) Provide premium and cost-sharing subsidies that are sufficient to
ensure fully subsidized coverage:
Public Act No. 26-68 155 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(A) On and after July 1, 2021, for parents and needy caretaker
relatives, and their tax dependents not older than twenty-six years of
age, who (i) are eligible for premium and cost-sharing subsidies for a
qualified health plan, (ii) are ineligible for Medicaid because their
income exceeds the Medicaid income limits under chapter 319v, (iii)
have household income up to one hundred seventy-five per cent of the
federal poverty level, (iv) are receiving coverage under a qualified
health plan offered through the exchange in the individual market at a
silver level of coverage, and (v) are utilizing the full amount of
applicable premium subsidies for such plan;
(B) On and after July 1, 2021, for the following additional family
members of parents and caretaker relatives receiving coverage under
such qualified health plan, provided the requirements of subparagraph
(A) of subdivision (1) of this subsection are met: (i) A child over twenty-
six years of age who is permanently and totally disabled, as defined by
the Internal Revenue Service pursuant to 26 USC 152, or (ii) a child who
is over the age of twenty-six and is incapable of self-sustaining
employment by reason of mental or physical handicap and is chiefly
dependent upon the parent or caretaker relative for support and
maintenance, as described in sections 38a-489 and 38a-512a, or (iii) a
child or stepchild receiving coverage under such qualified health plan
as described in sections 38a-497 and 38a-512b;
(C) On and after July 1, 2022, for all parents, needy caretaker relatives
and low-income adults who (i) are at least nineteen but not more than
sixty-four years of age, (ii) are eligible for premium and cost-sharing
subsidies for a qualified health plan, (iii) are ineligible for Medicaid
because their income exceeds the Medicaid income limits under chapter
319v, (iv) have household income up to one hundred seventy-five per
cent of the federal poverty level, (v) are receiving coverage under a
qualified health plan offered through the exchange in the individual
market at a silver level of coverage, and (vi) are utilizing the full amount
Public Act No. 26-68 156 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
of applicable premium subsidies for such plan; and
(D) On and after July 1, 2022, for the following additional family
members of parents, caretaker relatives, and adults receiving coverage
under such qualified health plan, provided the requirements of
subparagraph (C) of subdivision (1) of this subsection are met: (i) A
child over twenty-six years of age who is permanently and totally
disabled, as defined by the Internal Revenue Service pursuant to 26 USC
152, or (ii) a child who is over the age of twenty-six and is incapable of
self-sustaining employment by reason of mental or physical handicap
and is chiefly dependent upon the parent or caretaker relative for
support and maintenance, as described in sections 38a-489 and 38a-512a,
or (iii) a child or stepchild, as described in sections 38a-497 and 38a-512b.
(2) Not earlier than July 1, 2022, provide dental and nonemergency
medical transportation services, as provided under chapter 319v, to all
eligible individuals described in subdivision (1) of this subsection;
(3) Establish procedures to, on a quarterly basis, pay in
reimbursement to each health carrier offering the qualified health plan
described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of subdivision (1) of this
subsection, as applicable, the premium and cost-sharing subsidies
required under subdivision (1) of this subsection to ensure fully
subsidized coverage; and
(4) Consult with the [Office of Health Strategy and] Insurance
Commissioner for the purposes set forth in section 17b-312.
(c) (1) The [Office of Health Strategy] Department of Social Services
may, subject to the approval required under subdivision (3) of this
subsection, seek a waiver pursuant to Section 1332 of the Affordable
Care Act, as amended from time to time, to advance the purpose of the
Covered Connecticut program. The [Office of Health Strategy]
department shall implement such waiver if the federal government
Public Act No. 26-68 157 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
issues such waiver.
(2) The [Office of Health Strategy] Commissioner of Social Services
shall submit a report, in accordance with section 11-4a, to the joint
standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to appropriations, human services and insurance
containing any proposed waiver described in subdivision (1) of this
subsection before seeking such waiver from the federal government.
(3) Not later than thirty days after the [Office of Health Strategy]
Commissioner of Social Services submits a report under subdivision (2)
of this subsection, the joint standing committees of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to appropriations,
human services and insurance shall convene a joint public hearing on
the proposed waiver contained in the report submitted pursuant to
subdivision (2) of this subsection, separately vote to approve or reject
such proposed waiver and advise the [Office of Health Strategy]
commissioner of their approval or rejection of such proposed waiver. If
any committee takes no action on such proposed waiver within the
thirty-day period, the proposed waiver shall be deemed rejected.
Sec. 131. Section 19a-754d of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) [On and after January 1, 2022, any] Any state agency, board or
commission that directly, or by contract with another entity, collects
demographic data concerning the ancestry or ethnic origin, ethnicity,
race or primary language of residents of the state in the context of health
care or for the provision or receipt of health care services or for any
public health purpose shall:
(1) Collect such data in a manner that allows for aggregation and
disaggregation of data;
(2) Expand race and ethnicity categories to include subgroup
Public Act No. 26-68 158 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
identities as specified by the [Community and Clinical Integration
Program of the Office of Health Strategy] Office of Policy and
Management and follow the hierarchical mapping to align with United
States Office of Management and Budget standards;
(3) Provide the option to individuals of selecting one or more ethnic
or racial designations and include an "other" designation with the ability
to write in identities not represented by other codes;
(4) Provide the option to individuals to refuse to identify with any
ethnic or racial designations;
(5) Collect primary language data employing language codes set by
the International Organization for Standardization; and
(6) Ensure, in cases where data concerning an individual's ethnic
origin, ethnicity or race is reported to any other state agency, board or
commission, that such data is neither tabulated nor reported without all
of the following information: (A) The number or percentage of
individuals who identify with each ethnic or racial designation as their
sole ethnic or racial designation and not in combination with any other
ethnic or racial designation; (B) the number or percentage of individuals
who identify with each ethnic or racial designation, whether as their sole
ethnic or racial designation or in combination with other ethnic or racial
designations; (C) the number or percentage of individuals who identify
with multiple ethnic or racial designations; and (D) the number or
percentage of individuals who do not identify or refuse to identify with
any ethnic or racial designations.
(b) Each health care provider with an electronic health record system
capable of connecting to and participating in the State-wide Health
Information Exchange as specified in section 17b-59e shall, collect and
include in its electronic health record system self-reported patient
demographic data including, but not limited to, race, ethnicity, primary
Public Act No. 26-68 159 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
language, insurance status and disability status based upon the
implementation plan developed [under subsection (c) of this section] in
consultation with consumer advocates, health equity experts, state
agencies and health care providers for the changes required by this
section. Race and ethnicity data shall adhere to standard categories as
determined in subsection (a) of this section.
[(c) Not later than August 1, 2021, the Office of Health Strategy shall
consult with consumer advocates, health equity experts, state agencies
and health care providers, to create an implementation plan for the
changes required by this section.]
[(d)] (c) The Office of [Health Strategy] Policy and Management shall
(1) review (A) demographic changes in race and ethnicity, as
determined by the U.S. Census Bureau, and (B) health data collected by
the state, and (2) reevaluate the standard race and ethnicity categories
from time to time, in consultation with health care providers, consumers
and the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to public health.
Sec. 132. Section 19a-754f of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
For the purposes of this section and sections 19a-754g to 19a-754k,
inclusive:
(1) "Drug manufacturer" means the manufacturer of a drug that is:
(A) Included in the information and data submitted by a health carrier
pursuant to section 38a-479qqq, (B) studied or listed pursuant to
subsection (c) or (d) of section 19a-754b, or (C) in a therapeutic class of
drugs that the [Commissioner of Health Strategy] Secretary of the Office
of Policy and Management determines, through public or private
reports, has had a substantial impact on prescription drug expenditures,
net of rebates, as a percentage of total health care expenditures;
Public Act No. 26-68 160 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
[(2) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Health Strategy;]
[(3)] (2) "Health care cost growth benchmark" means the annual
benchmark established pursuant to section 19a-754g;
[(4)] (3) "Health care quality benchmark" means an annual
benchmark established pursuant to section 19a-754g;
[(5)] (4) "Health care provider" has the same meaning as provided in
subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 19a-17b;
[(6)] (5) "Net cost of private health insurance" means the difference
between premiums earned and benefits incurred, and includes insurers'
costs of paying bills, advertising, sales commissions, and other
administrative costs, net additions or subtractions from reserves, rate
credits and dividends, premium taxes and profits or losses;
[(7)] (6) "Office" means the Office of [Health Strategy established
under section 19a-754a] Policy and Management;
[(8)] (7) "Other entity" means a drug manufacturer, pharmacy
benefits manager or other health care provider that is not considered a
provider entity;
[(9)] (8) "Payer" means a payer, including Medicaid, Medicare and
governmental and nongovernment health plans, and includes any
organization acting as payer that is a subsidiary, affiliate or business
owned or controlled by a payer that, during a given calendar year, pays
health care providers for health care services or pharmacies or provider
entities for prescription drugs designated by the [Commissioner of
Health Strategy] Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management;
[(10)] (9) "Performance year" means the most recent calendar year for
which data were submitted for the applicable health care cost growth
benchmark, primary care spending target or health care quality
Public Act No. 26-68 161 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
benchmark;
[(11)] (10) "Pharmacy benefits manager" has the same meaning as
provided in subdivision (10) of section 38a-479ooo;
[(12)] (11) "Primary care spending target" means the annual target
established pursuant to section 19a-754g;
[(13)] (12) "Provider entity" means an organized group of clinicians
that come together for the purposes of contracting, or are an established
billing unit that, at a minimum, includes primary care providers, and
that collectively, during any given calendar year, has enough attributed
lives to participate in total cost of care contracts, even if they are not
engaged in a total cost of care contract;
[(14)] (13) "Potential gross state product" means a forecasted measure
of the economy that equals the sum of the (A) expected growth in
national labor force productivity, (B) expected growth in the state's labor
force, and (C) expected national inflation, minus the expected state
population growth;
(14) "Secretary" means the Secretary of the Office of Policy and
Management;
(15) "Total health care expenditures" means the sum of all health care
expenditures in this state from public and private sources for a given
calendar year, including: (A) All claims-based spending paid to
providers, net of pharmacy rebates, (B) all patient cost-sharing amounts,
and (C) the net cost of private health insurance; and
(16) "Total medical expense" means the total cost of care for the
patient population of a payer or provider entity for a given calendar
year, where cost is calculated for such year as the sum of (A) all claims-
based spending paid to providers by public and private payers, and net
of pharmacy rebates, (B) all nonclaims payments for such year,
Public Act No. 26-68 162 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
including, but not limited to, incentive payments and care coordination
payments, and (C) all patient cost-sharing amounts expressed on a per
capita basis for the patient population of a payer or provider entity in
this state.
Sec. 133. Section 19a-754g of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective July 1, 2026):
[(a) Not later than July 1, 2022, the commissioner shall publish (1) the
health care cost growth benchmarks and annual primary care spending
targets as a percentage of total medical expenses for the calendar years
2021 to 2025, inclusive, and (2) the annual health care quality
benchmarks for the calendar years 2022 to 2025, inclusive, on the office's
Internet web site.]
[(b)] (a) (1) (A) Not later than July 1, 2025, and every five years
thereafter, the [commissioner] secretary shall develop and adopt annual
health care cost growth benchmarks and annual primary care spending
targets for the succeeding five calendar years for provider entities and
payers.
(B) In developing the health care cost growth benchmarks and
primary care spending targets pursuant to this subdivision, the
[commissioner] secretary shall consider (i) any historical and forecasted
changes in median income for individuals in the state and the growth
rate of potential gross state product, (ii) the rate of inflation, and (iii) the
most recent report prepared by the [commissioner] secretary pursuant
to subsection (b) of section 19a-754h.
(C) (i) The [commissioner] secretary shall hold at least one
informational public hearing prior to adopting the health care cost
growth benchmarks and primary care spending targets for each
succeeding five-year period described in this subdivision. The
Public Act No. 26-68 163 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
[commissioner] secretary may hold informational public hearings
concerning any annual health care cost growth benchmark and primary
care spending target set pursuant to [subsection (a) of this section or]
this subdivision. [(1) of subsection (b) of this section.] Such
informational public hearings shall be held at a time and place
designated by the [commissioner] secretary in a notice prominently
posted by the [commissioner] secretary on the office's Internet web site
and in a form and manner prescribed by the [commissioner] secretary.
The [commissioner] secretary shall make available on the office's
Internet web site a summary of any such informational public hearing
and include the [commissioner's] secretary's recommendations, if any,
to modify or not to modify any such annual benchmark or target.
(ii) If the [commissioner] secretary determines, after any
informational public hearing held pursuant to this subparagraph, that a
modification to any health care cost growth benchmark or annual
primary care spending target is, in the [commissioner's] secretary's
discretion, reasonably warranted, the [commissioner] secretary may
modify such benchmark or target.
(iii) The [commissioner] secretary shall annually (I) review the
current and projected rate of inflation, and (II) include on the office's
Internet web site the [commissioner's] secretary's findings of such
review, including the reasons for making or not making a modification
to any applicable health care cost growth benchmark. If the
[commissioner] secretary determines that the rate of inflation requires
modification of any health care cost growth benchmark adopted under
this section, the [commissioner] secretary may modify such benchmark.
In such event, the [commissioner] secretary shall not be required to hold
an informational public hearing concerning such modified health care
cost growth benchmark.
(D) The [commissioner] secretary shall post each adopted health care
cost growth benchmark and annual primary care spending target on the
Public Act No. 26-68 164 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
office's Internet web site.
(E) Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraphs (A) to (D),
inclusive, of this subdivision, if the average annual health care cost
growth benchmark for a succeeding five-year period described in this
subdivision differs from the average annual health care cost growth
benchmark for the five-year period preceding such succeeding five-year
period by more than one-half of one per cent, the [commissioner]
secretary shall submit the annual health care cost growth benchmarks
developed for such succeeding five-year period to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to insurance for the committee's review and approval. The
committee shall be deemed to have approved such annual health care
cost growth benchmarks for such succeeding five-year period, except
upon a vote to reject such benchmarks by the majority of committee
members at a meeting of such committee called for the purpose of
reviewing such benchmarks and held not later than thirty days after the
[commissioner] secretary submitted such benchmarks to such
committee. If the committee votes to reject such benchmarks, the
[commissioner] secretary may submit to the committee modified annual
health care cost growth benchmarks for such succeeding five-year
period for the committee's review and approval in accordance with the
provisions of this subparagraph. The [commissioner] secretary shall not
be required to hold an informational public hearing concerning such
modified benchmarks. Until the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to insurance approves
annual health care cost growth benchmarks for the succeeding five-year
period, such benchmarks shall be deemed to be equal to the average
annual health care cost growth benchmark for the preceding five-year
period.
(2) (A) Not later than July 1, 2025, and every five years thereafter, the
[commissioner] secretary shall develop and adopt annual health care
Public Act No. 26-68 165 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
quality benchmarks for the succeeding five calendar years for provider
entities and payers.
(B) In developing annual health care quality benchmarks pursuant to
this subdivision, the [commissioner] secretary shall consider (i) quality
measures endorsed by nationally recognized organizations, including,
but not limited to, the National Quality Forum, the National Committee
for Quality Assurance, the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services,
the National Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, the Joint
Commission and expert organizations that develop health equity
measures, and (ii) measures that: (I) Concern health outcomes,
overutilization, underutilization and patient safety, (II) meet standards
of patient-centeredness and ensure consideration of differences in
preferences and clinical characteristics within patient subpopulations,
and (III) concern community health or population health.
(C) (i) The [commissioner] secretary shall hold at least one
informational public hearing prior to adopting the health care quality
benchmarks for each succeeding five-year period described in this
subdivision. The [commissioner] secretary may hold informational
public hearings concerning the quality measures the [commissioner]
secretary proposes to adopt as health care quality benchmarks. Such
informational public hearings shall be held at a time and place
designated by the [commissioner] secretary in a notice prominently
posted by the [commissioner] secretary on the office's Internet web site
and in a form and manner prescribed by the [commissioner] secretary.
The [commissioner] secretary shall make available on the office's
Internet web site a summary of any such informational public hearing
and include the recommendations, if any, to modify or not modify any
such health care quality benchmark.
(ii) If the [commissioner] secretary determines, after any
informational public hearing held pursuant to this subparagraph, that
modifications to any health care quality benchmarks are, in the
Public Act No. 26-68 166 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
[commissioner's] secretary's discretion, reasonably warranted, the
[commissioner] secretary may modify such quality benchmarks. The
[commissioner] secretary shall not be required to hold an additional
informational public hearing concerning such modified quality
benchmarks.
(D) The [commissioner] secretary shall post each adopted health care
quality benchmark on the office's Internet web site.
[(c)] (b) The [commissioner] secretary may enter into such contractual
agreements as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this section,
including, but not limited to, contractual agreements with actuarial,
economic and other experts and consultants.
Sec. 134. Section 19a-754h of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) Not later than August [15, 2022, and] fifteenth annually,
[thereafter,] each payer shall report to the [commissioner] secretary, in
a form and manner prescribed by the [commissioner] secretary, for the
preceding or prior years, if the [commissioner] secretary so requests
based on material changes to data previously submitted, aggregated
data, including aggregated self-funded data as applicable, necessary for
the [commissioner] secretary to calculate total health care expenditures,
primary care spending as a percentage of total medical expenses and net
cost of private health insurance. Each payer shall also disclose, as
requested by the [commissioner] secretary, payer data required for
adjusting total medical expense calculations to reflect changes in the
patient population.
(b) Not later than March [31, 2023, and] thirty-first annually,
[thereafter, the commissioner] the secretary shall prepare and post on
the office's Internet web site, a report concerning the total health care
expenditures utilizing the total aggregate medical expenses reported by
Public Act No. 26-68 167 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
payers pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, including, but not
limited to, a breakdown of such population-adjusted total medical
expenses by payer and provider entities. The report may include, but
[shall] need not be limited to, information regarding the following:
(1) Trends in major service category spending;
(2) Primary care spending as a percentage of total medical expenses;
(3) The net cost of private health insurance by payer by market
segment, including individual, small group, large group, self-insured,
student and Medicare Advantage markets; and
(4) Any other factors the [commissioner] secretary deems relevant to
providing context on such data, which shall include, but not be limited
to, the following factors: (A) The impact of the rate of inflation and rate
of medical inflation; (B) impacts, if any, on access to care; and (C)
responses to public health crises or similar emergencies.
(c) The [commissioner] secretary shall annually submit a request to
the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for the
unadjusted total medical expenses of Connecticut residents.
(d) Not later than August [15, 2023, and] fifteenth annually,
[thereafter,] each payer or provider entity shall report to the
[commissioner] secretary, in a form and manner prescribed by the
[commissioner] secretary, for the preceding year, and for prior years if
the [commissioner] secretary so requests based on material changes to
data previously submitted, on the health care quality benchmarks
adopted pursuant to section 19a-754g.
(e) Not later than March [31, 2024, and] thirty-first annually,
[thereafter, the commissioner] the secretary shall prepare and post on
the office's Internet web site, a report concerning health care quality
benchmarks reported by payers and provider entities pursuant to
Public Act No. 26-68 168 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
subsection (d) of this section.
(f) The commissioner may enter into such contractual agreements as
may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this section, including,
but not limited to, contractual agreements with actuarial, economic and
other experts and consultants.
Sec. 135. Section 19a-754i of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) (1) For each calendar year, beginning on January 1, 2023, the
[commissioner] secretary shall, if the payer or provider entity subject to
the cost growth benchmark or primary care spending target [so]
requests [,] a meeting, the secretary shall meet with such payer or
provider entity to review and validate the total medical expenses data
collected pursuant to section 19a-754h for such payer or provider entity.
The [commissioner] secretary shall review information provided by the
payer or provider entity and, if deemed necessary, amend findings for
such payer or provider prior to the identification of payer or provider
entities that exceeded the health care cost growth benchmark or failed
to meet the primary care spending target for the performance year as set
forth in section 19a-754h. The [commissioner] secretary shall identify,
not later than May first of such calendar year, each payer or provider
entity that exceeded the health care cost growth benchmark or failed to
meet the primary care spending target for the performance year.
(2) For each calendar year beginning on or after January 1, 2024, the
[commissioner] secretary shall, if the payer or provider entity subject to
the health care quality benchmarks for the performance year [so]
requests [,] a meeting, the secretary shall meet with such payer or
provider entity to review and validate the quality data collected
pursuant to section 19a-754h for such payer or provider entity. The
[commissioner] secretary shall review information provided by the
payer or provider entity and, if deemed necessary, amend findings for
Public Act No. 26-68 169 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
such payer or provider prior to the identification of payer or provider
entities that exceeded the health care quality benchmark as set forth in
section 19a-754h. The [commissioner] secretary shall identify, not later
than May first of such calendar year, each payer or provider entity that
exceeded the health care quality benchmark for the performance year.
(3) Not later than thirty days after the [commissioner] secretary
identifies each payer or provider entity pursuant to subdivisions (1) and
(2) of this subsection, the [commissioner] secretary shall send a notice to
each such payer or provider entity. Such notice shall be in a form and
manner prescribed by the [commissioner] secretary, and shall disclose
to each such payer or provider entity:
(A) That the [commissioner] secretary has identified such payer or
provider entity pursuant to subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection; and
(B) The factual basis for the [commissioner's] secretary's
identification of such payer or provider entity pursuant to subdivision
(1) or (2) of this subsection.
(b) (1) For each calendar year beginning on and after January 1, 2023,
if the [commissioner] secretary determines that the annual percentage
change in total health care expenditures for the performance year
exceeded the health care cost growth benchmark for such year, the
[commissioner] secretary shall identify, not later than May first of such
calendar year, any other entity that significantly contributed to
exceeding such benchmark. Each identification shall be based on:
(A) The report prepared by the [commissioner] secretary pursuant to
subsection (b) of section 19a-754h for such calendar year;
(B) The report filed pursuant to section 38a-479ppp for such calendar
year;
(C) The information and data reported to the office pursuant to
Public Act No. 26-68 170 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
subsection (d) of section 19a-754b for such calendar year;
(D) Information obtained from the all-payer claims database
established under section 19a-755a; and
(E) Any other information that the [commissioner] secretary, in the
[commissioner's] secretary's discretion, deems relevant for the purposes
of this section.
(2) The [commissioner] secretary shall account for costs, net of rebates
and discounts, when identifying other entities pursuant to this section.
Sec. 136. Section 19a-754j of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) (1) Not later than June [30, 2023, and] thirtieth annually,
[thereafter, the commissioner] the secretary shall hold an informational
public hearing to compare the growth in total health care expenditures
in the performance year to the health care cost growth benchmark
established pursuant to section 19a-754g for such year. Such hearing
shall involve an examination of:
(A) The report most recently prepared by the [commissioner]
secretary pursuant to subsection (b) of section 19a-754h;
(B) The expenditures of provider entities and payers, including, but
not limited to, health care cost trends, primary care spending as a
percentage of total medical expenses and the factors contributing to
such costs and expenditures; and
(C) Any other matters that the [commissioner] secretary, in the
[commissioner's] secretary's discretion, deems relevant for the purposes
of this section.
(2) The [commissioner] secretary may require any payer or provider
entity that, for the performance year, is found to be a significant
Public Act No. 26-68 171 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
contributor to health care cost growth in the state or has failed to meet
the primary care spending target, to participate in such hearing. Each
such payer or provider entity that is required to participate in such
hearing shall provide testimony on issues identified by the
[commissioner] secretary and provide additional information on actions
taken to reduce such payer's or entity's contribution to future state-wide
health care costs and expenditures or to increase such payer's or
provider entity's primary care spending as a percentage of total medical
expenses.
(3) The [commissioner] secretary may require that any other entity
that is found to be a significant contributor to health care cost growth in
this state during the performance year participate in such hearing. Any
other entity that is required to participate in such hearing shall provide
testimony on issues identified by the [commissioner] secretary and
provide additional information on actions taken to reduce such other
entity's contribution to future state-wide health care costs. If such other
entity is a drug manufacturer, and the [commissioner] secretary requires
that such drug manufacturer participate in such hearing with respect to
a specific drug or class of drugs, such hearing may, to the extent
possible, include representatives from at least one brand-name
manufacturer, one generic manufacturer and one innovator company
that is less than ten years old.
(4) Not later than October [15, 2023, and] fifteenth annually,
[thereafter, the commissioner] the secretary shall prepare and submit a
report, in accordance with section 11-4a, to the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to insurance and public health. Such report shall be based on
the [commissioner's] secretary's analysis of the information submitted
during the most recent informational public hearing conducted
pursuant to this subsection and any other information that the
[commissioner] secretary, in the [commissioner's] secretary's discretion,
Public Act No. 26-68 172 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
deems relevant for the purposes of this section, and shall:
(A) Describe health care spending trends in this state, including, but
not limited to, trends in primary care spending as a percentage of total
medical expense, and the factors underlying such trends;
(B) Include the findings from the report prepared pursuant to
subsection (b) of section 19a-754h;
(C) Describe a plan for monitoring any unintended adverse
consequences resulting from the adoption of cost growth benchmarks
and primary care spending targets and the results of any findings from
the implementation of such plan; and
(D) Disclose the [commissioner's] secretary's recommendations, if
any, concerning strategies to increase the efficiency of the state's health
care system, including, but not limited to, any recommended legislation
concerning the state's health care system.
(b) (1) Not later than June [30, 2024, and] thirtieth annually,
[thereafter, the commissioner] the secretary shall hold an informational
public hearing to compare the performance of payers and provider
entities in the performance year to the quality benchmarks established
for such year pursuant to section 19a-754g. Such hearing shall include
an examination of:
(A) The report most recently prepared by the [commissioner]
secretary pursuant to subsection (e) of section 19a-754h; and
(B) Any other matters that the [commissioner] secretary, in the
[commissioner's] secretary's discretion, deems relevant for the purposes
of this section.
(2) The [commissioner] secretary may require any payer or provider
entity that failed to meet any health care quality benchmarks in this state
Public Act No. 26-68 173 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
during the performance year to participate in such hearing. Each such
payer or provider entity that is required to participate in such hearing
shall provide testimony on issues identified by the [commissioner]
secretary and provide additional information on actions taken to
improve such payer's or provider entity's quality benchmark
performance.
(3) Not later than October [15, 2024, and] fifteenth annually,
[thereafter, the commissioner] the secretary shall prepare and submit a
report, in accordance with section 11-4a, to the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to insurance and public health. Such report shall be based on
the [commissioner's] secretary's analysis of the information submitted
during the most recent informational public hearing conducted
pursuant to this subsection and any other information that the
[commissioner] secretary, in the [commissioner's] secretary's discretion,
deems relevant for the purposes of this section, and shall:
(A) Describe health care quality trends in this state and the factors
underlying such trends;
(B) Include the findings from the report prepared pursuant to
subsection (e) of section 19a-754h; and
(C) Disclose the [commissioner's] secretary's recommendations, if
any, concerning strategies to improve the quality of the state's health
care system, including, but not limited to, any recommended legislation
concerning the state's health care system.
Sec. 137. Section 19a-754k of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
The [Commissioner of Health Strategy] Secretary of the Office of
Policy and Management may adopt regulations, in accordance with
chapter 54, to implement the provisions of [section 19a-754a and]
Public Act No. 26-68 174 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
sections 19a-754f to 19a-754j, inclusive.
Sec. 138. Section 19a-755a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "All-payer claims database" means a database that receives and
stores data from a reporting entity relating to medical insurance claims,
dental insurance claims, pharmacy claims and other insurance claims
information from enrollment and eligibility files.
(2) (A) "Reporting entity" means:
(i) An insurer, as described in section 38a-1, licensed to do health
insurance business in this state;
(ii) A health care center, as defined in section 38a-175;
(iii) An insurer or health care center that provides coverage under
Part C or Part D of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act, as amended
from time to time, to residents of this state;
(iv) A third-party administrator, as defined in section 38a-720;
(v) A pharmacy benefits manager, as defined in section 38a-479aaa;
(vi) A hospital service corporation, as defined in section 38a-199;
(vii) A nonprofit medical service corporation, as defined in section
38a-214;
(viii) A fraternal benefit society, as described in section 38a-595, that
transacts health insurance business in this state;
(ix) A dental plan organization, as defined in section 38a-577;
Public Act No. 26-68 175 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(x) A preferred provider network, as defined in section 38a-479aa;
and
(xi) Any other person that administers health care claims and
payments pursuant to a contract or agreement or is required by statute
to administer such claims and payments.
(B) "Reporting entity" does not include an employee welfare benefit
plan, as defined in the federal Employee Retirement Income Security
Act of 1974, as amended from time to time, that is also a trust established
pursuant to collective bargaining subject to the federal Labor
Management Relations Act.
(3) "Medicaid data" means the Medicaid provider registry, health
claims data and Medicaid recipient data maintained by the Department
of Social Services.
(4) "CHIP data" means the provider registry, health claims data and
recipient data maintained by the Department of Social Services to
administer the Children's Health Insurance Program.
(b) (1) There is established an all-payer claims database program. The
Office of [Health Strategy] Policy and Management shall: (A) Oversee
the planning, implementation and administration of the all-payer claims
database program for the purpose of collecting, assessing and reporting
health care information relating to safety, quality, cost-effectiveness,
access and efficiency for all levels of health care; (B) ensure that data
received is securely collected, compiled and stored in accordance with
state and federal law; (C) conduct audits of data submitted by reporting
entities in order to verify its accuracy; and (D) in consultation with the
Health Information Technology Advisory Council established under
section 17b-59f, maintain written procedures for the administration of
such all-payer claims database. Any such written procedures shall
include (i) reporting requirements for reporting entities, and (ii)
Public Act No. 26-68 176 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
requirements for providing notice to a reporting entity regarding any
alleged failure on the part of such reporting entity to comply with such
reporting requirements.
(2) The [Commissioner of Health Strategy] Secretary of the Office of
Policy and Management shall seek funding from the federal
government, other public sources and other private sources to cover
costs associated with the planning, implementation and administration
of the all-payer claims database program.
(3) (A) Upon the adoption of reporting requirements as set forth in
subdivision (1) of this subsection, a reporting entity shall report health
care information for inclusion in the all-payer claims database in a form
and manner prescribed by the [Commissioner of Health Strategy]
Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management. The [commissioner]
secretary may, after notice and hearing, impose a civil penalty on any
reporting entity that fails to report health care information as prescribed.
Such civil penalty shall not exceed one thousand dollars per day for each
day of violation and shall not be imposed as a cost for the purpose of
rate determination or reimbursement by a third-party payer.
(B) The [Commissioner of Health Strategy] Secretary of the Office of
Policy and Management may provide the name of any reporting entity
on which such penalty has been imposed to the Insurance
Commissioner. After consultation with the [Commissioner of Health
Strategy] secretary, the Insurance Commissioner may request the
Attorney General to bring an action in the superior court for the judicial
district of Hartford to recover any penalty imposed pursuant to
subparagraph (A) of this subdivision.
(4) The Commissioner of Social Services shall submit Medicaid and
CHIP data to the [Commissioner of Health Strategy] Secretary of the
Office of Policy and Management for inclusion in the all-payer claims
database only for purposes related to administration of the State
Public Act No. 26-68 177 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Medicaid and CHIP Plans, in accordance with 42 CFR 431.301 to 42 CFR
431.306, inclusive.
(5) The [Commissioner of Health Strategy] Secretary of the Office of
Policy and Management shall: (A) Utilize data in the all-payer claims
database to provide health care consumers in the state with information
concerning the cost and quality of health care services for the purpose
of allowing such consumers to make economically sound and medically
appropriate health care decisions; and (B) make data in the all-payer
claims database available to any state agency, insurer, employer, health
care provider, consumer of health care services or researcher for the
purpose of allowing such person or entity to review such data as it
relates to health care utilization, costs or quality of health care services.
If health information, as defined in 45 CFR 160.103, as amended from
time to time, is permitted to be disclosed under the Health Insurance
Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, as amended
from time to time, or regulations adopted thereunder, any disclosure
thereof made pursuant to this subdivision shall have identifiers
removed, as set forth in 45 CFR 164.514, as amended from time to time.
Any disclosure made pursuant to this subdivision of information other
than health information shall be made in a manner to protect the
confidentiality of such other information as required by state and
federal law. The [Commissioner of Health Strategy] secretary may set a
fee to be charged to each person or entity requesting access to data
stored in the all-payer claims database.
(6) The [Commissioner of Health Strategy] Secretary of the Office of
Policy and Management may (A) in consultation with the All-Payer
Claims Database Advisory Group set forth in section 17b-59f, enter into
a contract with a person or entity to plan, implement or administer the
all-payer claims database program, (B) enter into a contract or take any
action that is necessary to obtain data that is the same data required to
be submitted by reporting entities under Medicare Part A or Part B, (C)
Public Act No. 26-68 178 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
enter into a contract for the collection, management or analysis of data
received from reporting entities, and (D) in accordance with subdivision
(4) of this subsection, enter into a contract or take any action that is
necessary to obtain Medicaid and CHIP data. Any such contract for the
collection, management or analysis of such data shall expressly prohibit
the disclosure of such data for purposes other than the purposes
described in this subsection.
(c) Unless otherwise specified, nothing in this section and no action
taken by the [Commissioner of Health Strategy] Secretary of the Office
of Policy and Management pursuant to this section or section 19a-755b
shall be construed to preempt, supersede or affect the authority of the
Insurance Commissioner to regulate the business of insurance in the
state.
Sec. 139. Section 19a-755b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) For purposes of this section and sections 19a-904a, 19a-904b and
38a-477d to 38a-477f, inclusive:
(1) "Allowed amount" means the maximum reimbursement dollar
amount that an insured's health insurance policy allows for a specific
procedure or service;
(2) "Consumer health information Internet web site" means an
Internet web site developed and operated by the Office of [Health
Strategy] Policy and Management to assist consumers in making
informed decisions concerning their health care and informed choices
among health care providers;
(3) "Episode of care" means all health care services related to the
treatment of a condition or a service category for such treatment and,
for acute conditions, includes health care services and treatment
provided from the onset of the condition to its resolution or a service
Public Act No. 26-68 179 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
category for such treatment and, for chronic conditions, includes health
care services and treatment provided over a given period of time or a
service category for such treatment;
[(4) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Health Strategy;]
[(5)] (4) "Health care provider" means any individual, corporation,
facility or institution licensed by this state to provide health care
services;
[(6)] (5) "Health carrier" means any insurer, health care center,
hospital service corporation, medical service corporation, fraternal
benefit society or other entity delivering, issuing for delivery, renewing,
amending or continuing any individual or group health insurance
policy in this state providing coverage of the type specified in
subdivisions (1), (2), (4), (11) and (12) of section 38a-469;
[(7)] (6) "Hospital" has the same meaning as provided in section 19a-
490;
[(8)] (7) "Out-of-pocket costs" means costs that are not reimbursed by
a health insurance policy and includes deductibles, coinsurance and
copayments for covered services and other costs to the consumer
associated with a procedure or service;
[(9)] (8) "Outpatient surgical facility" has the same meaning as
provided in section 19a-493b; [and]
[(10)] (9) "Public or private third party" means the state, the federal
government, employers, a health carrier, third-party administrator, as
defined in section 38a-720, or managed care organization; and
(10) "Secretary" means the Secretary of the Office of Policy and
Management.
(b) (1) Within available resources, the consumer health information
Public Act No. 26-68 180 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Internet web site shall: (A) Contain information comparing the quality,
price and cost of health care services, including, to the extent practicable,
(i) comparative price and cost information for the health care services
and procedures reported pursuant to subsection (c) of this section
categorized by payer or listed by health care provider, (ii) links to
Internet web sites and consumer tools where consumers may obtain
comparative cost and quality information, including The Joint
Commission and Medicare hospital compare tool, (iii) definitions of
common health insurance and medical terms so consumers may
compare health coverage and understand the terms of their coverage,
and (iv) factors consumers should consider when choosing an insurance
product or provider group, including provider network, premium, cost
sharing, covered services and tier information; (B) be designed to assist
consumers and institutional purchasers in making informed decisions
regarding their health care and informed choices among health care
providers and, to the extent practicable, provide reference pricing for
services paid by various health carriers to health care providers; (C)
present information in language and a format that is understandable to
the average consumer; and (D) be publicized to the general public. All
information outlined in this section shall be posted on an Internet web
site established, or to be established, by the [Commissioner of Health
Strategy] secretary in a manner and time frame as may be
organizationally and financially reasonable in [his or her] the secretary's
sole discretion.
(2) Information collected, stored and published by the Office of
[Health Strategy] Policy and Management pursuant to this section is
subject to the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability
Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, as amended from time to time.
(3) The [Commissioner of Health Strategy] secretary may consider
adding quality measures to the consumer health information Internet
web site.
Public Act No. 26-68 181 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(c) Not later than January [1, 2018, and] first annually, [thereafter, the
Commissioner of Health Strategy] the secretary shall, to the extent the
information is available, make available to the public on the consumer
health information Internet web site a list of: (1) The fifty most
frequently occurring inpatient services or procedures in the state; (2) the
fifty most frequently provided outpatient services or procedures in the
state; (3) the twenty-five most frequent surgical services or procedures
in the state; (4) the twenty-five most frequent imaging services or
procedures in the state; and (5) the twenty-five most frequently used
pharmaceutical products and medical devices in the state. Such lists
may (A) be expanded to include additional admissions and procedures,
(B) be based upon those services and procedures that are most
commonly performed by volume or that represent the greatest
percentage of related health care expenditures, or (C) be designed to
include those services and procedures most likely to result in out-of-
pocket costs to consumers or include bundled episodes of care.
(d) Not later than January [1, 2018, and] first annually, [thereafter,] to
the extent practicable, the [Commissioner of Health Strategy] secretary
shall issue a report, in a form and manner prescribed by the
[commissioner] secretary, that includes the (1) billed and allowed
amounts paid to health care providers in each health carrier's network
for each service and procedure included pursuant to subsection (c) of
this section, and (2) out-of-pocket costs for each such service and
procedure.
(e) (1) [On and after January 1, 2018, each] Each hospital shall, at the
time of scheduling a service or procedure for nonemergency care that is
included in the report prepared by the [Commissioner of Health
Strategy] secretary pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, regardless
of the location or setting where such services are delivered, notify the
patient of the patient's right to make a request for cost and quality
information. Upon the request of a patient for a diagnosis or procedure
Public Act No. 26-68 182 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
included in such report, the hospital shall, not later than three business
days after scheduling such service or procedure, provide written notice,
electronically or by mail, to the patient who is the subject of the service
or procedure concerning: (A) If the patient is uninsured, the amount to
be charged for the service or procedure if all charges are paid in full
without a public or private third party paying any portion of the
charges, including the amount of any facility fee, or, if the hospital is not
able to provide a specific amount due to an inability to predict the
specific treatment or diagnostic code, the estimated maximum allowed
amount or charge for the service or procedure, including the amount of
any facility fee; (B) the corresponding Medicare reimbursement amount
or, if there is no corresponding Medicare reimbursement amount for
such diagnosis or procedure, (i) the approximate amount Medicare
would have paid the hospital for the services on the billing statement,
or (ii) the percentage of the hospital's charges that Medicare would have
paid the hospital for the services; (C) if the patient is insured, the
allowed amount, the toll-free telephone number and the Internet web
site address of the patient's health carrier where the patient can obtain
information concerning charges and out-of-pocket costs; (D) The Joint
Commission's composite accountability rating and the Medicare
hospital compare star rating for the hospital, as applicable; and (E) the
Internet web site addresses for The Joint Commission and the Medicare
hospital compare tool where the patient may obtain information
concerning the hospital.
(2) If the patient is insured and the hospital is out-of-network under
the patient's health insurance policy, such written notice shall include a
statement that the service or procedure will likely be deemed out-of-
network and that any out-of-network applicable rates under such policy
may apply.
Sec. 140. Subsection (b) of section 19a-911 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
Public Act No. 26-68 183 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
2026):
(b) The Council on Protecting Women's Health shall be comprised of
(1) the following ex-officio voting members: (A) The Commissioner of
Public Health, or the commissioner's designee; (B) the Commissioner of
Mental Health and Addiction Services, or the commissioner's designee;
(C) the Insurance Commissioner, or the commissioner's designee; (D)
[the Commissioner of Health Strategy, or the commissioner's designee;
(E)] the Healthcare Advocate, or the Healthcare Advocate's designee;
and [(F)] (E) the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, or
the secretary's designee; and (2) fourteen public members, three of
whom shall be appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate,
three of whom shall be appointed by the speaker of the House of
Representatives, two of whom shall be appointed by the majority leader
of the Senate, two of whom shall be appointed by the majority leader of
the House of Representatives, two of whom shall be appointed by the
minority leader of the Senate and two of whom shall be appointed by
the minority leader of the House of Representatives, and all of whom
shall be knowledgeable on issues relative to women's health care in the
state. The membership of the council shall fairly and adequately
represent women who have had issues accessing quality health care in
the state.
Sec. 141. Subsections (b) and (c) of section 20-195ttt of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(b) There is established within the [Office of Health Strategy]
Department of Public Health a Community Health Worker Advisory
Body. Said body shall (1) advise [said office and the Department of
Public Health] the department on matters relating to the educational
and certification requirements for training programs for community
health workers, including the minimum number of hours and
internship requirements for certification of community health workers,
Public Act No. 26-68 184 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(2) conduct a continuous review of such educational and certification
programs, and (3) provide the department with a list of approved
educational and certification programs for community health workers.
(c) The Commissioner of [Health Strategy] Public Health, or the
commissioner's designee, shall act as the chair of the Community Health
Worker Advisory Body and shall appoint the following members to said
body:
(1) Six members who are actively practicing as community health
workers in the state;
(2) A member of the Community Health Workers Association of
Connecticut or any successor or comparable professional organization
that represents community health workers in the state;
(3) A representative of a community-based community health worker
training organization;
(4) A representative of the Connecticut State Community College;
(5) An employer of community health workers;
(6) A representative of a health care organization that employs
community health workers; and
(7) A health care provider who works directly with community health
workers. [; and]
[(8) The Commissioner of Public Health, or the commissioner's
designee.]
Sec. 142. Subsection (b) of section 28-33 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
Public Act No. 26-68 185 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(b) The task force shall consist of the following members:
(1) Two appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives,
one of whom has expertise in prescription drug supply chains and one
of whom has expertise in federal law concerning prescription drug
shortages;
(2) Two appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate, one of
whom represents hospitals and one of whom represents health care
providers who treat patients with rare diseases;
(3) One appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives, who represents one of the two federally recognized
Indian tribes in the state;
(4) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate, who
represents one of the two federally recognized Indian tribes in the state;
(5) One appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives, who represents health insurance companies;
(6) One appointed by the minority leader of the Senate, who is a
representative of the Connecticut Health Insurance Exchange;
[(7) The Commissioner of Health Strategy, or the commissioner's
designee;]
[(8)] (7) The Commissioner of Consumer Protection, or the
commissioner's designee;
[(9)] (8) The Commissioner of Social Services, or the commissioner's
designee;
[(10)] (9) The Commissioner of Public Health, or the commissioner's
designee;
Public Act No. 26-68 186 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
[(11)] (10) The chief executive officer of The University of Connecticut
Health Center, or the chief executive officer's designee;
[(12)] (11) The Insurance Commissioner, or the commissioner's
designee;
[(13)] (12) The Commissioner of Economic and Community
Development, or the commissioner's designee; and
[(14)] (13) Any other members as deemed necessary by the
chairpersons of the task force.
Sec. 143. Subsections (e) to (g), inclusive, of section 33-182bb of the
general statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(e) Any medical foundation organized on or after July 1, 2009, shall
file a copy of its certificate of incorporation and any amendments to its
certificate of incorporation with the Health Systems Planning Unit of the
[Office of Health Strategy] Department of Public Health not later than
ten business days after the medical foundation files such certificate of
incorporation or amendment with the Secretary of the State pursuant to
chapter 602.
(f) Any medical group clinic corporation formed under chapter 594
of the general statutes, revision of 1958, revised to 1995, which amends
its certificate of incorporation pursuant to subsection (a) of section 33-
182cc, shall file with the Health Systems Planning Unit of the [Office of
Health Strategy] Department of Public Health a copy of its certificate of
incorporation and any amendments to its certificate of incorporation,
including any amendment to its certificate of incorporation that
complies with the requirements of subsection (a) of section 33-182cc, not
later than ten business days after the medical foundation files its
certificate of incorporation or any amendments to its certificate of
incorporation with the Secretary of the State.
Public Act No. 26-68 187 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(g) Any medical foundation, regardless of when organized, shall file
notice with the Health Systems Planning Unit of the [Office of Health
Strategy] Department of Public Health and the Secretary of the State of
its liquidation, termination, dissolution or cessation of operations not
later than ten business days after a vote by its board of directors or
members to take such action. A medical foundation shall, annually,
provide the office with (1) a statement of its mission, (2) the name and
address of the organizing members, (3) the name and specialty of each
physician employed by or acting as an agent of the medical foundation,
(4) the location or locations where each such physician practices, (5) a
description of the services provided at each such location, (6) a
description of any significant change in its services during the preceding
year, (7) a copy of the medical foundation's governing documents and
bylaws, (8) the name and employer of each member of the board of
directors, and (9) other financial information as reported on the medical
foundation's most recently filed Internal Revenue Service return of
organization exempt from income tax form, or any replacement form
adopted by the Internal Revenue Service, or, if such medical foundation
is not required to file such form, information substantially similar to that
required by such form. The Health Systems Planning Unit shall make
such forms and information available to members of the public and
accessible on said unit's Internet web site.
Sec. 144. Subdivisions (2) and (3) of subsection (a) of section 38a-47 of
the general statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(2) The amount appropriated to the Office of [Health Strategy] Policy
and Management from the Insurance Fund for the fiscal year, [including
the cost of fringe benefits for office personnel as estimated by the
Comptroller,] which shall be reduced by the amount of federal
reimbursement received for allowable Medicaid administrative
expenses;
Public Act No. 26-68 188 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(3) The expenditures made on behalf of the department and said
offices from the Capital Equipment Purchase Fund pursuant to section
4a-9 for such year, but excluding such estimated expenditures made on
behalf of the Health Systems Planning Unit of the [Office of Health
Strategy] Department of Public Health; and
Sec. 145. Subsections (b) to (f), inclusive, of section 38a-48 of the
general statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(b) On or before July thirty-first, annually, the Insurance
Commissioner shall render to each domestic insurance company or
other domestic entity liable for payment under section 38a-47:
(1) A statement that includes (A) the amount appropriated to the
Insurance Department, the Office of the Healthcare Advocate and the
Office of [Health Strategy] Policy and Management from the Insurance
Fund established under section 38a-52a for the fiscal year beginning July
first of the same year, (B) the cost of fringe benefits for department and
office personnel for such year, as estimated by the Comptroller, (C) the
estimated expenditures on behalf of the department and the offices from
the Capital Equipment Purchase Fund pursuant to section 4a-9 for such
year, not including such estimated expenditures made on behalf of the
Health Systems Planning Unit of the [Office of Health Strategy]
Department of Public Health, and (D) the amount appropriated to the
Department of Aging and Disability Services for the fall prevention
program established in section 17a-859 from the Insurance Fund for the
fiscal year;
(2) A statement of the total amount of taxes reported in the annual
statement rendered to the Insurance Commissioner pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section; and
(3) The proposed assessment against that company or entity,
Public Act No. 26-68 189 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
calculated in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this
section, provided for the purposes of this calculation the amount
appropriated to the Insurance Department, the Office of the Healthcare
Advocate and the Office of [Health Strategy] Policy and Management
from the Insurance Fund plus the cost of fringe benefits for department
and office personnel and the estimated expenditures on behalf of the
department and said offices from the Capital Equipment Purchase Fund
pursuant to section 4a-9, not including such expenditures made on
behalf of the Health Systems Planning Unit of the [Office of Health
Strategy] Department of Public Health shall be deemed to be the actual
expenditures of the department and said offices, and the amount
appropriated to the Department of Aging and Disability Services from
the Insurance Fund for the fiscal year for the fall prevention program
established in section 17a-859 shall be deemed to be the actual
expenditures for the program.
(c) (1) The proposed assessments for each domestic insurance
company or other domestic entity shall be calculated by (A) allocating
twenty per cent of the amount to be paid under section 38a-47 among
the domestic entities organized under sections 38a-199 to 38a-209,
inclusive, and 38a-214 to 38a-225, inclusive, in proportion to their
respective shares of the total amount of taxes reported in the annual
statement rendered to the Insurance Commissioner pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section, and (B) allocating eighty per cent of the
amount to be paid under section 38a-47 among all domestic insurance
companies and domestic entities other than those organized under
sections 38a-199 to 38a-209, inclusive, and 38a-214 to 38a-225, inclusive,
in proportion to their respective shares of the total amount of taxes
reported in the annual statement rendered to the Insurance
Commissioner pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, provided if
there are no domestic entities organized under sections 38a-199 to 38a-
209, inclusive, and 38a-214 to 38a-225, inclusive, at the time of
assessment, one hundred per cent of the amount to be paid under
Public Act No. 26-68 190 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
section 38a-47 shall be allocated among such domestic insurance
companies and domestic entities.
(2) When the amount any such company or entity is assessed
pursuant to this section exceeds twenty-five per cent of the actual
expenditures of the Insurance Department, the Office of the Healthcare
Advocate and the Office of [Health Strategy] Policy and Management
from the Insurance Fund, such excess amount shall not be paid by such
company or entity but rather shall be assessed against and paid by all
other such companies and entities in proportion to their respective
shares of the total amount of taxes reported in the annual statement
rendered to the Insurance Commissioner pursuant to subsection (a) of
this section, except that for purposes of any assessment made to fund
payments to the Department of Public Health to purchase vaccines, such
company or entity shall be responsible for its share of the costs,
notwithstanding whether its assessment exceeds twenty-five per cent of
the actual expenditures of the Insurance Department, the Office of the
Healthcare Advocate and the Office of [Health Strategy] Policy and
Management from the Insurance Fund. The provisions of this
subdivision shall not be applicable to any corporation that has
converted to a domestic mutual insurance company pursuant to section
38a-155 upon the effective date of any public act that amends said
section to modify or remove any restriction on the business such a
company may engage in, for purposes of any assessment due from such
company on and after such effective date.
(d) Each annual payment determined under section 38a-47 and each
annual assessment determined under this section shall be calculated
based on the total amount of taxes reported in the annual statement
rendered to the Insurance Commissioner pursuant to subsection (a) of
this section.
(e) On or before September first, annually, for each fiscal year, the
Insurance Commissioner, after receiving any objections to the proposed
Public Act No. 26-68 191 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
assessments and making such adjustments as in the commissioner's
opinion may be indicated, shall assess each such domestic insurance
company or other domestic entity an amount equal to its proposed
assessment as so adjusted. Each domestic insurance company or other
domestic entity shall pay to the Insurance Commissioner (1) on or before
June thirtieth, annually, an estimated payment against its assessment for
the following year equal to twenty-five per cent of its assessment for the
fiscal year ending such June thirtieth, (2) on or before September
thirtieth, annually, twenty-five per cent of its assessment adjusted to
reflect any credit or amount due from the preceding fiscal year as
determined by the commissioner under subsection (f) of this section,
and (3) on or before the following December thirty-first and March
thirty-first, annually, each domestic insurance company or other
domestic entity shall pay to the Insurance Commissioner the remaining
fifty per cent of its proposed assessment to the department in two equal
installments.
(f) If the actual expenditures for the fall prevention program
established in section 17a-859 are less than the amount allocated, the
Commissioner of Aging and Disability Services shall notify the
Insurance Commissioner. Immediately following the close of the fiscal
year, the Insurance Commissioner shall recalculate the proposed
assessment for each domestic insurance company or other domestic
entity in accordance with subsection (c) of this section using the actual
expenditures made during the fiscal year by the Insurance Department,
the Office of the Healthcare Advocate and the Office of [Health Strategy]
Policy and Management from the Insurance Fund, the actual
expenditures made on behalf of the department and said offices from
the Capital Equipment Purchase Fund pursuant to section 4a-9, not
including such expenditures made on behalf of the Health Systems
Planning Unit of the [Office of Health Strategy] Department of Public
Health, and the actual expenditures for the fall prevention program. On
or before July thirty-first, annually, the Insurance Commissioner shall
Public Act No. 26-68 192 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
render to each such domestic insurance company and other domestic
entity a statement showing the difference between their respective
recalculated assessments and the amount they have previously paid. On
or before August thirty-first, the Insurance Commissioner, after
receiving any objections to such statements, shall make such
adjustments that in the commissioner's opinion may be indicated, and
shall render an adjusted assessment, if any, to the affected companies.
Any such domestic insurance company or other domestic entity may
pay to the Insurance Commissioner the entire assessment required
under this subsection in one payment when the first installment of such
assessment is due.
Sec. 146. Subsection (a) of section 38a-477e of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(a) [On and after January 1, 2017, each] Each health carrier, as defined
in section 19a-755b, shall maintain an Internet web site and toll-free
telephone number that enables consumers to request and obtain: (1)
Information on in-network costs for inpatient admissions, health care
procedures and services, including (A) the allowed amount for, at a
minimum, admissions and procedures reported to the [Commissioner
of Health Strategy] Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management
pursuant to section 19a-755b for each health care provider in the state;
(B) the estimated out-of-pocket costs that a consumer would be
responsible for paying for any such admission or procedure that is
medically necessary, including any facility fee, coinsurance, copayment,
deductible or other out-of-pocket expense; and (C) data or other
information concerning (i) quality measures for the health care
provider, (ii) patient satisfaction, to the extent such information is
available, (iii) a directory of participating providers, as defined in
section 38a-472f, in accordance with the provisions of section 38a-477h;
and (2) information on out-of-network costs for inpatient admissions,
Public Act No. 26-68 193 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
health care procedures and services.
Sec. 147. Subdivision (2) of subsection (c) of section 38a-477ee of the
2026 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(2) The Attorney General [,] and Healthcare Advocate. [and
Commissioner of Health Strategy.]
Sec. 148. Subdivisions (13) to (17), inclusive, of subsection (c) of
section 38a-1083 of the general statutes are repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(13) Make and enter into any contract or agreement necessary or
incidental to the performance of its duties and execution of its powers,
including, but not limited to, an agreement with the Office of [Health
Strategy] Policy and Management to use funds collected under this
section for the operation of the all-payer claims database established
under section 19a-755a and to receive data from such database. The
contracts entered into by the exchange shall not be subject to the
approval of any other state department, office or agency, provided
copies of all contracts of the exchange shall be maintained by the
exchange as public records, subject to the proprietary rights of any party
to the contract, except any agreement with the Office of [Health
Strategy] Policy and Management shall be subject to approval by said
office [and the Office of Policy and Management] and no portion of such
agreement shall be considered proprietary;
(14) To the extent permitted under its contract with other persons,
consent to any termination, modification, forgiveness or other change of
any term of any contractual right, payment, royalty, contract or
agreement of any kind to which the exchange is a party;
(15) Award grants to trained and certified individuals and
institutions that will assist individuals, families and small employers
Public Act No. 26-68 194 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
and their employees in enrolling in appropriate coverage through the
exchange. Applications for grants from the exchange shall be made on
a form prescribed by the board;
(16) Limit the number of plans offered, and use selective criteria in
determining which plans to offer, through the exchange, provided
individuals and employers have an adequate number and selection of
choices;
(17) Evaluate [jointly with the Health Care Cabinet established
pursuant to section 19a-725] the feasibility of implementing a basic
health program option as set forth in Section 1331 of the Affordable Care
Act;
Sec. 149. Subdivision (26) of section 38a-1084 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(26) Consult with the Commissioner of Social Services, Insurance
Commissioner and Office of [Health Strategy, established under section
19a-754a] Policy and Management for the purposes set forth in section
19a-754c;
Sec. 150. Subsection (d) of section 3-123ddd of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(d) Nothing in sections 3-123aaa to 3-123hhh, inclusive, 19a-654, [19a-
725,] 19a-755a, 38a-513f or 38a-513g shall diminish any right to retiree
health insurance pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement or any
other provision of the general statutes.
Sec. 151. Subsection (b) of section 3-123hhh of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
Public Act No. 26-68 195 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(b) Nothing in this section or sections 3-123aaa to 3-123ggg, inclusive,
19a-654, [19a-725,] 19a-755a, 38a-513f or 38a-513g shall modify the state
employee plan in any way without the written consent of the State
Employees Bargaining Agent Coalition and the Secretary of the Office
of Policy and Management.
Sec. 152. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) The Department of Public
Health shall constitute a successor agency, in accordance with the
provisions of sections 4-38d, 4-38e and 4-39 of the general statutes, to the
Office of Health Strategy with respect to all functions, powers and
duties of the Office of Health Strategy concerning (1) the Health Systems
Planning Unit established pursuant to section 19a-612 of the general
statutes, and (2) the certificate of need process set forth in sections 19a-
638 to 19a-641, inclusive, of the general statutes. Any order, decision,
agreed settlement or regulation of the former Office of Health Strategy
concerning any of the functions described in subdivisions (1) and (2) of
this subsection that is in force on July 1, 2026, shall continue in force and
effect as an order, decision, agreed settlement or regulation of the
Department of Public Health until amended, repealed or superseded
pursuant to law. Where any order, decision, agreed settlement or
regulation of said department and said former office conflict, the
Commissioner of Public Health may implement policies and procedures
consistent with the provisions of chapters 368v and 368z of the general
statutes while in the process of adopting the policies or procedures in
regulation form, provided the commissioner shall publish notice of
intention to adopt regulations on the Department of Public Health's
Internet web site and the eRegulations System not later than twenty
days after implementation of such policies and procedures. Any such
policies or procedures shall be valid until such regulations are adopted.
(b) If the words "Office of Health Strategy" or "Commissioner of
Health Strategy" are used or referred to in any public or special act of
2026, or in any section of the general statutes that is amended in 2026
Public Act No. 26-68 196 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
that concerns said office's or commissioner's functions with regard to (1)
the Health Systems Planning Unit established pursuant to section 19a-
612 of the general statutes, or (2) the certificate of need process set forth
in sections 19a-638 to 19a-641, inclusive, of the general statutes, such
words shall be deemed to mean or refer to the Department of Public
Health or the Commissioner of Public Health, respectively.
Sec. 153. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) The Office of Policy and
Management shall constitute a successor agency, in accordance with the
provisions of sections 4-38d, 4-38e and 4-39 of the general statutes, to the
Office of Health Strategy with respect to all functions, powers and
duties of the Office of Health Strategy concerning (1) the State-wide
Health Information Exchange, established pursuant to section 17b-59d
of the general statutes, (2) the all-payer claims database program,
established pursuant to section 19a-755a of the general statutes, (3) the
development, publication and modification of health care cost growth
benchmarks and health care quality benchmarks required pursuant to
sections 19a-754f to 19a-754k, inclusive, of the general statutes, and (4)
contracts and memoranda of understanding or agreement related to
funding from the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021. Any order,
decision, agreed settlement or regulation of the former Office of Health
Strategy concerning any of the functions described in subdivisions (1)
to (3), inclusive, of this subsection that is in force on July 1, 2026, shall
continue in force and effect as an order, decision, agreed settlement or
regulation of the Office of Policy and Management until amended,
repealed or superseded pursuant to law. Where any order, decision,
agreed settlement or regulation of said offices conflict, the Secretary of
the Office of Policy and Management may implement policies and
procedures consistent with the provisions of part III of chapter 319o and
chapter 368ee of the general statutes while in the process of adopting the
policies or procedures in regulation form, provided the secretary shall
publish notice of intention to adopt regulations on the Office of Policy
and Management's Internet web site and the eRegulations System not
Public Act No. 26-68 197 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
later than twenty days after implementation of such policies and
procedures. Any such policy or procedure shall be valid until such
regulations are adopted.
(b) If the words "Office of Health Strategy" or "Commissioner of
Health Strategy" are used or referred to in any public or special act of
2026, or in any section of the general statutes that is amended in 2026
that concerns said office's or commissioner's functions with regard to (1)
the State-wide Health Information Exchange, established pursuant to
section 17b-59d of the general statutes, (2) the all-payer claims database
program, established pursuant to section 19a-755a of the general
statutes, or (3) the development, publication and modification of health
care cost growth benchmarks and health care quality benchmarks
required pursuant to sections 19a-754f to 19a-754k, inclusive, of the
general statutes, such words shall be deemed to mean or refer to the
Office of Policy and Management or the Secretary of the Office of Policy
and Management, respectively.
Sec. 154. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) The Department of Social
Services shall constitute a successor agency, in accordance with the
provisions of sections 4-38d, 4-38e and 4-39 of the general statutes, to the
Office of Health Strategy with respect to all functions, powers and
duties of the Office of Health Strategy concerning hospital financial
health reporting by hospitals pursuant to section 19a-486j of the general
statutes. Any order, decision, agreed settlement or regulation of the
former Office of Health Strategy concerning such functions that is in
force on July 1, 2026, shall continue in force and effect as an order,
decision, agreed settlement or regulation of the Department of Social
Services until amended, repealed or superseded pursuant to law. Where
any order, decision, agreed settlement or regulation of said offices
conflict, the Commissioner of Social Services may implement policies
and procedures consistent with the provisions of part III of chapter 319o
and chapter 368ee of the general statutes while in the process of
Public Act No. 26-68 198 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
adopting the policies or procedures in regulation form, provided the
commissioner shall publish notice of intention to adopt regulations on
the Department of Social Services' Internet web site and the
eRegulations System not later than twenty days after implementation of
such policies and procedures. Any such policy or procedure shall be
valid until such regulations are adopted.
(b) If the words "Office of Health Strategy" or "Commissioner of
Health Strategy" are used or referred to in any public or special act of
2026, or in any section of the general statutes that is amended in 2026
that concerns said office's or commissioner's functions with regard to
hospital financial health reporting by hospitals pursuant to section 19a-
486j of the general statutes, such terms shall be deemed to mean or refer
to the Department of Social Services or the Commissioner of Social
Services, respectively.
Sec. 155. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) The Office of the Healthcare
Advocate shall constitute a successor agency, in accordance with the
provisions of sections 4-38d, 4-38e and 4-39 of the general statutes, to the
Office of Health Strategy with respect to all functions, powers and
duties of the Office of Health Strategy concerning community benefit
program reporting by hospitals pursuant to section 19a-127k of the
general statutes. Any order, decision, agreed settlement or regulation of
the former Office of Health Strategy concerning such functions that is in
force on July 1, 2026, shall continue in force and effect as an order,
decision, agreed settlement or regulation of the Office of the Healthcare
Advocate until amended, repealed or superseded pursuant to law.
Where any order, decision, agreed settlement or regulation of said
offices conflict, the Office of the Healthcare Advocate may implement
policies and procedures consistent with the provisions of part III of
chapter 319o and chapter 368ee of the general statutes while in the
process of adopting the policies or procedures in regulation form,
provided the Healthcare Advocate shall publish notice of intention to
Public Act No. 26-68 199 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
adopt regulations on the Office of the Healthcare Advocate's Internet
web site and the eRegulations System not later than twenty days after
implementation of such policies and procedures. Any such policy or
procedure shall be valid until such regulations are adopted.
(b) If the words "Office of Health Strategy" or "Commissioner of
Health Strategy" are used or referred to in any public or special act of
2026, or in any section of the general statutes that is amended in 2026
that concerns said office's or commissioner's functions with regard to
community benefit program reporting by hospitals pursuant to section
19a-127k of the general statutes, such terms shall be deemed to mean or
refer to the Office of the Healthcare Advocate or the Healthcare
Advocate, respectively.
Sec. 156. Section 19a-2a of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July
1, 2026):
The Commissioner of Public Health shall employ the most efficient
and practical means for the prevention and suppression of disease and
shall administer all laws under the jurisdiction of the Department of
Public Health and the Public Health Code. The commissioner shall have
responsibility for the overall operation and administration of the
Department of Public Health. The commissioner shall have the power
and duty to: (1) Administer, coordinate and direct the operation of the
department; (2) adopt and enforce regulations, in accordance with
chapter 54, as are necessary to carry out the purposes of the department
as established by statute; (3) establish rules for the internal operation
and administration of the department; (4) establish and develop
programs and administer services to achieve the purposes of the
department as established by statute; (5) enter into a contract, including,
but not limited to, a contract with another state, for facilities, services
and programs to implement the purposes of the department as
established by statute; (6) designate a deputy commissioner or other
Public Act No. 26-68 200 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
employee of the department to sign any license, certificate or permit
issued by said department; (7) conduct a hearing, issue subpoenas,
administer oaths, compel testimony and render a final decision in any
case when a hearing is required or authorized under the provisions of
any statute dealing with the Department of Public Health; (8) with the
health authorities of this and other states, secure information and data
concerning the prevention and control of epidemics and conditions
affecting or endangering the public health, and compile such
information and statistics and shall disseminate among health
authorities and the people of the state such information as may be of
value to them; (9) annually issue a list of reportable diseases, emergency
illnesses and health conditions and a list of reportable laboratory
findings and amend such lists as the commissioner deems necessary and
distribute such lists as well as any necessary forms to each licensed
physician, licensed physician assistant, licensed advanced practice
registered nurse and clinical laboratory in this state. The commissioner
shall prepare printed forms for reports and returns, with such
instructions as may be necessary, for the use of directors of health,
boards of health and registrars of vital statistics; [and] (10) specify
uniform methods of keeping statistical information by public and
private agencies, organizations and individuals, including a client
identifier system, and collect and make available relevant statistical
information, including the number of persons treated, frequency of
admission and readmission, and frequency and duration of treatment.
The client identifier system shall be subject to the confidentiality
requirements set forth in section 17a-688 and regulations adopted
thereunder; and (11) direct and oversee the Health Systems Planning
Unit, established under section 19a-612 and all of its duties and
responsibilities concerning the certificate of need process as set forth in
chapter 368z. The commissioner may designate any person to perform
any of the duties listed in subdivision (7) of this section. The
commissioner shall have authority over directors of health and may, for
cause, remove any such director; but any person claiming to be
Public Act No. 26-68 201 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
aggrieved by such removal may appeal to the Superior Court which
may affirm or reverse the action of the commissioner as the public
interest requires. The commissioner shall assist and advise local
directors of health and district directors of health in the performance of
their duties, and may require the enforcement of any law, regulation or
ordinance relating to public health. In the event the commissioner
reasonably suspects impropriety on the part of a local director of health
or district director of health, or employee of such director, in the
performance of his or her duties, the commissioner shall provide
notification and any evidence of such impropriety to the appropriate
governing authority of the municipal health authority, established
pursuant to section 19a-200, or the district department of health,
established pursuant to section 19a-244, for purposes of reviewing and
assessing a director's or an employee's compliance with such duties.
Such governing authority shall provide a written report of its findings
from the review and assessment to the commissioner not later than
ninety days after such review and assessment. When requested by local
directors of health or district directors of health, the commissioner shall
consult with them and investigate and advise concerning any condition
affecting public health within their jurisdiction. The commissioner shall
investigate nuisances and conditions affecting, or that he or she has
reason to suspect may affect, the security of life and health in any
locality and, for that purpose, the commissioner, or any person
authorized by the commissioner, may enter and examine any ground,
vehicle, apartment, building or place, and any person designated by the
commissioner shall have the authority conferred by law upon
constables. Whenever the commissioner determines that any provision
of the general statutes or regulation of the Public Health Code is not
being enforced effectively by a local health department or health district,
he or she shall forthwith take such measures, including the performance
of any act required of the local health department or health district, to
ensure enforcement of such statute or regulation and shall inform the
local health department or health district of such measures. In
Public Act No. 26-68 202 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
September of each year the commissioner shall certify to the Secretary
of the Office of Policy and Management the population of each
municipality. The commissioner may solicit and accept for use any gift
of money or property made by will or otherwise, and any grant of or
contract for money, services or property from the federal government,
the state, any political subdivision thereof, any other state or any private
source, and do all things necessary to cooperate with the federal
government or any of its agencies in making an application for any grant
or contract. The commissioner may enter into any contracts or
agreements, in accordance with any established procedures, as may be
necessary for the distribution or use of such money, services or property
in accordance with any requirements to fulfill any conditions of a gift,
grant or contract. The commissioner may establish state-wide and
regional advisory councils. For purposes of this section, "employee of
such director" means an employee of, a consultant employed or retained
by or an independent contractor retained by a local director of health, a
district director of health, a local health department or a health district.
Sec. 157. Section 4-66 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
The Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management shall have the
following functions and powers:
(1) To keep on file information concerning the state's general
accounts;
(2) To furnish all accounting statements relating to the financial
condition of the state as a whole, to the condition and operation of state
funds, to appropriations, to reserves and to costs of operations;
(3) To furnish such statements as and when they are required for
administrative purposes and, at the end of each fiscal period, to prepare
and publish such financial statements and data as will convey to the
Public Act No. 26-68 203 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
General Assembly the essential facts as to the financial condition, the
revenues and expenditures and the costs of operations of the state
government;
(4) To furnish to the State Comptroller on or before the twentieth day
of each month cumulative monthly statements of revenues and
expenditures to the end of the last-completed month together with (A)
a statement of estimated revenue by source to the end of the fiscal year,
at least in the same detail as appears in the budget act, and (B) a
statement of appropriation requirements of the state's General Fund to
the end of the fiscal year itemized as far as practicable for each budgeted
agency, including estimates of lapsing appropriations, unallocated
lapsing balances and unallocated appropriation requirements;
(5) To transmit to the Office of Fiscal Analysis a copy of monthly
position data and monthly bond project run;
(6) To inquire into the operation of, and make or recommend
improvement in, the methods employed in the preparation of the
budget and the procedure followed in determining whether the funds
expended by the departments, boards, commissions and institutions
supported in whole or in part by the state are wisely, judiciously and
economically expended and to submit such findings and
recommendations to the General Assembly at each regular session,
together with drafts of proposed legislation, if any;
(7) To examine each department, state college, state hospital, state-
aided hospital, reformatory and prison and each other institution or
other agency supported in whole or in part by the state, except public
schools, for the purpose of determining the effectiveness of its policies,
management, internal organization and operating procedures and the
character, amount, quality and cost of the service rendered by each such
department, institution or agency;
Public Act No. 26-68 204 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(8) To recommend, and to assist any such department, institution or
agency to effect, improvements in organization, management methods
and procedures and to report its findings and recommendations and
submit drafts of proposed legislation, if any, to the General Assembly at
each regular session;
(9) To consider and devise ways and means whereby comprehensive
plans and designs to meet the needs of the several departments and
institutions with respect to physical plant and equipment and whereby
financial plans and programs for the capital expenditures involved may
be made in advance and to make or assist in making such plans;
(10) To devise and prescribe the form of operating reports that shall
be periodically required from the several departments, boards,
commissions, institutions and agencies supported in whole or in part by
the state;
(11) To require the several departments, boards, commissions,
institutions and agencies to make such reports for such periods as said
secretary may determine; [and]
(12) To verify the correctness of, and to analyze, all such reports and
to take such action as may be deemed necessary to remedy
unsatisfactory conditions disclosed by such reports;
(13) To (A) coordinate the state's health information technology
initiatives, (B) seek funding for and oversee the planning,
implementation and development of policies and procedures for the
administration of the all-payer claims database program established
under section 19a-775a, (C) establish and maintain a consumer health
information Internet web site under section 19a-755b, and (D) designate
an unclassified individual from the office to perform the duties of a
health information technology officer as set forth in sections 17b-59f and
17b-59g; and
Public Act No. 26-68 205 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(14) To (A) set an annual health care cost growth benchmark and
primary care spending target pursuant to section 19a-754g, (B) develop
and adopt health care quality benchmarks pursuant to section 19a-754g,
(C) develop strategies, in consultation with stakeholders, to meet such
benchmarks and targets developed pursuant to section 19a-754g, (D)
enhance the transparency of provider entities, as defined in subdivision
(13) of section 19a-754f, (E) monitor the development of accountable care
organizations and patient-centered medical homes in the state, and (F)
monitor the adoption of alternative payment methodologies in the state.
Sec. 158. Subsection (a) of section 17b-3 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(a) The Commissioner of Social Services shall administer all law
under the jurisdiction of the Department of Social Services. The
commissioner shall have the power and duty to do the following: (1)
Administer, coordinate and direct the operation of the department; (2)
adopt and enforce such regulations, in accordance with chapter 54, as
are necessary to implement the purposes of the department as
established by statute; (3) establish rules for the internal operation and
administration of the department; (4) establish and develop programs
and administer services to achieve the purposes of the department as
established by statute; (5) enter into a contract, including, but not limited
to, up to five contracts with other states, for facilities, services and
programs to implement the purposes of the department as established
by statute; (6) process applications and requests for services promptly;
(7) with the approval of the Comptroller and in accordance with such
procedures as may be specified by the Comptroller, make payments to
providers of services for individuals who are eligible for benefits from
the department as appropriate; (8) make no duplicate awards for items
of assistance once granted, except for replacement of lost or stolen
checks on which payment has been stopped; (9) promote economic self-
Public Act No. 26-68 206 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
sufficiency where appropriate in the department's programs, policies,
practices and staff interactions with recipients; (10) act as advocate for
the need of more comprehensive and coordinated programs for persons
served by the department; (11) plan services and programs for persons
served by the department; (12) coordinate outreach activities by public
and private agencies assisting persons served by the department; (13)
consult and cooperate with area and private planning agencies; (14)
advise and inform municipal officials and officials of social service
agencies about social service programs and collect and disseminate
information pertaining thereto, including information about federal,
state, municipal and private assistance programs and services; (15)
encourage and facilitate effective communication and coordination
among federal, state, municipal and private agencies; (16) inquire into
the utilization of state and federal government resources which offer
solutions to problems of the delivery of social services; (17) conduct,
encourage and maintain research and studies relating to social services
development; (18) prepare, review and encourage model
comprehensive social service programs; (19) maintain an inventory of
data and information and act as a clearing house and referral agency for
information on state and federal programs and services; [and] (20)
conduct, encourage and maintain research and studies and advise
municipal officials and officials of social service agencies about forms of
intergovernmental cooperation and coordination between public and
private agencies designed to advance social service programs; (21)
develop an annual summary and analysis of community benefit
reporting by hospitals pursuant to section 19a-127k; and (22) receive
reports from each hospital regarding its financial health pursuant to
section 19a-486j. The commissioner may require notice of the
submission of all applications by municipalities, any agency thereof,
and social service agencies, for federal and state financial assistance to
carry out social services. The commissioner shall establish state-wide
and regional advisory councils.
Public Act No. 26-68 207 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 159. Section 38a-477jj of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) For the purposes of this section:
(1) "Affordable Care Act" has the same meaning as provided in
section 38a-1080;
(2) "Exchange" has the same meaning as provided in section 38a-1080;
(3) "Health benefit plan" has the same meaning as provided in section
38a-1080, except that such term shall not include a grandfathered health
plan as such term is used in the Affordable Care Act;
(4) "Health carrier" has the same meaning as provided in section 38a-
1080;
(5) "Office of Health Strategy" means the Office of Health Strategy
established under section 19a-754a; and
(6) "Qualified health plan" has the same meaning as provided in
section 38a-1080.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes and except
as provided in subsection (c) of this section, no health carrier offering a
health benefit plan in this state on or after January 1, 2022, that includes
a pharmacy benefit and uses a drug formulary or list of covered drugs
may:
(1) Remove a prescription drug from the drug formulary or list of
covered drugs during a plan year; or
(2) Move a prescription drug from a cost-sharing tier that imposes a
lesser coinsurance, copayment or deductible for the prescription drug to
a cost-sharing tier that imposes a greater coinsurance, copayment or
deductible for the prescription drug during a plan year, unless the
Public Act No. 26-68 208 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
prescription drug is subject to an in-network coinsurance, copayment or
deductible that is not greater than forty dollars per prescription per
month in any tier.
(c) A health carrier offering a health benefit plan in this state on or
after January 1, 2022, that includes a pharmacy benefit and uses a drug
formulary or list of covered drugs may:
(1) Remove a prescription drug from the drug formulary or list of
covered drugs, upon at least ninety days' advance notice to a covered
person and the covered person's treating physician, if:
(A) The federal Food and Drug Administration issues an
announcement, guidance, notice, warning or statement concerning the
prescription drug that calls into question the clinical safety of the
prescription drug, unless the covered person's treating physician states,
in writing, that the prescription drug remains medically necessary
despite such announcement, guidance, notice, warning or statement; or
(B) The prescription drug is approved by the federal Food and Drug
Administration for use without a prescription; and
(2) Move a brand-name prescription drug from a cost-sharing tier
that imposes a lesser coinsurance, copayment or deductible for the
brand-name prescription drug to a cost-sharing tier that imposes a
greater coinsurance, copayment or deductible for the brand-name
prescription drug if the health carrier adds to the drug formulary or list
of covered drugs a generic prescription drug that is:
(A) Approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration for use
as an alternative to such brand-name prescription drug; and
(B) In a cost-sharing tier that imposes a coinsurance, copayment or
deductible for the generic prescription drug that is lesser than the
coinsurance, copayment or deductible that is imposed for such brand-
Public Act No. 26-68 209 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
name prescription drug.
(d) Nothing in this section shall prevent or prohibit a health carrier
from adding a prescription drug to a formulary or list of covered drugs
at any time.
[(e) (1) The Office of Health Strategy shall, at least annually, conduct
a study to determine the impact that the requirements established in
subsections (a) to (d), inclusive, of this section have on the cost of health
benefit plans offered, delivered, issued for delivery, renewed, amended
or continued in this state and qualified health plans offered and sold
through the exchange.
(2) Not later than January 31, 2023, and annually thereafter, the Office
of Health Strategy shall submit a report, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a, to the commissioner and the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to insurance. Such report shall disclose the results of the study
conducted pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection for the
preceding year.]
Sec. 160. Sections 19a-754a and 19a-754e of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes are repealed. (Effective July 1, 2026)
Sec. 161. Sections 19a-725 and 20-195sss of the general statutes are
repealed. (Effective July 1, 2026)
Sec. 162. Section 10 of public act 26-41 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Any individual may, at any time, deliver or surrender any firearm,
as defined in section 53a-3 of the general statutes, as amended by [this
act] public act 26-41, or ammunition in the possession of such individual
to the Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection for a
period of not less than fourteen days, provided a local police
Public Act No. 26-68 210 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
department may accept such firearm or ammunition on behalf of said
commissioner. The commissioner or local police department shall
exercise due care in the receipt and holding of such firearm or
ammunition.
(b) An individual who delivers or surrenders a firearm or
ammunition to the Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public
Protection or a local police department may request the return of such
firearm or ammunition on or after the fifteenth day after the date of such
delivery or surrender, but not later than [two years] one year after such
date. Such request shall include a completed and signed form
promulgated pursuant to subsection (b) of section [502 of this act] 11 of
public act 26-41.
(c) Not later than five days after receiving a request pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section, the commissioner or a local police
department shall review the request and make available for retrieval
any firearm or ammunition to such individual, provided the
commissioner or local police department confirms that such individual
(1) submitted the signed form required pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section, (2) is not otherwise disqualified from possessing such firearm
or ammunition, and (3) was legally entitled to possess such firearm or
ammunition at the time of delivery or surrender to the commissioner or
a local police department. If such firearm or ammunition has not been
collected by the individual at the end of the [two-year] one-year period
immediately following the date of delivery or surrender of such firearm
or ammunition, the commissioner or a local police department, as
applicable, shall cause such firearm or ammunition to be destroyed. Not
later than ninety days prior to such destruction, the commissioner or
local police department, as applicable, shall notify, in writing, the
individual who delivered or surrendered the firearm or ammunition of
the date of such destruction.
Sec. 163. Section 11 of public act 26-41 is repealed and the following
Public Act No. 26-68 211 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) Not later than thirty days after the effective date of this section,
the Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection shall,
within available appropriations, provide written notification of the
provisions of section [501 of this act] 10 of public act 26-41, by posting
the notification on the Department of Emergency Services and Public
Protection's Internet web site. Such notification shall include directions
concerning how an individual who delivers or surrenders any firearm,
as defined in section 53a-3 of the general statutes, as amended by [this
act] public act 26-41, or ammunition in the possession of such individual
to the Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection for a
period of not less than fourteen days, may on or after the fifteenth day
after the date of such delivery or surrender, but not later than [two
years] one year after such date, request the return of such firearm or
ammunition, and which requirements the individual must satisfy in
order to have such firearm or ammunition returned to such person. Such
notice shall also provide that such firearm or ammunition shall be
destroyed if not collected by the individual before the end of the [two-
year] one-year period immediately following the date of delivery or
surrender of a firearm or ammunition.
(b) On or before October 1, [2027] 2026, the Commissioner of
Emergency Services and Public Protection shall promulgate and make
available on the Department of Emergency Services and Public
Protection's Internet web site a form to be signed by any individual who
is seeking the return of a firearm or ammunition pursuant to section [501
of this act] 10 of public act 26-41.
Sec. 164. Section 32-664 of the general statutes is amended by adding
subsection (m) as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
(NEW) (m) Whenever an environmental use restriction, as defined in
section 22a-133n, is required by section 22a-133k or 22a-134tt or by the
Public Act No. 26-68 212 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
regulations that implement such sections, or any authorization or
approval issued pursuant thereto, on land within the Adriaen's Landing
site, such requirement may be satisfied by complying with the
provisions of subdivision (1) this subsection.
(1) Soil and groundwater impacted by releases of pollution may be
managed in place provided:
(A) Each owner of a parcel within the Adriaen's Landing site on or
under which such soil or groundwater is located records an affidavit of
facts on the land records of the city of Hartford. Such affidavit shall
include statements indicating that (i) there is polluted soil, groundwater
or both on or under the parcel, and (ii) that any person who disturbs
such soil or groundwater for any purpose shall return the soil to the
approximate location and depth from which it was removed or properly
dispose of such soil or groundwater in accordance with all relevant state
and federal laws;
(B) A notice is sent by such owner to all governmental authorities and
public service companies, as defined in section 16-1, that are reasonably
expected to own, use or maintain electric, natural gas, sewer, steam or
other utility infrastructure located on, over or under the portion of the
Adriaen's Landing site where such soil or groundwater will be managed
in place pursuant to this subdivision. Such notice shall include a copy of
the affidavit of facts recorded pursuant to this subdivision; and
(C) If the soil or groundwater on the site is isolated from direct
exposure by a membrane, layer or other barrier, the presence of such
barrier shall be identified in the affidavit of facts recorded pursuant to
this subdivision, and such membrane, layer or other barrier shall not be
removed, breached or otherwise damaged without such person first
receiving prior approval from the Capital Region Development
Authority, which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld. Any
membrane, layer or other barrier that is removed, breached or otherwise
Public Act No. 26-68 213 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
damaged by such person shall be repaired or replaced by such person,
as soon as reasonably practicable, provided measures to mitigate the
risk of direct exposure to, or the migration of, pollution shall be
implemented by such person until the repair or replacement of such
membrane, layer or other barrier is completed.
(2) The Capital Region Development Authority shall prepare, in
consultation with the Commissioner of Energy and Environmental
Protection, a protocol to be used by any person disturbing soil or
groundwater on or under the Adriaen's Landing site that is managed
pursuant to this subsection. Such protocol shall set forth a process for
the provision of notice of any such disturbance and best management
practices for properly managing such soil or groundwater. The
authority shall post such protocol on its Internet website. Such protocol
shall be identified in the affidavit of facts recorded pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(3) The Capital Region Development Authority shall perform, or
cause to be performed, an annual inspection of any portion of the
Adrien's Landing site where soil or groundwater is managed pursuant
to this subsection by a licensed environmental professional, as defined
in section 22a-133v. Such inspection shall include a physical inspection
to determine compliance with any approvals or authorizations issued
pursuant to section 22a-133k or 22a-134tt and the regulations that
implement such sections and a review of records to verify compliance
with any recordkeeping or monitoring required by such approvals or
authorizations. If such annual inspection identifies conditions contrary
to those conditions required by any approval or authorization, the
authority shall notify the Commissioner of Energy and Environmental
Protection and provide a proposed schedule for correcting such
condition.
(4) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit any
person from exercising any existing right to dig, excavate or disturb soil
Public Act No. 26-68 214 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
in the Adrien's Landing site provided such person performs such
activity in a manner that protects human health and the environment
and is consistent with the provisions of this subsection. The failure to
perform any activity in a manner that is consistent with the provisions
of this subsection may result in the creation of a condition reasonably
expected to pollute the waters of the state.
Sec. 165. Section 17a-714a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) For purposes of this section, (1) "opioid antagonist" means
naloxone hydrochloride or any other similarly acting and equally safe
drug approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration for the
treatment of drug overdose, and (2) "person" has the same meaning as
provided in section 21a-240.
(b) A licensed health care professional who is permitted by law to
prescribe an opioid antagonist may prescribe or dispense an opioid
antagonist to any individual to treat or prevent a drug overdose without
being liable for damages in a civil action or subject to criminal
prosecution for prescribing or dispensing such opioid antagonist or for
any subsequent use of such opioid antagonist. A licensed health care
professional who prescribes or dispenses an opioid antagonist in
accordance with the provisions of this subsection shall be deemed not
to have violated the standard of care for such licensed health care
professional.
(c) A licensed health care professional may administer an opioid
antagonist to any person to treat or prevent an opioid-related drug
overdose. Such licensed health care professional who administers an
opioid antagonist in accordance with the provisions of this subsection
shall not be liable for damages in a civil action or subject to criminal
prosecution for administration of such opioid antagonist and shall not
be deemed to have violated the standard of care for such licensed health
Public Act No. 26-68 215 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
care professional.
(d) (1) Any person may provide a nonlegend opioid antagonist to any
person for the purposes of treating or preventing an opioid-related drug
overdose. Any person that distributes such a nonlegend opioid
antagonist in accordance with the provisions of this subsection shall not
be liable for payments or damages in a claim or civil action or subject to
criminal prosecution for such distribution or use of such nonlegend
opioid antagonist.
(2) Any person who solely distributes a nonlegend opioid antagonist
to the public, without compensation or consideration, shall not be
required to obtain a permit pursuant to the provisions of section 20-624.
[(d)] (e) Any person who in good faith believes that another person is
experiencing an opioid-related drug overdose may, if acting with
reasonable care, administer an opioid antagonist to such other person.
Any person, other than a licensed health care professional acting in the
ordinary course of such person's employment, who administers an
opioid antagonist in accordance with this subsection shall not be liable
for damages in a civil action or subject to criminal prosecution with
respect to the administration of such opioid antagonist.
[(e)] (f) Not later than October 1, 2017, each municipality shall amend
its local emergency medical services plan, as described in section 19a-
181b, to ensure that at least one emergency medical services provider,
as defined in the regulations of Connecticut state agencies pertaining to
emergency medical services, who is likely to be the first person to arrive
on the scene of a medical emergency in the municipality, including, but
not limited to, emergency medical services personnel, as defined in
section 20-206jj, or a resident state trooper, is equipped with an opioid
antagonist and such person has received training, approved by the
Commissioner of Public Health, in the administration of an opioid
antagonist.
Public Act No. 26-68 216 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 166. Section 15-120h of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
As used in sections 15-120g to 15-120o, inclusive, the following terms
[shall] have the following meanings:
(1) "Airport project" means any acquisition, disposition, demolition,
remediation, construction, renovation, repair, replacement, expansion,
environmental remediation or other development of real property or
improvements that is related to an airport facility or access to an airport
facility, including (A) the acquisition of off-airport land required by a
permitting agency, (B) for purposes of a runway, a taxilane, a hanger, a
depot, an apron, a mezzanine, baggage handling, administration,
maintenance, storage, utilities or parking, (C) furniture, fixtures,
equipment, communication, navigation, safety infrastructure and
systems and other personal property which is reasonably necessary to
acquire in connection with such development, and (D) associated
interest, reserve fund deposits and other financing costs and charges
necessary or incident to the development, financing, completion and
placement in operation of any airport project, owned in its entirety by
the authority, or suitable for use by the authority, in accordance with the
purposes of the authority;
[(1)] (2) "Authority" means the Tweed-New Haven Airport
Authority, as created under section 15-120i;
(3) "Bonds" means bonds of the authority issued under the provisions
of this chapter, including refunding bonds, which may be secured by
mortgages or the full faith and credit of the authority, the full faith and
credit of a participating corporation or any other lawfully pledged
security of the authority or a participating corporation, which may
include, but need not be limited to, the revenues from the airport or a
financing project.
Public Act No. 26-68 217 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(4) "Cost" in relation to an airport project or any portion of an airport
project financed under the provision of this chapter, includes all or any
part of the cost of (A) construction and acquisition of all lands,
structures, real or personal property, rights, rights-of-way, franchises,
easements, permits, licenses and other interests of any kind which may
be owned, held, possessed, transferred, assigned or otherwise acquired
or used for an airport project, including the acquisition of off-airport
land; (B) demolishing, renovation, expanding or removing any
buildings or other structures on acquired land, including the cost of
acquiring land upon which such buildings or structures may be moved;
(C) environmental remediation; (D) all machinery, equipment, repairs
or improvements to other public or private property or infrastructure
that is necessary for, incident to or a condition for, the construction,
placement or use of airport infrastructure; (E) the payment of offset,
impact or compensatory fees or payments for the use of, modifications
to or disruption of, public or private properties, adverse impact upon
the environment or the health, safety or welfare of the general public,
finance charges, interest prior to, during and for a period after,
completion of construction, working capital, reserves for principal and
interest, extensions, enlargements, additions, replacements, renovations
and improvements; (F) engineering, financial and legal services,
designs, plans, studies, surveys, inspections, testing, regulatory
compliance and certifications, estimates of cost and of revenues, project
management, administrative expense, expenses necessary to determine
the feasibility or practicability of constructing the airport project; and
(G) other expenses necessary or incident to the construction, financing
or operation of the airport project;
(5) "Federally guaranteed security" means any security, investment
or evidence of indebtedness which is either directly or indirectly insured
or guaranteed, in whole or in part, concerning the payment of principal
and interest by the United States or any agency or instrumentality
thereof;
Public Act No. 26-68 218 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(6) "Financing project" means the leasing, licensing, operation of an
airport project and any other activity or property for which the authority
is authorized to issue bonds or provide financing under the provisions
of this chapter;
(7) "Participating corporation" means any corporation, partnership,
limited liability company, limited liability partnership, limited
partnership, nonprofit organization, specially chartered corporation or
similar type of legal business entity, quasi-public authority or
governmental entity;
[(2)] (8) "Procedure" means each statement, by the authority, of
general applicability, without regard to its designation, that implements
or prescribes law or policy or describes the organization or procedure of
the authority, [. The term] including, but not limited to, bylaws.
"Procedure" includes the amendment or repeal of a prior regulation, but
does not include, unless otherwise provided by any provision of the
general statutes, (A) statements concerning only the internal
management of the authority and not affecting procedures available to
the public, and (B) intra-authority memoranda;
[(3)] (9) "Proposed procedure" means a proposal by the authority
under the provisions of section 15-120k for a new procedure or for a
change in, addition to or repeal of an existing procedure.
Sec. 167. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) Notwithstanding any
provision of the general statutes, upon certification by the Secretary of
the Office of Policy and Management to the Treasurer that a passenger
terminal facility located on the side of the Tweed-New Haven Airport
that is adjacent to the town of East Haven and designed to support
scheduled and charter commercial airline flights, including no fewer
than two thousand one hundred parking spaces, has opened and is
operational, and annually thereafter until such passenger terminal
facility ceases to operate, the Treasurer shall make the following
Public Act No. 26-68 219 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
payments in lieu of taxes on behalf of the state:
(1) Four million four hundred thousand dollars to the town of East
Haven; and
(2) Two million nine hundred thousand dollars to the city of New
Haven.
(b) The payments made pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall
be in addition to any state grant in lieu of taxes otherwise payable to the
town of East Haven or the city of New Haven pursuant to any provision
of the general statutes.
Sec. 168. Section 15-120i of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) There is created a body politic and corporate to be known as the
"Tweed-New Haven Airport Authority". Said authority shall be a public
instrumentality and political subdivision of this state and the exercise
by the authority of the powers conferred by sections 15-120g to 15-120o,
inclusive, shall be deemed and held to be the performance of an essential
public and governmental function. The Tweed-New Haven Airport
Authority shall not be construed to be a department, institution or
agency of the state.
(b) (1) The authority shall be governed by a board of directors
consisting of fifteen members, each member serving not more than two
consecutive four-year terms. The terms of the members shall be
staggered so that not more than four members' terms shall expire at the
same time.
(2) Until thirty days after the issuance of a building permit in
accordance with subdivision (3) of this subsection, the membership of
the board shall be appointed as follows: Eight members of the board
shall be appointed by the mayor of New Haven and five members shall
Public Act No. 26-68 220 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
be appointed by the mayor of East Haven, at least six of whom shall be
residents of New Haven or East Haven. Two members of the board shall
be appointed by the South Central Regional Council of Governments,
each of whom shall be a resident of any of the following towns or cities:
Bethany, Branford, Guilford, Hamden, Madison, Milford, North
Branford, North Haven, Orange, Wallingford, West Haven or
Woodbridge. [The board of directors shall elect a chairperson from
among its members and shall annually elect one of its members as vice-
chairperson and shall elect other members as officers, and establish
bylaws as necessary for the operation of the authority. Members of the
board of directors shall receive no compensation for the performance of
their duties. No member of the board shall have any financial interest in
Tweed-New Haven Airport or any of its tenants or concessions.]
(3) Thirty days after the issuance by the local building official and fire
marshal of a building permit to construct a passenger terminal facility
located on the side of the Tweed-New Haven Airport that is adjacent to
the town of East Haven and designed to support scheduled and charter
commercial airline flights, including no fewer than two thousand one
hundred parking spaces, the membership of the board shall be
appointed as follows: Eight members of the board shall be appointed by
the mayor of New Haven and seven members shall be appointed by the
mayor of East Haven, at least six of whom shall be residents of New
Haven or East Haven. Any member appointed by the South Central
Regional Council of Governments pursuant to subdivision (2) of this
subsection and serving at the time of the issuance of such permit shall
continue to serve until such time as the initial appointment of the two
additional members appointed by the mayor of East Haven under this
subdivision.
[(c)] (4) The [thirteen] fifteen members of the board of directors
appointed by the mayors of New Haven and East Haven shall be special
directors vested with additional powers set forth in the bylaws of the
Public Act No. 26-68 221 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Tweed-New Haven Airport Authority.
(c) The board of directors shall elect a chairperson from among its
members and shall annually elect one of its members as vice-
chairperson and shall elect other members as officers, and establish
bylaws as necessary for the operation of the authority. Members of the
board of directors shall receive no compensation for the performance of
their duties. No member of the board shall have any financial interest in
Tweed-New Haven Airport or any of its tenants or concessions.
(d) The powers of the authority shall be vested in and exercised by
the board. Eight members of the board shall constitute a quorum and
the affirmative vote of a majority of the members present at a meeting
of the board shall be sufficient for any action taken by the board, except
as provided in subsection (e) of this section and sections 15-120j and 15-
120k. No vacancy in the membership of the board shall impair the right
of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the
board. Any action taken by the board may be authorized by resolution
at any regular or special meeting and shall take effect immediately
unless otherwise provided in the resolution. Notice of any meeting,
whether special or regular, shall be given orally, not less than forty-eight
hours prior to the meeting. The board may delegate to three or more of
its members, or its officers, agents and employees, such board powers
and duties as it may deem proper.
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of the general statutes, upon
the issuance of a building permit to construct a passenger terminal
facility located on the side of the Tweed-New Haven Airport that is
adjacent to the town of East Haven and designed to support scheduled
and charter commercial airline flights, including no fewer than two
thousand one hundred parking spaces, the following actions shall
require the affirmative vote of at least ten members of the board, unless
such actions are required to comply with applicable federal law,
including mandatory conditions of grants of the Federal Aviation
Public Act No. 26-68 222 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Administration, the airport operating certificate, safety or security
directives or any action necessary to maintain safe airport operations:
(1) Any extension of Runway 2-20 of the airport exceeding six
thousand six hundred thirty-five linear feet;
(2) Construction of any new facility, or the structural conversion of
any existing airport facility, for the purpose of providing or enabling
freight and cargo services;
(3) Any expansion project that increases the operational capacity,
passenger capacity, gate or landing position capacity or increases use of
airport facilities within the town of East Haven, excluding any project
that is part of, and consistent with, the terminal expansion project
approved by the authority prior to such permit issuance, including all
associated supporting infrastructure necessary to complete such
terminal expansion project;
(4) Any addition, material modification or closing of any airport
entrances or exits;
(5) Any lease agreement or renewal of a lease agreement pertaining
to general aviation services, including the addition of any fixed base
operations;
(6) Any amendment to provisions of a lease or other agreement or
renewal of a lease or other agreement, for private operation or
management of the airport that would impact (A) cargo or freight
operations, the construction of a facility or modification of existing
facilities to accommodate such operations, (B) community benefits,
including, but not limited to, mitigation payments paid by the private
operator, (C) operation of parking at the West Terminal and access to
such terminal, and (D) the acquisition of additional property; and
(7) The repeal or reduction of noise mitigation or abatement measures
Public Act No. 26-68 223 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
previously approved by the board.
[(e)] (f) The authority shall have perpetual succession and shall adopt
procedures for the conduct of its affairs in accordance with section 15-
120k. Such succession shall continue as long as the authority shall have
obligations outstanding and until the existence of the authority is
terminated by law at which time the rights and properties of the
authority shall pass to and be vested in the city of New Haven.
Sec. 169. Section 15-120j of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The authority shall maintain and improve Tweed-New Haven
Airport as an important economic development asset for the south
central Connecticut region which is comprised of the towns and cities of
Bethany, Branford, East Haven, Guilford, Hamden, Madison, Milford,
New Haven, North Branford, North Haven, Orange, Wallingford, West
Haven and Woodbridge. The authority shall have the following powers
and duties and may exercise such powers in its own name:
(1) To manage, maintain, supervise and operate Tweed-New Haven
Airport;
(2) [do] To do all things necessary to maintain working relationships
with the state, municipalities and persons, and conduct the business of
a regional airport, in accordance with applicable statutes and
regulations;
(3) [to] To charge reasonable fees for the services it performs and
modify, reduce or increase such fees, provided fees shall apply
uniformly to all airport users;
(4) [to] To enter into contracts, leases and agreements for goods and
equipment and for services with airlines, concessions, counsel,
engineers, architects, private consultants and advisors;
Public Act No. 26-68 224 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(5) [to] To contract for the construction, reconstruction, enlargement
or alteration of airport projects with private persons and firms in
accordance with such terms and conditions as the authority shall
determine;
(6) [to] To make plans and studies in conjunction with the Federal
Aviation Administration or other state or federal agencies;
(7) [to] To apply for and receive grant funds for airport purposes;
(8) [to] To plan and enter into contracts with municipalities, the state,
businesses and other entities to finance the operations and debt of the
airport, including compensation to the host municipalities of New
Haven and East Haven for the use of the land occupied by the airport;
(9) [to] To borrow funds for airport purposes for such consideration
and upon such terms as the authority may determine to be reasonable;
(10) [to] To employ a staff necessary to carry out its functions and
purposes and fix the duties, compensation and benefits of such staff;
(11) [to] To issue and sell bonds and to use the proceeds of such bonds
for capital improvements to the airport and to provide for the financing
of financing projects, and to fund or refund such projects;
(12) [to] To acquire, lease and sell property [by purchase or lease] for
airport purposes, subject to applicable requirements of federal law and
regulation;
(13) To own, operate, lease, assign, pledge, sell or dispose of personal
property of any kind for airport purposes, including, but not limited to,
securities, rights and privileges in contract or at law, insurance, security
and trade fixtures;
(14) To fix, revise from time to time, charge and collect rates, rents,
fees and charges for the use of and services furnished or to be furnished
Public Act No. 26-68 225 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
by a financing project or a portion of a financing project and to enter into
a contract with any person, public or private, concerning such project;
(15) To make loans to any participating corporation for purposes of
providing financing for a financing project in accordance with any
agreement between the authority and such corporation;
(16) To acquire and agree to acquire any federally guaranteed
security and pledge or use such security in a manner that the authority
determines in its best interest to secure or as a source of repayment on
any of its bonds, notes or other obligation or to agree to make a loan to
a participating corporation for purposes of acquiring any federally
guaranteed security;
(17) To enter into any contract or series of contracts that the authority
deems to be necessary or appropriate concerning the bonds, notes or
other obligations of the authority;
[(13) to] (18) To prepare and issue budgets, reports, procedures,
audits and such other materials as may be necessary and desirable to its
purposes; [and]
(19) To accept from any public agency, as defined in section 1-200,
insurance, loans or grants for purposes of a financing project or any
portion of such project and to receive loans, grants or other assistance,
including money, property or services, from any source provided any
such assistance is used only for the purposes which such assistance is
granted;
(20) To invest any funds not needed for immediate use or
disbursement, in reserve funds, federally guaranteed securities or in the
state, including the Short Term Investment Fund created under section
3-27a, Medium-Term Investment Fund created under section 3-28a or
other securities, obligations or investments described in a trust
agreement or resolution providing for the issuance of bond funds;
Public Act No. 26-68 226 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(21) To charge and equitably apportion administrative costs and
expenses incurred by the authority in the exercise of the powers and
duties of the authority among participating corporations; and
[(14) to] (22) To exercise all other powers granted to such an authority
by law.
(b) The authority shall have full control of the operation and
management of the airport, including land, buildings and easements by
means of a lease to the authority by the city of New Haven and the town
of East Haven.
[(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this
section, Runway 2-20 of the airport shall not exceed the existing paved
runway length of five thousand six hundred linear feet.]
(c) The authority may undertake a financing project for two or more
participating corporations jointly and may structure such financing as a
single project or as related components thereof. In such cases, all
provisions of this section and sections 15-120h to 15-120o, inclusive,
shall apply to and for the benefit of the authority and such participating
corporations.
Sec. 170. Section 15-120l of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The board of directors of the authority is authorized from time to
time to issue its bonds, notes and other obligations in such principal
amounts as in the opinion of the board shall be necessary to provide
sufficient funds for carrying out the purposes set forth in sections 15-
120g to 15-120o, inclusive, including the payment, funding or refunding
of the principal of, or interest or redemption premiums on, any bonds,
notes and other obligations issued by it whether the bonds, notes or
other obligations or interest to be funded or refunded have or have not
become due, the establishment of reserves to secure such bonds, notes
Public Act No. 26-68 227 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
and other obligations and all other expenditures of the authority
incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes set
forth in said sections. In anticipation of the sale of such bonds, the
authority may issue negotiable bond anticipation notes and may renew
the same from time to time. Such notes shall be paid from any revenues
of the authority or other moneys available to the authority and not
otherwise pledged, or from the proceeds of the sale of the bonds of the
authority in anticipation of which they were issued. Such notes and any
resolution authorizing such notes may contain any provisions,
conditions or limitations that a resolution authorizing bonds may
contain.
(b) Except as otherwise expressly provided in sections 15-120g to 15-
120o, inclusive, or by the board, every issue of bonds, notes or other
obligations, shall be a general obligation of the authority payable out of
any moneys or revenues of the authority subject only to any agreements
with the holders of particular bonds, notes or other obligations pledging
any particular moneys or revenues, which may be subject to any
applicable agreements with a participating corporation for any bonds
issued on behalf of a participating corporation. Any such bonds, notes
or other obligations may be additionally secured by any grant or
contributions from any department, agency or instrumentality of the
United States or person or a pledge of any moneys, income or revenues
of the authority from any source whatsoever. Bonds issued by the
authority under the provisions of this chapter are securities (1) in which
all public officers and public bodies of the state and the political
subdivisions of the state, insurance companies, state banks and trust
companies, national banking associations, savings banks, savings and
loan associations, investment companies, executors, administrators,
trustees and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds,
and (2) which may properly and legally be deposited with and received
by any state or municipal officer, state agency or political subdivision of
the state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations
Public Act No. 26-68 228 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
of the state is authorized by law.
(c) Any provision of any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any
bonds, notes or other obligations issued by the authority pursuant to
sections 15-120g to 15-120o, inclusive, shall be fully negotiable within
the meaning and for all purposes of title 42a. Any such bonds, notes or
other obligations shall be legal investments for all trust companies,
banks, investment companies, savings banks, building and loan
associations, executors, administrators, guardians, conservators,
trustees and other fiduciaries and pension, profit-sharing and
retirement funds.
(d) Bonds, notes or other obligations of the authority shall be
authorized by resolution of the board of directors of the authority and
may be issued in one or more series and shall bear such date or dates,
mature at such time or times, in the case of any such bond or note, or
any renewal thereof, not exceeding the term of years as the board shall
determine from the date of the original issue of such bond or notes, [and,
in the case of bonds, not exceeding thirty years from the date thereof,]
bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such denomination or
denominations, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such
conversion or registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be
executed in such manner, be payable [from such sources in such
medium of payment] in any lawful money of the United States at such
place or places within or without this state, and be subject to such terms
of redemption, with or without premium, as such resolution or
resolutions may provide.
(e) Bonds, notes or other obligations of the authority may be sold at
public or private sale at such price or prices as the [board] authority shall
determine. The board may by resolution delegate to the chairperson or
vice-chairperson of the board, the executive director or another officer
of the authority the power to fix the date of sale of bonds, to receive bids
or proposals, to award and sell bonds and to take all other necessary
Public Act No. 26-68 229 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
actions to sell and deliver bonds. The exercise of such delegated powers
shall be subject to the approval of the board in accordance with the
provisions of subsection (d) of section 15-120i. The authority may issue
interim receipts or certificates while preparing the definitive bonds and
shall exchange such receipts or certificates for the definitive bonds.
(f) Bonds, notes or other obligations of the authority may be refunded
and renewed from time to time as may be determined by resolution of
the board, provided any such refunding or renewal shall be in
conformity with any rights of the holders thereof.
(g) Bonds, notes or other obligations of the authority issued under the
provisions of sections 15-120g to 15-120o, inclusive, shall not be deemed
to constitute a debt or liability of the state or of any political subdivision
thereof other than the authority or a pledge of the faith and credit of the
state or of any such political subdivision other than the authority, and
shall not constitute bonds or notes issued or guaranteed by the state
within the meaning of section 3-21, but shall be payable solely from the
funds herein provided therefor. All such bonds, notes or other
obligations shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that
neither the state of Connecticut nor any political subdivision thereof
other than the authority shall be obligated to pay the same or the interest
thereof except from revenues or other funds of the authority and that
neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state of
Connecticut or of any political subdivision thereof other than the
authority is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on
such bonds, notes or other obligations. The authority may issue revenue
bonds for the benefit of a participating corporation in accordance with
the provisions of sections 15-120g to 15-120o, inclusive, provided there
is an agreement with the holder of such bonds that in no event shall the
authority be liable for the repayment of such revenue bonds from any
revenue or assets of the authority other than any assets pledged for such
bonds, regardless of whether such assets shall revert to the authority.
Public Act No. 26-68 230 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(h) Any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds, notes or other
obligations may contain provisions, except as expressly limited in
sections 15-120g to 15-120o, inclusive, and except as otherwise limited
by existing agreements with the holders of bonds, notes or other
obligations, that shall be a part of the contract with the holders thereof,
as to the following:
(1) The pledging of the full faith and credit of the authority, the full
faith and credit of any participating corporation, all or any part of the
[moneys received by the authority] revenues of a financing project or
any revenue-producing contract made by the authority with any
participating corporation, any federally guaranteed security and
moneys received therefrom purchased with bond proceeds or all or any
part of any other property, revenues, funds or legally available moneys
to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds,
notes or other obligations or of any issue thereof;
(2) [the] The pledging of all or part of the assets of the authority to
secure the payment of the principal and interest on any bonds, notes or
other obligations or of any issue thereof, including rental fees and other
charges, and the amounts to be raised during each year, and the use and
disposition of the revenues;
(3) [the] The establishment of reserves or sinking funds, the making
of charges and fees to provide for the same, and the regulation and
disposition thereof;
(4) [limitations] Limitations on the purpose to which the proceeds of
sale of bonds, notes or other obligations may be applied and pledging
such proceeds to secure the payment of the bonds, notes or other
obligations, or of any issues thereof;
(5) [limitations] Limitations on the issuance of additional bonds,
notes or other obligations; the terms upon which additional bonds, bond
Public Act No. 26-68 231 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
anticipation notes or other obligations may be issued and secured [;] and
the refunding or purchase of outstanding bonds, notes or other
obligations of the authority;
(6) [the] The procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract
with the holders of any bonds, notes or other obligations of the authority
may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds, notes or other
obligations the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner
in which such consent may be given;
(7) [limitations] Limitations on the amount of moneys derived from
the financing project to be expended [by the authority] for operating,
administrative or other expenses of the authority;
(8) [the] The vesting in a trustee or trustees of such property, rights,
powers and duties in trust as the authority may determine, which may
include any or all of the rights, powers and duties of any trustee
appointed by the holders of any bonds, notes or other obligations and
limiting or abrogating the right of the holders of any bonds, notes or
other obligations of the authority to appoint a trustee under this chapter
or limiting the rights, powers and duties of such trustee;
(9) [provision] Provision for a trust agreement by and between the
authority and a corporate trustee which may be any trust company or
bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state,
which agreement may provide for the pledging or assigning of any
assets or income from assets to which or in which the authority has any
rights or interest, and may further provide for such other rights and
remedies exercisable by the trustee as may be proper for the protection
of the holders of any bonds, notes or other obligations of the authority
and not otherwise in violation of law. Such trust agreement, resolution
providing for the issuance of such bonds or other instrument of the
authority may secure such bonds by a pledge or assignment of any
revenues to be received, any contract or the proceeds of any contract or
Public Act No. 26-68 232 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
any other property, revenues, moneys or funds available to the
authority for such purpose. Such agreement may provide for the
restriction of the rights of any individual holder of bonds, notes or other
obligations of the authority or a financing project. All expenses incurred
in carrying out the provisions of such trust agreement or resolution may
be treated as a part of the cost of operation of the authority or of a
financing project. The trust agreement may contain any further
provisions which are reasonable to delineate further the respective
rights, duties, safeguards, responsibilities and liabilities of the authority;
individual and collective holders of bonds, notes and other obligations
of the authority and the trustees;
(10) [covenants] Covenants to do or refrain from doing such acts and
things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to better
secure any bonds, notes or other obligations of the authority, or which,
in the discretion of the authority, will tend to make any bonds, notes or
other obligations to be issued more marketable notwithstanding that
such covenants, acts or things may not be enumerated [herein] in this
section;
(11) Provisions permitting any participating corporation to enter into
a leasehold mortgage of its leasehold interest in any financing project
and the site thereof or to pledge or assign a loan agreement, conditional
sale agreement, sale agreement or lease for the benefit of the holders of
any bonds issued to finance such financing project; and
[(11) any] (12) Any other matters of like or different character, which
in any way affect the security or protection of the bonds, notes or other
obligations. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this
chapter shall be payable solely from funds provided under the authority
of this chapter and no liability or obligation shall be incurred by the
authority under this section beyond the extent to which moneys have
been provided in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
Public Act No. 26-68 233 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(i) Any pledge made by the authority of income, revenues, or other
property shall be valid and binding from the time the pledge is made,
and shall constitute a pledge within the meaning and for all purposes of
title 42a. The income, revenue, or other property so pledged and
thereafter received by the authority shall immediately be subject to the
lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act,
and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all
parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against
the authority, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof.
(j) The board of directors of the authority [is authorized and
empowered to] may obtain from any department, agency or
instrumentality of the United States any insurance or guarantee as to, or
of or for the payment or repayment of, interest or principal, or both, or
any part thereof, on any bonds, notes or other obligations issued by the
authority pursuant to the provisions of sections 15-120g to 15-120o,
inclusive, and, notwithstanding any other provisions of said sections, to
enter into any agreement, contract or any other instrument whatsoever
with respect to any such insurance or guarantee except to the extent that
such action would in any way impair or interfere with the authority's
ability to perform and fulfill the terms of any agreement made with the
holders of the bonds, bond anticipation notes or other obligations of the
authority.
(k) Neither the members of the board of directors of the authority nor
any person executing bonds, notes or other obligations of the authority
issued pursuant to sections 15-120g to 15-120o, inclusive, shall be liable
personally on such bonds, notes or other obligations or be subject to any
personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof, nor
shall any director or employee of the authority be personally liable for
damage or injury, not wanton, reckless, wilful or malicious, caused in
the performance of his duties and within the scope of his employment
or appointment as such director, officer or employee. The authority shall
Public Act No. 26-68 234 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
protect, save harmless and indemnify its directors, officers or employees
from financial loss and expense, including legal fees and costs, if any,
arising out of any claim, demand, suit or judgment by reason of alleged
negligence or alleged deprivation of any person's civil rights or any
other act or omission resulting in damage or injury, if the director,
officer or employee is found to have been acting in the discharge of his
duties or within the scope of his employment and such act or omission
is found not to have been wanton, reckless, wilful or malicious.
(l) The board of directors of the authority shall have power to
purchase bonds, notes or other obligations of the authority out of any
funds available therefor. The authority may hold, cancel or resell such
bonds, notes or other obligations subject to and in accordance with
agreements with holders of its bonds, notes and other obligations.
(m) All moneys received pursuant to the authority of sections 15-120g
to 15-120o, inclusive, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds or as
revenues, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely
as provided in said sections. Any officer with whom, or any bank or
trust company with which, such moneys shall be deposited shall act as
trustee of such moneys and shall hold and apply the same for the
purposes of sections 15-120g to 15-120o, inclusive, subject to such
regulations as said sections and the resolution authorizing the bonds of
any issue or the trust agreement securing such bonds may provide.
(n) Any holder of bonds, notes or other obligations issued under the
provisions of sections 15-120g to 15-120o, inclusive, and the trustee or
trustees under any trust agreement, except to the extent the rights herein
given may be restricted by any resolution authorizing the issuance of,
or any such trust agreement securing, such bonds, may, either at law or
in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceedings, protect and
enforce any and all rights under the laws of the state or granted
hereunder or under such resolution or trust agreement, and may enforce
and compel the performance of all duties required by said sections or by
Public Act No. 26-68 235 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
such resolution or trust agreement to be performed by the authority or
by any officer, employee or agent thereof, including the fixing, charging
and collecting of the rates, rents, fees and charges herein authorized and
required by the provisions of such resolution or trust agreement to be
fixed, established and collected.
(o) The authority may make representations and agreements for the
benefit of the holders of any bonds, notes or other obligations of the state
which are necessary or appropriate to ensure the exclusion from gross
income for federal income tax purposes of interest on bonds, notes or
other obligations of the state from taxation under the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986 or any subsequent corresponding internal revenue code of
the United States, as from time to time amended, including agreement
to pay rebates to the federal government of investment earnings derived
from the investment of the proceeds of the bonds, notes or other
obligations of the authority. Any such agreement may include: (1) A
covenant to pay rebates to the federal government of investment
earnings derived from the investment of the proceeds of the bonds,
notes or other obligations of the authority, (2) a covenant that the
authority will not limit or alter its rebate obligations until its obligations
to the holders or owners of such bonds, notes or other obligations are
finally met and discharged, and (3) provisions to (A) establish trust and
other accounts which may be appropriate to carry out such
representations and agreements, (B) retain fiscal agents as depositories
for such fund and accounts and (C) provide that such fiscal agents may
act as trustee of such funds and accounts.
(p) Authority rates, rents, fees and charges shall be fixed and adjusted
considering the aggregate of rates, rents, fees and charges from such
financing project in order to provide funds sufficient with other
revenues or moneys available therefor, if any, to (1) pay the cost of
maintaining, repairing and operating the financing project and each and
every portion thereof, to the extent that the payment of such cost has not
Public Act No. 26-68 236 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
otherwise been adequately provided for, (2) pay the principal of and the
interest on outstanding bonds of the authority issued for such financing
project as the same shall become due and payable, and (3) create and
maintain reserves required or provided for in any resolution
authorizing, or trust agreement securing, such bonds of the authority.
Such rates, rents, fees and charges shall not be subject to supervision or
regulation by any department, commission, board, body, bureau or
agency of this state other than the authority.
(q) A sufficient amount of the revenues derived in respect of a
financing project, except such part of such revenues as may be necessary
to pay the cost of maintenance, repair and operation and to provide
reserves and for renewals, replacements, extensions, enlargements and
improvements as may be provided for in the resolution authorizing the
issuance of any bonds of the authority or in the trust agreement securing
the same, shall be set aside at such regular intervals as may be provided
in such resolution or trust agreement in a sinking or other similar fund
which is hereby pledged to, and charged with, the payment of the
principal of and the interest on such bonds as the same shall become
due, and the redemption price or the purchase price of bonds retired by
call or purchase as therein provided. Such pledge shall be valid and
binding from the time when the pledge is made and the rates, rents, fees
and charges and other revenues or other moneys so pledged and
thereafter received by the authority shall immediately be subject to the
lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act,
and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all
parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against
the authority, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof.
Notwithstanding any provision of the Uniform Commercial Code,
neither the resolution, any trust agreement, other agreement nor any
lease by which a pledge is created needs to be filed or recorded except
in the records of the authority. The use and disposition of moneys to the
credit of such sinking or other similar fund shall be subject to the
Public Act No. 26-68 237 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or
of such trust agreement. Unless otherwise provided in such resolution
or such trust agreement, such resolution or trust agreement may permit
the issuance of bonds having a subordinate lien in respect of the security
authorized in this section to other bonds of the authority, and, in such
case, the authority may create separate sinking or other similar funds in
respect of such subordinate lien bonds.
(r) The authority may issue bonds, notes or other obligations under
this section (1) the interest on which may be includable in the gross
income of the holder or holders thereof under the Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, or any subsequent corresponding internal revenue code of the
United States, as amended from time to time, and (2) that may be eligible
for tax credits or exemptions or payments from the federal government,
or any other desired federal income tax treatment of such bonds, notes
or other obligations. Any such bonds, notes or other obligations may be
issued only upon a finding by the authority that such issuance is
necessary, is in the public interest, and is in furtherance of the purposes
and powers of the authority. The state hereby consents to such inclusion
only for the bonds, notes or other obligations of the authority so
authorized.
(s) The authority may provide for the issuance of bonds of the
authority for the purpose of refunding any bonds of the authority then
outstanding, including the payment of any redemption premium
thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the earliest or
subsequent date of redemption, purchase or maturity of such bonds.
The proceeds of any such bonds issued for the purpose of refunding
outstanding bonds may, in the discretion of the authority, be applied to
the purchase or retirement at maturity or redemption of such
outstanding bonds either on their earliest or any subsequent redemption
date or upon the purchase or at the maturity thereof and may, pending
such application, be placed in escrow to be applied to such purchase or
Public Act No. 26-68 238 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
retirement at maturity or redemption on such date as may be
determined by the authority. Any such escrowed proceeds, pending
such use, may be invested and reinvested in federally guaranteed
securities and certificates of deposit or time deposits secured by direct
obligations of, or obligations unconditionally guaranteed by, the United
States, or obligations of a state, a territory, or a possession of the United
States, or any political subdivision of such state, territory or possession,
or of the District of Columbia, within the meaning of Section 103(a) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or any subsequent corresponding
internal revenue code of the United States, as amended from time to
time, the full and timely payment of the principal of and interest on
which are secured by an irrevocable deposit of federally guaranteed
securities, maturing at such time or times as shall be appropriate to
assure the prompt payment, as to principal, interest and redemption
premium, if any, of the outstanding bonds to be so refunded. The
interest, income and profits, if any, earned or realized on any such
investment may also be applied to the payment of the outstanding
bonds to be so refunded.
(t) The authority may contract with the holders of any of its bonds or
notes for the custody, collection, securing, investment and payment of
any reserve funds of the authority, or of any moneys held in trust or
otherwise for the payment of bonds or notes, and to carry out such
contracts. Any officer with whom, or any bank or trust company with
which, such moneys are deposited as trustee thereof shall hold, invest,
reinvest and apply such moneys for the purposes thereof, subject to such
provisions as this chapter and the resolution authorizing the issue of the
bonds or notes or the trust agreement securing such bonds or notes may
provide.
Sec. 171. Section 15-120m of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
The exercise of the powers granted by sections 15-120g to 15-120o,
Public Act No. 26-68 239 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
inclusive, constitute the performance of an essential governmental
function and the authority shall not be required to pay any taxes or
assessments upon or in respect of [the] any airport project, levied by any
municipality or political subdivision or special district having taxing
powers of the state and [the] any airport project and the principal and
interest of any bonds and notes issued under the provisions of said
sections, their transfer and the income therefrom, including revenues
derived from the sale thereof, shall at all times be free from taxation of
every kind by the state of Connecticut or under its authority, except for
estate or succession taxes.
Sec. 172. Subsection (a) of section 15-120o of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(a) Within the first ninety days of each fiscal year of the authority, the
board of directors of the authority shall submit a report to the Governor,
the Auditors of Public Accounts and the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to finance,
revenue and bonding. Such report shall include, but not be limited to,
the following: (1) A list of all bonds issued during the preceding fiscal
year, including, for each such issue, the financial advisor and
underwriters, whether the issue was competitive, negotiated or
privately placed, and the issue's face value and net proceeds; (2) a
description of [the] any airport project, its location, and the amount of
funds, if any, provided by the authority with respect to the construction
of [the] any such airport project; (3) a list of all outside individuals and
firms receiving in excess of five thousand dollars in the form of loans,
grants or payments for services; (4) an annual comprehensive financial
report prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles for governmental enterprises; (5) the cumulative value of all
bonds issued, the value of outstanding bonds, and the amount of the
state's contingent liability; (6) the affirmative action policy statement, a
Public Act No. 26-68 240 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
description of the composition of the work force of the authority by race,
sex and occupation and a description of the affirmative action efforts of
the authority; and (7) a description of planned activities for the current
fiscal year.
Sec. 173. Section 32-75d of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) There is established an airport development zone, which is
comprised of the following census blocks as assigned on October 1, 2011,
in the towns of Windsor Locks, Suffield, East Granby and Windsor:
090034701001022, 090034701003000, 090034701003001,
090034701003002, 090034701003003, 090034701003004,
090034701003005, 090034701003017, 090034701003018,
090034701003019, 090034701003020, 090034701003021,
090034701003025, 090034701003026, 090034735022009,
090034735022010, 090034735022011, 090034735022012,
090034735022013, 090034735025004, 090034735027000,
090034735029000, 090034735029001, 090034735029002,
090034735029003, 090034735029004, 090034735029006,
090034761009000, 090034761009010, 090034761009011,
090034761009012, 090034761009013, 090034762001023,
090034762001025, 090034762002009, 090034762002013,
090034763003004, 090034763009000, 090034763009001,
090034763009002, 090034763009003, 090034763009004,
090034763009005, 090034763009006, 090034763009007,
090034763009008, 090034763009009, 090034763009010,
090034763009011, 090034763009012, 090034763009013,
090034763009014, 090034763009015, 090034763009016,
090034763009017, 090034763009018, 090034763009020,
090034763009021, 090034763009022, 090034763009023,
090034763009024, 090034763009025, 090034763009026,
090034763009031, 090034763009033, 090034771014005,
090034771014011, 090034771014012, 090034771014013,
090034771014014, 090034771014017, 090034771014018,
090034771014019, 090034771014020, 090034771023025,
090034771023026, 090034771023027, 090034771023036,
090034701003006, 090034701003022, 090034701003023,
Public Act No. 26-68 241 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
090034701005000, 090034761001039, 090034763009028.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section,
the Commissioner of Economic and Community Development may
establish additional airport development zones surrounding any of the
general aviation airports, as defined in section 15-120aa, or any other
airport within the duty, power and authority of the Connecticut Airport
Authority, as defined in section 15-120cc, upon receipt from one or more
interested municipalities of a proposal recommending the
establishment of such a zone.
(1) The commissioner shall consider any such proposal if the
commissioner determines that the economic development benefits of
establishing a new airport development zone outweigh the anticipated
costs to the state and the affected municipalities. Any such proposal
shall comply with the state plan of conservation and development
adopted pursuant to chapter 297.
(2) A proposal submitted to the commissioner shall include, but not
be limited to, an identification of:
(A) The geographical scope of such proposed zone, including
designation of all census blocks that are proposed to be incorporated
into such zone, provided (i) each zone shall be in accordance with the
applicable general aviation airport or other airport's master plan, and
(ii) no zone shall extend beyond a two-mile radius of the applicable
general aviation airport or other airport without approval of the General
Assembly;
(B) The economic development benefits anticipated from the
establishment of such zone, including the nature of business and
industry that will be developed and the anticipated number of jobs
created; and
Public Act No. 26-68 242 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(C) The anticipated costs of establishing such zone.
(3) The commissioner may modify the geographic scope of the
proposed zone to improve, within the commissioner's discretion, the
balance between the anticipated economic benefit and the cost to the
state and affected municipalities.
(4) The commissioner may approve the establishment of a new
airport development zone.
(5) An airport development zone established pursuant to this
subsection shall not include the land on which any general aviation
airport or other airport operates, including any state-owned or
controlled land.
(c) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this
section, the Commissioner of Economic and Community Development
shall establish an airport development zone surrounding Tweed New
Haven Airport upon a proposal submitted by the town of East Haven
or the city of New Haven or jointly by both said town and city.
(2) Any such proposal shall comply with the state plan of
conservation and development adopted pursuant to chapter 297 and
shall include, but need not be limited to, an identification of:
(A) The geographical scope of such proposed zone, including
designation of all census blocks that are proposed to be incorporated
into such zone, provided such zone shall be in accordance with the
master plan of Tweed New Haven Airport and shall not extend beyond
a two-mile radius of said airport without approval of the General
Assembly;
(B) The economic development benefits anticipated from the
establishment of such zone, including the nature of business and
industry that will be developed and the anticipated number of jobs
Public Act No. 26-68 243 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
created; and
(C) The anticipated costs of establishing such zone.
(3) The commissioner may modify the geographic scope of the
proposed zone to improve, within the commissioner's discretion, the
balance between the anticipated economic benefit and the cost to the
state and affected municipalities.
(4) An airport development zone established pursuant to this
subsection shall not include the land on which the Tweed New Haven
Airport operates, including any state-owned or controlled land.
Sec. 174. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding the
provisions of chapter 204 of the general statutes, a municipality may, by
vote of its legislative body, (1) abate all or a portion of the total amount
of interest on any delinquent real property taxes owed to the
municipality by a common interest community, as defined in section 47-
202 of the general statutes, that is composed of more than five hundred
units, or (2) refund all or a portion of the total amount of such interest
paid on such taxes by such community, provided to be eligible for such
abatement or such refund pursuant to this section, such community
shall be in receivership pursuant to an order of the Superior Court.
(b) A municipal water pollution control authority may, by vote of the
authority, (1) abate all or a portion of the total amount of interest on any
delinquent sewerage system use charge owed to the municipality by a
common interest community, as defined in section 47-202 of the general
statutes, that is composed of more than five hundred units, or (2) refund
all or a portion of the total amount of such interest paid on any such use
charge by such community, provided to be eligible for such abatement
or such refund pursuant to this section, such community shall be in
receivership pursuant to an order of the Superior Court.
Sec. 175. Subdivision (3) of subsection (f) of section 4-66l of the 2026
Public Act No. 26-68 244 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(3) For the fiscal [year] years ending June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027,
the amount of the grant payable to a municipality in accordance with
subsection (d) of this section shall not be reduced in the case of a
municipality whose adopted budget expenditures exceed the cap set
forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
Sec. 176. Subsection (b) of section 4b-3 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(b) The [chairman] chairperson of the board shall be compensated
[two] three hundred dollars per diem up to a maximum of [thirty] forty-
five thousand dollars annually. Other members of the board shall be
compensated [two] three hundred dollars per diem up to a maximum
of [twenty-five] forty thousand dollars annually. The members of the
board shall choose their own [chairman] chairperson. No person shall
serve on [this] the board who holds another elected or paid state or
municipal governmental position and no person on the board shall be
directly involved in any enterprise which does business with the state
or directly or indirectly involved in any enterprise concerned with real
estate acquisition or development.
Sec. 177. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) No board or commission in the
executive branch which compensates its members on a per diem basis
shall establish a meeting schedule for any fiscal year that would cause
such board or commission to expend funds on per diem reimbursement
of its members in excess of the amount appropriated to such board or
commission for such purpose during such fiscal year, unless the board
or commission obtains prior approval of such schedule, in writing, by
the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management.
Public Act No. 26-68 245 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 178. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 12-142 of the general statutes, title 7 or 10 of the general statutes,
chapters 170 and 204 of the general statutes, any special act, any
municipal charter or any home rule ordinance, if a municipality or
regional board of education has adopted a budget or levied taxes for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, prior to the adoption of the state budget
for said fiscal year and such municipality or regional board of education
receives, pursuant to such adopted state budget, an amount of state aid
more than the amount projected in the municipality's or regional board
of education's adopted budget, such (1) municipality, by vote of its
legislative body or, in a municipality where the legislative body is a
town meeting, by vote of the board of selectmen, or (2) regional board
of education, may (A) amend its budget, and (B) not later than July 1,
2026, adjust the tax levy and the amount of any remaining installments
of such taxes. The amendment to such budget shall be in an amount not
exceeding the increase in state aid to the municipality or regional board
of education.
Sec. 179. Section 18 of public act 25-173 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
The Office of Consumer Counsel, in consultation with the Public
Utilities Regulatory Authority and the Commissioner of Energy and
Environmental Protection, shall prepare a report that describes the line
items included in the charges known as the "combined public benefits
charges" on a bill to any end use customer of an electric distribution
company, as defined in section 16-1 of the general statutes, as amended
by [this act] public act 25-173. Such report shall include, but need not be
limited to, an examination of the enabling authority for the imposition
of any such line item, and the purpose, costs and benefits associated
with any such line item. Not later than [October 1, 2026] January 15,
2027, the Consumer Counsel shall submit a report, in accordance with
the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint
Public Act No. 26-68 246 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to energy and technology.
Sec. 180. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 13b-268 of the general statutes or any other provision of the
general statutes, special act or regulation that prohibits the construction
of any new highway railroad crossing at grade, the Department of
Transportation shall allow the town of Newtown or its authority or
agent to construct an at-grade pedestrian crossing on the Housatonic
Railroad as part of the Housatonic Valley Rail Trail Railroad, provided
such at-grade pedestrian crossing is approved by the legislative body of
the town of Newtown and the Housatonic Railroad and constructed in
accordance with the department's recommendations.
Sec. 181. Section 5-198 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
The offices and positions filled by the following-described
incumbents shall be exempt from the classified service:
(1) All officers and employees of the Judicial Department;
(2) All officers and employees of the Legislative Department;
(3) All officers elected by popular vote;
(4) All agency heads, members of boards and commissions and other
officers appointed by the Governor;
(5) All persons designated by name in any special act to hold any state
office;
(6) All officers, noncommissioned officers and enlisted men in the
military or naval service of the state and under military or naval
discipline and control;
Public Act No. 26-68 247 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(7) (A) All correctional wardens, as provided in section 18-82, and (B)
all superintendents of state institutions, the State Librarian, the
president of The University of Connecticut and any other commissioner
or administrative head of a state department or institution who is
appointed by a board or commission responsible by statute for the
administration of such department or institution;
(8) The State Historian appointed by the State Library Board;
(9) Deputies to the administrative head of each department or
institution designated by statute to act for and perform all of the duties
of such administrative head during such administrative head's absence
or incapacity;
(10) Executive assistants to each state elective officer and each
department head, as defined in section 4-5, provided (A) each position
of executive assistant shall have been created in accordance with section
5-214, and (B) in no event shall the Commissioner of Administrative
Services or the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management
approve more than four executive assistants for a department head and,
for any department with two or more deputies, more than two executive
assistants for each such deputy;
(11) One personal secretary to the administrative head and to each
undersecretary or deputy to such head of each department or
institution;
(12) All members of the professional and technical staffs of the
constituent units of the state system of higher education, as defined in
section 10a-1, of all other state institutions of learning, of the Board of
Regents for Higher Education, and of the agricultural experiment
station at New Haven, professional and managerial employees of the
Department of Education and the Office of Early Childhood, teachers
and administrators employed by the Technical Education and Career
Public Act No. 26-68 248 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
System and teachers certified by the State Board of Education and
employed in teaching positions at state institutions;
(13) Physicians, dentists, student nurses in institutions and other
professional specialists who are employed on a part-time basis;
(14) Persons employed to make or conduct a special inquiry,
investigation, examination or installation;
(15) Students in educational institutions who are employed on a part-
time basis;
(16) Forest fire wardens provided for by section 23-36;
(17) Patients or inmates of state institutions who receive
compensation for services rendered therein;
(18) Employees of the Governor including employees working at the
executive office, official executive residence at 990 Prospect Avenue,
Hartford and the Washington D.C. office;
(19) Persons filling positions expressly exempted by statute from the
classified service;
(20) Librarians employed by the State Board of Education or any
constituent unit of the state system of higher education;
(21) All officers and employees of the Division of Criminal Justice;
(22) Professional employees in the education professions bargaining
unit of the Department of Aging and Disability Services;
(23) Lieutenant colonels in the Division of State Police within the
Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection;
(24) The Deputy State Fire Marshal within the Department of
Administrative Services;
Public Act No. 26-68 249 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(25) The chief administrative officer of the Workers' Compensation
Commission;
(26) Employees in the education professions bargaining unit;
(27) Disability policy specialists employed by the Council on
Developmental Disabilities;
(28) The director for digital media and motion picture activities in the
Department of Economic and Community Development; and
(29) Any Director of Communications 1, Director of Communications
1 (Rc), Director of Communications 2, Director of Communications 2
(Rc), Legislative Program Manager, Communications and Legislative
Program Manager, Director of Legislation, Regulation and
Communication, Legislative and Administrative Advisor 1, [or]
Legislative and Administrative Advisor 2, Agency Legal Director,
Energy and Environmental Protection Office Director (Legal) or First
Assistant Commissioner of Revenue Services, as such positions are
classified within the Executive Department.
Sec. 182. Section 5-207a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) For purposes of this section, "state agency" has the same meaning
as provided in section 1-79. For each position of employment with the
state of Connecticut that involves exposure to federal tax information,
the [employing] state agency with custody of the federal tax information
and, in the case [where the Department of Administrative Services is the
provider of human resources services for such employing agency] of an
executive branch state agency, the Department of Administrative
Services, shall, subject to the provisions of section 31-51i, require each
applicant for, each employee applying for transfer to, and, at least every
five years, [or more often if required by the United States Department
of the Treasury,] each current employee of such a position, to (1) state in
Public Act No. 26-68 250 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
writing whether such applicant or employee has been convicted of a
crime or whether criminal charges are pending against such applicant
or employee at the time of application for employment or transfer and,
if so, to identify the charges and court in which such charges are
pending, and (2) be fingerprinted and submit to state and national
criminal history records checks. The criminal history records checks
required by this section shall be conducted in accordance with section
29-17a. Each employee who has access to federal tax information shall
be subject to such criminal history records check at least every five years.
(b) If a contractor or subcontractor has a contract with [an] a state
agency to perform work for the state agency that entails such contractor
or subcontractor or any employee thereof to access federal tax
information, such contractor or subcontractor and any such employee
shall be subject to the requirements of subdivisions (1) and (2) of
subsection (a) of this section prior to commencing such work and [as
often thereafter as required by subsection (a) of this section] at least
every five years thereafter.
Sec. 183. Section 19a-502 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Any person establishing, conducting, managing or operating any
institution without the license required under the provisions of [sections
19a-490 to 19a-503, inclusive, or owning real property or improvements
upon or within which such an institution is established, conducted,
managed or operated,] this chapter or without the certificate required
under the provisions of section [19a-491, shall be fined not more than
one hundred dollars for each offense, and each day of a continuing
violation after conviction shall be considered a separate offense] 19a-561
shall be guilty of a class D felony and fined not more than five thousand
dollars for each day of continuing action in violation of this chapter or
section 19a-561.
Public Act No. 26-68 251 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(b) Any person owning real property or improvements upon or
within which an institution is established, conducted, managed or
operated without the license required under this chapter or without the
certificate required under section 19a-561 shall be fined not more than
one hundred dollars for each offense and each day of a continuing
violation after conviction shall be considered a separate offense.
(c) The penalty provisions of this [subsection] section shall not apply
to (1) any financial institution regulated by any state or federal agency
or body, which financial institution has succeeded to the title of the
premises by mortgage foreclosure and the operator, if any, continues to
occupy such property, or (2) an institution that applied for license
renewal within sixty days of the lapsing of its license, even if the license
renewal application was incomplete at the time of application.
[(b)] (d) If any person conducting, managing or operating any
nursing home facility, as defined in section 19a-521, or residential care
home, as defined in section 19a-521, fails to maintain or make available
the financial information, data or records required under subsection (d)
of section 19a-498, such person's license as a nursing home facility or
residential care home administrator may be revoked or suspended in
accordance with section 19a-517 or the license of such nursing home
facility or residential care home may be revoked or suspended in the
manner provided in section 19a-494, or both.
Sec. 184. Section 19a-503 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Notwithstanding the existence or pursuit of any other remedy, the
Department of Public Health may, in the manner provided by law and
upon the advice of the Attorney General, conduct an investigation and
maintain an action in the name of the state for injunction or other
process against any person or governmental unit to restrain or prevent
the establishment, conduct, management or operation of an institution
Public Act No. 26-68 252 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
or nursing facility management services, without a license or certificate
under this chapter.
(b) The commissioner may, after a hearing held in accordance with
chapter 54, impose a civil penalty on any person establishing,
conducting, managing or operating any institution without the license
required under this chapter or without the certificate required under
section 19a-561. The amount of any such civil penalty shall not exceed
twenty-five thousand dollars for each day such person is in violation of
this chapter or section 19a-561.
Sec. 185. Section 19a-11 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
Any board or commission listed in subsection (b) of section 19a-14 or
the Department of Public Health, with respect to professions under its
jurisdiction that have no board or commission, may, in its discretion,
issue [an appropriate] a summary order to any person found to be
violating an applicable statute or regulation, providing for the
immediate discontinuance of the violation that poses an imminent risk
to public health, safety or welfare, pending proceedings to determine
whether to issue a cease and desist order. Such board or commission or
the department, with respect to professions under its jurisdiction that
have no board or commission, may, after a hearing held in accordance
with chapter 54, impose a civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five
thousand dollars on a person who provides professional services under
the department's jurisdiction without a license or certificate issued by
the department. For the purposes of this section, each day of the
provision of any such services shall be grounds for such a penalty. The
board or commission may, through the Attorney General, petition the
superior court for the judicial district wherein the violation occurred, or
wherein the person committing the violation resides or transacts
business, for the enforcement of any order issued by it and for
appropriate temporary relief or a restraining order. Such board or
Public Act No. 26-68 253 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
commission shall certify and file in such court a transcript of the entire
record of the hearing or hearings, including all testimony upon which
such order was made and the findings and orders made by such board
or commission. The court may grant such relief by injunction or
otherwise, including temporary relief, as it deems equitable and may
make and enter a decree enforcing, modifying and enforcing as so
modified, or setting aside, in whole or in part, any order of the board or
commission.
Sec. 186. (NEW) (Effective from passage) The Commissioner of Public
Health may appoint a willing licensed embalmer, as defined in section
20-207 of the general statutes, to dispose of an abandoned dead human
body or the abandoned cremated remains of a dead human body. An
appointed embalmer may request any records necessary to identify
such dead human body or cremated remains. The appointed embalmer
shall notify the commissioner, in a form and manner prescribed by the
commissioner, of the date and time of disposition of any such dead
human body or cremated remains and the method of such disposition
not later than seven days after such disposition. A dead human body or
cremated remains of a dead human body shall be deemed to be
abandoned, for the purposes of this section, when a licensed or formerly
licensed funeral director or embalmer voluntarily or improperly
relinquishes custody of such human body or cremated remains in
violation of the requirements of state law, including, but not limited to,
when a funeral director or embalmer ceases to operate a funeral home
and fails to arrange for the transfer or disposition of such dead human
body or cremated remains in the funeral director or embalmer's
possession prior to ceasing operations.
Sec. 187. Subsections (c) and (d) of section 7-51a of the general statutes
are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
from passage):
(c) [For deaths occurring on or after July 1, 1997, the] The Social
Public Act No. 26-68 254 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Security number recorded on the death certificate of the deceased
person shall be [recorded in the "administrative purposes" section of the
death certificate. Such administrative purposes section, and the Social
Security number contained therein, shall be] restricted and disclosed
only to the following eligible parties: (1) All parties specified on the
death certificate, including the informant, licensed funeral director,
licensed embalmer, conservator, surviving spouse, physician or
advanced practice registered nurse and town clerk, for the purpose of
processing the certificate, (2) the surviving spouse, (3) the next of kin, or
(4) any state and federal agencies authorized by federal law to receive
the Social Security number. The department shall provide any other
individual, researcher or state or federal agency requesting a certified or
uncertified copy of a death certificate, [or the information contained
within such certificate, for a death occurring on or after July 1, 1997, such
certificate or information. The] in accordance with the provisions of this
section, such copy with the decedent's Social Security number [shall be]
removed or redacted. [from such certificate or information or the
administrative purposes section shall be omitted from such certificate.]
(d) The department shall provide, as electronic data, the information
contained within a certified copy of a death certificate to any individual,
researcher or state or federal agency upon request. The decedent's Social
Security number shall be removed, redacted or omitted from such data
unless the requester is a state or federal agency authorized by federal
law to receive the Social Security number.
[(d)] (e) The registrar of vital statistics of any town or city in this state
that has access to an electronic vital records system, as authorized by the
department, may use such system to issue certified copies of birth,
death, fetal death or marriage certificates that are electronically filed in
such system.
Sec. 188. Subsection (a) of section 19a-537 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
Public Act No. 26-68 255 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
passage):
(a) As used in this section and section 19a-537a:
(1) "Vacancy" means a bed that is available for an admission;
(2) "Nursing home" means any chronic and convalescent facility or
any rest home with nursing supervision, as defined in section 19a-521;
(3) "Hospital" means a general short-term hospital licensed by the
Department of Public Health or a hospital for [mental illness]
psychiatric disabilities, as defined in section 17a-495, or a chronic
disease hospital.
Sec. 189. Section 19a-36g of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
As used in this section, [and] sections 19a-36b, 19a-36h to 19a-36o,
inclusive, and section 19a-36r:
(1) "Catering food service establishment" means a business that is
involved in the (A) sale or distribution of food and drink prepared in
bulk in one geographic location for retail service in individual portions
in another location, or (B) preparation and service of food in a public or
private venue that is not under the ownership or control of the operator
of such business;
(2) "Certified food protection manager" means a food employee that
has supervisory and management responsibility and the authority to
direct and control food preparation and service;
(3) "Class 1 food establishment" means a retail food establishment
that does not serve a population that is highly susceptible to food borne
illnesses and only offers (A) commercially packaged food in its original
commercial package that is time or temperature controlled for safety, or
(B) commercially prepackaged, precooked food that is time or
Public Act No. 26-68 256 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
temperature controlled for safety and heated, hot held and served in its
original commercial package not later than four hours after heating, or
(C) food prepared in the establishment that is not time or temperature
controlled for safety;
(4) "Class 2 food establishment" means a retail food establishment
that does not serve a population that is highly susceptible to food-borne
illnesses and offers a limited menu of food that is prepared or cooked
and served immediately, or that prepares or cooks food that is time or
temperature controlled for safety and may require hot or cold holding,
but that does not involve cooling;
(5) "Class 3 food establishment" means a retail food establishment
that (A) does not serve a population that is highly susceptible to food-
borne illnesses, and (B) offers food that is time or temperature controlled
for safety and requires complex preparation, including, but not limited
to, handling of raw ingredients, cooking, cooling and reheating for hot
holding;
(6) "Class 4 food establishment" means a retail food establishment
that serves a population that is highly susceptible to food-borne
illnesses, including, but not limited to, preschool students, hospital
patients and nursing home patients or residents, or that conducts
specialized food processes, including, but not limited to, smoking,
curing or reduced oxygen packaging for the purposes of extending the
shelf life of the food;
(7) "Cold holding" means maintained at a temperature of forty-one
degrees Fahrenheit or below;
(8) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Public Health or the
commissioner's designee;
(9) "Contact hour" means a minimum of fifty minutes of a training
activity;
Public Act No. 26-68 257 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(10) "Department" means the Department of Public Health;
(11) "Director of health" means the director of a local health
department or district health department appointed pursuant to section
19a-200 or 19a-242;
(12) "Food code" means the food code administered under section
19a-36h;
(13) "Food establishment" means an operation that (A) stores,
prepares, packages, serves, vends directly to the consumer or otherwise
provides food for human consumption, including, but not limited to, a
restaurant, catering food service establishment, food service
establishment, temporary food service establishment, itinerant food
vending establishment, market, conveyance used to transport people,
institution or food bank, or (B) relinquishes possession of food to a
consumer directly, or indirectly through a delivery service, including,
but not limited to, home delivery of grocery orders or restaurant takeout
orders or a delivery service that is provided by common carriers. "Food
establishment" does not include a vending machine, as defined in
section 21a-34, a private residential dwelling in which food is prepared
under section 21a-62a or a food manufacturing establishment, as
defined in section 21a-151;
(14) "Food inspector" means a director of health, or his or her
authorized agent, or a registered environmental health specialist who
has been certified as a food inspector by the commissioner;
(15) "Food inspection training officer" means a certified food
inspector who has received training developed or approved by the
commissioner and been authorized by the commissioner to train
candidates for food inspector certification;
(16) "Food-borne illness" means illness, including, but not limited to,
illness due to heavy metal intoxications, staphylococcal food poisoning,
Public Act No. 26-68 258 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
botulism, salmonellosis, shigellosis, Clostridium perfringens
intoxication and hepatitis A, acquired through the ingestion of a
common-source food or water contaminated with a chemical, infectious
agent or the toxic products of a chemical or infectious agent;
(17) "Food-borne outbreak" means illness, including, but not limited
to, illness due to heavy metal intoxications, staphylococcal food
poisoning, botulism, salmonellosis, shigellosis, Clostridium perfringens
intoxication and hepatitis A, in two or more individuals, acquired
through the ingestion of common-source food or water contaminated
with a chemical, infectious agent or the toxic products of a chemical or
infectious agent;
(18) "Hot holding" means maintained at a temperature of one
hundred thirty-five degrees Fahrenheit or above;
(19) "Itinerant food vending establishment" means a vehicle-
mounted, self-contained, mobile food establishment;
(20) "Permit" means a written document issued by a director of health
that authorizes a person to operate a food establishment;
(21) "Temporary food service establishment" means a food
establishment that operates for a period of not more than fourteen
consecutive days in conjunction with a single event or celebration;
(22) "Time or temperature controlled for safety" means maintained at
a certain temperature or maintained for a certain length of time, or both,
to prevent microbial growth and toxin production; and
(23) "Variance" means a written document issued by the
commissioner that authorizes a modification or waiver of one or more
requirements of the food code.
Sec. 190. Subsection (b) of section 19a-36h of the 2026 supplement to
Public Act No. 26-68 259 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(b) The commissioner may adopt regulations, in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54, to implement the provisions of this section,
[and] sections 19a-36i to 19a-36m, inclusive, and section 19a-36r.
Sec. 191. Section 19a-36b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) Any person who serves meals to individuals at registered
congregate meal sites funded under Title III of the Older Americans Act
of 1965, as amended from time to time, which were prepared under the
supervision of a [qualified food operator] certified food protection
manager, shall be exempt from the examination requirement for
[qualified food operators] certified food protection managers.
(b) Any volunteer who serves meals for a nonprofit organization shall
be exempt from the examination requirement for [qualified food
operators] certified food protection managers.
(c) The Commissioner of Public Health, in conjunction with the
Commissioner of Social Services, shall adopt regulations in accordance
with the provisions of chapter 54 to establish training procedures for
persons exempt from the examination requirement for [qualified food
operators] certified food protection managers under the provisions of
subsections (a) and (b) of this section.
Sec. 192. Section 19a-580h of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Medical order for life-sustaining treatment" means a [written
medical order] specific set of written medical orders developed by the
Public Act No. 26-68 260 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Department of Public Health specific to the program established in
accordance with the provisions of this section and made by a physician,
advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant to effectuate a
patient's request for life-sustaining treatment when the patient has been
determined by a physician, physician assistant or advanced practice
registered nurse to be approaching the end stage of a serious, life-
limiting illness or is in a condition of advanced, chronic progressive
frailty;
(2) "Health care provider" means any person, corporation, limited
liability company, facility or institution operated, owned or licensed by
this state to provide health care or professional medical services; and
(3) "Legally authorized representative" means a minor patient's
parent, guardian appointed by the Probate Court or a health care
representative appointed in accordance with sections 19a-576 and 19a-
577.
(b) The Commissioner of Public Health shall establish a state-wide
program to implement the use of medical orders for life-sustaining
treatment by health care providers. Patient participation in the program
shall be voluntary. An agreement to participate in the program shall be
documented by the signature of the patient or the patient's legally
authorized representative on the medical order for life-sustaining
treatment form.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 19a-495 and 19a-580d
and the regulations adopted thereunder, the Commissioner of Public
Health shall adopt regulations, in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 54, for the program established in accordance with this section
to ensure that: (1) Medical orders for life-sustaining treatment are
transferrable among, and recognized by, various types of health care
institutions subject to any limitations set forth in federal law; (2) any
procedures and forms developed for recording medical orders for life-
Public Act No. 26-68 261 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
sustaining treatment require the signature of the patient or the patient's
legally authorized representative on the medical order for life-
sustaining treatment and the patient or the patient's legally authorized
representative is given [the original order immediately after signing
such] a copy of or access to the order and a copy of such order is
immediately placed in the patient's medical record; (3) prior to
requesting the signature of the patient or the patient's legally authorized
representative on such order, the physician, advanced practice
registered nurse or physician assistant writing the medical order
discusses with the patient or the patient's legally authorized
representative the patient's goals for care and treatment and the benefits
and risks of various methods for documenting the patient's wishes for
end-of-life treatment, including medical orders for life-sustaining
treatment; and (4) each physician, advanced practice registered nurse or
physician assistant that intends to write a medical order for life-
sustaining treatment receives training concerning: (A) The importance
of talking with patients about their personal treatment goals; (B)
methods for presenting choices for end-of-life care that elicit
information concerning patients' preferences and respects those
preferences without directing patients toward a particular option for
end-of-life care; (C) the importance of fully informing patients about the
benefits and risks of an immediately effective medical order for life-
sustaining treatment; (D) awareness of factors that may affect the use of
medical orders for life-sustaining treatment, including, but not limited
to, advanced health care directives, race, ethnicity, age, gender,
socioeconomic position, immigrant status, sexual minority status,
language, disability, homelessness, mental illness and geographic area
of residence; and (E) procedures for properly completing and
effectuating medical orders for life-sustaining treatment.
(d) A medical order for life-sustaining treatment for a person
participating in the program described in this section shall not be valid
unless it is completed on a form prescribed by the department and
Public Act No. 26-68 262 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
executed in accordance with the requirements of this section and any
regulations adopted under this section.
[(d)] (e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the
authority of the Commissioner of Developmental Services under
subsection (g) of section 17a-238 concerning orders applied to persons
receiving services under the direction of said commissioner.
[(e)] (f) The Commissioner of Public Health may implement policies
and procedures necessary to administer the provisions of this section
until such time as regulations are adopted pursuant to subsection (c) of
this section.
Sec. 193. Subsection (a) of section 19a-112h of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(a) The Commissioner of Public Health shall establish and contract
for the administration of a state-wide human immunodeficiency virus
pre-exposure prophylaxis and post-exposure prophylaxis drug
assistance program using appropriated AIDS Services funding,
provided such funding is equal to or greater than twenty-five thousand
dollars annually. The program shall provide financial assistance to
individuals at risk of acquiring human immunodeficiency for (1) the
purchase of pre-exposure and post-exposure prophylaxis for human
immunodeficiency virus prescribed by a licensed physician consistent
with the recommendations of the National Centers for Disease Control
and Prevention, and (2) payment of associated laboratory testing and
other related costs. For the purposes of this subsection, "financial
assistance" includes, but need not be limited to, payments for out-of-
pocket costs, copayments, coinsurance, and up to full cost payments
toward a deductible for individuals who are underinsured and for
whom the program is the payer of last resort.
Public Act No. 26-68 263 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 194. Section 19a-2a of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
October 1, 2026):
The Commissioner of Public Health shall employ the most efficient
and practical means for the prevention and suppression of disease and
shall administer all laws under the jurisdiction of the Department of
Public Health and the Public Health Code. The commissioner shall have
responsibility for the overall operation and administration of the
Department of Public Health. The commissioner shall have the power
and duty to: (1) Administer, coordinate and direct the operation of the
department; (2) adopt and enforce regulations, in accordance with
chapter 54, as are necessary to carry out the purposes of the department
as established by statute; (3) establish rules for the internal operation
and administration of the department; (4) establish and develop
programs and administer services to achieve the purposes of the
department as established by statute; (5) enter into a contract, including,
but not limited to, a contract with another state, for facilities, services
and programs to implement the purposes of the department as
established by statute; (6) designate a deputy commissioner or other
employee of the department to sign any license, certificate or permit
issued by said department; (7) conduct a hearing, issue subpoenas,
administer oaths, compel testimony and render a final decision in any
case when a hearing is required or authorized under the provisions of
any statute dealing with the Department of Public Health; (8) with the
health authorities of this and other states, secure information and data
concerning the prevention and control of epidemics and conditions
affecting or endangering the public health, and compile such
information and statistics and shall disseminate among health
authorities and the people of the state such information as may be of
value to them; (9) annually issue a list of reportable diseases, emergency
illnesses and health conditions and a list of reportable laboratory
findings and amend such lists as the commissioner deems necessary and
Public Act No. 26-68 264 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
distribute such lists as well as any necessary forms to each licensed
physician, licensed physician assistant, licensed advanced practice
registered nurse and clinical laboratory in this state. The commissioner
shall prepare printed forms for reports and returns, with such
instructions as may be necessary, for the use of directors of health,
boards of health and registrars of vital statistics; and (10) specify
uniform methods of keeping statistical information by public and
private agencies, organizations and individuals, including a client
identifier system, and collect and make available relevant statistical
information, including the number of persons treated, frequency of
admission and readmission, and frequency and duration of treatment.
In the administration or enforcement of any applicable statute,
regulation, permit or order, the department may resolve any dispute
regarding compliance or ensure compliance with the regulatory
requirements by agreed settlement or consent order, except consent
orders resolving petitions filed in accordance with section 19a-12e shall
be subject to the approval of the board or commission having
jurisdiction over the health care professional. The client identifier
system shall be subject to the confidentiality requirements set forth in
section 17a-688 and regulations adopted thereunder. The commissioner
may designate any person to perform any of the duties listed in
subdivision (7) of this section. The commissioner shall have authority
over directors of health and may, for cause, remove any such director;
but any person claiming to be aggrieved by such removal may appeal
to the Superior Court which may affirm or reverse the action of the
commissioner as the public interest requires. The commissioner shall
assist and advise local directors of health and district directors of health
in the performance of their duties, and may require the enforcement of
any law, regulation or ordinance relating to public health. In the event
the commissioner reasonably suspects impropriety on the part of a local
director of health or district director of health, or employee of such
director, in the performance of his or her duties, the commissioner shall
provide notification and any evidence of such impropriety to the
Public Act No. 26-68 265 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
appropriate governing authority of the municipal health authority,
established pursuant to section 19a-200, or the district department of
health, established pursuant to section 19a-244, for purposes of
reviewing and assessing a director's or an employee's compliance with
such duties. Such governing authority shall provide a written report of
its findings from the review and assessment to the commissioner not
later than ninety days after such review and assessment. When
requested by local directors of health or district directors of health, the
commissioner shall consult with them and investigate and advise
concerning any condition affecting public health within their
jurisdiction. The commissioner shall investigate nuisances and
conditions affecting, or that he or she has reason to suspect may affect,
the security of life and health in any locality and, for that purpose, the
commissioner, or any person authorized by the commissioner, may
enter and examine any ground, vehicle, apartment, building or place,
and any person designated by the commissioner shall have the
authority conferred by law upon constables. Whenever the
commissioner determines that any provision of the general statutes or
regulation of the Public Health Code is not being enforced effectively by
a local health department or health district, he or she shall forthwith take
such measures, including the performance of any act required of the
local health department or health district, to ensure enforcement of such
statute or regulation and shall inform the local health department or
health district of such measures. In September of each year the
commissioner shall certify to the Secretary of the Office of Policy and
Management the population of each municipality. The commissioner
may solicit and accept for use any gift of money or property made by
will or otherwise, and any grant of or contract for money, services or
property from the federal government, the state, any political
subdivision thereof, any other state or any private source, and do all
things necessary to cooperate with the federal government or any of its
agencies in making an application for any grant or contract. The
commissioner may enter into any contracts or agreements, in
Public Act No. 26-68 266 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
accordance with any established procedures, as may be necessary for
the distribution or use of such money, services or property in
accordance with any requirements to fulfill any conditions of a gift,
grant or contract. The commissioner may establish state-wide and
regional advisory councils. For purposes of this section, "employee of
such director" means an employee of, a consultant employed or retained
by or an independent contractor retained by a local director of health, a
district director of health, a local health department or a health district.
Sec. 195. Subsection (c) of section 31-225a of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(c) (1) (A) Any week for which the employer has compensated the
claimant in the form of wages in lieu of notice, dismissal payments or
any similar payment for loss of wages shall be considered a week of
employment for the purpose of determining employer chargeability.
(B) No benefits shall be charged to any employer who paid wages of
five hundred dollars or less to the claimant in his or her base period.
(C) No dependency allowance paid to a claimant shall be charged to
any employer.
(D) In the event of a natural disaster declared by the President of the
United States, no benefits paid on the basis of total or partial
unemployment that is the result of physical damage to a place of
employment caused by severe weather conditions including, but not
limited to, hurricanes, snow storms, ice storms or flooding, or fire except
where caused by the employer, shall be charged to any employer.
(E) If the administrator finds that (i) an individual's most recent
separation from a base period employer occurred under conditions that
would result in disqualification by reason of subdivision (2), (6) or (9) of
subsection (a) of section 31-236, or (ii) an individual was discharged for
Public Act No. 26-68 267 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
violating an employer's drug testing policy, provided the policy has
been adopted and applied consistent with sections 31-51t to 31-51aa,
inclusive, section 14-261b and any applicable federal law, no benefits
paid thereafter to such individual with respect to any week of
unemployment that is based upon wages paid by such employer with
respect to employment prior to such separation shall be charged to such
employer's account, provided such employer shall have filed a notice
with the administrator within the time allowed for appeal in section 31-
241.
(F) No base period employer's account shall be charged with respect
to benefits paid to a claimant if such employer continues to employ such
claimant at the time the employer's account would otherwise have been
charged to the same extent that he or she employed him or her during
the individual's base period, provided the employer shall notify the
administrator within the time allowed for appeal in section 31-241.
(G) If a claimant has failed to accept suitable employment under the
provisions of subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 31-236 and the
disqualification has been imposed, the account of the employer who
makes an offer of employment to a claimant who was a former
employee shall not be charged with any benefit payments made to such
claimant after such initial offer of reemployment until such time as such
claimant resumes employment with such employer, provided such
employer shall make application therefor in a form acceptable to the
administrator. The administrator shall notify such employer whether or
not his or her application is granted. Any decision of the administrator
denying suspension of charges as herein provided may be appealed
within the time allowed for appeal in section 31-241.
(H) Fifty per cent of benefits paid to a claimant under the federal-state
extended duration unemployment benefits program established by the
federal Employment Security Act shall be charged to the experience
accounts of the claimant's base period employers in the same manner as
Public Act No. 26-68 268 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
the regular benefits paid for such benefit year.
(I) No base period employer's account shall be charged with respect
to benefits paid to a claimant who voluntarily left suitable work with
such employer (i) to care for a seriously ill spouse, parent or child, or (ii)
due to the discontinuance of the transportation used by the claimant to
get to and from work, as provided in subparagraphs (A)(ii) and (A)(iii)
of subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 31-236.
(J) No base period employer's account shall be charged with respect
to benefits paid to a claimant who has been discharged or suspended
because the claimant has been disqualified from performing the work
for which he or she was hired due to the loss of such claimant's operator
license as a result of a drug or alcohol test or testing program conducted
in accordance with section 14-44k, 14-227a or 14-227b while the claimant
was off duty.
(K) No base period employer's account shall be charged with respect
to benefits paid to a claimant whose separation from employment is
attributable to the return of an individual who was absent from work
due to a bona fide leave taken pursuant to sections 31-49f to 31-49t,
inclusive, or 31-51kk to 31-51qq, inclusive.
(L) On and after January 1, 2027, no base period employer's account
shall be charged with respect to benefits paid to a claimant through the
voluntary shared work unemployment compensation program,
established pursuant to section 31-274j, if a claim for benefits is filed in
a week in which the state is in an extended benefit period or high
unemployment period, pursuant to sections 31-232b to 31-232g,
inclusive. Such noncharge shall continue until the United States
Secretary of Labor has notified the Labor Commissioner that such
extended benefit period or high unemployment period has been
triggered off.
Public Act No. 26-68 269 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(2) All benefits paid that are not charged to any employer shall be
pooled.
(3) The noncharging provisions of this chapter, except subparagraphs
(D), (F) and (K) of subdivision (1) of this subsection, shall not apply to
reimbursing employers.
Sec. 196. Section 31-266c of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The administrator, upon the advice of the Attorney General, may
abate any contributions or payments in lieu of contributions due under
this chapter which have been found by the administrator to be
uncollectible.
(b) The administrator or the administrator's duly authorized agent
may make or entertain an offer of compromise for any contributions or
payments in lieu of contributions due under this chapter if such offer is
based upon doubt as to the employer's liability for the amount in
controversy or doubt as to the collectibility of such amount. For
purposes of this section, doubt as to the employer's liability for the
amount in controversy exists if there is a genuine dispute as to the
existence or amount of the employer's liability under this chapter, and
doubt as to the collectibility of such amount exists if the employer's
assets and income are less than the full amount of the employer's debts,
obligations and liabilities under state or federal law.
Sec. 197. Section 31-236f of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
The administrator, as defined in section 31-232b, [in consultation with
the advisory board established pursuant to section 31-250a,] shall
develop and implement a procedure or program to insure that an
employee, at the time of termination by an employer, receives adequate
information regarding the availability of unemployment compensation
Public Act No. 26-68 270 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
benefits under chapter 567 and the procedure required for making a
claim for such benefits.
Sec. 198. Section 31-264a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) Unless the context requires a different meaning, the term "bonds"
or "revenue bonds" under this section and sections 3-21a, 31-222, 31-
225a, 31-231a, 31-232b, 31-232d, 31-232f, 31-236, [31-250a,] 31-259, 31-
263, 31-264b and 31-274j includes notes issued in anticipation of the
issuance of revenue bonds, or notes issued pursuant to a commercial
paper program.
(b) There is established a fund to be known as the Unemployment
Compensation Advance Fund. The fund shall be administered by the
State Treasurer as a trust fund, in accordance with the provisions of this
section and sections 3-21a, 31-222, 31-225a, 31-231a, 31-232b, 31-232d, 31-
232f, 31-236, [31-250a,] 31-259, 31-263, 31-264b and 31-274j. The state
treasurer may enter into contracts that may be useful to the
organization, establishment, operation and administration of the fund
under all applicable state and federal laws and may contract with any
person to provide whatever services to the fund as, in the discretion of
the State Treasurer, are necessary for the proper operation and
administration of the fund. All costs of organizing, establishing and
operating the fund, including the costs of personnel and contractual
services, shall be a charge upon and paid by the State Treasurer from
the fund. In addition, all costs of establishing and administering the
necessary procedures for billing, payment and collection of the
assessments authorized to be established by the administrator pursuant
to section 31-225a shall be a charge upon and paid by the State Treasurer
from the fund. All costs related to the organization, establishment and
operation of the fund and all costs related to the establishment and
administration of billing, payment and collection procedures for
moneys received from employers in payment of assessments
Public Act No. 26-68 271 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
established in accordance with said section 31-225a, to the extent not
payable from the fund, may be paid from other moneys of the state
when made available for such purpose. There is established within the
fund an advance account, a debt service and reserve account and an
administration account, which accounts shall be held separate and apart
from each other. Additional accounts and subaccounts may be
established in the proceedings under which the revenue bonds are
authorized.
(c) There shall be deposited in the advance account: (1) The proceeds
of revenue bonds issued by the state for deposit into the account and
use in accordance with this section and sections 3-21a, 31-222, 31-225a,
31-231a, 31-232b, 31-232d, 31-232f, 31-236, [31-250a,] 31-259, 31-263, 31-
264b and 31-274j; (2) federal grants and awards or other federal
assistance received by the state for deposit into the account or for other
purposes in accordance with said sections; and (3) interest or other
income earned on the investment of moneys in the advance account
pending transfer or use pursuant to said sections.
(d) To the extent that amounts are available therefor in the advance
account, and on request of the administrator pursuant to subsection (h)
of this section, the State Treasurer shall apply the proceeds (1) to repay,
in accordance with the proceedings authorizing any revenue bonds
issued pursuant to this section and sections 3-21a, 31-222, 31-225a, 31-
231a, 31-232b, 31-232d, 31-232f, 31-236, [31-250a,] 31-259, 31-263, 31-264b
and 31-274j, the outstanding balance of all or any part of the advances
made to the state from the federal unemployment account under Title
XII of the Social Security Act, 42 USC Sections 1321 to 1324, inclusive,
and any interest due on the advances, and (2) to provide advances to the
Unemployment Compensation Benefit Fund.
(e) Within the debt service and reserve account there are established
the following subaccounts: (1) A reserve subaccount into which shall be
deposited the proceeds of revenue bonds issued by the state for deposit
Public Act No. 26-68 272 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
into the reserve subaccount and use in accordance with this section and
sections 3-21a, 31-222, 31-225a, 31-231a, 31-232b, 31-232d, 31-232f, 31-
236, [31-250a,] 31-259, 31-263, 31-264b and 31-274j; and (2) a debt service
subaccount into which shall be deposited, in accordance with the
proceeding authorizing the bonds, the proceeds of the initial issuance of
revenue bonds which are expected to be applied as capitalized interest
to the extent required, and payments received from or on behalf of any
employer in payment of assessments established in accordance with
said sections attributable to the debt service requirement. Moneys in
each subaccount created under this subsection may be applied by the
State Treasurer to debt service on revenue bonds. The Treasurer shall
apply amounts in the reserve subaccount to the payment of debt service
on bonds whenever amounts on deposit in the debt service subaccount
are insufficient. The net proceeds of any refunding bonds shall be
deposited in a special subaccount within the debt service and reserve
account and shall be applied solely to the retirement or redemption of
the bonds to be refunded.
(f) There shall be deposited in the administration account: (1) The
proceeds of revenue bonds expected to be deposited into the
administration account and use in accordance with this section and
sections 3-21a, 31-222, 31-225a, 31-231a, 31-232b, 31-232d, 31-232f, 31-
236, [31-250a,] 31-259, 31-263, 31-264b and 31-274j; and (2) any additional
money received from employers in payment of assessments established
in accordance with said sections, to offset the costs and expenses of
administering and operating the fund. Amounts in the administration
account may be applied to offset the costs and expenses of establishing,
administering and operating the fund.
(g) The fund shall be maintained separate and apart from all other
moneys, funds and accounts of the state. Investment earnings credited
to the assets of the fund and to any account and subaccount within the
fund shall become part of the assets of the fund, account and
Public Act No. 26-68 273 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
subaccount, except as otherwise required for rebates in order to assure
the excludability of the interest on the bonds from federal income
taxation, as provided in the proceedings authorizing any revenue
bonds. Any balance remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year
shall be carried forward in the fund, account and subaccount for the next
fiscal year.
(h) Upon the issuance of revenue bonds and to the extent there are
sufficient proceeds or other amounts in the advance account available
therefor, any advances to the Unemployment Compensation Benefit
Fund that the administrator deems necessary for the payment of
benefits under this chapter or to the Unemployment Compensation
Fund for the repayment of advances made to the state from the federal
unemployment account, including interest thereon, may be obtained
from the advance account of the Unemployment Compensation
Advance Fund. The State Treasurer shall, on request filed in writing by
the administrator, withdraw from the advance account of the
Unemployment Compensation Advance Fund and deposit in the
Unemployment Compensation Benefit Fund, amounts determined by
the administrator to be necessary for the payment of benefits under this
chapter without incurring federal interest charges, or deposit in the
Unemployment Compensation Fund amounts determined by the
administrator to be required for the repayment of advances made to the
state from the federal unemployment account, including interest
thereon. The State Treasurer shall, from time to time and at least
annually, determine the amount of interest, amortization, reserve and
associated costs required for each advance made from the advance
account under this subsection computed in accordance with the
requirements of the Unemployment Compensation Fund and the
proceedings under which the revenue bonds are authorized and such
amounts shall be assessed by the administrator as provided in
subdivision (2) of subsection (e) of section 31-225a. For purposes of this
subsection, "associated costs" includes all costs related to the efficient
Public Act No. 26-68 274 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
establishment, operation and administration of the Unemployment
Compensation Advance Fund pursuant to subsection (b) of this section,
and the proceedings under which the bonds are issued pursuant to this
section and sections 3-21a, 31-222, 31-225a, 31-231a, 31-232b, 31-232d, 31-
232f, 31-236, [31-250a,] 31-259, 31-263, 31-264b and 31-274j and the costs
of establishing and administering the billing, payment and collection
procedures referred to in subsection (b) of this section.
(i) The moneys in the advance account may also be used to pay any
costs related to the issuance of revenue bonds issued pursuant to section
31-264b and to pay any debt service thereon for which amounts on
deposit in the debt service and reserve account maintained pursuant to
this section are insufficient.
(j) Notwithstanding any provision of this section and sections 3-21a,
31-222, 31-225a, 31-231a, 31-232b, 31-232d, 31-232f, 31-236, [31-250a,] 31-
259, 31-263, 31-264b and 31-274j to the contrary, any money received
from the Unemployment Compensation Fund may not be used for any
purpose inconsistent with federal law, and any federal grants, awards,
advances or other federal assistance referred to herein may not be used
for any purpose other than that for which such amounts were granted,
awarded, advanced, or otherwise appropriated, respectively.
Sec. 199. Section 31-264b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The State Bond Commission may authorize the issuance of
revenue bonds of the state in one or more series and in principal
amounts necessary or estimated to be necessary as an advance to the
Unemployment Compensation Fund, or to repay advances made to the
state from the federal unemployment account, but not in excess of one
billion dollars outstanding at any one time and such additional amount
of bonds required to fund any debt service and reserve account in
accordance with the proceedings authorizing the bonds and the costs of
Public Act No. 26-68 275 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
issuance, capitalized interest, if any, and the initial costs and expenses
of the administration account, provided in computing the total amount
of bonds which may at any one time be outstanding, the principal
amount of any refunding bonds issued to refund bonds shall be
excluded. The legislature finds that it is an essential governmental
function to assure that the balance in the state's account in the federal
Unemployment Trust Fund is maintained at a level which is sufficient
to pay all benefits and further finds that the financing and payment of
the outstanding principal amount which has been advanced to the state
from the federal account of the Unemployment Trust Fund and the
financing and funding of the state's account in the Unemployment Trust
Fund by the issuance of revenue bonds pursuant to this section and
sections 3-21a, 31-222, 31-225a, 31-231a, 31-232b, 31-232d, 31-232f, 31-
236, [31-250a,] 31-259, 31-263, 31-264a and 31-274j is in the public
interest, will substantially result in savings of interest costs, will achieve
a public purpose of reducing overall costs of providing employment
benefits and will thereby foster and promote economic growth, provide
employment opportunities for the residents of the state and assist
companies by reducing their overall costs of doing business in the state.
(b) Bonds issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be
special obligations of the state and shall not be payable from nor
charged upon any funds other than the Unemployment Compensation
Advance Fund and revenues pledged to the payment thereof, nor shall
the state or any political subdivision thereof be subject to any liability
thereon other than from such sources. The issuance of revenue bonds
under the provisions of this section and sections 3-21a, 31-222, 31-225a,
31-231a, 31-232b, 31-232d, 31-232f, 31-236, [31-250a,] 31-259, 31-263, 31-
264a and 31-274j shall not directly or indirectly or contingently obligate
the state or any political subdivision thereof to levy or to pledge any
form of taxation whatever therefor or to make any appropriation for
their payment other than the appropriation set forth in this section. The
bonds shall not constitute a charge, lien or encumbrance, legal or
Public Act No. 26-68 276 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
equitable, upon any property of the state or of any political subdivision
thereof, except the Unemployment Compensation Advance Fund and
revenues pledged or otherwise encumbered under the provisions and
for the purpose of said sections. The substance of this limitation shall be
plainly stated on the face of each bond. Revenue bonds issued pursuant
to said sections shall not be subject to any statutory limitation on the
indebtedness of the state and the bonds, when issued, shall not be
included in computing the aggregate indebtedness of the state in respect
to, and to the extent of, any such limitation. As part of the contract of the
state with the owners of the revenue bonds, all amounts necessary for
the punctual payment of the debt service requirements with respect to
the revenue bonds shall be deemed appropriated, but only from the
sources pledged pursuant to this section and sections 3-21a, 31-222, 31-
225a, 31-231a, 31-232b, 31-232d, 31-232f, 31-236, [31-250a,] 31-259, 31-
263, 31-264a and 31-274j.
(c) The revenue bonds referred to in subsection (a) of this section may
be executed and delivered at the time or times, shall be dated, shall bear
interest at the rate or rates, shall mature at the time or times not
exceeding ten years from their date, have the rank or priority, be payable
in the medium of payment, be issued in coupon or in registered form,
or both, carry the registration and transfer privileges and be made
redeemable before maturity at the price or prices and under the terms
and conditions, all as may be provided by the State Bond Commission.
With the exception of subsections (i) and (p) all provisions of section 3-
20 and the exercise of any right or power granted thereby which are not
inconsistent with the provisions of this section and sections 3-21a, 31-
222, 31-225a, 31-231a, 31-232b, 31-232d, 31-232f, 31-236, [31-250a,] 31-
259, 31-263, 31-264a and 31-274j are hereby adopted and may be invoked
in respect to all revenue bonds authorized by the State Bond
Commission pursuant to said sections. For the purposes of subsection
(o) of said section 3-20, "bond act" includes said sections. None of the
revenue bonds shall be authorized, except upon a finding by the State
Public Act No. 26-68 277 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Bond Commission that there has been filed with it a request for
authorization, which is signed by or on behalf of the State Treasurer and
states the terms and conditions as said commission, in its discretion,
may require.
(d) The principal of and interest on any bonds issued pursuant to this
section and sections 3-21a, 31-222, 31-225a, 31-231a, 31-232b, 31-232d, 31-
232f, 31-236, [31-250a,] 31-259, 31-263, 31-264a and 31-274j shall be
secured by a pledge of the Unemployment Compensation Advance
Fund and any revenues, receipts, funds or moneys payable to the fund,
including any federal grants or advances available for the fund and
including the amounts of payment received from assessments
established pursuant to said sections, all as set forth in the proceedings
authorizing the bonds pursuant to said sections. Any pledge made by
the state pursuant to said sections is a pledge within the meaning and
for all purposes of title 42a and shall be valid and binding from the time
when the pledge is made. Any revenues or other receipts, funds or
moneys so pledged and thereafter received by the state shall be subject
immediately to the lien of the pledge without any physical delivery
thereof or further act. The lien of any pledge shall be valid and binding
as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or
otherwise against the state, irrespective of whether the parties have
notice of the claims. Neither this section nor sections 3-21a, 31-222, 31-
225, 31-231a, 31-232b, 31-232d, 31-232f, 31-236, [31-250a,] 31-259, 31-263,
31-264a and 31-274j, the resolution nor any other instrument by which a
pledge is created need be recorded.
(e) Revenue bonds issued pursuant to this section and sections 3-21a,
31-222, 31-225a, 31-231a, 31-232b, 31-232d, 31-232f, 31-236, [31-250a,] 31-
259, 31-263, 31-264a and 31-274j are hereby made securities in which
public officers and public bodies of the state and its political
subdivisions, all insurance companies, credit unions, savings and loan
associations, investment companies, banking associations, trust
Public Act No. 26-68 278 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
companies, executors, administrators, trustees and other fiduciaries and
pension, profit-sharing and retirement funds may properly and legally
invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. The
bonds are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be
deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer or any
agency or political subdivision of the state for any purpose for which
the deposit of bonds or other obligations of the state is now or may
hereafter be authorized by law.
(f) The proceedings under which bonds are authorized to be issued
may contain any or all of the following: (1) Provisions respecting
custody of the proceeds from the sale of the bonds, including any
requirement that the proceeds be deposited in the Unemployment
Compensation Advance Fund and held separate from, or not be
commingled with, other funds of the state; (2) provisions for the
investment and reinvestment of bond proceeds and after the disposition
of any excess bond proceeds or investment earnings thereon; (3)
provisions for the execution of reimbursement agreements or similar
agreements in connection with credit facilities, including, but not
necessarily limited to, letters of credit or policies of bond insurance,
remarketing agreements and agreements for the purpose of moderating
interest rate fluctuations, and of such other agreements entered into
pursuant to section 3-20a; (4) provisions for the collection, custody,
investment, reinvestment and use of the pledged revenues or other
receipts, funds or moneys pledged therefor as provided in this section
and sections 3-21a, 31-222, 31-225a, 31-231a, 31-232b, 31-232d, 31-232f,
31-236, [31-250a,] 31-259, 31-263, 31-264a and 31-274j; (5) provisions
regarding the establishment and maintenance of reserves, sinking funds
and any other funds and accounts of the Unemployment Compensation
Advance Fund pursuant to said sections and in the amounts and on the
terms approved by the State Bond Commission in the amounts
established by the State Bond Commission; (6) covenants for the
establishment of pledged revenue coverage requirements for the bonds;
Public Act No. 26-68 279 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(7) provisions for the issuance of additional bonds on a parity with
bonds theretofore issued, including establishment of coverage
requirements with respect thereto as herein provided; (8) provisions
regarding the rights and remedies available in case of a default to
bondowners, noteowners or any trustee under any contract, loan
agreement, document, instrument or trust indenture, including the right
to appoint a trustee to represent their interests upon occurrence of an
event of default, as defined in said proceedings, provided if any revenue
bonds are secured by a trust indenture, the respective owners of the
bonds shall have no authority, except as set forth in the trust indenture,
to appoint a separate trustee to represent them; (9) provisions for the
payment of rebate amounts; and (10) provisions of covenants of like or
different character from the foregoing which are consistent with this
section and sections 3-21a, 31-222, 31-225a, 31-231a, 31-232b, 31-232d, 31-
232f, 31-236, [31-250a,] 31-259, 31-263, 31-264a and 31-274j, and which
the State Bond Commission determines in such proceedings are
necessary, convenient or desirable in order to better secure the revenue
bonds, or will tend to make the revenue bonds more marketable, and
which are in the best interests of the state. Any provision which may be
included in proceedings authorizing the issuance of bonds hereunder
may be included in an indenture of trust duly approved in accordance
with said sections, which secures the revenue bonds issued in
anticipation thereof, and in such case the provision of the indenture
shall be deemed to be a part of the proceedings as though they were
expressly included therein.
(g) Whether or not any revenue bonds issued pursuant to this section
and sections 3-21a, 31-222, 31-225a, 31-231a, 31-232b, 31-232d, 31-232f,
31-236, [31-250a,] 31-259, 31-263, 31-264a and 31-274j are of the form and
character to qualify as negotiable instruments under the terms of title
42a, the bonds are hereby made negotiable instruments within the
meaning of and for all purposes of title 42a, subject only to the
provisions of the bonds.
Public Act No. 26-68 280 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(h) The state covenants with the purchasers and all subsequent
owners and transferees of revenue bonds issued by the state pursuant
to this section and sections 3-21a, 31-222, 31-225a, 31-231a, 31-232b, 31-
232d, 31-232f, 31-236, [31-250a,] 31-259, 31-263, 31-264a and 31-274j, in
consideration of the acceptance of and payment for the bonds, that the
bonds shall be free at all times from taxes levied by any municipality or
political subdivision or special district having taxing powers of the state,
and the principal and interest of any bonds issued under the provisions
of said sections, their transfer and the income therefrom, including any
profit on the sale or transfer thereof, shall at all times be exempt from
any taxation by the state of Connecticut or under its authority, except
for estate or succession taxes. The State Treasurer is authorized to
include this covenant of the state in any agreement with the owner of
any bonds and in any credit facility or reimbursement agreement with
respect to the bonds.
(i) The state further covenants with the purchasers and all subsequent
owners and transferees of bonds issued by the state pursuant to this
section and sections 3-21a, 31-222, 31-225a, 31-231a, 31-232b, 31-232d, 31-
232f, 31-236, [31-250a,] 31-259, 31-263, 31-264a and 31-274j, in
consideration of the acceptance of the payment of the bonds, until the
bonds, together with the interest thereon, with interest on any unpaid
installment of interest and all costs and expenses in connection with any
action or proceeding on behalf of the owners, are fully met and
discharged or unless expressly permitted or otherwise authorized by
the terms of each contract and agreement made or entered into by or on
behalf of the state with or for the benefit of such owners, that the state
will cause the administrator to impose, charge, raise, levy, collect and
apply the pledged assessments and other revenues, receipts, funds or
moneys pledged for the payment of debt service requirements in each
year in which bonds are outstanding and further, that the state (1) will
not limit or alter the duties imposed on the administrator, the State
Treasurer and other officers of the state by the proceedings authorizing
Public Act No. 26-68 281 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
the issuance of bonds with respect to application of pledged
assessments or other revenues, receipts, funds or moneys pledged for
the payment of debt service requirements; (2) will not issue any bonds,
notes or other evidences of indebtedness, other than the bonds, having
any rights arising out of said sections or secured by any pledge of or
other lien or charge on the pledged revenues or other receipts, funds or
moneys pledged for the payment of debt service requirements; (3) will
not create or cause to be created any lien or charge on the pledged
amounts, other than a lien or pledge created thereon pursuant to said
sections, provided nothing in this subsection shall prevent the state from
issuing evidences of indebtedness (A) which are secured by a pledge or
lien which is, and shall on the face thereof, be expressly subordinate and
junior in all respects to every lien and pledge created by or pursuant to
said sections; or (B) which are secured by a pledge of or lien on moneys
or funds derived on or after the date every pledge or lien thereon created
by or pursuant to said sections shall be discharged and satisfied; (4) will
carry out and perform, or cause to be carried out and performed, each
and every promise, covenant, agreement or contract made or entered
into by the state or on its behalf with the owners of any bonds; (5) will
not in any way impair the rights, exemptions or remedies of the owners;
and (6) will not limit, modify, rescind, repeal or otherwise alter the
rights or obligations of the appropriate officers of the state to impose,
maintain, charge or collect the assessments and other revenues or
receipts constituting the pledged revenues as may be necessary to
produce sufficient revenues to fulfill the terms of the proceedings
authorizing the issuance of the bonds, including pledged revenue
coverage requirements, and provided nothing herein shall preclude the
state from exercising its power, through a change in law, to limit,
modify, rescind, repeal or otherwise alter the character of the pledged
assessments or revenues or to substitute like or different sources of
assessments, taxes, fees, charges or other receipts as pledged revenues
if and when adequate provision shall be made by law for the protection
of the holders of outstanding bonds pursuant to the proceedings under
Public Act No. 26-68 282 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
which the bonds are issued, including changing or altering the method
of establishing the assessments as provided in subparagraph (B) of
subdivision (2) of subsection (e) of section 31-225a. The State Bond
Commission is authorized to include this covenant of the state, as a
contract of the state, in any agreement with the owner of any bonds and
in any credit facility or reimbursement agreement with respect to the
bonds.
(j) Pending the use and application of any bond proceeds, the
proceeds may be invested by, or at the direction of, the State Treasurer
in obligations listed in section 3-20.
(k) Any revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this section
and sections 3-21a, 31-222, 31-225a, 31-231a, 31-232b, 31-232d, 31-232f,
31-236, [31-250a,] 31-259, 31-263, 31-264a and 31-274j and at any time
outstanding may, at any time and from time to time, be refunded by the
state by the issuance of its revenue refunding bonds in whatever
amounts the State Bond Commission may deem necessary, but not to
exceed an amount sufficient to refund the principal of the revenue
bonds to be so refunded, to pay any unpaid interest thereon and any
premiums and commissions necessary to be paid in connection
therewith and to pay costs and expenses which the State Treasurer may
deem necessary or advantageous in connection with the authorization,
sale and issuance of refund bonds. Any such refunding may be effected
whether the revenue bonds to be refunded shall have matured or shall
thereafter mature. All revenue refunding bonds issued hereunder shall
be payable solely from the Unemployment Compensation Advance
Fund and revenues or other receipts, funds or moneys out of which the
revenue bonds to be refunded thereby are payable and shall be subject
to and may be secured in accordance with the provisions of this section.
(l) The State Treasurer shall have power, out of any funds available
therefor, to purchase revenue bonds issued pursuant to this section and
sections 3-21a, 31-222, 31-225a, 31-231a, 31-232b, 31-232d, 31-232f, 31-
Public Act No. 26-68 283 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
236, [31-250a,] 31-259, 31-263, 31-264a and 31-274j. The State Treasurer
may hold, pledge, cancel or resell the bonds, subject to and in
accordance with agreements with bondholders.
Sec. 200. Section 31-250a of the general statutes is repealed. (Effective
October 1, 2026)
Sec. 201. Subdivision (2) of section 31-76b of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(2) (A) "Hours worked" [include] includes all time during which an
employee is required by the employer to be on the employer's premises
or to be on duty, or to be at the prescribed work place, and all time
during which an employee is employed or permitted to work, whether
or not required to do so, provided time allowed for meals shall be
excluded unless the employee is required or permitted to work. Such
time includes, but shall not be limited to, (i) the time when an employee
is required to wait on the premises while no work is provided by the
employer, and (ii) the time an employee spends in security screenings
required by an employer. (B) All time during which an employee is
required to be on call for emergency service at a location designated by
the employer shall be considered to be working time and shall be paid
for as such, whether or not the employee is actually called upon to work.
(C) When an employee is subject to call for emergency service but is not
required to be at a location designated by the employer but is simply
required to keep the employer informed as to the location at which he
may be contacted, or when an employee is not specifically required by
his employer to be subject to call but is contacted by his employer or on
the employer's authorization directly or indirectly and assigned to duty,
working time shall begin when the employee is notified of his
assignment and shall end when the employee has completed his
assignment. (D) Notwithstanding the provisions of this subdivision,
when an individual employed by a third-party provider to provide
Public Act No. 26-68 284 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
"companionship services", as defined in the regulations of the federal
Fair Labor Standards Act, is required to be present at a worksite for a
period of not less than twenty-four consecutive hours, such individual
and his or her employer may agree in writing to exclude a regularly
scheduled sleeping period of not more than eight hours from hours
worked, provided (i) adequate on-site sleeping facilities are furnished
to such individual, and (ii) such individual receives at least five hours
of sleep time. If the scheduled sleeping period is more than eight hours,
only eight hours will be excluded. If the scheduled sleeping period is
interrupted by an assignment to work, the interruption shall be counted
as hours worked. If such individual does not receive at least five hours
of sleep time during the scheduled sleeping period, the entire sleeping
period shall be considered hours worked. The provisions of this
subparagraph shall be effective on and after the effective date of the
United States Department of Labor's Final Rule concerning the
Application of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act to Domestic Service
published in the Federal Register of October 1, 2013;
Sec. 202. (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a task force to
study and provide recommendations on the establishment of heat safety
standards for workplaces. The study shall include, but need not be
limited to, an examination of (1) best practices to prevent employee
exposure to the risk of heat illness, and (2) laws and regulations
governing heat safety standards implemented in other states.
(b) The task force shall consist of the following members:
(1) The chairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to labor and public employees, or their designees;
(2) One appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives,
who is a member of an organization that advocates for the prevention
of sudden death from exertional heat stroke;
Public Act No. 26-68 285 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(3) One appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate;
(4) One appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives;
(5) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate;
(6) One appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives;
(7) One appointed by the minority leader of the Senate; and
(8) The Labor Commissioner, or the commissioner's designee.
(c) Any member of the task force appointed under subdivision (2),
(3), (4), (5), (6) or (7) of subsection (b) of this section may be a member
of the General Assembly.
(d) All initial appointments to the task force shall be made not later
than thirty days after the effective date of this section. Any vacancy shall
be filled by the appointing authority.
(e) The chairpersons of the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to labor and public
employees, or their designees, shall be the chairpersons of the task force.
Such chairpersons shall schedule the first meeting of the task force,
which shall be held not later than sixty days after the effective date of
this section.
(f) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to labor and
public employees shall serve as administrative staff of the task force.
(g) Not later than January 1, 2027, the task force shall submit a report
on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to labor
Public Act No. 26-68 286 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
and public employees, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-
4a of the general statutes. The task force shall terminate on the date that
it submits such report or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
Sec. 203. Subsection (a) of section 31-102 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) There shall continue to be in the Labor Department the
Connecticut State Board of Labor Relations, which shall be composed of
three members. On or before June first in the odd-numbered years, as
the term of each member expires, the Governor shall, with the advice
and consent of the General Assembly, appoint a successor to serve for a
term of six years. Each member of the board shall have been an elector
in this state for at least one year next preceding his appointment. Any
member may be removed by the Governor for cause shown in a public
hearing after the accused has been given a copy of the charges made and
has had an opportunity to answer such charges. The Governor shall fill
any vacancy by appointment for the unexpired term. No member shall
receive a salary but each member shall be paid [one hundred fifty] three
hundred dollars in lieu of expenses for each day during which he is
engaged in the duties of the board. The offices of the board shall be in
the department at Wethersfield. The board is authorized to hold
hearings at any place in this state. Subject to the provisions of chapter
67, the board shall appoint such employees, including an assistant to the
agent, for such periods as may be necessary to carry out the work of the
board and the provisions of this chapter without undue delay. All files,
records and documents accumulated by the board shall be kept in
offices provided by the department. All decisions shall be made by a
majority of the board and a copy shall be filed with the commissioner.
As provided in section 4-60 and more frequently if required by the
governor, the board shall make a written report to the Governor, a copy
of which shall be filed with the commissioner.
Public Act No. 26-68 287 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 204. Section 31-98 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The panel, or its single member if sitting in accordance with
section 31-93, may, in its discretion and with the consent of the parties,
issue an oral decision immediately upon conclusion of the proceedings.
If the decision is to be in writing, it shall be signed, within fifteen days,
by a majority of the members of the panel or by the single member so
sitting, and the decision shall state such details as will clearly show the
nature of the decision and the points disposed of by the panel. Where
the decision is in writing, one copy thereof shall be filed by the panel in
the office of the town clerk in the town where the controversy arose and
one copy shall be given to each of the parties to the controversy. The
panel or single member which has rendered an oral decision
immediately upon conclusion of the proceedings shall submit a written
copy of the decision to each party within fifteen days from the issuance
of such oral decision. In all cases where a decision is rendered orally
from the bench, the secretary shall cause such oral decision to be
transcribed, approved by the panel or single member as applicable and
filed with the records of the board proceedings.
(b) Upon the conclusion of the proceedings, each member of the panel
shall receive [three hundred twenty-five] five hundred dollars and a
panel member who prepares a written decision shall receive an
additional [five hundred] one thousand dollars, or the single member,
if sitting in accordance with section 31-93, shall receive [three hundred
twenty-five] five hundred dollars, provided if the proceedings extend
beyond one day, each member shall receive [three hundred twenty-five]
five hundred dollars for each additional day beyond the first day, and
provided further no proceeding may be extended beyond two days
without the prior approval of the Labor Commissioner for each such
additional day.
(c) Upon the conclusion of an executive panel session, each member
Public Act No. 26-68 288 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
of such panel shall receive [two] three hundred dollars.
Sec. 205. Section 228 of public act 25-168 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) The Comptroller shall conduct a study on the compensation of
transportation network company drivers and third-party delivery
company drivers in the state. In conducting such study, the Comptroller
shall obtain and analyze data and information related to income earned
by transportation network company drivers and third-party delivery
company drivers for services provided by such drivers in the state and
costs directly attributable to providing such services. Such data and
information shall be aggregated in a manner that does not report
personally identifiable information and shall exclude any proprietary,
trade secret, competitively sensitive or otherwise confidential
commercial information that is not publicly available. The Comptroller
may enter into a contract with a consultant in order to conduct such
study. Not later than [July 1, 2026] October 1, 2026, the Comptroller shall
file a report on such data and information, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, with the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to labor and public employees.
(b) The Comptroller shall, within available appropriations, spend not
more than one hundred thousand dollars on conducting such study.
Sec. 206. Section 44 of public act 26-12 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2027):
(a) As used in this section and sections 45 to 47, inclusive, of [this act]
public act 26-12:
(1) "Public utility pole" means a pole, including a portion of a pole,
owned by a telephone company or an electric distribution company that
is used to support wires for (A) the distribution of electricity, (B)
Public Act No. 26-68 289 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
telecommunications services, as defined in section 16-247a of the
general statutes, or (C) the lighting of streets or sidewalks;
(2) "Double utility poles" means a replacement public utility pole
built or installed alongside, or attached to, an existing public utility pole,
or a portion of an existing public utility pole, for the purpose of
transferring the wires from the existing utility pole to the replacement
utility pole, provided the existing public utility pole, including any
portion of such utility pole, has not been removed after the installation
of the replacement utility pole;
(3) "Utility pole custodian" means the electric distribution company
or telephone company with a duty to maintain a public utility pole;
(4) "Utility pole attachment database system" means a software
system designated by the Public Utilities Regulatory Authority for the
purpose of maintaining a database of attachments to public utility poles
in the state;
(5) "User" means any person or entity that is not the owner of a public
utility pole who maintains equipment of any sort on such pole, except
when a public utility pole is owned by more than one person or entity,
the person or entity that is a partial owner of such pole and that is not
performing the removal or replacement work shall be considered a
"user" for the purposes of this section and section 45 of [this act] public
act 26-12. "User" does not include any municipality or political
subdivision of the state or an electric distribution company if such
company owns the public utility pole;
(6) "Electric distribution company" has the same meaning as
provided in section 16-1 of the general statutes;
(7) "Telephone company" has the same meaning as provided in
section 16-1 of the general statutes; and
Public Act No. 26-68 290 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(8) "Complex transfer" means work to transfer a public utility pole
attachment that would be reasonably likely to cause a service outage or
damage to any other such attachments, including work such as splicing
a communication attachment or relocating existing wireless
attachments. Any transfer involving mobile, fixed, and point-to-point
wireless communications and attachments owned by wireless Internet
service providers shall be deemed a complex transfer.
(b) A utility pole custodian, or the custodian's agent, shall deliver
notice of any removal and replacement work concerning such utility
pole to each user of such utility pole not more than seventy-two hours
(1) after starting any such work if such work is planned, or (2) after such
work is completed if such work was unplanned and necessary to correct
a hazardous condition on an emergency basis. Such notice shall describe
the location of the public utility pole, the nature of the work completed
or to be completed, the date upon which such work was completed or is
to be completed and the delivery date of such notice. Such notice shall
be delivered to each user of the public utility pole by electronic means
through the utility pole attachment database system.
(c) Except as provided in section 46 of [this act] public act 26-12, each
user of a public utility pole, except an electric distribution company, that
receives notice of work pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall
transfer its equipment from the existing public utility pole to the
replacement public utility pole not later than (1) twenty days after
receiving such notice if such notice requires the transfer of equipment
from fifty or fewer public utility poles, or (2) forty-five days after
receiving such notice if such notice requires the transfer of equipment
from greater than fifty public utility poles. Except as provided in section
46 of public act 26-12, each user that is an electric distribution company
that receives notice of work pursuant to subsection (b) of this section
shall transfer its equipment from the existing public utility pole to the
replacement public utility pole not later than forty-five days after
Public Act No. 26-68 291 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
receiving such notice. Upon the completion of the work to transfer
equipment pursuant to this subsection, the user shall provide notice by
electronic means through the utility pole attachment database system to
the utility pole custodian that such work has been completed.
(d) (1) Except as provided in section 46 of [this act] public act 26-12, if
a user fails to complete the work required to transfer the user's
equipment in the time required under subsection (c) of this section, the
telephone company, or such company's agent, may complete such work
on the user's behalf. Such company, or such company's agent, may
submit a bill to such user based on the prevailing rate of wages
established pursuant to section 31-53 of the general statutes, as amended
by [this act] public act 26-12, for any such work completed on behalf of
such user. Such user shall pay such bill not later than sixty days after
receipt.
(2) A user shall not be in violation of this section if (A) such user is
prevented from timely completing the transfer of such user's equipment
due solely to a municipality's failure to timely remove or transfer any
equipment owned by such municipality or a political subdivision of the
municipality, (B) a telephone company, or such company's agent, fails
to complete any work required to transfer such user's equipment
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, or (C) the user can
demonstrate good cause to the authority why such user failed to timely
complete such transfer, including, but not limited to, the presence of an
unidentified attachment to a public utility pole, a significant weather
event that precludes or delays the timely completion of required work,
the existence of a declared emergency in the state, or if the transfer is a
complex transfer. Nothing in this section shall be construed to excuse
such user from completing such work within a reasonable period of
time, considering the circumstances of such work, as determined by the
authority.
(e) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, a user
Public Act No. 26-68 292 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
that fails to transfer the user's equipment to a replacement public utility
pole in compliance with subsection (c) of this section or fails to pay a bill
submitted to such user pursuant to subsection (d) of this section within
sixty days of receipt shall be in violation of this section. The Public
Utilities Regulatory Authority may impose, by order of the authority, a
civil penalty not to exceed one hundred dollars for each violation of
subsection (c) of this section, and in the case of a continued violation,
each day thereof shall be deemed a separate violation. The authority
shall impose any such civil penalty in accordance with the procedure
established in section 16-41 of the general statutes.
(2) The authority shall impose no penalty on a user pursuant to this
subsection if (A) the user of a public utility pole was prevented from
completing the transfer of such user's equipment due solely to a
municipality's failure to timely remove or transfer any equipment
owned by such municipality or a political subdivision of the
municipality, (B) a telephone company, or such company's agent, fails
to complete any work required to transfer such user's equipment
pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, or (C) the user can
demonstrate good cause to the authority why such user failed to timely
complete such transfer, including, but not limited to, the presence of an
unidentified attachment to a public utility pole, a significant weather
event that precludes or delays the timely completion of required work,
the existence of a declared emergency in the state, or if the transfer is a
complex transfer. If the authority finds the user has demonstrated good
cause pursuant to subparagraph (C) of this subdivision, the authority
shall issue a written decision that articulates the basis for such finding.
(f) (1) An electric distribution company or telephone company that
removes a public utility pole, including any portion of such a utility
pole, and installs a replacement public utility pole shall complete the
transfer of any wires or equipment owned by the electric distribution
company or telephone company not later than forty-five days after such
Public Act No. 26-68 293 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
company receives notice of work pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section.
(2) An electric distribution company or telephone company that fails
to comply with subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be in violation of
this section. The Public Utilities Regulatory Authority may impose, by
order of the authority, a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred dollars
for each violation of this subsection, and in the case of a continued
violation, each day thereof shall be deemed a separate violation. The
authority shall impose any such civil penalty in accordance with the
procedure established in section 16-41 of the general statutes, except
when such company can demonstrate good cause to the authority why
such company failed to timely complete such transfer, including, but not
limited to, the presence of an unidentified attachment to a public utility
pole, a significant weather event that precludes or delays the timely
completion of required work, the existence of a declared emergency in
the state, or if the transfer is a complex transfer. If the authority finds the
company has demonstrated good cause, the authority shall issue a
written decision that articulates the basis for such finding.
(g) The Public Utilities Regulatory Authority shall remit the amount
of any civil penalty collected pursuant to this section or section 45 of
[this act] public act 26-12, to the Commissioner of Social Services for the
purpose of providing funding for the Connecticut energy assistance
program administered by the commissioner pursuant to section 17b-2
of the general statutes.
(h) The Public Utilities Regulatory Authority may adopt regulations,
in accordance with chapter 54 of the general statutes, to implement the
provisions of this section and section 45 of [this act] public act 26-12.
Sec. 207. Section 32-9y of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July
1, 2026):
Public Act No. 26-68 294 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Economic and
Community Development; and
(2) "Greyfield" means any previously developed commercial retail or
office property that (A) is economically nonviable in its current state and
exhibits conditions that significantly complicate its redevelopment or
reuse, as determined by the commissioner; and (B) is not currently
eligible for any brownfield remediation and development program
provided in chapter 588gg.
(b) On and after July 1, 2025, the commissioner may use bond funds
and available resources to provide not more than fifty million dollars in
the aggregate for grants or loans in support of major projects selected
pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.
(c) On and after July 1, 2025, the commissioner, in coordination with
the Commissioner of Housing, the Connecticut Municipal
Redevelopment Authority and the Capital Region Development
Authority, may establish a greyfield revitalization program, which shall
provide grants or loans to facilitate the renovation and repurposing of
commercial retail and office space determined by the Commissioner of
Economic and Community Development to be a greyfield and to
provide grants to the Connecticut Municipal Redevelopment Authority
or the Capital Region Development Authority to provide grants or loans
to facilitate the renovation and repurposing of such commercial retail
and office space. The commissioner shall develop a competitive
application process and criteria to (1) evaluate applications submitted
pursuant to this subsection, and (2) select projects for funding pursuant
to subsection (b) of this section.
(d) Eligible use of grant or loan funds include: (1) Architectural and
engineering assessment of buildings and site readiness to determine
Public Act No. 26-68 295 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
suitability for conversion to multi-family housing; (2) demolition; (3)
remediation and abatement of building materials that were used in
accordance with the State Building Code when the structure was
constructed; (4) renovation or conversion construction costs; (5)
planning studies to assess the viability of one or more potential future
project sites under the program; and (6) reasonable administrative
expenses not to exceed five per cent of any grant awarded.
(e) Financial assistance awarded pursuant to this section shall be
exempt from the provisions of section 32-462.
(f) The commissioner may contract with nongovernmental entities,
including, but not limited to, nonprofit organizations, economic and
community development organizations, lending institutions, and
technical assistance providers to carry out the provisions of this section.
(g) The provisions of this section in relation to the renovation and
repurposing of commercial retail and office space shall apply solely
within the territorial boundaries of the capital city economic
development district, as defined in section 32-600, and the town of East
Hartford.
Sec. 208. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) The Chief Workforce
Officer shall establish a program to serve residents of the Clay Arsenal
neighborhood in the city of Hartford by connecting such residents
seeking employment, training or career advancement to employment
opportunities. Such program shall be known as the Clay Arsenal
Workforce Readiness Program. In establishing such program the
commissioner shall:
(1) Establish and maintain a listing of available (A) job opportunities,
(B) training programs, (C) credentials, as defined in section 10a-35b of
the general statutes, offered in the state, (D) apprenticeships, and (E)
employment support services;
Public Act No. 26-68 296 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(2) Establish and maintain relationships with employers, workforce
development groups, education institutions and community-based
organizations in the region in order to:
(A) Identify workforce needs and hiring opportunities in the state;
(B) Support the development of training and pipeline programs; and
(C) Establish a referral process to refer participating residents to
employers;
(3) Assist participating residents in meeting workplace expectations
or requirements by:
(A) Assessing participating residents' workforce readiness;
(B) Identifying gaps in required training, education or support
services;
(C) Facilitating training opportunities; and
(D) Developing career pathway programs that align with regional
employer demand; and
(4) Provide residents with employment and training opportunities
based on the residents' skills, interest, readiness and current employer
demand.
(b) The Chief Workforce Officer may contract with nongovernmental
entities that provide workforce development opportunities and training
to carry out the provisions of this section.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the Chief
Workforce Officer shall submit a report on the program, in accordance
with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
Public Act No. 26-68 297 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
matters relating to finance, revenue and bonding. Such report shall
include (1) a list identifying the participating employers, workforce
development groups, education institutions and community-based
organizations, (2) a description of the level of support provided by each
such participating entity, (3) a summary of the way in which the
coordination among such entities is structured and implemented, (4)
identification of the performance outcomes of the program, including,
but not limited to, participant engagement, training enrollment and
completion by participants and job placement of participants, and (5)
recommendations for program improvement.
Sec. 209. Section 16-256l of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes, as amended by section 62 of public act 26-1, is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) As used in this section, "provider" means a telephone or
telecommunications company providing local telephone service,
provider of commercial mobile radio service, as defined in 47 CFR
Section 20.3, as amended from time to time, and voice over Internet
protocol service provider, as defined in section 28-30b.
(b) [On] (1) For each monthly period commencing on and after July
1, 2026, each provider shall assess against each subscriber a fee in an
amount equal to five cents per month per access line. Each fee assessed
under this [subsection] subdivision shall be remitted [to the office of the
State Treasurer for deposit into the firefighters cancer relief account
established pursuant to section 7-313h, not later than the fifteenth day
of each month. No part of any fee assessed under this subsection shall
be subject to a refund.] pursuant to the provisions of subdivisions (2)
and (3) of this subsection.
(2) Each provider shall report all fees assessed pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this subsection and remit such fees at such time and
in the same manner as such provider files a return and remits a tax
Public Act No. 26-68 298 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
payment pursuant to section 12-414. Such report shall include, but need
not be limited to, the number of access lines on which such fee was
assessed and the total amount of such fees collected during such tax
period or each month of such tax period, as applicable. Such fees shall
not be included in gross receipts on such return.
(3) Not later than August 1, 2026, and each month thereafter, the
Commissioner of Revenue Services shall deposit all fees remitted
pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection into the firefighter's cancer
relief account established pursuant to section 7-313h.
(c) Not later than May 1, 2026, the provider shall provide written
notice to each subscriber disclosing the amount and frequency of such
fee.
(d) No part of any fee assessed pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section shall be subject to a refund.
[(d)] (e) The fee described in subsection (b) of this section shall not
apply to any prepaid wireless telecommunications service, as defined in
section 28-30b.
Sec. 210. Subparagraph (B) of subdivision (9) of subsection (a) of
section 12-407 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes is repealed
and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(B) "Gross receipts" do not include any of the following: (i) Cash
discounts allowed and taken on sales; (ii) any portion of the sales price
of property returned by purchasers, which upon rescission of the
contract of sale is refunded either in cash or credit, provided the
property is returned within ninety days from the date of sale; (iii) the
amount of any tax, not including any manufacturers' or importers'
excise tax, imposed by the United States upon or with respect to retail
sales whether imposed upon the retailer or the purchaser; (iv) the
amount charged for labor rendered in installing or applying the
Public Act No. 26-68 299 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
property sold, provided such charge is separately stated and exclusive
of such charge for any service rendered within the purview of
subparagraph (I) of subdivision (37) of this subsection; (v) unless the
provisions of subdivision (4) of section 12-430 or of section 12-430a are
applicable, any amount for which credit is given to the purchaser by the
retailer, provided such credit is given solely for property of the same
kind accepted in part payment by the retailer and intended by the
retailer to be resold; (vi) the full face value of any coupon used by a
purchaser to reduce the price paid to the retailer for an item of tangible
personal property, whether or not the retailer will be reimbursed for
such coupon, in whole or in part, by the manufacturer of the item of
tangible personal property or by a third party; (vii) the amount charged
for separately stated compensation, fringe benefits, workers'
compensation and payroll taxes or assessments paid to or on behalf of
employees of a retailer who has contracted to manage a service
recipient's property or business premises and renders management
services described in subparagraph (I) or (J) of subdivision (37) of this
subsection, provided the employees perform such services solely for the
service recipient at its property or business premises and "gross
receipts" shall include the separately stated compensation, fringe
benefits, workers' compensation and payroll taxes or assessments paid
to or on behalf of any employee of the retailer who is an officer, director
or owner of more than five per cent of the outstanding capital stock of
the retailer. Determination whether an employee performs services
solely for a service recipient at its property or business premises for
purposes of this subdivision shall be made by reference to such
employee's activities during the time period beginning on the later of
the commencement of the management contract, the date of the
employee's first employment by the retailer or the date which is six
months immediately preceding the date of such determination; (viii) the
amount charged for separately stated compensation, fringe benefits,
workers' compensation and payroll taxes or assessments paid to or on
behalf of (I) a leased employee, or (II) a worksite employee by a
Public Act No. 26-68 300 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
professional employer organization pursuant to a professional
employer agreement. For purposes of this subparagraph, an employee
shall be treated as a leased employee if the employee is provided to the
client at the commencement of an agreement with an employee leasing
organization under which at least seventy-five per cent of the employees
provided to the client at the commencement of such initial agreement
qualify as leased employees pursuant to Section 414(n) of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, or any subsequent corresponding internal
revenue code of the United States, as from time to time amended, or the
employee is added to the client's workforce by the employee leasing
organization subsequent to the commencement of such initial
agreement and qualifies as a leased employee pursuant to Section 414(n)
of said Internal Revenue Code of 1986 without regard to subparagraph
(B) of paragraph (2) thereof. A leased employee, or a worksite employee
subject to a professional employer agreement, shall not include any
employee who is hired by a temporary help service and assigned to
support or supplement the workforce of a temporary help service's
client; (ix) the amount received by a retailer from a purchaser as the
battery deposit that is required to be paid under subsection (a) of section
22a-256h; the refund value of a beverage container that is required to be
paid under subsection (a) of section 22a-244 or a deposit that is required
by law to be paid by the purchaser to the retailer and that is required by
law to be refunded to the purchaser by the retailer when the same or
similar tangible personal property is delivered as required by law to the
retailer by the purchaser, if such amount is separately stated on the bill
or invoice rendered by the retailer to the purchaser; [and] (x) the amount
charged for separately stated compensation, fringe benefits, workers'
compensation and payroll taxes or assessments paid to a media payroll
services company, as defined in this subsection; and (xi) the amount of
any subscriber fee assessed pursuant to section 16-256l.
Sec. 211. (NEW) (Effective from passage) During the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, and each fiscal year thereafter, the Department of Social
Public Act No. 26-68 301 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Services shall, in consultation with the Secretary of the Office of Policy
and Management, divert federal Medicaid revenue resulting from
disproportionate share hospital claiming at John Dempsey Hospital in
an amount to be determined by the secretary, not to exceed an amount
equal to $15,000,000 multiplied by the number of hospitals owned and
operated by The University of Connecticut Health Center Joint Venture
Initiative at any point during such fiscal year. Such revenue shall be
diverted and transferred to The University of Connecticut Health Center
to support operational costs associated with The University of
Connecticut Health Center Joint Venture Initiative. The Department of
Social Services and The University of Connecticut Health Center shall
enter into a memorandum of understanding to effectuate the transfer of
such funds.
Sec. 212. (Effective July 1, 2026) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
the Department of Social Services may, with the approval of the
Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, establish receivables
for the collection of revenue anticipated under section 12-263q of the
general statutes.
Sec. 213. (Effective from passage) The sum of $1,500,000 shall be reduced
from the amount appropriated to The University of Connecticut Health
Center, for Operating Expenses, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.
Sec. 214. (Effective from passage) The sum of $1,500,000 is appropriated
to the Department of Social Services for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2027, for the purpose of funding the Medicaid state share to allow for
the expansion of the physician supplemental payment issued to The
University of Connecticut Health Center under the Medicaid program.
Sec. 215. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) For the purposes of this
section:
(1) "Campus" has the same meaning as provided in section 19a-508c
Public Act No. 26-68 302 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
of the general statutes;
(2) "Health system" has the same meaning as provided in section 19a-
508c of the general statutes;
(3) "Hospital" has the same meaning as provided in section 19a-490
of the general statutes; and
(4) "Infusion center" means a site that offers intravenous infusions
and intramuscular or subcutaneous injections of medications, fluids or
biological products for complex medical conditions, including, but not
limited to, cancers and autoimmune disorders.
(b) Any hospital or health system that schedules a patient for any
infusion or injection service to be provided at a hospital-based
outpatient infusion center located outside the hospital campus shall, at
the time of scheduling, provide the patient with a written notice
disclosing that such patient may incur financial liability for such service
that is greater than the financial liability such patient would incur for
such service if such service were provided at a non-hospital-based
infusion center.
Sec. 216. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) For the purposes of this
section:
(1) "Campus" has the same meaning as provided in section 19a-508c
of the general statutes;
(2) "Hospital" has the same meaning as provided in section 19a-490
of the general statutes;
(3) "Infusion center" means a site that offers intravenous infusions
and intramuscular or subcutaneous injections of medications, fluids or
biological products for complex medical conditions, including, but not
limited to, cancers and autoimmune disorders;
Public Act No. 26-68 303 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(4) "Utilization review" has the same meaning as provided in section
38a-591a of the general statutes; and
(5) "Utilization review company" has the same meaning as provided
in section 38a-591a of the general statutes.
(b) Each insurer, health care center, hospital service corporation,
medical service corporation, fraternal benefit society or other entity that
delivers, issues for delivery, renews, amends or continues an individual
or group health insurance policy in this state providing coverage of the
type specified in subdivisions (1), (2), (4), (11) and (12) of section 38a-469
of the general statutes, or utilization review company that conducts
utilization review for such insurer, center, corporation, society or entity,
and issues prior authorization for, or precertifies, any infusion or
injection service to be provided at an infusion center on or after January
1, 2027, shall, at the time of issuing such prior authorization or
precertification for such service, provide the covered person with
written notice disclosing that if such service is provided at any hospital-
based outpatient infusion center located outside the hospital campus,
such covered person may incur financial liability that is greater than the
financial liability such covered person would incur for such service if
such service were provided at a non-hospital-based infusion center.
Sec. 217. (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Campus" has the same meaning as provided in section 19a-508c
of the general statutes;
(2) "Facility fee" has the same meaning as provided in section 19a-
508c of the general statutes;
(3) "Hospital" has the same meaning as provided in section 19a-490
of the general statutes;
(4) "Infusion center" means a site that offers intravenous infusions
Public Act No. 26-68 304 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
and intramuscular or subcutaneous injections of medications, fluids or
biological products for complex medical conditions, including, but not
limited to, cancers and autoimmune disorders; and
(5) "Surprise bill" has the same meaning as provided in section 38a-
477aa of the general statutes.
(b) The Insurance Department, in consultation with the Office of the
Healthcare Advocate, shall conduct a study of (1) potential methods to
lower the costs associated with infusion and injection services provided
at hospital-based outpatient infusion centers located outside hospital
campuses, (2) appropriate patient protections for stop-loss insurance
coverage used in conjunction with self-funded employee health benefit
plans, and (3) surprise bills for ground ambulance services.
(c) Not later than October 1, 2027, the Insurance Department shall
submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the
general statutes, to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to insurance on the
results and recommendations of the study conducted pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section. Such report shall include, but need not be
limited to, recommendations concerning:
(1) Whether payments for services provided at an infusion center
should be (A) set at not greater than ten per cent above the Medicare
average sales price calculated in accordance with 42 CFR 414.904, as
amended from time to time, or a different reimbursement rate payable
under Medicare, or (B) based on data from the all-payer claims database
established under section 19a-755a of the general statutes; and
(2) Whether a facility fee for services provided at an infusion center
should be prohibited.
Sec. 218. Subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 38a-477i of the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
Public Act No. 26-68 305 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(2) "Anti-steering clause" means any provision, including, but not
limited to, any utilization management provision, in a health care
contract that restricts the ability of the health carrier or health plan
administrator from encouraging an enrollee to obtain a health care
service from a competitor of a hospital or health system, including
offering incentives to encourage enrollees to utilize specific health care
providers such as centers of excellence or any other pay-for-
performance program;
Sec. 219. Section 12-71e of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026, and
applicable to assessment years commencing on or after October 1, 2026):
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of any special act, municipal
charter or home rule ordinance, (1) for the assessment year commencing
October 1, 2016, the mill rate for motor vehicles shall not exceed 39 mills,
(2) for the assessment years commencing October 1, 2017, to October 1,
2020, inclusive, the mill rate for motor vehicles shall not exceed 45 mills,
and (3) for the assessment year commencing October 1, 2021, and each
assessment year thereafter, the mill rate for motor vehicles shall not
exceed 32.46 mills.
(b) Any municipality or district may establish a mill rate for motor
vehicles that is equal to or lower than 32.46 mills, including zero mills.
Such mill rate may be different from the mill rate for real property and
personal property other than motor vehicles to comply with the
provisions of this section, provided the mill rate for motor vehicles is
lower than the mill rate for real property and personal property. No
district or borough may set a motor vehicle mill rate that if combined
with the motor vehicle mill rate of the town, city, consolidated town and
city or consolidated town and borough in which such district or
borough is located would result in a combined motor vehicle mill rate
Public Act No. 26-68 306 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(1) above 39 mills for the assessment year commencing October 1, 2016,
(2) above 45 mills for the assessment years commencing October 1, 2017,
to October 1, 2020, inclusive, or (3) above 32.46 mills for the assessment
year commencing October 1, 2021, and each assessment year thereafter.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of any special act, municipal
charter or home rule ordinance, a municipality or district that set a
motor vehicle mill rate prior to May 7, 2022, for the assessment year
commencing October 1, 2021, may, by vote of its legislative body, or if
the legislative body is a town meeting, the board of selectmen, revise
such mill rate to meet the requirements of this section, provided such
revision occurs not later than June 15, 2022.
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 12-112, any board of
assessment appeals of a municipality that mailed or distributed, prior to
October 31, 2017, bills to taxpayers for motor vehicle property taxes
based on assessments made for the assessment year commencing
October 1, 2016, shall hear or entertain any appeals related to such
assessments not later than December 15, 2017.
(e) The Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management shall notify
the chief executive officer of each municipality:
(1) Annually, (A) of the municipality's option to reduce the mill rate
for motor vehicles to lower than 32.46 mills, including zero mills, and
(B) that such mill rate may be different from the mill rate for real
property and personal property other than motor vehicles to comply
with the provisions of this section, provided the mill rate for motor
vehicles is lower than the mill rate for real property and personal
property; and
(2) In advance of the implementation of a municipality's revaluation
pursuant to section 12-62, of the municipality's option to consider and
evaluate the reduction of the mill rate for motor vehicles in the same
Public Act No. 26-68 307 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
fiscal year in which the revaluation is implemented.
(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this
section and subdivision (1) of subsection (e) of this section, the city of
Bridgeport may establish a mill rate for motor vehicles that is equal to
or greater than the mill rate for real property and personal property,
provided such motor vehicle mill rate shall not exceed 32.46 mills.
[(f)] (g) For the purposes of this section, "municipality" means any
town, city, borough, consolidated town and city, consolidated town and
borough and "district" has the same meaning as provided in section 7-
324.
Sec. 220. (Effective from passage) The Legislative Commissioners' Office
shall, in codifying the provisions of this act, make such technical,
grammatical and punctuation changes as are necessary to carry out the
purposes of this act, including, but not limited to, correcting inaccurate
internal references.
Sec. 221. Section 3-13m of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(a) For purposes of this section, "virtual currency" has the same
meaning as provided in section 36a-596.
[Neither] (b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section,
neither the state nor any political subdivision of the state shall (1) accept
or require payment in the form of virtual currency for an amount due to
the state or the political subdivision, [or (2) purchase, hold, invest in or]
(2) establish a reserve of virtual currency, [. For purposes of this section,
"virtual currency" has the same meaning as provided in section 36a-596.]
or (3) purchase, hold or invest in a reserve of virtual currency.
(c) The state may invest in regulated securities comprised of virtual
Public Act No. 26-68 308 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
currency or companies, entities or funds that hold investments in virtual
currency, provided any such state investment (1) is made solely through
a company, entity or fund that is regulated by a state or federal
regulatory authority or equivalent foreign jurisdiction; (2) does not
constitute the establishment of a reserve of virtual currency for
transactional or treasury purposes; (3) complies with all applicable
fiduciary, investment and risk management standards otherwise
required by law; and (4) complies with the investment policy statement
established pursuant to section 3-13b and any additional standards for
custody, capitalization or compliance established by the Treasurer.
Sec. 222. Subsection (a) of section 5-142 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) If any member of the Division of State Police within the
Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection or of any
correctional institution, or any institution or facility of the Department
of Mental Health and Addiction Services giving care and treatment to
persons afflicted with a mental disorder or disease, or any institution for
the care and treatment of persons afflicted with any mental defect, or
any full-time enforcement officer of the Department of Energy and
Environmental Protection, the Department of Motor Vehicles, the
Department of Consumer Protection who carries out the duties and
responsibilities of sections 30-2 to 30-68m, inclusive, Adult Probation
Services, the division within the Department of Administrative Services
that carries out construction services or the Board of Pardons and
Paroles, any probation officer for juveniles or any employee of any
juvenile detention home, any member of the police or fire security force
of The University of Connecticut, any member of the police or fire
security force of Bradley International Airport, any member of the Office
of State Capitol Police or any person appointed under section 29-18 as a
special policeman for the State Capitol building and grounds and the
Public Act No. 26-68 309 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Legislative Office Building and parking garage and related structures
and facilities and other areas under the supervision and control of the
Joint Committee on Legislative Management, the Chief State's Attorney,
the Chief Public Defender, the Deputy Chief State's Attorney, the
Deputy Chief Public Defender, any state's attorney, any assistant state's
attorney or deputy assistant state's attorney, any public defender,
assistant public defender or deputy assistant public defender, any chief
inspector or inspector appointed under section 51-286 or any staff
member or employee of the Division of Criminal Justice or of the
Division of Public Defender Services, or any Judicial Department
employee, or any health care provider employed at a state-operated
health care facility or institution that providers direct patient care,
sustains any injury (1) while making an arrest or in the actual
performance of such police duties or guard duties or fire duties or
inspection duties, or prosecution or public defender or courthouse
duties, or while attending or restraining an inmate of any such
institution or as a result of being assaulted in the performance of such
person's duty, or while responding to an emergency or code at a
correctional institution, and (2) that is a direct result of the special
hazards inherent in such duties, the state shall pay all necessary medical
and hospital expenses resulting from such injury. For purposes of this
subsection, "health care provider" means an individual directly
employed by a state agency who is involved in direct patient care. If
total incapacity results from such injury, such person shall be removed
from the active payroll the first day of incapacity, exclusive of the day
of injury, and placed on an inactive payroll. Such person shall continue
to receive the full salary that such person was receiving at the time of
injury subject to all salary benefits of active employees, including annual
increments, and all salary adjustments, including salary deductions,
required in the case of active employees, for a period of two hundred
sixty weeks from the date of the beginning of such incapacity.
Thereafter, such person shall be removed from the payroll and shall
receive compensation at the rate of fifty per cent of the salary that such
Public Act No. 26-68 310 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
person was receiving at the expiration of said two hundred sixty weeks
as long as such person remains so disabled, except that any such person
who is a member of the Division of State Police within the Department
of Emergency Services and Public Protection shall receive compensation
at the rate of sixty-five per cent of such salary as long as such person
remains so disabled. Such benefits shall be payable to a member of the
Division of State Police after two hundred sixty weeks of disability only
if the member elects in writing to receive such benefits in lieu of any
benefits payable to the employee under the state employees retirement
system. In the event that such disabled member of the Division of State
Police elects the compensation provided under this subsection, no
benefits shall be payable under chapter 568 or the state employees
retirement system until the former of the employee's death or recovery
from such disability. The provisions of section 31-293 shall apply to any
such payments, and the state of Connecticut is authorized to bring an
action or join in an action as provided by said section for reimbursement
of moneys paid and which it is obligated to pay under the terms of this
subsection. All other provisions of the workers' compensation law not
inconsistent with this subsection, including the specific indemnities and
provisions for hearing and appeal, shall be available to any such state
employee or the dependents of such a deceased employee. All payments
of compensation made to a state employee under this subsection shall
be charged to the appropriation provided for compensation awards to
state employees. On and after October 1, 1991, any full-time officer of
the Department of Energy and Environmental Protection, the
Department of Motor Vehicles, the Department of Consumer Protection
who carries out the duties and responsibilities of sections 30-2 to 30-68m,
inclusive, Adult Probation Services, the division within the Department
of Administrative Services that carries out construction services or the
Board of Pardons and Paroles, any probation officer for juveniles or any
employee of any juvenile detention home, the Chief State's Attorney, the
Chief Public Defender, the Deputy Chief State's Attorney, the Deputy
Chief Public Defender, any state's attorney, assistant state's attorney or
Public Act No. 26-68 311 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
deputy assistant state's attorney, any public defender, assistant public
defender or deputy assistant public defender, any chief inspector or
inspector appointed under section 51-286 or any staff member or
employee of the Division of Criminal Justice or the Division of Public
Defender Services, or any Judicial Department employee who sustains
any injury in the course and scope of such person's employment shall
be paid compensation in accordance with the provisions of section 5-143
and chapter 568, except, if such injury is sustained as a result of being
assaulted in the performance of such person's duty, any such person
shall be compensated pursuant to the provisions of this subsection.
Sec. 223. Section 12-217jj of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective from passage):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Revenue Services.
(2) "Department" means the Department of Economic and
Community Development.
(3) (A) "Qualified production" means entertainment content created
in whole or in part within the state, including motion pictures, except as
otherwise provided in this subparagraph; documentaries; long-form,
specials, mini-series, series, sound recordings, videos and music videos
and interstitials television programming; interactive television;
relocated television production; interactive games; videogames;
commercials; any format of digital media, including an interactive web
site, created for distribution or exhibition to the general public; and any
trailer, pilot, video teaser or demo created primarily to stimulate the
sale, marketing, promotion or exploitation of future investment in either
a product or a qualified production via any means and media in any
digital media format, film or videotape, provided such program meets
Public Act No. 26-68 312 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
all the underlying criteria of a qualified production. For state fiscal years
ending on or after June 30, 2014, "qualified production" shall not include
a motion picture that has not been designated as a state-certified
qualified production prior to July 1, 2013, and no tax credit voucher for
such motion picture may be issued for such motion picture, except, for
state fiscal years ending on or after June 30, 2015, "qualified production"
shall include a motion picture for which twenty-five per cent or more of
the principal photography shooting days are in this state at a facility that
receives not less than twenty-five million dollars in private investment
and opens for business on or after July 1, 2013, and a tax credit voucher
may be issued for such motion picture.
(B) "Qualified production" shall not include any ongoing television
program created primarily as news, weather or financial market reports;
a production featuring current events, other than a relocated television
production, sporting events, an awards show or other gala event; a
production whose sole purpose is fundraising; a long-form production
that primarily markets a product or service; a production used for
corporate training or in-house corporate advertising or other similar
productions; or any production for which records are required to be
maintained under 18 USC 2257, as amended from time to time, with
respect to sexually explicit content.
(4) "Eligible production company" means a corporation, partnership,
limited liability company, or other business entity engaged in the
business of producing qualified productions on a one-time or ongoing
basis, and qualified by the Secretary of the State to engage in business
in the state.
(5) "Production expenses or costs" means all expenditures clearly and
demonstrably incurred in the state in the preproduction, production or
postproduction costs of a qualified production, including:
(A) Expenditures incurred in the state in the form of either
Public Act No. 26-68 313 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
compensation or purchases including production work, production
equipment not eligible for the infrastructure tax credit provided in
section 12-217kk, production software, postproduction work,
postproduction equipment, postproduction software, set design, set
construction, props, lighting, wardrobe, makeup, makeup accessories,
special effects, visual effects, audio effects, film processing, music,
sound mixing, editing, location fees, soundstages and any and all other
costs or services directly incurred in connection with a state-certified
qualified production;
(B) Expenditures for distribution, including preproduction,
production or postproduction costs relating to the creation of trailers,
marketing videos, commercials, point-of-purchase videos and any and
all content created on film or digital media, including the duplication of
films, videos, CDs, DVDs and any and all digital files now in existence
and those yet to be created for mass consumer consumption; the
purchase, by a company in the state, of any and all equipment relating
to the duplication or mass market distribution of any content created or
produced in the state by any digital media format which is now in use
and those formats yet to be created for mass consumer consumption;
and
(C) "Production expenses or costs" does not include the following: (i)
On and after January 1, 2008, compensation in excess of fifteen million
dollars paid to any individual or entity representing an individual, for
services provided in the production of a qualified production and on or
after January 1, 2010, compensation subject to Connecticut personal
income tax in excess of twenty million dollars paid in the aggregate to
any individuals or entities representing individuals, for star talent
provided in the production of a qualified production; (ii) media buys,
promotional events or gifts or public relations associated with the
promotion or marketing of any qualified production; (iii) deferred,
leveraged or profit participation costs relating to any and all personnel
Public Act No. 26-68 314 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
associated with any and all aspects of the production, including, but not
limited to, producer fees, director fees, talent fees and writer fees; (iv)
costs relating to the transfer of the production tax credits; (v) any
amounts paid to persons or businesses as a result of their participation
in profits from the exploitation of the qualified production; and (vi) any
expenses or costs relating to an independent certification, as required by
subsection (h) of this section, or as the department may otherwise
require, pertaining to the amount of production expenses or costs set
forth by an eligible production company in its application for a
production tax credit.
(6) "Sound recording" means a recording of music, poetry or spoken-
word performance, but does not include the audio portions of dialogue
or words spoken and recorded as part of a motion picture, video,
theatrical production, television news coverage or athletic event.
(7) "State-certified qualified production" means a qualified
production produced by an eligible production company that (A) is in
compliance with regulations adopted pursuant to subsection (l) of this
section, (B) is authorized to conduct business in this state, and (C) has
been approved by the department as qualifying for a production tax
credit under this section.
(8) "Interactive web site" means a web site, the production expenses
or costs of which (A) exceed five hundred thousand dollars per income
year, and (B) is primarily (i) interactive games or end user applications,
or (ii) animation, simulation, sound, graphics, story lines or video
created or repurposed for distribution over the Internet. An interactive
web site does not include a web site primarily used for institutional,
private, industrial, retail or wholesale marketing or promotional
purposes, or which contains obscene content.
(9) "Post-certification remedy" means the recapture, disallowance,
recovery, reduction, repayment, forfeiture, decertification or any other
Public Act No. 26-68 315 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
remedy that would have the effect of reducing or otherwise limiting the
use of a tax credit provided by this section.
(10) "Compensation" means base salary or wages and does not
include bonus pay, stock options, restricted stock units or similar
arrangements.
(11) "Relocated television production" means:
(A) An ongoing television program all of the prior seasons of which
were filmed outside this state, and may include current events shows,
except those referenced in subparagraph (B)(i) of this subdivision.
(B) An eligible production company's television programming in this
state that (i) is not a general news program, sporting event or game
broadcast, and (ii) is created at a qualified production facility that has
had a minimum investment of twenty-five million dollars made by such
eligible production company on or after January 1, 2012, at which
facility the eligible production company creates ongoing television
programming as defined in subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, and
creates at least two hundred new jobs in Connecticut on or after January
1, 2012. For purposes of this subdivision, "new job" means a full-time
job, as defined in section 12-217ii, that did not exist in this state prior to
January 1, 2012, and is filled by a new employee, and "new employee"
includes a person who was employed outside this state by the eligible
production company prior to January 1, 2012, but does not include a
person who was employed in this state by the eligible production
company or a related person, as defined in section 12-217ii, with respect
to the eligible production company during the prior twelve months.
(C) A relocated television production may be a state-certified
qualified production for not more than ten successive income years,
after which period the eligible production company shall be ineligible
to resubmit an application for certification.
Public Act No. 26-68 316 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(b) (1) The Department of Economic and Community Development
shall administer a system of tax credit vouchers within the resources,
requirements and purposes of this section for eligible production
companies producing a state-certified qualified production in the state.
(2) Any eligible production company incurring production expenses
or costs shall be eligible for a credit (A) for income years commencing
on or after January 1, 2010, but prior to January 1, 2018, against the tax
imposed under chapter 207 or this chapter, (B) for income years
commencing on or after January 1, 2018, but prior to January 1, 2022,
against the tax imposed under chapter 207 or 211 or this chapter, and
(C) for income years commencing on or after January 1, 2022, against the
tax imposed under chapter 207, 211, 219 or this chapter, as follows: (i)
For any such company incurring such expenses or costs of not less than
one hundred thousand dollars, but not more than five hundred
thousand dollars, a credit equal to ten per cent of such expenses or costs,
(ii) for any such company incurring such expenses or costs of more than
five hundred thousand dollars, but not more than one million dollars, a
credit equal to fifteen per cent of such expenses or costs, and (iii) for any
such company incurring such expenses or costs of more than one million
dollars, a credit equal to thirty per cent of such expenses or costs.
(c) No eligible production company incurring an amount of
production expenses or costs that qualifies for such credit shall be
eligible for such credit unless on or after January 1, 2010, such company
conducts (1) not less than fifty per cent of principal photography days
within the state, or (2) expends not less than fifty per cent of
postproduction costs within the state, or (3) expends not less than one
million dollars of postproduction costs within the state. The provisions
of this subsection shall not apply to an eligible production company that
produces an interactive Internet web site created for distribution or
exhibition to the general public.
(d) For income years commencing on or after January 1, 2010, no
Public Act No. 26-68 317 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
expenses or costs incurred outside the state and used within the state
shall be eligible for a credit, and one hundred per cent of such expenses
or costs shall be counted toward such credit when incurred within the
state and used within the state.
(e) (1) On and after July 1, 2006, and for income years commencing
on or after January 1, 2006, any credit allowed pursuant to this section
may be sold, assigned or otherwise transferred, in whole or in part, to
one or more taxpayers, provided (A) no credit, after issuance, may be
sold, assigned or otherwise transferred, in whole or in part, more than
three times, (B) in the case of a credit allowed for the income year
commencing on or after January 1, 2011, but prior to January 1, 2012,
any entity that is not subject to tax under chapter 207 or this chapter may
transfer not more than fifty per cent of such credit in any one income
year, and (C) in the case of a credit allowed for an income year
commencing on or after January 1, 2012, any entity that is not subject to
tax under chapter 207 or this chapter may transfer not more than
twenty-five per cent of such credit in any one income year.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this
subsection, any entity that is not subject to tax under this chapter or
chapter 207 shall not be subject to the limitations on the transfer of
credits provided in subparagraphs (B) and (C) of said subdivision (1),
provided such entity owns not less than fifty per cent, directly or
indirectly, of a business entity, as defined in section 12-284b.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this
subsection, any qualified production that is created in whole or in
significant part, as determined by the Commissioner of Economic and
Community Development, at a qualified production facility shall not be
subject to the limitations of subparagraph (B) or (C) of said subdivision
(1). For purposes of this subdivision, "qualified production facility"
means a facility (A) located in this state, (B) intended for film, television
or digital media production, and (C) that has had a minimum
Public Act No. 26-68 318 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
investment of three million dollars, or less if the Commissioner of
Economic and Community Development determines such facility
otherwise qualifies.
(4) (A) For the income year commencing on or after January 1, 2018,
but prior to January 1, 2019, any credit that is sold, assigned or otherwise
transferred, in whole or in part, to one or more taxpayers pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this subsection may be claimed against the tax
imposed under chapter 211 only if there is common ownership of at least
fifty per cent between such taxpayer and the eligible production
company that sold, assigned or otherwise transferred such credit. Such
taxpayer may only claim ninety-two per cent of the amount of such
credit entered by the department on the production tax credit voucher.
(B) For income years commencing on or after January 1, 2019, any
credit that is sold, assigned or otherwise transferred, in whole or in part,
to one or more taxpayers pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection,
which credit is claimed against the tax imposed under chapter 211, shall
be subject to the following limits:
(i) The taxpayer may only claim ninety-five per cent of the amount of
such credit entered by the department on the production tax credit
voucher; and
(ii) If there is common ownership of at least fifty per cent between
such taxpayer and the eligible production company that sold, assigned
or otherwise transferred such credit, such taxpayer may only claim
ninety-two per cent of the amount of such credit entered by the
department on the production tax credit voucher.
(5) (A) For income years commencing on or after January 1, 2022, but
prior to January 1, 2024, and on or after January 1, [2026] 2028, any credit
that is claimed against the tax imposed under chapter 219 shall be
subject to the following limits:
Public Act No. 26-68 319 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(i) Any credit that is sold, assigned or otherwise transferred, in whole
or in part, to one or more taxpayers pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection may be claimed against the tax imposed under chapter 219
only if there is common ownership of at least fifty per cent between such
taxpayer and the eligible production company that sold, assigned or
otherwise transferred such credit; and
(ii) The eligible production company or taxpayer claiming the credit
against the tax imposed under chapter 219 may only claim seventy-eight
per cent of the amount of such credit entered by the department on the
production tax credit voucher.
(B) For income years commencing on or after January 1, 2024, but
prior to January 1, [2026] 2028, any credit that is claimed against the tax
imposed under chapter 219 shall be subject to the following limits:
(i) Any credit that is sold, assigned or otherwise transferred, in whole
or in part, to one or more taxpayers pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection may be claimed against the tax imposed under chapter 219
only if there is common ownership of at least fifty per cent between such
taxpayer and the eligible production company that sold, assigned or
otherwise transferred such credit; and
(ii) The eligible production company or taxpayer claiming the credit
against the tax imposed under chapter 219 may only claim ninety-two
per cent of the amount of such credit entered by the department on the
production tax credit voucher.
(f) (1) On and after July 1, 2006, and for income years commencing on
or after January 1, 2006, but prior to January 1, 2015, all or part of any
such credit allowed under this section may be claimed against the tax
imposed under chapter 207 or this chapter for the income year in which
the production expenses or costs were incurred, or in the three
immediately succeeding income years.
Public Act No. 26-68 320 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(2) For production tax credit vouchers issued on or after July 1, 2015,
but prior to January 1, 2018, all or part of any such credit may be claimed
against the tax imposed under chapter 207 or this chapter, for the
income year in which the production expenses or costs were incurred,
or in the five immediately succeeding income years.
(3) For production tax credit vouchers issued on or after July 1, 2018,
but prior to January 1, 2022, all or part of any such credit may be claimed
against the tax imposed under chapter 207 or 211 or this chapter, for the
income year in which the production expenses or costs were incurred,
or in the five immediately succeeding income years.
(4) For production tax credit vouchers issued on or after January 1,
2022, all or part of any such credit may be claimed against the tax
imposed under chapter 207, 211, 219 or this chapter, for the income year
in which the production expenses or costs were incurred, or in the five
immediately succeeding income years.
(g) Any production tax credit allowed under this section shall be
nonrefundable.
(h) (1) An eligible production company shall apply to the department
for a tax credit voucher on an annual basis, but not later than ninety days
after the first production expenses or costs are incurred in the
production of a qualified production, and shall provide with such
application such information as the department may require to
determine such company's eligibility to claim a credit under this section.
No production expenses or costs may be listed more than once for
purposes of the tax credit voucher pursuant to this section or section 12-
217kk, and if a production expense or cost has been included in a claim
for a credit, such production expense or cost may not be included in any
subsequent claim for a credit.
(2) Not later than ninety days after the end of the annual period, or
Public Act No. 26-68 321 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
after the completion of the independent certification, an eligible
production company shall apply to the department for a production tax
credit voucher, and shall provide with such application (A) a report that
includes the number of full-time jobs and the number of part-time jobs
created by the eligible production company during the annual period, a
description of each such job and an explanation of what the eligible
production company considers to be job creation for purposes of the
report, and (B) such information and independent certification as the
department may require pertaining to the amount of such company's
production expenses or costs. Such independent certification shall be
provided by an audit professional chosen from a list compiled by the
department. If the department determines that such company is eligible
to be issued a production tax credit voucher, the department shall enter
on the voucher the amount of production expenses or costs that has been
established to the satisfaction of the department and the amount of such
company's credit under this section. The department shall provide a
copy of such voucher to the commissioner, upon request.
(3) The department shall charge a reasonable and nonrefundable
administrative fee sufficient to cover the department's costs to analyze
applications submitted under this section.
(i) If an eligible production company sells, assigns or otherwise
transfers a credit under this section to another taxpayer, the transferor
and transferee shall jointly submit written notification of such transfer
to the department not later than thirty days after such transfer. If such
transferee sells, assigns or otherwise transfers a credit under this section
to a subsequent transferee, such transferee and such subsequent
transferee shall jointly submit written notification of such transfer to the
department not later than thirty days after such transfer. The
notification after each transfer shall include the credit voucher number,
the date of transfer, the amount of such credit transferred, the tax credit
balance before and after the transfer, the tax identification numbers for
Public Act No. 26-68 322 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
both the transferor and the transferee, and any other information
required by the department. Failure to comply with this subsection will
result in a disallowance of the tax credit until there is full compliance on
the part of the transferor and the transferee, and for a second or third
transfer, on the part of all subsequent transferors and transferees. The
department shall provide a copy of the notification of assignment to the
commissioner upon request.
(j) Any eligible production company that submits information to the
department that it knows to be fraudulent or false shall, in addition to
any other penalties provided by law, be liable for a penalty equal to the
amount of such company's credit entered on the production tax credit
voucher issued under this section.
(k) No tax credits transferred pursuant to this section shall be subject
to a post-certification remedy, and the department and the
commissioner shall have no right, except in the case of possible material
misrepresentation or fraud, to conduct any further or additional review,
examination or audit of the expenditures or costs for which such tax
credits were issued. The sole and exclusive remedy of the department
and the commissioner shall be to seek collection of the amount of such
tax credits from the entity that committed the fraud or
misrepresentation.
(l) The department, in consultation with the commissioner, may
adopt regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, as
may be necessary for the administration of this section.
Sec. 224. (NEW) (Effective from passage and applicable to assessment years
commencing on or after October 1, 2027) (a) Except as provided in
subsection (c) of this section, any municipality may, upon approval of
its legislative body or, in a municipality where the legislative body is a
town meeting, by vote of the board of selectmen, provide an exemption
from property tax applicable to the assessed value of any dwelling
Public Act No. 26-68 323 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
declared to be the primary residence of (1) the owner or owners of such
dwelling, or (2) any person or persons for whom such dwelling is held
in trust, in accordance with the provisions of subsection (b) of this
section, in the amount of fifty thousand dollars of the assessed value of
such dwelling. Such municipality may require a term of residency to be
eligible for an exemption under this section.
(b) Any owner or owners of a dwelling, or person or persons for
whom such dwelling is held in trust, claiming the exemption provided
pursuant to this section for any assessment year shall, on or before the
first day of November in such assessment year, file with the assessor or
board of assessors in the municipality in which such dwelling is located
an application claiming such exemption. Such application shall be made
in the manner prescribed and on a form prepared for such purpose by
the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, and shall include,
but not be limited to, a declaration that (1) such dwelling is the primary
residence of the applicant or applicants, (2) the applicant or applicants
have no other primary residence, and (3) the applicant or applicants
have not claimed the exemption provided in this section for more than
one such dwelling in the same assessment year, and any documentation
the secretary deems necessary to verify such declaration. The secretary
shall make such application available to the public on the Internet web
site of the Office of Policy and Management. Failure to file such
application in the manner and form provided by the secretary within
the time limit prescribed shall constitute a waiver of the right to such
exemption for such assessment year.
(c) No municipality shall provide an exemption from property tax
pursuant to this section and an exemption from property tax pursuant
to section 12-81oo of the general statutes for the same assessment year.
(d) As used in this section, "dwelling" means a single-family
dwelling, condominium, as defined in section 47-68a of the general
statutes, or unit in a common interest community, as defined in section
Public Act No. 26-68 324 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
47-202 of the general statutes.
Sec. 225. Section 12-81oo of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective from passage and applicable to assessment years commencing on or
after October 1, 2027):
(a) [Any] Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, any
municipality may, upon approval by its legislative body or, in a
municipality where the legislative body is a town meeting, by vote of
the board of selectmen, provide an exemption from property tax of not
less than five per cent and not more than thirty-five per cent of the
assessed value, for owner-occupied dwellings, including
condominiums, as defined in section 47-68a, and units in a common
interest community, as defined in section 47-202, that are the primary
residences of such owners and consist of not more than two units. Such
municipality may also require a term of residency for owners to be
eligible for an exemption under this section or an assessed value
maximum for dwellings to be eligible for an exemption under this
section, or both.
(b) No municipality shall provide an exemption from property tax
pursuant to this section and an exemption from property tax pursuant
to section 224 of this act for the same assessment year.
Sec. 226. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) As used in this section and
sections 227 to 237, inclusive, of this act, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(1) "Affiliate" means a person, entity or organization controlling,
controlled by or under common control with another person, entity or
organization. "Affiliate" does not include a medical foundation
organized under chapter 594b of the general statutes. As used in this
subdivision, "controlled by" means the other person, entity or
Public Act No. 26-68 325 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
organization, or one of such other person's, entity's or organization's
affiliates, officers or management employees, acting in such capacity,
acts as a general partner of a general or limited partnership or manager
of a limited liability company.
(2) "Applicant" means any person or health care facility that applies
for a certificate of need pursuant to section 231 or 232 of this act.
(3) "Bed capacity" means the total number of inpatient beds in a
facility licensed by the Department of Public Health under sections 19a-
490 to 19a-503, inclusive, of the general statutes.
(4) "Certificate of need" means a certificate issued pursuant to section
231 or 232 of this act.
(5) "Change of ownership or control" means any change in the
ownership or beneficial ownership or the change of control of an entity,
including (A) a corporate merger, (B) an acquisition of one or more
entities by direct or indirect purchase in any manner of not less than
twenty-five per cent of the assets, equity or voting shares of a health care
facility, (C) a transfer of control of a board of directors or governing
body, or (D) a real estate sale or lease agreement involving not less than
twenty per cent of the total assets of a hospital.
(6) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Public Health, or the
commissioner's designee.
(7) "Day" means a calendar day.
(8) "Department" means the Department of Public Health.
(9) "Free clinic" means a private, nonprofit community-based
organization that provides medical, dental, pharmaceutical or mental
health services at reduced cost or no cost to low-income, uninsured and
underinsured individuals.
Public Act No. 26-68 326 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(10) "Health care facility" means (A) a hospital, including any satellite
location licensed by the Department of Public Health under chapter
368v of the general statutes; (B) specialty hospital; (C) freestanding
emergency department; (D) outpatient surgical facility (i) as defined in
section 19a-493b of the general statutes and licensed under chapter 368v
of the general statutes, or (ii) as established by a short-term acute care
general hospital licensed by the department under said chapter; (E) a
hospital or other facility or institution operated by the state that
provides services that are eligible for reimbursement under Title XVIII
or XIX of the federal Social Security Act, 42 USC 301, as amended from
time to time; (F) a central service facility; (G) a mental health facility; (H)
a substance abuse treatment facility; (I) any other facility requiring
certificate of need review pursuant to section 229 of this act; and (J) any
parent company, subsidiary, affiliate or joint venture, or any
combination thereof, of any facility described in subparagraphs (A) to
(J), inclusive, of this subdivision.
(11) "Large group practice" means eight or more full-time equivalent
physicians, legally organized in a partnership, professional corporation,
limited liability company formed to render professional services,
medical foundation, not-for-profit corporation, faculty practice plan or
other similar entity (A) in which each physician who is a member of the
group provides substantially the full range of services that the physician
routinely provides, including, but not limited to, medical care,
consultation, diagnosis or treatment, through the joint use of shared
office space, facilities, equipment or personnel; (B) for which
substantially all of the services of the physicians who are members of
the group are provided through the group and are billed in the name of
the group practice and amounts so received are treated as receipts of the
group; or (C) in which the overhead expenses of, and the income from,
the group are distributed in accordance with methods previously
determined by members of the group. An entity that otherwise meets
the definition of group practice under this section shall be considered a
Public Act No. 26-68 327 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
group practice although its shareholders, partners or owners of the
group practice include single-physician professional corporations,
limited liability companies formed to render professional services or
other entities in which beneficial owners are individual physicians.
(12) "Panel" means the three-person panel established under section
227 of this act to decide all certificate of need applications.
(13) "Person" means any individual, partnership, corporation, limited
liability company, association, governmental subdivision, agency or
public or private organization of any character. "Person" does not
include the agency conducting the certificate of need application
proceeding under section 231 or 232 of this act.
(14) "Physician" means an individual licensed to practice medicine
pursuant to chapter 370 of the general statutes.
(15) "Program" means the certificate of need program established
pursuant to section 228 of this act.
Sec. 227. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) There is established
within the department, for administrative purposes only, a panel that
shall make all final decisions and rulings regarding certificate of need
applications submitted on and after July 1, 2027, pursuant to section 231
or 232 of this act, civil penalties and cease and desist orders imposed on
and after July 1, 2027, pursuant to section 235 of this act, approvals of
policies and procedures effective on and after July 1, 2027, pursuant to
section 236 of this act, hospital plans for continued access to care during
service termination on and after July 1, 2027, pursuant to section 237 of
this act, and sales of nonprofit hospitals pursuant to section 19a-486a of
the general statutes. The panel shall consist of three members, who shall
include (1) the Commissioner of Public Health, or the commissioner's
designee, who shall act as chairperson of the panel, (2) the Secretary of
the Office of Policy and Management, or the secretary's designee, and
Public Act No. 26-68 328 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(3) the Commissioner of Social Services, or the Commissioner of Social
Services' designee.
(b) On and after July 1, 2027, the panel shall hold monthly meetings
to review and decide any certificate of need application that has been
submitted to the panel at least five days before the meeting date. In
addition to the monthly meetings, the chairperson may at any time call
a special meeting of the panel to review and decide any application
prepared for presentation to the panel or any other matter appropriate
for panel review under this section or sections 228 to 237, inclusive, of
this act. The panel may cancel a monthly meeting if no application or
other business has been appropriately submitted with at least five days'
notice to the panel for review at such meeting.
Sec. 228. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) There is established
within the department a Certificate of Need Program that shall support
the review of certificate of need applications. The commissioner shall
designate a director who shall oversee the program.
(b) On and after July 1, 2027, (1) each person applying for a certificate
of need shall file an application with the Certificate of Need Program,
and (2) the program shall prepare a report regarding the certificate of
need application.
(c) On and after July 1, 2027, the Certificate of Need Program shall
make all determinations as to whether a certificate of need is required
pursuant to section 229 of this act.
(d) The Certificate of Need Program shall monitor compliance with
the provisions of sections 227 to 237, inclusive, of this act and with any
order or decision, including any conditions placed thereon, that is
issued by the panel. In any enforcement action made under section 235
of this act, the Certificate of Need Program shall present the allegations
set forth in the enforcement action at the public hearing before the panel.
Public Act No. 26-68 329 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 229. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) On and after July 1, 2027,
a certificate of need issued by the panel shall be required for:
(1) The establishment of a new health care facility;
(2) A change of ownership or control of a health care facility;
(3) A change of ownership or control of a large group practice to any
entity other than a (A) physician, or (B) group of two or more physicians
legally organized in a partnership, professional corporation or limited
liability company formed to render professional services and not
employed by or an affiliate of any hospital, medical foundation,
insurance company or other similar entity;
(4) The acquisition of computed tomography scanners, magnetic
resonance imaging scanners, positron emission tomography scanners or
positron emission tomography-computed tomography scanners, by any
person, physician, provider, short-term acute care general hospital or
children's hospital, except (A) as provided for in subdivision (18) of
subsection (b) of this section, and (B) a certificate of need issued by the
panel shall not be required where such scanner is a replacement for a
scanner that was previously acquired through certificate of need
approval or a certificate of need determination, including a replacement
scanner that has dual modalities or functionalities if the applicant
already offers similar imaging services for each of the scanner's
modalities or functionalities that will be utilized;
(5) An increase in the licensed bed capacity of a health care facility;
(6) The acquisition of equipment utilizing technology that has not
previously been utilized in the state;
(7) An increase of two or more operating rooms within any three-year
period by an outpatient surgical facility, as defined in section 19a-493b
of the general statutes, or by a short-term acute care general hospital;
Public Act No. 26-68 330 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(8) The establishment of cardiac services, including inpatient and
outpatient cardiac catheterization, interventional cardiology and
cardiovascular surgery; and
(9) The acquisition of nonhospital-based linear accelerators, except a
certificate of need issued by the panel shall not be required where such
accelerator is a replacement for an accelerator that was previously
acquired through certificate of need approval or a certificate of need
determination.
(b) On and after July 1, 2027, a certificate of need issued by the panel
shall not be required for:
(1) A health care facility owned and operated by the federal
government;
(2) The establishment of offices by a licensed private practitioner,
whether for individual or group practice, except when a certificate of
need is required in accordance with the requirements of section 19a-
493b of the general statutes or subdivision (3), (4) or (6) of subsection (a)
of this section;
(3) A health care facility operated by a religious group that
exclusively relies upon spiritual means through prayer for healing;
(4) Residential care homes, nursing homes and rest homes, as defined
in section 19a-490 of the general statutes;
(5) An assisted living services agency, as defined in section 19a-490 of
the general statutes;
(6) A home health agency, as defined in section 19a-490 of the general
statutes;
(7) Hospice services, as described in section 19a-122b of the general
statutes;
Public Act No. 26-68 331 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(8) An outpatient rehabilitation facility;
(9) Outpatient chronic dialysis services;
(10) Transplant services;
(11) A free clinic;
(12) A school-based health center and an expanded school health site,
as such terms are defined in section 19a-6r of the general statutes, a
community health center, as defined in section 19a-490a of the general
statutes, a not-for-profit outpatient clinic licensed in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 368v of the general statutes and a federally
qualified health center;
(13) A program licensed or funded exclusively by the Department of
Children and Families, provided such program is not a psychiatric
residential treatment facility;
(14) Any facility, institution or provider that is (A) operated as a
nonprofit or by the state, and (B) solely providing behavioral health or
substance use disorder treatment services;
(15) A health care facility operated by a nonprofit educational
institution exclusively for students, faculty and staff of such institution
and their dependents;
(16) An outpatient clinic or program operated exclusively by or
contracted to be operated exclusively by a municipality, municipal
agency, municipal board of education or a health district, as described
in section 19a-241 of the general statutes;
(17) A residential facility for persons with intellectual disability
licensed pursuant to section 17a-227 of the general statutes and certified
to participate in the Title XIX Medicaid program as an intermediate care
facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities;
Public Act No. 26-68 332 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(18) Replacement of existing computed tomography scanners,
magnetic resonance imaging scanners, positron emission tomography
scanners or positron emission tomography-computed tomography
scanners, if such equipment was acquired through certificate of need
approval or a certificate of need determination, provided a health care
facility, provider, physician or person notifies the Department of Public
Health of the date on which the equipment is replaced and the
disposition of the replaced equipment, including if a replacement
scanner has dual modalities or functionalities and the applicant already
offers similar imaging services for each of the equipment's modalities or
functionalities that will be utilized;
(19) Acquisition of cone-beam dental imaging equipment that is to be
used exclusively by a dentist licensed pursuant to chapter 379 of the
general statutes;
(20) The partial or total elimination of services provided by an
outpatient surgical facility, as defined in section 19a-493b of the general
statutes;
(21) The termination of services for which the Department of Public
Health has requested the facility to relinquish its license;
(22) Acquisition of any equipment by any person that is to be used
exclusively for scientific research, provided the equipment shall not be
used in the diagnosis, treatment or prevention of any medical condition
for humans;
(23) The establishment of a harm reduction center through the pilot
program established pursuant to section 17a-673c of the general
statutes;
(24) On or before June 30, 2028, a birth center, as defined in
section 19a-490 of the general statutes, that is enrolled as a provider in
the Connecticut medical assistance program, as defined in section 17b-
Public Act No. 26-68 333 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
245g of the general statutes;
(25) An association between a group practice and a management
services organization under which such management services
organization does not directly share in the profits or net revenue of the
group practice but rather is paid a fair market value through a contract
for services rendered; and
(26) The relocation of a health care facility within the same town or
within ten miles of the existing facility location, provided such
relocation will not result in a substantial change to the payer mix or
patient population served by the facility.
(c) On and after July 1, 2027, any person, health care facility or
institution that is unsure whether a certificate of need is required for a
particular proposal under this section shall send a letter to the
Certificate of Need Program that describes the proposal and requests
that the program make a determination as to whether a certificate of
need is required for such proposal. A person, health care facility or
institution making such request shall provide the program with any
information the program requests as part of its determination process.
The program shall provide a determination not later than thirty days
after receipt of such request.
(d) On and after July 1, 2027, any acquiring person or entity in a
change of ownership or control of a large group practice to any person
or entity that does not require a certificate of need pursuant to
subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of this section shall submit notices to
the program, in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner, of
such transfer consistent with this subsection.
(1) Not less than thirty days prior to the closing of a transaction, the
acquiring person or entity shall submit a notice for each such group
practice, in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner, setting
Public Act No. 26-68 334 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
forth: (A) The names and medical specialties of each physician
practicing medicine with the group practice; (B) the names of the
business entities that provide clinical or managerial services as part of
the group practice; (C) the address for each location where clinical
services are provided by the group practice; (D) a description of the
clinical services provided at each location of the group practice; (E) the
zip codes of the primary service area served by each location of the
group practice; and (F) the resulting name, ownership, and business
type of the group practice after the proposed change of ownership,
control or affiliation, including the name and business type of any
person or entity that will control, directly or indirectly, at least ten per
cent of the large group practice. The program shall, unless otherwise
prohibited by federal or state law, post such information on its Internet
web site.
(2) Not later than thirty days after the close of the transaction or after
the abandonment of such transaction, the acquiring person or entity
shall submit a report indicating the date on which the transaction closed
or was abandoned.
(3) When the provision of thirty days' notice pursuant to subdivision
(1) of this subsection is not practicable due to circumstances outside of
the acquiring person or entity's control, such as death, incapacity or
other exigent circumstances, the acquiring person or entity shall provide
notice to the program as soon as practicable but in no case later than
fourteen days after the close of the transaction.
(e) Not later than January 1, 2028, the commissioner shall report to
the Governor and, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of
the general statutes, to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public health
concerning the commissioner's recommendations, if any, regarding an
exemption from certificate of need requirements related to temporary
increases in licensed bed capacity of a hospital due to a surge in
Public Act No. 26-68 335 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
admissions that cannot be accommodated by the hospital's existing
licensed bed capacity.
Sec. 230. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) In any deliberation
involving a certificate of need application filed pursuant to section 231
of this act, the panel shall determine whether the applicant has
demonstrated, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the proposal is
in the public's interest. In making such determination, the panel shall
consider, consistent with any relevant regulations, policies or
procedures of the department, the following factors:
(1) Whether the proposal promotes delivery of high-quality care in
the primary service area of the applicant;
(2) Whether the proposal promotes access to health care services,
including Medicaid access, in the primary service area of the applicant;
(3) Whether the proposal promotes delivery of cost-effective care in
the primary service area of the applicant;
(4) Whether the proposal promotes financial stability of the health
care system, including, but not limited to, whether the proposal is
financially feasible for the applicant and whether there is any evidence
of prior financial mismanagement or misconduct by the applicant;
(5) Whether there is a clear public need for the proposal and the
services to be provided under the proposal; and
(6) Whether the proposal would result in an unnecessary duplication
of services.
(b) In analyzing whether a certificate of need application satisfies the
certificate of need criteria set forth in subsection (a) of this section, the
panel and the Certificate of Need Program may engage, when, in the
sole discretion of the director, an expert with specialized knowledge is
Public Act No. 26-68 336 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
required, any third-party consultant that the panel or program deems
necessary to analyze the application materials and proposal set forth in
the application pursuant to such criteria. All costs associated with such
third-party consultant shall be borne by the applicant, provided the total
costs for all consultants to the panel and the program under this
subsection for a single application shall not exceed one hundred
thousand dollars. Each third-party consultant engaged under this
subsection shall submit each invoice for consulting services directly to
the applicant for payment not later than thirty days after the issuance of
the invoice. The provisions of chapter 57 of the general statutes and
sections 4-212 to 4-219, inclusive, and 4e-19 of the general statutes shall
not apply to any retainer agreement executed pursuant to this
subsection.
(1) No consultant shall be retained in connection with the processing
of an application under the expedited review process described in
section 232 of this act unless such expedited application is referred for a
full review pursuant to subsection (g) of section 232 of this act.
(2) If the program determines that a consultant is necessary under this
subsection, the program shall provide notice to the applicant prior to
expending any money and provide the applicant the opportunity to
withdraw the application prior to incurring any consulting fees.
(3) Not later than July 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the
commissioner shall report to the Governor and, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to public health regarding all consultants engaged under this
subsection, including (A) the number of engagements, (B) the categories
of certificate of need proposals for which the engagements were made,
(C) the amount spent on each engagement, (D) the nature of the
expertise sought in each engagement, and (E) any reports produced
under each engagement.
Public Act No. 26-68 337 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 231. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) On and after July 1, 2027,
an applicant seeking a certificate of need shall submit an application to
the Certificate of Need Program, in a form and manner prescribed by
the commissioner, and include all information required pursuant to the
regulations, policies and procedures promulgated pursuant to section
236 of this act. Each application shall be submitted based on monthly
deadlines, including submission dates of the fifteenth day of each
month.
(b) The applicant shall include with the application a nonrefundable
application fee based on the total cost associated with the project. The
amount of the fee shall be as follows: (1) One thousand dollars for a
project that will cost not greater than fifty thousand dollars; (2) two
thousand dollars for a project that will cost greater than fifty thousand
dollars but not greater than one hundred thousand dollars; (3) three
thousand dollars for a project that will cost greater than one hundred
thousand dollars but not greater than five hundred thousand dollars; (4)
four thousand dollars for a project that will cost greater than five
hundred thousand dollars but not greater than one million dollars; (5)
five thousand dollars for a project that will cost greater than one million
dollars but not greater than five million dollars; (6) eight thousand
dollars for a project that will cost greater than five million dollars but
not greater than ten million dollars; and (7) ten thousand dollars for a
project that will cost greater than ten million dollars.
(c) Not later than twenty-one days prior to the deadline to submit a
certificate of need application described in subsection (a) of this section,
an applicant for a certificate of need shall submit a notice to the program
for posting on the program's Internet web site. If the applicant has not
submitted the application on or before ninety days after submission of
such notice, a new notice shall be required under this subsection prior
to submitting the application. Such notice shall include, but need not be
limited to:
Public Act No. 26-68 338 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(1) The identity of the applicant and any known parties to the
application;
(2) The street address and town where the proposal that is the subject
of the application is located; and
(3) A brief description in plain language of the proposal, including a
reference to the subdivision of subsection (a) of section 229 of this act
under which the application is being submitted.
(d) Any person wishing to request party or intervenor status in
connection with a certificate of need application shall file a notice of such
person's intent, including a statement of whether such person seeks a
hearing on the application, with the program not later than twenty days
after the posting on the program's Internet web site of the applicant's
notice of the intent to file the application. Any person who files such a
notice of intent under this subsection, or who demonstrates good cause
for failing to file such a notice, may file a petition for party or intervenor
status not later than twenty-one days after the applicant's filing of the
certificate of need application.
(1) If a petition for party or intervenor status is filed, the panel shall
appoint a hearing officer to resolve the request.
(2) The applicant may object to any request for party or intervenor
status not later than five days after the request is filed.
(3) The hearing officer shall render a decision on the petition not later
than fifteen days after the request is filed.
(4) If a request to intervene is granted, the decision granting
intervention shall set out the scope of intervention rights granted,
including whether or not an intervenor's request for a hearing is granted
or whether intervention is limited to submission of written materials.
Public Act No. 26-68 339 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(e) Not later than fifteen days after the deadline to submit an
application described in subsection (a) of this section, the program shall
notify each certificate of need applicant whether the applicant's
application is deemed complete. To be deemed complete, the applicant
shall have submitted relevant responses to all application questions and
data requests in the application. For any application that is deemed
incomplete, the program shall, not later than five days after deeming
such application incomplete, notify the applicant, in writing, of each
application and data element that was not adequately addressed by the
applicant. The program shall not review any incomplete application
until the applicant submits a revised and completed application that
adequately addresses such application and data elements to the
program in a subsequent application period. The subsequent filing of
the revised application shall not require any additional filing fee unless
the total cost of the proposal is amended such that a different fee would
be required under subsection (b) of this section, in which case the
applicant shall submit the net difference.
(f) The program shall submit a report to the record summarizing the
certificate of need application and providing an analysis of each
criterion listed in section 230 of this act. The program shall provide such
report no later than ten days prior to any public hearing and in no case
later than ninety days after the application was deemed complete.
(1) The program may request additional information from the
applicant during the course of analyzing the certificate of need
application. Any such request shall not delay timelines for review of the
application except by mutual agreement of the applicant and the
program. All additional information shall, unless otherwise prohibited
by federal or state law, be made part of the public certificate of need
record.
(2) The program may supplement the record with relevant data,
analyses, reports or other similar evidence not later than seventy-five
Public Act No. 26-68 340 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
days after the application is deemed complete, provided the applicant
shall have ten days to respond, in writing, to such evidence. Any
response from the applicant shall be included in the record.
(g) The panel, or a hearing officer designated by the panel, shall hold
a public hearing on each properly filed and complete certificate of need
application filed under this section unless the applicant waives the
applicant's right to a public hearing.
(1) An applicant may waive the applicant's right to a public hearing,
in writing, not later than thirty days after the application is deemed
complete, if the applicant is the only party to the proceeding and no
person is granted intervenor status pursuant to section 4-177a of the
general statutes and subsection (d) of this section. Such waiver shall
constitute a waiver of the applicant's right to appeal under section 4-183
of the general statutes.
(2) The panel shall convene a public hearing on an application not
later than ninety days after the program deems the application as
properly filed and complete.
(3) The hearing record shall close not later than ten days after the
adjournment of the hearing unless the applicant and program mutually
agree to maintain the record open for some period. Any transcript of the
hearing shall be made part of the record without needing to reopen the
record. If no hearing is held, the record shall close ten days after the
submission of the report.
(4) The panel may appoint a hearing officer to administer any hearing
under this section and to draft the proposed final decision consistent
with this section and chapter 54 of the general statutes. A hearing officer
appointed by the panel may draft a proposed final decision even for
dockets in which the applicant waived the right to a hearing and no
hearing was held.
Public Act No. 26-68 341 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(h) Not later than sixty days after the record of the public hearing is
closed, or one hundred fifty days after the application was deemed
complete if the applicant affirmatively waives a public hearing, the
hearing officer, if one is appointed, shall transmit the report required
pursuant to this section, the record of such hearing, if any, and the
hearing officer's proposed final decision to the panel for consideration
at the panel's next monthly meeting. If no hearing officer is appointed
for a docket that did not have a hearing, the director of the program shall
prepare and submit the proposed final decision. If the proposed final
decision recommends conditions pursuant to this section, the program
or hearing officer shall meet with the applicant, unless otherwise
prohibited by law, at least five days before transmitting such proposed
final decision, to preview the conditions to be proposed.
(i) An applicant may file written briefs or exceptions and request oral
argument regarding the proposed final decision not later than fourteen
days after the publication of such proposed final decision.
(j) At the panel meeting to review one or more certificate of need
applications filed under this section, the panel shall vote on the
disposition of each application that has been submitted to the panel at
least five days prior to such meeting. The panel shall decide any
presented application by majority vote. The panel may approve the
application, with or without conditions, deny the application or remand
the application to the hearing officer for further development of the
record for presentation at the next panel meeting, or order the program
and applicant to engage in agreed settlement negotiations.
(1) Any proposed final decision that is approved by the vote of the
panel shall be automatically converted to a final decision upon the
approval vote of the panel.
(2) Any proposed final decision that is voted to be modified by the
panel shall be modified consistent with the direction of the panel and
Public Act No. 26-68 342 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
posted as a final decision of the panel not later than thirty days after the
panel's vote to modify, provided, at least five days before posting the
modified final decision, the program or hearing officer shall meet with
the applicant, unless otherwise prohibited by law, to preview the
conditions to be finalized.
(3) Any docket remanded for further development of the record and
presentation at the next meeting shall not be so remanded more than
twice by the panel unless by mutual agreement of the panel and the
applicant.
(4) Any docket referred for settlement negotiations shall have the
resulting negotiated proposed settlement presented at the next panel
meeting. The panel shall vote on the proposed settlement and may
approve the proposed settlement or reject such settlement and move to
one of the other available dispositions of the docket.
(5) Nothing in this section shall preclude the program and the
applicant from engaging in negotiations to reach an agreed settlement
at an earlier point in the process, provided such negotiations occur not
earlier than thirty days after the application has been deemed complete.
Any negotiated agreement shall be presented for review and a vote on
the disposition thereof at the next meeting of the panel that is at least
five days after the date of the settlement.
(k) The Certificate of Need Program may recommend, and the panel
may impose, any condition on an approval of a certificate of need
application filed under this section, provided (1) any such condition is
consistent with the purposes of sections 227 to 237, inclusive, of this act,
and (2) the program or hearing officer shall meet with the applicant,
unless otherwise prohibited by law, at least five days before issuing a
proposed final decision or a final decision that imposes any such
condition, to preview each such condition to be met by the applicant.
The applicant and any party to the application may request an
Public Act No. 26-68 343 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
amendment to or relief from any condition, in a form and manner
prescribed by the commissioner, due to changed circumstances,
hardship or for other good cause. The panel may grant or deny any such
request. The determination to deny such request shall not be subject to
appeal under section 4-183 of the general statutes.
(l) Any final decision issued pursuant to this section for a docket in
which a public hearing was held, either under subsection (e) of this
section or as a result of the docket being remanded by the panel for
further development of the record pursuant to subsection (j) of this
section, shall be subject to appeal under section 4-183 of the general
statutes.
(m) Any deadlines in this section may be extended by mutual
agreement of the program and the applicant.
Sec. 232. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) Not later than January
1, 2028, the panel shall create an expedited review pathway for certain
categories of applications for certificates of need required under
subsection (a) of section 229 of this act, or subcategories thereof. On and
after January 1, 2028, an applicant may request an expedited review of
the following categories of applications:
(1) The relocation of a health care facility greater than ten miles away
from its current location and outside the current town in which it is
located;
(2) The increase in the number of inpatient or outpatient hospital
beds;
(3) The acquisition of computed tomography scanners, magnetic
resonance imaging scanners, positron emission tomography scanners or
positron emission tomography-computed tomography scanners, by any
person, physician, provider, short-term acute care general hospital or
children's hospital, where certificate of need approval is required for
Public Act No. 26-68 344 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
such acquisition;
(4) An increase of two or three operating rooms, within any three-
year period, by an outpatient surgical facility, as defined in section 19a-
493b of the general statutes, or by a short-term acute care general
hospital; and
(5) Any other category designated by the commissioner in
regulations adopted in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54 of
the general statutes.
(b) On and after January 1, 2028, an applicant requesting expedited
review of a certificate of need application shall submit such application,
in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner, pursuant to the
deadlines described in subsection (a) of section 231 of this act and
provide the same application fee described in subsection (b) of said
section and notice of intent to the program as described in subsection (c)
of said section.
(c) An application processed through the expedited pathway shall
not be entitled to a hearing before a hearing officer, except (1) the
program may hold a hearing before a hearing officer appointed by the
panel not later than thirty days after deeming the application complete
without affecting any other timelines under this subsection, or (2) the
panel may remove the application from the expedited pathway and
have it processed through the standard pathway described in section
231 of this act.
(d) Not later than fifteen days after submitting an application for a
certificate of need for expedited review under this section, the program
shall notify the applicant requesting expedited review whether such
applicant's application is deemed complete and whether the application
meets the requirements for expedited review.
(1) For any application that is deemed incomplete, the Certificate of
Public Act No. 26-68 345 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Need Program shall, not later than five days after deeming such
application incomplete, notify the applicant, in writing, of any
application or data elements that were not adequately addressed by the
applicant. The program shall not review such an application until the
applicant submits an application that adequately addresses such
application or data elements to the program in a subsequent application
period.
(2) For any application that is deemed complete but ineligible for
expedited review under this section, the Certificate of Need Program
shall review the application under the standard process set forth in
section 231 of this act.
(e) Any person who wishes to seek intervenor or party status shall
file a request to do so not later than fourteen days after the filing of a
certificate of need application filed under the expedited pathway.
(1) The panel shall appoint a hearing officer to review any request to
intervene or for party status.
(2) The applicant may respond to such request not later than five days
after filing.
(3) The hearing officer shall resolve the request for party or intervenor
status not later than five days after the applicant's response.
(4) If party or intervenor status is granted, the application shall be
removed from the expedited pathway and processed through the
standard pathway described in section 231 of this act. In determining
whether to grant intervention, the hearing officer shall consider the
unique nature of the expedited process and potential burden imposed
by permitting intervention.
(5) The date of any referral of an application under this subsection to
the standard pathway shall be considered the date on which the
Public Act No. 26-68 346 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
application was deemed complete.
(f) For any complete application that is eligible for expedited review
under this section, the Certificate of Need Program shall complete its
analysis and the director shall issue a proposed final decision not later
than sixty days after the application is deemed complete and eligible for
expedited review under this section and present the application to the
panel at its next meeting.
(g) An applicant may file written briefs or exceptions and request oral
argument regarding the proposed final decision not later than seven
days after the publication of such proposed final decision. The program
shall submit the proposed final decision and any subsequent
submissions from the applicant to the panel.
(h) The panel shall base its decision in the expedited pathway on the
same standards and guidelines as those in subsection (a) of section 230
of this act. At the panel's meeting to consider an expedited application,
the panel shall vote on the disposition of the certificate of need
application. The panel may approve the application, with or without
conditions, deny the application, remand the application to the program
for further development of the record for presentation at the next panel
meeting, remand the application for further development of the record
in the standard certificate of need application process pursuant to
section 231 of this act, or order the program and applicant to engage in
agreed settlement negotiations.
(1) Any proposed final decision that is approved by the vote of the
panel shall be automatically converted to a final decision upon such
approval.
(2) Any proposed final decision that is voted to be modified by the
panel shall be modified consistent with the direction of the panel and
posted as a final decision of the panel not later than twenty-one days
Public Act No. 26-68 347 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
after the panel's vote to modify, provided, at least five days before
posting the modified final decision, the program or hearing officer shall
meet with the applicant, unless otherwise prohibited by law, to preview
the conditions to be finalized.
(3) Any docket remanded for further development of the record and
presentation at the next meeting shall not be so remanded more than
twice by the panel unless by mutual agreement of the panel and the
applicant.
(4) Any docket remanded for processing under the standard
certificate of need application pursuant to section 231 of this act shall
have the date of the panel's vote be the date on which the application is
considered to be deemed complete in the standard process.
(5) Any docket referred for settlement negotiations shall have the
resulting negotiated proposed settlement presented at the next panel
meeting. The panel shall vote on the proposed settlement and may
approve the proposed settlement or reject such settlement and move to
one of the other available dispositions of the docket.
(6) Nothing in this section shall preclude the program and the
applicant from engaging in negotiations to reach an agreed settlement
at an earlier point in the process, provided such negotiations occur not
earlier than fifteen days after the application has been deemed complete.
Any negotiated agreement shall be presented for review and a vote on
the disposition thereof at the next meeting of the panel that is at least
five days after the date of the settlement.
(i) The Certificate of Need Program may recommend, and the panel
may impose any condition on, an approval of an expedited certificate of
need application, provided (1) any such condition is consistent with the
purposes of sections 227 to 237, inclusive, of this act, and (2) the program
or hearing officer shall meet with the applicant, unless otherwise
Public Act No. 26-68 348 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
prohibited by law, at least five days before issuing a proposed final
decision or a final decision that imposes any such condition, to preview
each such condition to be met by the applicant. The applicant and any
party to the application may request an amendment to or relief from any
condition, in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner, due
to changed circumstances, hardship or for other good cause. The panel
may grant or deny any such request. The determination to deny such
request shall not be subject to appeal under section 4-183 of the general
statutes.
(j) Not later than July 1, 2029, the Certificate of Need Program, in
consultation with relevant stakeholders, shall submit a report, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to public health regarding the expedited
pathway, including (1) the average time from application submission to
final decision, (2) the number of applications processed through the
expedited process in comparison to the standard process, (3) the number
of applications filed under the expedited pathway that have been
transferred to the standard pathway and the reasons for such transfer,
and (4) any recommendations for process changes to the expedited
pathway.
(k) Any deadlines in this section may be extended by mutual
agreement of the program and the applicant.
Sec. 233. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) For a certificate of need
issued pursuant to an application filed on or after July 1, 2027, the
certificate of need shall be valid (1) only for the proposal described in
the application, and (2) for two years from the date of issuance by the
panel. During the period of time that such certificate is valid and the
thirty-day period following the expiration of the certificate, the holder
of the certificate shall provide the Certificate of Need Program with such
information as the program may request on the development of the
Public Act No. 26-68 349 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
proposal covered by the certificate.
(b) Upon request from a certificate of need holder, the program may
extend the duration of a certificate of need for such additional period of
time as the program determines is reasonably necessary to
expeditiously complete the proposal. Not later than five business days
after receiving a request to extend the duration of a certificate of need,
the program shall post such request on its Internet web site. Any person
who wishes to comment on extending the duration of the certificate of
need shall provide written comments to the program on the requested
extension not later than thirty days after the date the program posts
notice of the request for an extension of time on its Internet web site.
(c) If the program determines that (1) commencement, construction
or other preparation has not been substantially undertaken during a
valid certificate of need period, or (2) the certificate of need holder has
not made a good-faith effort to complete the proposal as approved, the
program may withdraw, revoke or rescind the certificate of need
pursuant to the requirements set forth in chapter 54 of the general
statutes.
(d) For a certificate of need issued pursuant to an application filed on
or after July 1, 2027, the (1) certificate of need shall not be transferable
or assignable, and (2) project that is the subject of the certificate of need
shall not be transferred from a certificate holder to another person.
Sec. 234. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) On and after July 1, 2027,
the Certificate of Need Program shall conduct a cost and market impact
review for any transaction involving the transfer of ownership or
control of a hospital in which (1) an application for a certificate of need
has been filed pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 229
of this act or a notice of material change has been filed with the Attorney
General's office pursuant to section 19a-486i of the general statutes that
involves the transfer of ownership of a hospital, as defined in section
Public Act No. 26-68 350 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
19a-639 of the general statutes, and (2) the purchaser is (A) a hospital, as
defined in section 19a-490 of the general statutes, whether located
within or outside the state, that had net patient revenue for fiscal year
2025 in an amount greater than one billion dollars, (B) a hospital system,
as defined in section 19a-486i of the general statutes, whether located
within or outside the state, that had net patient revenue for fiscal year
2025 in an amount greater than one billion dollars, or (C) any person
that is organized or operated for profit.
(b) The program shall develop a set of data requests to be used for
applications filed on and after July 1, 2027, for all cost and market impact
reviews. An applicant that is the subject of a cost and market impact
review shall submit all data necessary for such review at the same time
that the hospital initiates the application process for a certificate of need
with the program or that it submits a notice of material change to the
Attorney General under section 19a-486i of the general statutes,
whichever is earlier. The program shall review the data submission for
completeness not later than thirty days after submission. If the data
submission is incomplete, the program shall notify the applicant that it
is incomplete and identify which data elements are incomplete.
(c) The program shall keep confidential all nonpublic information
and documents obtained pursuant to this section and shall not disclose
the information or documents to any person without the consent of the
person that produced the information or documents, except in a
preliminary report or final report issued in accordance with this section
if the program believes that such disclosure should be made in the
public interest after taking into account any privacy, trade secret or anti-
competitive considerations. Such information and documents shall not
be deemed a public record under section 1-210 of the general statutes
and shall be exempt from disclosure.
(d) The cost and market impact review conducted pursuant to this
section shall examine factors relating to the businesses and relative
Public Act No. 26-68 351 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
market positions of the transacting parties as defined in subsection (d)
of section 19a-639 of the general statutes, and may include, but need not
be limited to: (1) The transacting parties' size and market share within
its primary service area, by major service category and within its
dispersed service areas; (2) the transacting parties' prices for services,
including the transacting parties' relative prices compared to other
health care providers for the same services in the same market; (3) the
transacting parties' health status adjusted total medical expense,
including the transacting parties' health status adjusted total medical
expense compared to that of similar health care providers; (4) the quality
of the services provided by the transacting parties, including patient
experience; (5) the transacting parties' cost and cost trends in
comparison to total health care expenditures state wide; (6) the
availability and accessibility of services similar to those provided by
each transacting party, or proposed to be provided as a result of the
transfer of ownership of a hospital within each transacting party's
primary service areas and dispersed service areas; (7) the impact of the
proposed transfer of ownership of the hospital on competing options for
the delivery of health care services within each transacting party's
primary service area and dispersed service area including the impact on
existing service providers; (8) the methods used by the transacting
parties to attract patient volume and to recruit or acquire health care
professionals or facilities; (9) the role of each transacting party in serving
at-risk, underserved and government payer patient populations,
including those with behavioral, substance use disorder and mental
health conditions, within each transacting party's primary service area
and dispersed service area; (10) the role of each transacting party in
providing low margin or negative margin services within each
transacting party's primary service area and dispersed service area; (11)
consumer concerns, including, but not limited to, complaints or other
allegations that a transacting party has engaged in any unfair method of
competition or any unfair or deceptive act or practice; and (12) any other
factors that the program determines to be in the public interest.
Public Act No. 26-68 352 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(e) The program shall submit the preliminary report to the applicant
and to the Attorney General not later than ninety days after the data
submissions are deemed complete. The applicant shall respond, in
writing, not later than fifteen days after receipt of such preliminary
report with any comments regarding such report. Once the applicant
has submitted such written comments or waived the opportunity to
make such a submission, the program shall make the preliminary report
and the applicant's comments public. The program shall issue a final
report not later than one hundred twenty days after the application was
deemed complete and make such final report part of the public
certificate of need record of such application.
(f) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a transfer of ownership of a
hospital, provided any such proposed transfer shall not be completed
(1) less than thirty days after the program has issued a final report on a
cost and market impact review, if such review is required, or (2) while
any action brought by the Attorney General pursuant to subsection (g)
of this section is pending and before a final judgment on such action is
issued by a court of competent jurisdiction.
(g) After the program issues a final report on a transfer of ownership
of a hospital under subsection (e) of this section, the Attorney General
may: (1) Conduct an investigation to determine whether the transacting
parties engaged or, as a result of completing the transfer of ownership
of the hospital, are expected to engage in unfair methods of competition,
anti-competitive behavior or other conduct in violation of chapter 624
or 735a of the general statutes or any other state or federal law; and (2)
if appropriate, take action under chapter 624 or 735a of the general
statutes or any other state law to protect consumers in the health care
market. The program's final report may be evidence in any such action.
(h) For the purposes of this section, the provisions of chapter 735a of
the general statutes may be directly enforced by the Attorney General.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to modify, impair or
Public Act No. 26-68 353 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
supersede the operation of any state antitrust law or otherwise limit the
authority of the Attorney General to (1) take any action against a
transacting party as authorized by any law; or (2) protect consumers in
the health care market under any law. Notwithstanding subdivision (1)
of subsection (a) of section 42-110c of the general statutes, the
transacting parties shall be subject to chapter 735a of the general
statutes.
(i) The program shall retain an independent consultant with expertise
on the economic analysis of the health care market and health care costs
and prices to conduct each cost and market impact review, as described
in this section. The program shall submit bills for such services to the
purchaser, as defined in subsection (d) of section 19a-639 of the general
statutes. Such purchaser shall pay such bills not later than thirty days
after receipt thereof. Such bills shall not exceed two hundred fifty
thousand dollars per application. The provisions of chapter 57 of the
general statutes, sections 4-212 to 4-219, inclusive, of the general statutes
and section 4e-19 of the general statutes shall not apply to any
agreement executed pursuant to this subsection.
Sec. 235. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) On and after July 1, 2027,
the director of the Certificate of Need Program shall investigate all
inquiries concerning compliance with the provisions of sections 227 to
237, inclusive, of this act.
(b) The panel, or any agent authorized by the panel to conduct any
inquiry, investigation or hearing under the provisions of sections 227 to
237, inclusive, of this act, shall have authority to administer oaths and
take testimony under oath relative to the matter of inquiry or
investigation. At any hearing under this section, the panel or such
authorized agent may subpoena witnesses and require the production
of records, papers and documents pertinent to such inquiry. If any
person disobeys such process or, having appeared in obedience thereto,
refuses to answer any pertinent question put to such person by the panel
Public Act No. 26-68 354 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
or such panel's authorized agent or to produce any records and papers
pursuant thereto, the panel or such panel's authorized agent may apply
to the superior court for the judicial district of Hartford or for the judicial
district wherein the person resides or the business that is the subject of
the inquiry has been conducted, or to any judge of said court if the same
is not in session, setting forth such disobedience to process or refusal to
answer, and said court or such judge shall cite such person to appear
before said court or such judge to answer such question or to produce
such records and papers.
(c) Any person or health care facility or institution that is required to
acquire a certificate of need for any of the activities described in
subsection (a) of section 229 of this act and negligently undertakes any
of the activities described in said section without such certificate of need,
any person, or health care facility or institution that is subject to any
terms or conditions enumerated in a certificate of need decision or
agreed settlement approved by the panel and negligently fails to comply
with any such enumerated term or condition, and any person or entity
that is required to submit a notice to the program pursuant to subsection
(d) of section 229 of this act or section 237 of this act and negligently fails
to submit such notice shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to one
thousand dollars a day for each day such person, entity or institution
conducts any of the described activities without certificate of need
approval as required by section 229 of this act, or for each day any
enumerated term or condition is not met or for each day that the notice
was not timely submitted. Any civil penalty proceeding authorized by
this section shall be initiated by the program, which shall also present
allegations of such negligence at a hearing before the panel in
accordance with subsections (b) to (f), inclusive, of this section.
(d) If the program has reason to believe that a person or health care
facility or institution has committed a violation for which a civil penalty
is authorized pursuant to subsection (c) of this section or subsection (e)
Public Act No. 26-68 355 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
of section 19a-632 of the general statutes, the program shall notify such
person or health care facility or institution by first class mail or personal
service. The notice shall include: (1) A reference to the sections of the
statute, regulation or settlement agreement involved; (2) a short and
plain statement of the matters asserted or charged; (3) a statement of the
amount of the civil penalty or penalties to be imposed; (4) the initial date
of the imposition of the penalty; and (5) a statement of the party's right
to a hearing.
(e) The person or health care facility or institution to whom the notice
is addressed shall have fifteen business days after the date of mailing of
the notice to make written application to the program to (1) request a
hearing to contest the imposition of the penalty, (2) request an extension
of time to file the required data, or (3) comply with enumerated
conditions of an agreed settlement. A failure to make a timely request
for a hearing or an extension of time to file the required data or a denial
of a request for an extension of time shall result in a final order for the
imposition of the penalty. All hearings under this section shall be
conducted pursuant to chapter 54 of the general statutes. The panel may
mitigate or waive the penalty upon such terms and conditions as, in its
discretion, it deems proper or necessary upon consideration of any
extenuating factors or circumstances.
(f) A final order of the panel assessing a civil penalty imposed after a
hearing before the panel pursuant to subsection (d) of this section shall
be subject to appeal as set forth in section 4-183 of the general statutes,
except that any such appeal shall be taken to the superior court for the
judicial district of New Britain. Such final order shall not be subject to
appeal under any other provision of the general statutes. No challenge
to any such final order shall be allowed as to any issue which could have
been raised by an appeal of an earlier order, denial or other final
decision by the panel.
(g) If any person or health care facility or institution fails to pay any
Public Act No. 26-68 356 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
civil penalty under this section after the assessment of such penalty has
become final, the amount of such penalty may be deducted from
payments to such person or health care facility or institution from the
Medicaid account.
(h) In addition to any civil penalty imposed under this section, if the
director of the program or the director's authorized agent has received
information and has a reasonable belief that any person or health care
facility or institution has violated or is violating any provision of
sections 227 to 237, inclusive, of this act, or any policy and procedure or
order of the panel, the director or such agent shall notify such person or
health care facility or institution by first class mail or personal service.
The notice shall include: (1) A reference to the sections of the general
statutes, regulations of Connecticut state agencies or orders alleged or
believed to have been violated; (2) a short and plain language statement
of the matters asserted or charged; (3) a description of the activity
alleged to have violated a statute or regulation identified pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this subsection; (4) a statement concerning the right to
a hearing of such person or health care facility or institution; and (5) a
statement that such person or health care facility or institution may, not
later than ten business days after receipt of such notice, make a written
request for a hearing on the matters asserted, to be sent to the
commissioner or such agent.
(i) The person or health care facility or institution to whom such
notice is provided pursuant to subsection (h) of this section may, not
later than ten business days after receipt of the notice, make written
application to the program to request a hearing to demonstrate that such
violation has not occurred, a certificate of need was not required or each
required certificate of need was obtained. A failure to make a timely
request for a hearing shall result in the panel issuing a cease and desist
order. Each hearing held under this subsection shall be conducted as a
contested case pursuant to chapter 54 of the general statutes.
Public Act No. 26-68 357 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(j) If the panel finds, by a preponderance of the evidence, following a
hearing held under subsection (i) of this section that such person or
health care facility or institution has violated or is violating any
provision of sections 227 to 237, inclusive, of this act, or any regulation
or order of the department, the panel shall issue a cease and desist order
to such person or health care facility or institution that shall be
considered a final decision subject to appeal to the Superior Court in
accordance with section 4-183 of the general statutes.
(k) Any cease and desist order issued under this section may be
enforced by the Attorney General pursuant to section 19a-642 of the
general statutes.
(l) Any civil penalty proceeding and any investigation or cease and
desist proceeding may be conducted simultaneously in a unified
proceeding.
Sec. 236. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) The commissioner shall
adopt regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54 of the
general statutes, to implement the provisions of sections 227 to 237,
inclusive, of this act. The commissioner may implement policies and
procedures necessary to administer the provisions of said sections while
in the process of adopting such policies and procedures as regulation,
provided, prior to implementing such policies and procedures, the
department shall convene a working group with relevant stakeholders
to provide input on the development of such policies and procedures.
The commissioner shall convene the working group not later than
January 1, 2027. Policies and procedures implemented pursuant to this
section shall be valid until the earlier of two years from the date of their
implementation or the time final regulations are adopted.
Sec. 237. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) On and after July 1, 2027,
a hospital may temporarily pause a service for up to ninety days,
provided, if a hospital intends to indefinitely terminate a service line or
Public Act No. 26-68 358 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
pause a service line for more than ninety days, the hospital shall notify
the Certificate of Need Program, in writing, not less than ninety days
prior to commencing such pause or termination. For purposes of this
section, "service line" means a category of inpatient and outpatient
services but does not include services provided by an emergency
department.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, not less than
ninety days prior to commencing any termination of service by a
hospital or any pause of a service intended to last more than ninety days,
the hospital shall provide notice, either electronically or in writing, to
the program that includes the following information:
(1) A description of the service to be paused or terminated;
(2) Current and historical utilization rates for such service;
(3) A description of the anticipated impact of such pause or
termination on individuals and health care facilities in the hospital's
primary service area;
(4) The date set for the pause or termination of service and, if
applicable, the anticipated date of resumption of such service;
(5) A detailed account of any community engagement and planning
that has occurred prior to such notice or that is scheduled to occur prior
to the pause or termination; and
(6) Any other information the director may require.
(c) The hospital shall also send a copy of such notice to the office of
the Attorney General, the Department of Social Services, the Office of
the Healthcare Advocate, and, if it relates to a behavioral health service
or substance use disorder treatment service, the Department of Mental
Health and Addiction Services and the Behavioral Health Advocate.
Public Act No. 26-68 359 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(d) When the provision of ninety days' notice of the cessation of a
service line is not practicable due to circumstances outside of the
hospital's control, such as the death of the provider of such service or
due to natural disaster, the hospital shall provide notice to the program
as soon as practicable but in no case later than fourteen days after the
initiation of the unanticipated cessation.
(e) The program shall hold a public hearing concerning the proposed
pause or termination of service, the impact on the hospital's primary
service area and the proposed plans for ensuring continued access to
high-quality, affordable health care in such service area. The hearing
record and any submitted public comments shall inform the panel's
review of the proposed plan and any imposed conditions pursuant to
subsection (f) of this section.
(f) Not later than sixty days prior to commencing the pause or
termination of a service, the hospital shall submit a plan for ensuring
access to such service following the hospital's pause or termination of
such service. If the cessation of the service is due to an unplanned event
outside the control of the hospital, as described in subsection (d) of this
section, the hospital shall submit the plan for ensuring access to the
service within fourteen days of the hospital's cessation of the service
line. The plan shall include:
(1) Information on utilization of such service prior to the proposed
pause or termination;
(2) Information on the location and service capacity of alternative
sites that provide such service;
(3) Travel times to alternative sites that provide such service;
(4) An assessment of transportation needs after the pause or
termination and a plan for meeting such needs;
Public Act No. 26-68 360 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(5) A protocol that details mechanisms to maintain continuity of care
for patients who receive such paused or terminated service;
(6) A protocol that describes how patients in the hospital's primary
service area will obtain such service at alternative sites that provide such
service; and
(7) A communication plan for ensuring all affected patients in the
hospital's primary service area are aware of the pause or termination of
such service, where they may obtain such service at an alternative site
and the assistance available from the hospital to obtain such service to
preserve continuity of care.
(g) The program shall review the plan submitted by the hospital
pursuant to subsection (f) of this section to determine if the plan ensures
continued access to the service to be paused or terminated. The program
shall complete its review of the plan and submit to the hospital and
panel written recommendations regarding the approval, modification
or imposition of conditions upon the plan not later than ten days after
receiving the plan from the hospital. The panel shall hold a meeting on
the plan not later than ten days after receipt of such recommendations.
The hospital may submit a response to such recommendations at or
prior to such meeting. Not later than ten days after such meeting, the
panel shall approve the plan, require modifications to the plan or add
conditions to the plan.
(h) The panel's decision approving or modifying the plan shall
constitute a final decision subject to appeal under section 4-183 of the
general statutes.
(i) The program shall monitor implementation of the hospital's plan
for preserving access to a health care service following a pause of
termination of such service under this section. If the hospital fails to
implement any aspect of the plan as approved by the panel pursuant to
Public Act No. 26-68 361 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
subsection (g) of this section, the program may impose a performance
improvement plan on the hospital. Failure to comply with the
performance improvement plan and continued failure to perform under
the plan may result in the imposition of civil penalties pursuant to
section 235 of this act.
Sec. 238. Subsection (a) of section 19a-612d of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) The Commissioner of Health Strategy shall oversee the Health
Systems Planning Unit and shall exercise independent decision-making
authority over all certificate of need decisions for applications for a
certificate of need filed on or before June 30, 2027.
Sec. 239. Subsections (a) to (e), inclusive, of section 19a-638 of the
general statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) [A] On and before June 30, 2027, a certificate of need issued by the
unit shall be required for:
(1) The establishment of a new health care facility;
(2) A transfer of ownership of a health care facility;
(3) A transfer of ownership of a large group practice to any entity
other than a (A) physician, or (B) group of two or more physicians,
legally organized in a partnership, professional corporation or limited
liability company formed to render professional services and not
employed by or an affiliate of any hospital, medical foundation,
insurance company or other similar entity;
(4) The establishment of a freestanding emergency department;
(5) The termination of inpatient or outpatient services offered by a
Public Act No. 26-68 362 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
hospital, including, but not limited to, the termination by a short-term
acute care general hospital or children's hospital of inpatient and
outpatient mental health and substance abuse services;
(6) The establishment of an outpatient surgical facility, as defined in
section 19a-493b, or as established by a short-term acute care general
hospital;
(7) The termination of surgical services by an outpatient surgical
facility, as defined in section 19a-493b, or a facility that provides
outpatient surgical services as part of the outpatient surgery department
of a short-term acute care general hospital, provided termination of
outpatient surgical services due to (A) insufficient patient volume, or (B)
the termination of any subspecialty surgical service, shall not require
certificate of need approval;
(8) The termination of an emergency department by a short-term
acute care general hospital;
(9) The establishment of cardiac services, including inpatient and
outpatient cardiac catheterization, interventional cardiology and
cardiovascular surgery;
(10) The acquisition of computed tomography scanners, magnetic
resonance imaging scanners, positron emission tomography scanners or
positron emission tomography-computed tomography scanners, by any
person, physician, provider, short-term acute care general hospital or
children's hospital, except (A) as provided for in subdivision (22) of
subsection (b) of this section, and (B) a certificate of need issued by the
unit shall not be required where such scanner is a replacement for a
scanner that was previously acquired through certificate of need
approval or a certificate of need determination, including a replacement
scanner that has dual modalities or functionalities if the applicant
already offers similar imaging services for each of the scanner's
Public Act No. 26-68 363 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
modalities or functionalities that will be utilized;
(11) The acquisition of nonhospital based linear accelerators, except a
certificate of need issued by the unit shall not be required where such
accelerator is a replacement for an accelerator that was previously
acquired through certificate of need approval or a certificate of need
determination;
(12) An increase in the licensed bed capacity of a health care facility,
except as provided in subdivision (23) of subsection (b) of this section;
(13) The acquisition of equipment utilizing technology that has not
previously been utilized in the state;
(14) An increase of two or more operating rooms within any three-
year period, commencing on and after October 1, 2010, by an outpatient
surgical facility, as defined in section 19a-493b, or by a short-term acute
care general hospital; and
(15) The termination of inpatient or outpatient services offered by a
hospital or other facility or institution operated by the state that
provides services that are eligible for reimbursement under Title XVIII
or XIX of the federal Social Security Act, 42 USC 301, as amended.
(b) [A] On and before June 30, 2027, a certificate of need issued by the
unit shall not be required for:
(1) Health care facilities owned and operated by the federal
government;
(2) The establishment of offices by a licensed private practitioner,
whether for individual or group practice, except when a certificate of
need is required in accordance with the requirements of section 19a-
493b or subdivision (3), (10) or (11) of subsection (a) of this section;
(3) A health care facility operated by a religious group that
Public Act No. 26-68 364 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
exclusively relies upon spiritual means through prayer for healing;
(4) Residential care homes, as defined in subsection (c) of section 19a-
490, and nursing homes and rest homes, as defined in subsection (o) of
section 19a-490;
(5) An assisted living services agency, as defined in section 19a-490;
(6) Home health agencies, as defined in section 19a-490;
(7) Hospice services, as described in section 19a-122b;
(8) Outpatient rehabilitation facilities;
(9) Outpatient chronic dialysis services;
(10) Transplant services;
(11) Free clinics, as defined in section 19a-630;
(12) School-based health centers and expanded school health sites, as
such terms are defined in section 19a-6r, community health centers, as
defined in section 19a-490a, not-for-profit outpatient clinics licensed in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 368v and federally qualified
health centers;
(13) A program licensed or funded by the Department of Children
and Families, provided such program is not a psychiatric residential
treatment facility;
(14) Any nonprofit facility, institution or provider that has a contract
with, or is certified or licensed to provide a service for, a state agency or
department for a service that would otherwise require a certificate of
need. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to a short-term
acute care general hospital or children's hospital, or a hospital or other
facility or institution operated by the state that provides services that are
Public Act No. 26-68 365 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
eligible for reimbursement under Title XVIII or XIX of the federal Social
Security Act, 42 USC 301, as amended;
(15) A health care facility operated by a nonprofit educational
institution exclusively for students, faculty and staff of such institution
and their dependents;
(16) An outpatient clinic or program operated exclusively by or
contracted to be operated exclusively by a municipality, municipal
agency, municipal board of education or a health district, as described
in section 19a-241;
(17) A residential facility for persons with intellectual disability
licensed pursuant to section 17a-227 and certified to participate in the
Title XIX Medicaid program as an intermediate care facility for
individuals with intellectual disabilities;
(18) Replacement of existing computed tomography scanners,
magnetic resonance imaging scanners, positron emission tomography
scanners, positron emission tomography-computed tomography
scanners, or nonhospital based linear accelerators, if such equipment
was acquired through certificate of need approval or a certificate of need
determination, provided a health care facility, provider, physician or
person notifies the unit of the date on which the equipment is replaced
and the disposition of the replaced equipment, including if a
replacement scanner has dual modalities or functionalities and the
applicant already offers similar imaging services for each of the
equipment's modalities or functionalities that will be utilized;
(19) Acquisition of cone-beam dental imaging equipment that is to be
used exclusively by a dentist licensed pursuant to chapter 379;
(20) The partial or total elimination of services provided by an
outpatient surgical facility, as defined in section 19a-493b, except as
provided in subdivision (6) of subsection (a) of this section and section
Public Act No. 26-68 366 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
19a-639e;
(21) The termination of services for which the Department of Public
Health has requested the facility to relinquish its license;
(22) Acquisition of any equipment by any person that is to be used
exclusively for scientific research that is not conducted on humans;
(23) On or before [June 30, 2026] June 30, 2027, an increase in the
licensed bed capacity of a mental health facility, provided (A) the mental
health facility demonstrates to the unit, in a form and manner prescribed
by the unit, that it accepts reimbursement for any covered benefit
provided to a covered individual under: (i) An individual or group
health insurance policy providing coverage of the type specified in
subdivisions (1), (2), (4), (11) and (12) of section 38a-469; (ii) a self-
insured employee welfare benefit plan established pursuant to the
federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended
from time to time; or (iii) HUSKY Health, as defined in section 17b-290,
and (B) if the mental health facility does not accept or stops accepting
reimbursement for any covered benefit provided to a covered
individual under a policy, plan or program described in clause (i), (ii) or
(iii) of subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, a certificate of need for such
increase in the licensed bed capacity shall be required; [.]
(24) The establishment at harm reduction centers through the pilot
program established pursuant to section 17a-673c; or
(25) On or before [June 30, 2028] June 30, 2027, a birth center, as
defined in section 19a-490, that is enrolled as a provider in the
Connecticut medical assistance program, as defined in section 17b-245g.
(c) (1) Any person [,] or health care facility or institution that is unsure
whether a certificate of need is required under this section, or (2) any
health care facility that proposes to relocate pursuant to section 19a-
639c, shall send a letter to the unit that describes the project and requests
Public Act No. 26-68 367 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
that the unit make a determination as to whether a certificate of need is
required. In the case of a relocation of a health care facility, the letter
shall include information described in section 19a-639c. A person [,] or
health care facility or institution making such request shall provide the
unit with any information the unit requests as part of its determination
process. The unit shall provide a determination within thirty days of
receipt of such request.
(d) The Commissioner of Health Strategy may implement policies
and procedures necessary to administer the provisions of this section
while in the process of adopting such policies and procedures as
regulation, provided the commissioner holds a public hearing prior to
implementing the policies and procedures and posts notice of intent to
adopt regulations on the office's Internet web site and the eRegulations
System not later than twenty days after the date of implementation.
Policies and procedures implemented pursuant to this section shall be
valid until the time final regulations are adopted.
(e) On or before [June 30, 2026] June 30, 2027, a mental health facility
seeking to increase licensed bed capacity without applying for a
certificate of need, as permitted pursuant to subdivision (23) of
subsection (b) of this section, shall notify the Office of Health Strategy,
in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner, regarding (1)
such facility's intent to increase licensed bed capacity, (2) the address of
such facility, and (3) a description of all services that are being or will be
provided at such facility.
Sec. 240. Subsections (a) to (e), inclusive, of section 19a-639 of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) In any deliberations involving a certificate of need application
filed on or before June 30, 2027, pursuant to section 19a-638, the unit
shall take into consideration and make written findings concerning each
Public Act No. 26-68 368 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
of the following guidelines and principles:
(1) Whether the proposed project is consistent with any applicable
policies and standards adopted in regulations by the Office of Health
Strategy;
(2) The relationship of the proposed project to the state-wide health
care facilities and services plan;
(3) Whether there is a clear public need for the health care facility or
services proposed by the applicant;
(4) Whether the applicant has satisfactorily demonstrated how the
proposal will impact the financial strength of the health care system in
the state or that the proposal is financially feasible for the applicant;
(5) Whether the applicant has satisfactorily demonstrated how the
proposal will improve quality, accessibility and cost effectiveness of
health care delivery in the region, including, but not limited to,
provision of or any change in the access to services for Medicaid
recipients and indigent persons;
(6) The applicant's past and proposed provision of health care
services to relevant patient populations and payer mix, including, but
not limited to, access to services by Medicaid recipients and indigent
persons;
(7) Whether the applicant has satisfactorily identified the population
to be served by the proposed project and satisfactorily demonstrated
that the identified population has a need for the proposed services;
(8) The utilization of existing health care facilities and health care
services in the service area of the applicant;
(9) Whether the applicant has satisfactorily demonstrated that the
proposed project shall not result in an unnecessary duplication of
Public Act No. 26-68 369 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
existing or approved health care services or facilities;
(10) Whether an applicant, who has failed to provide or reduced
access to services by Medicaid recipients or indigent persons, has
demonstrated good cause for doing so, which shall not be demonstrated
solely on the basis of differences in reimbursement rates between
Medicaid and other health care payers;
(11) Whether the applicant has satisfactorily demonstrated that the
proposal will not negatively impact the diversity of health care
providers and patient choice in the geographic region; and
(12) Whether the applicant has satisfactorily demonstrated that any
consolidation resulting from the proposal will not adversely affect
health care costs or accessibility to care.
(b) [In] On or before June 30, 2027, in deliberations as described in
subsection (a) of this section, there shall be a presumption in favor of
approving the certificate of need application for a transfer of ownership
of a large group practice, as described in subdivision (3) of subsection
(a) of section 19a-638, when an offer was made in response to a request
for proposal or similar voluntary offer for sale.
(c) The unit, as it deems necessary, may revise or supplement the
guidelines and principles, set forth in subsection (a) of this section,
through regulation.
(d) (1) For purposes of this subsection and subsection (e) of this
section:
(A) "Affected community" means a municipality where a hospital is
physically located or a municipality whose inhabitants are regularly
served by a hospital;
(B) "Hospital" has the same meaning as provided in section 19a-490;
Public Act No. 26-68 370 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(C) "New hospital" means a hospital as it exists after the approval of
an agreement pursuant to section 19a-486b or a certificate of need
application for a transfer of ownership of a hospital;
(D) "Purchaser" means a person who is acquiring, or has acquired,
any assets of a hospital through a transfer of ownership of a hospital;
(E) "Transacting party" means a purchaser and any person who is a
party to a proposed agreement for transfer of ownership of a hospital;
(F) "Transfer" means to sell, transfer, lease, exchange, option, convey,
give or otherwise dispose of or transfer control over, including, but not
limited to, transfer by way of merger or joint venture not in the ordinary
course of business; and
(G) "Transfer of ownership of a hospital" means a transfer that
impacts or changes the governance or controlling body of a hospital,
including, but not limited to, all affiliations, mergers or any sale or
transfer of net assets of a hospital and for which a certificate of need
application or a certificate of need determination letter is filed on or after
December 1, 2015.
(2) In any deliberations involving a certificate of need application
filed on or before June 30, 2027, pursuant to section 19a-638 that involves
the transfer of ownership of a hospital, the unit shall, in addition to the
guidelines and principles set forth in subsection (a) of this section and
those prescribed through regulation pursuant to subsection (c) of this
section, take into consideration and make written findings concerning
each of the following guidelines and principles:
(A) Whether the applicant fairly considered alternative proposals or
offers in light of the purpose of maintaining health care provider
diversity and consumer choice in the health care market and access to
affordable quality health care for the affected community; and
Public Act No. 26-68 371 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(B) Whether the plan submitted pursuant to section 19a-639a
demonstrates, in a manner consistent with this chapter, how health care
services will be provided by the new hospital for the first three years
following the transfer of ownership of the hospital, including any
consolidation, reduction, elimination or expansion of existing services
or introduction of new services.
(3) The unit shall deny any certificate of need application involving a
transfer of ownership of a hospital unless the commissioner finds that
the affected community will be assured of continued access to high
quality and affordable health care after accounting for any proposed
change impacting hospital staffing.
(4) The unit may deny any certificate of need application involving a
transfer of ownership of a hospital subject to a cost and market impact
review pursuant to section 19a-639f if the commissioner finds that (A)
the affected community will not be assured of continued access to high
quality and affordable health care after accounting for any consolidation
in the hospital and health care market that may lessen health care
provider diversity, consumer choice and access to care, and (B) any
likely increases in the prices for health care services or total health care
spending in the state may negatively impact the affordability of care.
(5) The unit may place any conditions on the approval of a certificate
of need application involving a transfer of ownership of a hospital
consistent with the provisions of this chapter. Before placing any such
conditions, the unit shall weigh the value of such conditions in
promoting the purposes of this chapter against the individual and
cumulative burden of such conditions on the transacting parties and the
new hospital. For each condition imposed, the unit shall include a
concise statement of the legal and factual basis for such condition and
the provision or provisions of this chapter that it is intended to promote.
Each condition shall be reasonably tailored in time and scope. The
transacting parties or the new hospital shall have the right to make a
Public Act No. 26-68 372 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
request to the unit for an amendment to, or relief from, any condition
based on changed circumstances, hardship or for other good cause.
(6) In any deliberations involving a certificate of need application
filed pursuant to section 19a-638 that involves the transfer of ownership
of a hospital and is subject to a cost and market impact review, the unit
may consider (A) the preliminary report and response to the
preliminary report, (B) the final report, and (C) any written comments
from the parties regarding the reports issued or submitted as part of the
review. The unit shall not place the preliminary report in the public
record until the transacting parties have had an opportunity to respond
to the findings of the preliminary report pursuant to subsection (f) of
section 19a-639f.
(e) (1) If the certificate of need application filed on or before June 30,
2027, (A) involves the transfer of ownership of a hospital, (B) the
purchaser is a hospital, as defined in section 19a-490, whether located
within or outside the state, that had net patient revenue for fiscal year
2013 in an amount greater than one billion five hundred million dollars
or a hospital system, as defined in section 19a-486i, whether located
within or outside the state, that had net patient revenue for fiscal year
2013 in an amount greater than one billion five hundred million dollars,
or any person that is organized or operated for profit, and (C) such
application is approved, the unit shall hire an independent consultant
to serve as a post-transfer compliance reporter for a period of three years
after completion of the transfer of ownership of the hospital. Such
reporter shall, at a minimum: (i) Meet with representatives of the
purchaser, the new hospital and members of the affected community
served by the new hospital not less than quarterly; and (ii) report to the
unit not less than quarterly concerning (I) efforts the purchaser and
representatives of the new hospital have taken to comply with any
conditions the unit placed on the approval of the certificate of need
application and plans for future compliance, and (II) community
Public Act No. 26-68 373 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
benefits and uncompensated care provided by the new hospital. The
purchaser shall give the reporter access to its records and facilities for
the purposes of carrying out the reporter's duties. The purchaser shall
hold a public hearing in the municipality in which the new hospital is
located not less than annually during the reporting period to provide
for public review and comment on the reporter's reports and findings.
(2) If the reporter finds that the purchaser has breached a condition
of the approval of the certificate of need application, the unit may, in
consultation with the purchaser, the reporter and any other interested
parties it deems appropriate, implement a performance improvement
plan designed to remedy the conditions identified by the reporter and
continue the reporting period for up to one year following a
determination by the unit that such conditions have been resolved.
(3) The purchaser shall provide funds, in an amount determined by
the unit not to exceed two hundred thousand dollars annually, for the
hiring of the post-transfer compliance reporter.
Sec. 241. Section 19a-639a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) [An] On or before June 30, 2027, an application for a certificate of
need shall be filed with the unit in accordance with the provisions of this
section and any regulations adopted by the Office of Health Strategy.
The application shall address the guidelines and principles set forth in
(1) subsection (a) of section 19a-639, and (2) regulations adopted by the
department. The applicant shall include with the application a
nonrefundable application fee based on the cost of the project. The
amount of the fee shall be as follows: (A) One thousand dollars for a
project that will cost not greater than fifty thousand dollars; (B) two
thousand dollars for a project that will cost greater than fifty thousand
dollars but not greater than one hundred thousand dollars; (C) three
thousand dollars for a project that will cost greater than one hundred
Public Act No. 26-68 374 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
thousand dollars but not greater than five hundred thousand dollars;
(D) four thousand dollars for a project that will cost greater than five
hundred thousand dollars but not greater than one million dollars; (E)
five thousand dollars for a project that will cost greater than one million
dollars but not greater than five million dollars; (F) eight thousand
dollars for a project that will cost greater than five million dollars but
not greater than ten million dollars; and (G) ten thousand dollars for a
project that will cost greater than ten million dollars.
(b) Prior to the filing of a certificate of need application pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section, the applicant shall (1) publish notice that
an application is to be submitted to the unit (A) in a newspaper having
a substantial circulation in the area where the project is to be located,
and (B) on the applicant's Internet web site in a clear and conspicuous
location that is easily accessible by members of the public, (2) request
the publication of notice (A) in at least two sites within the affected
community that are commonly accessed by the public, such as a town
hall or library, and (B) on any existing Internet web site of the
municipality or local health department, and (3) submit such notice to
the unit for posting on such unit's Internet web site. Such newspaper
notice shall be published for not less than three consecutive days, with
the final date of consecutive publication occurring not later than twenty
days prior to the date of filing of the certificate of need application, and
contain a brief description of the nature of the project and the street
address where the project is to be located. Postings in the affected
community and on the applicant's Internet web site shall remain until
the decision on the application is rendered. The unit shall not invalidate
any notice due to changes or removal of the notice from a community
Internet web site of which the applicant has no control. An applicant
shall file the certificate of need application with the unit not later than
ninety days after publishing notice of the application in a newspaper in
accordance with the provisions of this subsection. The unit shall not
accept the applicant's certificate of need application for filing unless the
Public Act No. 26-68 375 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
application is accompanied by the application fee prescribed in
subsection (a) of this section and proof of compliance with the
publication requirements prescribed in this subsection.
(c) (1) Not later than five business days after receipt of a properly filed
certificate of need application under this section, the unit shall publish
notice of the application on its Internet web site. Not later than thirty
days after the date of filing of the application, the unit may request such
additional information as the unit determines necessary to complete the
application. In addition to any information requested by the unit, if the
application involves the transfer of ownership of a hospital, as defined
in section 19a-639, the applicant shall submit to the unit (A) a plan
demonstrating how health care services will be provided by the new
hospital for the first three years following the transfer of ownership of
the hospital, including any consolidation, reduction, elimination or
expansion of existing services or introduction of new services, and (B)
the names of persons currently holding a position with the hospital to
be purchased or the purchaser, as defined in section 19a-639, as an
officer, director, board member or senior manager, whether or not such
person is expected to hold a position with the hospital after completion
of the transfer of ownership of the hospital and any salary, severance,
stock offering or any financial gain, current or deferred, such person is
expected to receive as a result of, or in relation to, the transfer of
ownership of the hospital.
(2) The applicant shall, not later than sixty days after the date of the
unit's request, submit any requested information and any information
required under this subsection to the unit. If an applicant fails to submit
such information to the unit within the sixty-day period, the unit shall
consider the application to have been withdrawn.
(3) The unit shall make reasonable efforts to limit the requests for
additional information to two such requests and, in all cases, cease all
requests for additional information not later than six months after
Public Act No. 26-68 376 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
receiving the application.
(d) Upon deeming an application filed under this section complete,
the unit shall provide notice of this determination to the applicant and
to the public in accordance with regulations adopted by the department.
In addition, the unit shall post such notice on its Internet web site and
notify the applicant not later than five days after deeming the
application complete. The date on which the unit posts such notice on
its Internet web site shall begin the review period. Except as provided
in this subsection, (1) the review period for an application deemed
complete shall be ninety days from the date on which the unit posts such
notice on its Internet web site; and (2) the unit shall issue a decision on
an application deemed complete prior to the expiration of the ninety-
day review period in matters without a public hearing. The review
period for an application deemed complete that involves a transfer of a
large group practice, as described in subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of
section 19a-638, when the offer was made in response to a request for
proposal or similar voluntary offer for sale, shall be sixty days from the
date on which the unit posts notice on its Internet web site. Upon request
or for good cause shown, the unit may extend the review period for a
period of time not to exceed sixty days. If the review period is extended,
the unit shall issue a decision on the completed application prior to the
expiration of the extended review period. If the unit holds a public
hearing concerning a completed application in accordance with
subsection (e) or (f) of this section, the unit shall issue a decision on the
completed application not later than sixty days after the date the unit
closes the public hearing record.
(e) Except as provided in this subsection, the unit shall hold a public
hearing on a [properly filed and completed] certificate of need
application properly filed and completed under this section if three or
more individuals or an individual representing an entity with five or
more people submits a request, in writing, that a public hearing be held
Public Act No. 26-68 377 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
on the application. For a [properly filed and completed] certificate of
need application properly filed and completed under this section
involving a transfer of ownership of a large group practice, as described
in subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of section 19a-638, when an offer was
made in response to a request for proposal or similar voluntary offer for
sale, a public hearing shall be held if twenty-five or more individuals or
an individual representing twenty-five or more people submits a
request, in writing, that a public hearing be held on the application. Any
request for a public hearing shall be made to the unit not later than thirty
days after the date the unit deems the application to be complete.
(f) (1) The unit shall hold a public hearing with respect to each
certificate of need application filed pursuant to section 19a-638, after
December 1, 2015, and on or before June 30, 2027, that concerns any
transfer of ownership involving a hospital. Such hearing shall be held in
the municipality in which the hospital that is the subject of the
application is located.
(2) The unit may hold a public hearing with respect to any certificate
of need application submitted under this [chapter] section. The unit
shall provide not less than two weeks' advance notice to the applicant,
in writing, and to the public by publication in a newspaper having a
substantial circulation in the area served by the health care facility or
provider. In conducting its activities under this chapter, the unit may
hold hearings with respect to applications of a similar nature at the same
time. The applicant shall post a copy of the unit's hearing notice on the
applicant's Internet web site in a clear and conspicuous location that is
easily accessible by members of the public. Such applicant shall request
the publication of notice in at least two sites within the affected
community that are commonly accessed by the public, such as a town
hall or library, as well as on any existing Internet web site of the
municipality or local health department. The unit shall not invalidate
any notice due to changes or removal of the notice from a community
Public Act No. 26-68 378 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Internet web site of which the applicant has no control.
(g) For applications submitted on or after October 1, 2023, and on or
before June 30, 2027, the unit may retain an independent consultant with
expertise in the specific area of health care that is the subject of the
application filed by an applicant if the review and analysis of an
application cannot reasonably be conducted by the unit without the
expertise of an industry analyst or other actuarial consultant. The unit
shall submit bills for independent consultant services to the applicant.
Such applicant shall pay such bills not later than thirty days after receipt
of such bills. Such bills shall be a reasonable amount per application.
The provisions of chapter 57 and sections 4-212 to 4-219, inclusive, and
4e-19 shall not apply to any retainer agreement executed pursuant to
this subsection.
[(h) The Commissioner of Health Strategy may implement policies
and procedures necessary to administer the provisions of this section
while in the process of adopting such policies and procedures as
regulation, provided the commissioner holds a public hearing prior to
implementing the policies and procedures and posts notice of intent to
adopt regulations on the office's Internet web site and the eRegulations
System not later than twenty days after the date of implementation.
Policies and procedures implemented pursuant to this section shall be
valid until the time final regulations are adopted.]
Sec. 242. Section 19a-639b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) A certificate of need issued under section 19a-638a shall be valid
only for the project described in the application. A certificate of need
issued under said section shall be valid for two years from the date of
issuance by the unit. During the period of time that such certificate is
valid and the thirty-day period following the expiration of the
certificate, the holder of the certificate shall provide the unit with such
Public Act No. 26-68 379 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
information as the unit may request on the development of the project
covered by the certificate.
(b) [Upon] On or before June 30, 2027, upon request from a certificate
holder, the unit may extend the duration of a certificate of need for such
additional period of time as the unit determines is reasonably necessary
to expeditiously complete the project. Not later than five business days
after receiving a request to extend the duration of a certificate of need,
the unit shall post such request on its web site. Any person who wishes
to comment on extending the duration of the certificate of need shall
provide written comments to the unit on the requested extension not
later than thirty days after the date the unit posts notice of the request
for an extension of time on its web site. The unit shall hold a public
hearing on any request to extend the duration of a certificate of need
made under this subsection if three or more individuals or an individual
representing an entity with five or more people submits a request, in
writing, that a public hearing be held on the request to extend the
duration of a certificate of need.
(c) [In] On or before June 30, 2027, in the event that the unit
determines that: (1) Commencement, construction or other preparation
has not been substantially undertaken during a valid certificate of need
period; or (2) the certificate holder has not made a good-faith effort to
complete the project as approved, the unit may withdraw, revoke or
rescind the certificate of need.
(d) [A] On or before June 30, 2027, a certificate of need shall not be
transferable or assignable nor shall a project be transferred from a
certificate holder to another person.
(e) The Commissioner of Health Strategy may implement policies
and procedures necessary to administer the provisions of this section
while in the process of adopting such policies and procedures as
regulation, provided the commissioner holds a public hearing prior to
Public Act No. 26-68 380 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
implementing the policies and procedures and posts notice of intent to
adopt regulations on the office's Internet web site and the eRegulations
System not later than twenty days after the date of implementation.
Policies and procedures implemented pursuant to this section shall be
valid until the time final regulations are adopted.
Sec. 243. Subsection (a) of section 19a-639c of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) [Any] On or before June 30, 2027, any health care facility that
proposes to relocate a facility shall submit a letter to the unit, as
described in subsection (c) of section 19a-638. In addition to the
requirements prescribed in said subsection (c), in such letter the health
care facility shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the unit that the
population served by the health care facility and the payer mix will not
substantially change as a result of the facility's proposed relocation. If
the facility is unable to demonstrate to the satisfaction of the unit that
the population served and the payer mix will not substantially change
as a result of the proposed relocation, the health care facility shall apply
for certificate of need approval pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection
(a) of section 19a-638, in order to effectuate the proposed relocation. The
unit shall provide a determination not later than thirty days after receipt
of such letter.
Sec. 244. Subsections (a) to (c), inclusive, of section 19a-639e of the
general statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Unless otherwise required to file a certificate of need application
pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a) of section 19a-638, any
health care facility that proposes on or before June 30, 2027, to terminate
a service that was authorized pursuant to a certificate of need issued
under [this chapter] section 19a-638a shall file a modification request
Public Act No. 26-68 381 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
with the unit not later than sixty days prior to the proposed date of the
termination of the service. The unit may request additional information
from the health care facility as necessary to process the modification
request. In addition, the unit shall hold a public hearing on any request
from a health care facility to terminate a service pursuant to this section
if three or more individuals or an individual representing an entity with
five or more people submits a request, in writing, that a public hearing
be held on the health care facility's proposal to terminate a service.
(b) Unless otherwise required to file a certificate of need application
pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a) of section 19a-638, any
health care facility that proposes on or before June 30, 2027, to terminate
all services offered by such facility, that were authorized pursuant to
one or more certificates of need issued under [this chapter] section 19a-
639a, shall provide notification to the unit not later than sixty days prior
to the termination of services and such facility shall surrender its
certificate of need not later than thirty days prior to the termination of
services.
(c) Unless otherwise required to file a certificate of need application
pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a) of section 19a-638, any
health care facility that proposes on or before June 30, 2027, to terminate
the operation of a facility or service for which a certificate of need was
not obtained shall notify the unit not later than sixty days prior to
terminating the operation of the facility or service.
Sec. 245. Subsections (a) and (b) of section 19a-639f of the general
statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The Health Systems Planning Unit of the Office of Health Strategy
shall conduct a cost and market impact review in each case where (1) an
application for a certificate of need filed on or before June 30, 2027,
pursuant to section 19a-638 involves the transfer of ownership of a
Public Act No. 26-68 382 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
hospital, as defined in section 19a-639, and (2) the purchaser in a
transaction occurring on or before June 30, 2027, is a hospital, as defined
in section 19a-490, whether located within or outside the state, that had
net patient revenue for fiscal year 2013 in an amount greater than one
billion five hundred million dollars, or a hospital system, as defined in
section 19a-486i, whether located within or outside the state, that had
net patient revenue for fiscal year 2013 in an amount greater than one
billion five hundred million dollars or any person that is organized or
operated for profit.
(b) Not later than twenty-one days after receipt of a properly filed
certificate of need application involving the transfer of ownership of a
hospital filed on or after December 1, 2015, and on or before June 30,
2027, as described in subsection (a) of this section, the unit shall initiate
such cost and market impact review by sending the transacting parties
a written notice that shall contain a description of the basis for the cost
and market impact review as well as a request for information and
documents. Not later than thirty days after receipt of such notice, the
transacting parties shall submit to the unit a written response. Such
response shall include, but need not be limited to, any information or
documents requested by the unit concerning the transfer of ownership
of the hospital. The unit shall have the powers with respect to the cost
and market impact review as provided in section 19a-633.
Sec. 246. Section 19a-641 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
Any health care facility or institution and any state health care facility
or institution aggrieved by any final decision of said unit issued on an
application filed on or before June 30, 2027, under the provisions of
sections 19a-630 to 19a-639e, inclusive, may appeal from such decision
in accordance with the provisions of section 4-183, except venue shall be
in the judicial district in which it is located. Such appeal shall have
precedence in respect to order of trial over all other cases except writs
Public Act No. 26-68 383 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
of habeas corpus, actions brought by or on behalf of the state, including
information on the relation of private individuals, and appeals from
awards or decisions of administrative law judges.
Sec. 247. Subsection (b) of section 9 of public act 26-12 is repealed and
the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2027):
(b) (1) (A) Not later than fifteen days prior to (i) the termination or
nonrenewal of any service contract, (ii) the start of a successor service
contract for services previously performed by the awarding authority's
own employees, or (iii) the sale or transfer of any property where
employees were employed at any time during the ninety-day period
preceding such sale or transfer of such property, the awarding authority
shall, where applicable, give advance notice to a terminated contractor,
the employees of such terminated contractor and the exclusive
bargaining representative of any of the terminated contractor's
employees, of the termination or nonrenewal of such service contract,
successor service contract for such services or the sale or transfer of such
property. Such notice shall be provided in writing to each affected
employee and be posted in a conspicuous place at the worksite. The
awarding authority shall provide the terminated contractor, employees
of such terminated contractor and the exclusive bargaining
representative of any of the terminated contractor's employees with the
name, telephone number and address of the successor employer or
employers, if known.
(B) The terminated contractor shall, not later than three days after
receipt of such notice, provide the successor employer with the name,
date of hire and employment occupation classification of each employee
employed by the terminated contractor at the site or sites covered by the
service contract or contract to sell or transfer property as of the date the
terminated contractor receives such notice.
(2) On the date (A) the service contract terminates, (B) the successor
Public Act No. 26-68 384 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
service contract for services previously performed by the awarding
authority's own employees begins, or (C) the sale or transfer of property
occurs, the terminated contractor shall provide the successor employer
with updated information concerning the name, date of hire and
employment occupation classification of each employee employed by
the terminated contractor at the site or sites covered by the service
contract or the contract to sell or transfer property, to ensure that such
information is current up to the actual date of (i) service contract
termination, (ii) successor service contract start, or (iii) the sale or
transfer of property.
(3) If the awarding authority fails to notify the terminated contractor
of the identity of the successor employer, as required by subdivision (1)
of this subsection, the terminated contractor shall provide the
information described in subdivision (2) of this subsection to the
awarding authority not later than three days after receiving notice from
the awarding authority pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection.
The awarding authority shall be responsible for providing such
information to the successor employer as soon as the successor
employer has been selected.
(4) (A) Except as provided in [subparagraphs (D) and (E)]
subparagraph (D) of this subdivision, a successor employer shall retain,
for at least ninety days from the date of first performance of services (i)
under the successor service contract, or (ii) following the date of the sale
or transfer of a property, all of the employees who were continuously
employed by the terminated contractor at the site or sites covered by the
service contract or the contract to sell or transfer property during the
ninety-day period immediately preceding the termination or
nonrenewal of such service contract, start of the successor service
contract or sale or transfer of such property, including any periods of
layoff or leave with recall rights.
(B) Except as provided in [subparagraphs (D) and (E)] subparagraph
Public Act No. 26-68 385 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(D) of this subdivision, if the successor service contract is terminated
prior to the expiration of such ninety-day period, then any successor
employer awarded a subsequent successor service contract shall be
bound by the requirements set forth in this subsection to retain, for a
new ninety-day period commencing with the onset of the subsequent
successor service contract, all of the employees who were previously
employed by any one or more of the terminated contractors at the site
or sites covered by the service contract or contract to sell or transfer
property continuously during the ninety-day period immediately
preceding the date of the most recently terminated service contract,
including any periods of layoff or leave with recall rights.
(C) At least five days prior to the termination of a service contract, or
at least fifteen days prior to the commencement of the first performance
of service (i) under a successor service contract, or (ii) following the date
of the sale or transfer of a property, whichever is later, the successor
employer shall hand-deliver a written offer of employment in
substantially the form set forth below to each such employee in such
employee's native language or any other language in which such
employee is fluent:
"IMPORTANT INFORMATION REGARDING YOUR
EMPLOYMENT
To: .... (Name of employee)
We have received information that you are employed by .... (name of
terminated contractor) and are currently performing work at ....
(address of worksite) .... (name of terminated contractor's) contract to
perform .... (describe services under contract) at .... (address of worksite)
will terminate as of .... (last day of predecessor contract or date of the
sale or transfer of property) and it will no longer be providing those
services as of that date.
Public Act No. 26-68 386 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
We are .... (name of successor employer) and have been hired to
provide services similar to those of or have purchased or acquired the
property of .... (name of terminated contractor) at .... (address of
worksite). We are offering you a job with us for a ninety-day transition
period starting .... (first day of successor contract or date of the start of
services following the sale or transfer of property) to perform the same
type of work that you have already been doing for .... (name of
terminated contractor) under the following terms:
Payrate (per hour): $....
Hours per shift: ....
Total hours per week: ....
Benefits: ....
You must respond to this offer within the next ten days. If you want
to continue working at .... (address of worksite) you must let us know
by .... (no later than ten days after the date of this letter). If we do not
receive your response by the end of business that day, we will not hire
you and you will lose your job. We can be reached at .... (successor
employer telephone number).
Connecticut state law gives you the following rights:
1. You have the right with certain exceptions, to be hired by our
company for the first ninety days that we begin to provide services at ....
(address of worksite).
2. During this ninety-day period, you cannot be fired without just
cause.
3. If you believe that you have been fired or laid off in violation of this
law, you have the right to sue us or file a complaint with the Labor
Commissioner and be awarded back pay, attorneys' fees and court costs.
Public Act No. 26-68 387 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
From: .... (Name of successor employer)
.... (Address of successor employer)
.... (Telephone number of successor employer)"
Each offer of employment shall state the time within which such
employee must accept such offer but in no case shall that time be less
than ten days from the date of the offer of employment.
[(D) The provisions of subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this subdivision
shall not be construed to require a successor employer to retain any
employee whose attendance and performance records, while working
under the terminated service contract, would lead a reasonably prudent
employer to terminate the employee.]
[(E)] (D) For the purchase or acquisition of property by a successor
employer, the provisions of subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this
subdivision shall only apply when the services to be performed at the
site or sites covered by the contract to sell or transfer property are
substantially the same as services previously provided by the
terminated contractor's employees.
(5) If at any time a successor employer determines that fewer
employees are required to perform (A) the successor service contract, or
(B) services at the purchased or acquired property than were required
by the terminated contractor, the successor employer shall be required
to retain such employees by seniority within each job classification,
based upon the employees' total length of service at the affected site or
sites.
(6) During such ninety-day period, the successor employer shall
maintain a preferential hiring list of employees eligible for retention
pursuant to subdivision (4) of this subsection, who were not initially
retained by the successor employer, from which the successor contractor
Public Act No. 26-68 388 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
shall hire additional employees, if necessary.
(7) Except as provided under subdivision (5) of this subsection,
during such ninety-day period, the successor employer shall not
discharge without just cause an employee retained pursuant to this
section. For purposes of this subdivision, "just cause" shall be
determined solely by the performance or conduct of the particular
employee.
(8) After such ninety-day period, the successor employer shall
provide each employee retained pursuant to this section a performance
evaluation. If the performance of such employee is satisfactory during
the ninety-day period, the successor employer shall offer the employee
continued employment under the terms and conditions established by
the successor employer, or as required by law.
(9) The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to prevent
a terminated contractor from taking disciplinary action against an
employee, to the extent permissible by law or such employee's collective
bargaining agreement, including, but not limited to, termination, prior
to (A) the start of the successor service contract, or (B) the successor
employer assuming control of the site or sites covered by the contract to
sell or transfer property, if such employee's attendance or performance
records, while working under the terminated contract, would lead a
reasonably prudent employer to take similar disciplinary action.
Sec. 248. (NEW) (Effective from passage) Not later than January 1, 2027,
and annually thereafter, the Commissioner of Social Services shall
report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general
statutes, to the joint standing committees of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to appropriations and the budgets
of state agencies and public health regarding the collection of moneys
for deposit in the hospital supplemental payment account and the use
of funds in such account during the preceding calendar year.
Public Act No. 26-68 389 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 249. (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a working
group to study and provide recommendations for the establishment of
a payroll tax program for employees in this state. Such study shall
examine, but need not be limited to: (1) Considerations of mandatory or
optional participation in such program, such as (A) whether such
program should be (i) mandatory for employees and employers, (ii)
optional for employees and mandatory for employers, (iii) optional for
employers and mandatory for employees, or (iv) optional for employees
and employers, (B) the role of union negotiations to determine program
participation, and (C) the feasibility of allowing employees who have
opted in to such program to opt out of such program; (2) payroll tax
rates and tax credits for different wage levels; (3) statutory wage
reductions for participation in such program; (4) methods to mitigate
lower Social Security benefits that result from participation in such
program, such as (A) payment of a state-administered retirement or
income benefit for program participants, and (B) retirement account
contributions paid by employers on behalf of employees, or paid by
employees; (5) methods to mitigate any reductions in employer-
provided retirement benefits resulting from lower reported salary, such
as adjustments to pension calculations and employer retirement account
contributions; (6) any administrative requirements of the Department of
Revenue Services in implementing such program; (7) any
administrative requirements of employers participating in such
program; and (8) assuming mandatory participation of employees and
employers, any financial impact that such program may have on state
revenue, employee net wages and employer payroll expenses.
(b) The working group shall consist of the following members:
(1) Two appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate, one of
whom shall be a chairperson of the working group, and one of whom
shall be a representative of a labor organization;
(2) Two appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives,
Public Act No. 26-68 390 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
one of whom shall be a chairperson of the working group, and one of
whom shall be an executive from a payroll services company doing
business in this state;
(3) One appointed by the majority leader of the Senate, who shall be
an attorney with experience in legal issues related to pensions in this
state;
(4) One appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives, who shall be an attorney with experience in tax law in
this state;
(5) One appointed by the minority leader of the Senate, who shall be
a payroll administrator from an employer in this state that employs
more than one hundred employees;
(6) One appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives, who shall be a representative from a state-wide
business association in this state;
(7) The Commissioner of Revenue Services, or the commissioner's
designee;
(8) One representative of the office of the Governor;
(9) The Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, or the
secretary's designee;
(10) The State Treasurer, or the State Treasurer's designee; and
(11) The House and Senate chairpersons of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to finance, revenue and bonding, or their designees.
(c) All initial appointments to the working group shall be made not
later than thirty days after the effective date of this section. Any vacancy
Public Act No. 26-68 391 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
shall be filled by the appointing authority.
(d) The chairpersons of the working group shall jointly schedule the
first meeting of the working group, which shall be held not later than
sixty days after the effective date of this section.
(e) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to finance,
revenue and bonding shall serve as administrative staff of the working
group. The Office of Legislative Research shall assist the working group
in conducting research related to the development of a payroll tax
program, and the Office of Fiscal Analysis shall assist the working group
in calculating costs associated with the development and
implementation of any such payroll tax program.
(f) Not later than January 1, 2027, the working group shall submit a
report on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to finance, revenue and bonding, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes. The working group
shall terminate on the date that it submits such report or January 1, 2027,
whichever is later.
Sec. 250. (NEW) (Effective from passage) There is established an account
to be known as the "innocence project revolving loan account", which
shall be a separate, nonlapsing account. The account shall contain any
moneys required by law to be deposited in the account. Moneys in the
account shall be expended by the Judicial Branch for the purposes of the
provision of loans to claimants who may meet the qualifications for
compensation pursuant to section 54-102uu of the general statutes.
Sec. 251. (Effective from passage) The sum of $400,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to
the Judicial Department, for Legal Aid, for the fiscal year ending June
Public Act No. 26-68 392 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
30, 2026, and the sum of $500,000 of the amount appropriated in section
1 of public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to the Judicial Department,
for Legal Aid, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be
transferred to the innocence project revolving loan account established in
section 250 of this act.
Sec. 252. Subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of section 9-369b of the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(3) (A) (i) For purposes of this [subdivision] subparagraph,
"community notification system" means a communication system
maintained by a municipality that is available to all residents of such
municipality and permits any resident to opt to receive notifications of
community events or news from such municipality via electronic mail,
text, telephone or other electronic or automated means.
[(B)] (ii) At the direction of the chief elected official of a municipality
or, with respect to a referendum called for by a regional school district,
the request of the chairperson of the regional school board of education
having jurisdiction over such municipality included in such regional
school district, a municipality that maintains a community notification
system may use such system to send or publish a notice informing all
residents enrolled in such system of an upcoming referendum
pertaining to such municipality or regional school district, as applicable.
Such notice shall be limited to [(i)] (I) the time and location of such
referendum, [(ii)] (II) a statement of the question as it is to appear on the
ballot at the referendum, and [(iii)] (III) if applicable, the explanatory
text or other material approved in accordance with subdivision (1) or (2)
of this subsection. Any such notice shall not advocate the approval or
disapproval of the proposal or question or attempt to influence or aid
the success or defeat of the referendum.
(iii) An Internet web site maintained by a municipality or a regional
Public Act No. 26-68 393 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
school district shall not be deemed a community notification system for
the purposes of this subparagraph, but may contain a notice with the
information described in subparagraph (A)(ii) of this subdivision.
(B) The superintendent of schools for a school district may
disseminate a written notice through the schools within such school
district for the purpose of informing the parents or legal guardians of
students enrolled in such schools of an upcoming referendum
pertaining to such school district. Such written notice shall be limited to
(i) the time and location of such referendum, (ii) a statement of the
question as it is to appear on the ballot at the referendum, and (iii) if
applicable, the explanatory text or other material approved in
accordance with subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection. Any such
notice shall not advocate the approval or disapproval of the proposal or
question or attempt to influence or aid the success or defeat of the
referendum.
(C) Other than a notice authorized by this subdivision, no person may
use or authorize the use of municipal funds to send an unsolicited
communication to a group of residents regarding a referendum via
electronic mail, text, telephone or other electronic or automated means
for the purpose of reminding or encouraging such residents to vote in a
referendum, provided such prohibition shall not apply to a regularly
published newsletter or similar publication.
[(D) An Internet web site maintained by a municipality or a regional
school district shall not be deemed a community notification system for
the purposes of this subdivision, but may contain a notice with the
information described in subparagraph (B) of this subdivision.]
Sec. 253. (Effective from passage) Section 64 of public act 26-12 shall take
effect July 1, 2027.
Sec. 254. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) For purposes of this section:
Public Act No. 26-68 394 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(1) "Academic year" means the period of time beginning July first and
ending on the succeeding June thirtieth.
(2) "Authority" has the same meaning as provided in section 32-600
of the general statutes.
(3) "Excess net profits" means the remainder of net profits, as defined
in subdivision (5) of this subsection, on an annual basis, from the
operation of the PeoplesBank Arena in excess of four million dollars.
(4) "Facility management agreement" means the agreement between
the authority and a qualified operator, dated August 16, 2024, relating
to the management of the PeoplesBank Arena.
(5) "Net profits" has the same meaning as provided in the facility
management agreement, as amended from time to time.
(6) "PeoplesBank Arena" means the civic center and coliseum
complex in the city of Hartford known as PeoplesBank Arena in
Hartford and includes the adjoining parking garage owned by the
authority that is located on Church Street in the city of Hartford.
(7) "Qualified operator" means an entity, including any affiliate
thereof, that executed the facility management agreement with the
authority.
(8) "Qualified agreement" means an agreement between a qualified
operator and The University of Connecticut in which the qualified
operator agrees to host, and The University of Connecticut commits to
participate in, a minimum of twenty UConn athletic events each
academic year at the PeoplesBank Arena for a term that commences not
later than July 1, 2027, and ends not earlier than September 1, 2045,
provided the minimum number of such athletic events may be reduced
in any given academic year with the unanimous consent of the qualified
operator, The University of Connecticut, the authority and the Secretary
Public Act No. 26-68 395 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
of the Office of Policy and Management.
(9) "UConn athletic events" means University of Connecticut's men's
and women's intercollegiate basketball games and men's intercollegiate
hockey games.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, The
University of Connecticut may enter into a qualified agreement with a
qualified operator, which, in part, allows the qualified operator to claim
a credit against the taxes imposed by chapter 219 of the general statutes.
A qualified operator may claim a credit in the latter of (1) each of the
first five academic years identified in the qualified agreement, or (2) the
academic year commencing July 1, 2027, and the four successive
academic years. The amount of the credit allowable for each of the first
five academic years shall not exceed two million dollars for any
academic year and the aggregate amount of the credits allowed under
this section shall not exceed ten million dollars. If a qualified operator is
eligible to claim a credit for an academic year under this section, such
qualified operator shall claim the credit on its tax return due under
section 12-414 of the general statutes, for the monthly period ending July
thirty-first during such academic year.
(c) (1) Any qualified agreement shall include a provision that requires
a qualified operator to repay a prorated portion of any credit that such
operator claimed under this section if such qualified operator fails to
host twenty or more UConn athletic events at the PeoplesBank Arena
during any academic year, due to a breach of the qualified agreement
by such qualified operator. Any amount of any such credit that a
qualified operator is required to repay shall be reported by such
qualified operator on the tax return due under chapter 219 of the general
statutes for the first monthly period ending after the issuance of a
repayment voucher by the authority in accordance with the provisions
of subsection (f) of this section. Such repayment shall constitute a final
tax due to the state, subject to collection in accordance with the
Public Act No. 26-68 396 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
provisions of section 12-35 of the general statutes. A qualified agreement
shall include a provision that requires any repayment attributable to
future academic years to be accelerated to the current academic year,
proportionate to the number of missed UConn athletic events of the
twenty required UConn athletic events for an academic year, if, and
when, the authority determines that the qualified operator is in breach
of the qualified agreement and is unable or unwilling to host the
minimum number of UConn athletic events in such future academic
years.
(2) A qualified agreement shall provide for the division of net profit
or loss between the qualified operator and The University of
Connecticut on an annual basis as follows: (A) The qualified operator
shall be responsible for any net loss from the operation of the
PeoplesBank Arena; and (B) The University of Connecticut shall be
entitled to the share of net profit attributable to the first four million
dollars of net profit, and any excess net profits, from the operation of the
PeoplesBank Arena, in accordance with the schedule prescribed in
subdivision (3) of this subsection.
(3) A qualified agreement shall require a qualified operator to pay to
The University of Connecticut the following percentages of net profit
attributable to the first four million dollars of net profit, and to pay any
excess net profits, from the operation of the PeoplesBank Arena:
(A) For the first academic year in which the qualified operator is
eligible to claim a credit under this section, ten per cent of the first four
million dollars of net profit and five per cent of any excess net profits;
(B) For the second academic year in which the qualified operator is
eligible to claim a credit under this section, twenty per cent of the first
four million dollars of net profit and ten per cent of any excess net
profits;
Public Act No. 26-68 397 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(C) For the third academic year in which the qualified operator is
eligible to claim a credit under this section, thirty per cent of the first
four million dollars of net profit and fifteen per cent of any excess net
profits;
(D) For the fourth academic year in which the qualified operator is
eligible to claim a credit under this section, forty per cent of the first four
million dollars of net profit and twenty per cent of any excess net profits;
(E) For the fifth academic year in which the qualified operator is
eligible to claim a credit under this section, fifty per cent of the first four
million dollars of net profit and twenty-five per cent of any excess net
profits;
(F) For each academic year thereafter for the term of the qualified
agreement, fifty per cent of the first four million dollars of net profit and
twenty-five per cent of any excess net profits;
(G) Provided that for academic years one to five, inclusive, of the
qualified agreement, if the qualified operator fails to receive the
applicable credit on or before the first day of the academic year, the
amount of net profit subject to the foregoing percentages shall be
prorated to reflect the portion of such academic year occurring on and
after the qualified operator's receipt of such credit; and
(H) Provided that for academic years six and thereafter for the term
of the qualified agreement, the amount of net profit subject to the
foregoing percentages shall be prorated only in the event the qualified
operator has failed to receive ten million dollars in aggregate credits.
(d) Any qualified agreement shall be executed not later than
December 31, 2026, except that any amendment to such qualified
agreement may be executed after December 31, 2026, provided any such
qualified agreement or amendment thereto shall be subject to prior
approval by the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management and
Public Act No. 26-68 398 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
the authority.
(e) If the amount of the credit allowed pursuant to this section
exceeds a qualified operator's liability for the tax imposed under chapter
219 of the general statutes, the Commissioner of Revenue Services shall
treat such excess as an overpayment and shall refund the amount of
such excess, without interest, to such qualified operator. The credit
allowed under this section shall be claimed after all other credits have
been claimed.
(f) The Commissioner of Revenue Services may require confirmation,
or other documentation, from the authority, confirming the qualified
operator's eligibility for a tax credit claimed pursuant to subsection (b)
of this section. If a qualified operator is required to repay any portion of
a tax credit claimed pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the
authority shall issue a repayment voucher to such qualified operator not
later than thirty days after the end of the academic year in which such
repayment obligation arises. The authority shall provide a copy of any
such repayment voucher to the Commissioner of Revenue Services and
the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, and any other
information requested by said commissioner or secretary.
Sec. 255. Section 32-616b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, the
authority may enter into one or more agreements for a project to
renovate and reconstruct the XL Center. Any such agreement shall be
entered into not later than December 31, 2025, except amendments
thereto may be entered into after said date. Any such agreement or
amendment shall be subject to the approval of the Secretary of the Office
of Policy and Management.
(b) Any such agreement shall provide that the authority, the state, or
Public Act No. 26-68 399 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
a combination thereof, shall contribute not more than one hundred
twenty-five million dollars and the contractor shall contribute not less
than twenty million dollars toward the costs of any renovation or
reconstruction of the XL Center occurring after January 1, 2023. The
value of any credit claimed in accordance with section 254 of this act
shall not be applied toward such contribution amounts of the authority,
the state or the contractor.
Sec. 256. Subsection (a) of section 4-30a of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) (1) (A) For the fiscal years commencing on or after July 1, 2017,
and ending on or before June 30, 2024, all revenue in excess of three
billion one hundred fifty million dollars received by the state each fiscal
year from estimated and final payments of the personal income tax
imposed under chapter 229 and the affected business entity tax imposed
under section 12-699 shall be transferred by the Treasurer to a special
fund to be known as the Budget Reserve Fund. On and after July 1, 2018,
the threshold amount shall be adjusted annually by the compound
annual growth rate of personal income in the state over the preceding
five calendar years, using data reported by the United States Bureau of
Economic Analysis.
(B) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, the threshold amount
prescribed by subparagraph (A) of this subdivision shall be four billion
seventy-nine million three hundred thousand dollars.
(C) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the threshold amount
prescribed by subparagraph (A) of this subdivision shall be [four billion
seven hundred twenty-eight million six hundred thousand] five billion
five hundred forty-two million three hundred thousand dollars.
(D) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, the threshold amount
Public Act No. 26-68 400 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
prescribed by subparagraph (A) of this subdivision shall be five billion
two million five hundred thousand dollars. On and after July 1, [2026]
2027, the threshold amount shall be adjusted annually by the compound
annual growth rate of personal income in the state over the preceding
five calendar years, using data reported by the United States Bureau of
Economic Analysis.
(2) The General Assembly may amend the threshold amount
determined under subdivision (1) of this subsection, by vote of at least
three-fifths of the members of each house of the General Assembly, due
to changes in state or federal tax law or policy or significant adjustments
to economic growth or tax collections.
Sec. 257. Section 42 of public act 25-168 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
Not later than June 30, 2026, the Comptroller shall transfer [two
hundred forty-four] one hundred fourteen million dollars of the
resources of the General Fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, to
be accounted for as revenue of the General Fund for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027.
Sec. 258. (Effective from passage) Not later than June 30, 2026, the
Comptroller shall transfer two hundred thirty-three million seven
hundred thousand dollars of the resources of the General Fund for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, to be accounted for as revenue of the
General Fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.
Sec. 259. (Effective from passage) Not later than June 30, 2026, the
Comptroller shall transfer fifty million dollars of the resources of the
General Fund for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, to the Federal Cuts
Response Fund established pursuant to section 1 of special act 26-1.
Sec. 260. Section 43 of public act 25-168 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
Public Act No. 26-68 401 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
The following amounts shall be transferred from the resources of the
General Fund to the Municipal Revenue Sharing Fund: (1) For the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, [one hundred one million] eighty-seven
million nine hundred thousand dollars, and (2) for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2027, [ninety] seventy-five million dollars.
Sec. 261. (NEW) (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the
provisions of section 12-494 of the general statutes, for the fiscal years
ending June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027, the Comptroller shall not make
the revenue transfer described in subsection (d) of section 12-494 of the
general statutes.
Sec. 262. Section 12-407e of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) [(1) From the third Sunday in August until the Saturday next
succeeding, inclusive, during the period beginning July 1, 2004, and
ending June 30, 2015, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply to
sales of any article of clothing or footwear intended to be worn on or
about the human body the cost of which article to the purchaser is less
than three hundred dollars.
(2) On and after July 1, 2015, from] From the third Sunday in August
until the Saturday next succeeding, inclusive, the provisions of this
chapter shall not apply to sales of any article of clothing or footwear,
including cleated shoes, intended to be worn on or about the human
body or to any backpack, the cost of which article or backpack to the
purchaser is less than [one] three hundred dollars.
(b) For the purposes of this section, clothing or footwear shall not
include (1) any special clothing or footwear primarily designed for
athletic activity or protective use and which is not normally worn except
when used for the athletic activity or protective use for which it was
designed, and (2) jewelry, handbags, luggage other than backpacks,
Public Act No. 26-68 402 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
umbrellas, wallets, watches and similar items carried on or about the
human body but not worn on the body in the manner characteristic of
clothing intended for exemption under this section.
Sec. 263. (NEW) (Effective from passage and applicable to income and
taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2026) (a) As used in this
section:
(1) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Revenue Services;
(2) "Department" means the Department of Revenue Services;
(3) "Income year" means the income year or taxable year, as
determined under chapter 207, 208 or 229 of the general statutes, as the
case may be;
(4) "Qualified small business" means an employer in the state that (A)
is subject to tax under chapter 207, 208 or 229 of the general statutes, (B)
employs fewer than fifty employees in the state on the date of its
application under subsection (c) of this section, and (C) has adopted an
individual coverage health reimbursement arrangement, as described in
Section 9831(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, in lieu of a traditional
employer-provided health insurance plan;
(5) "Qualified contribution" means a contribution by a qualified small
business toward a covered employee's individual coverage health
reimbursement arrangement during the income year; and
(6) "Covered employee" means an employee for whom the qualified
small employer made a qualified contribution toward an individual
coverage health reimbursement arrangement during the income year.
(b) (1) There is established an individual coverage health
reimbursement arrangement tax credit for qualified small businesses
whereby a qualified small business may be allowed a tax credit against
Public Act No. 26-68 403 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
the taxes imposed under chapter 207, 208 or 229 of the general statutes,
other than the liability imposed by section 12-707 of the general statutes.
(2) The amount of the credit allowed for an income year shall be equal
to the lesser of: (A) The sum of qualified contributions made by the
qualified small business during the income year, or (B) one thousand
dollars per covered employee. Any tax credit not used in the income
year during which it was earned shall expire and shall not be
refundable.
(3) A credit under this section may be allowed to a qualified small
business for the first income year during which the business offered an
individual coverage health reimbursement arrangement and the
immediately succeeding income year. No credit shall be allowed for any
other income year.
(c) (1) Any qualified small business planning to claim a credit under
the provisions of this section shall apply to the commissioner, in such
form and manner prescribed by the commissioner, to reserve an
allocation for a credit based upon the qualified contributions the
business intends to make. Such application shall indicate the amount of
qualified contributions that the business intends to make in the first
income year during which it offers an individual coverage health
reimbursement arrangement and the immediately succeeding income
year. The application shall contain such information as the
commissioner deems necessary to administer the provisions of this
section.
(2) The commissioner shall approve applications for the reservation
of a credit on a first-come, first-served basis and shall notify the
qualified small business in writing not later than thirty days after the
date of receipt of an application of the commissioner's approval or
rejection of the application. If the commissioner approves the
application of the qualified small business, the commissioner shall issue
Public Act No. 26-68 404 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
a certification letter indicating the amount of the tax credit that has been
reserved for such business during each of the two income years for
which it is eligible to claim the credit. A qualified small business may
not claim a credit under this section in excess of the amount reserved by
the commissioner.
(3) The total amount of tax credits reserved under this section shall
not exceed five million dollars for any income year.
(d) If the qualified small business is an S corporation or an entity
treated as a partnership for federal income tax purposes, the tax credit
may be claimed by the shareholders or partners of the qualified small
business. If the qualified small business is a single member limited
liability company that is disregarded as an entity separate from its
owner, the tax credit may be claimed by the limited liability company's
owner.
Sec. 264. Section 12-330ll of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective October 1, 2026, and applicable to sales occurring on or after October
1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section and sections 12-330mm and 12-330nn:
(1) "Cannabis" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-420;
[(2) "Cannabis concentrate" has the same meaning as provided in
section 21a-420;
(3) "Cannabis edible product" means a product containing cannabis
or cannabis concentrate, combined with other ingredients, that is
intended for use or consumption through ingestion, including
sublingual or oral absorption;
(4) "Cannabis plant material" has the same meaning as provided in
Public Act No. 26-68 405 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
section 21a-279a;]
[(5)] (2) "Cannabis retailer" means "retailer", as defined in section 21a-
420;
[(6)] (3) "Consumer" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-
420;
[(7)] (4) "Cultivator" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-
420;
[(8)] (5) "Delivery service" has the same meaning as provided in
section 21a-420;
[(9)] (6) "Dispensary facility" has the same meaning as provided in
section 21a-420;
[(10)] (7) "Food and beverage manufacturer" has the same meaning as
provided in section 21a-420;
[(11)] (8) "Hybrid retailer" has the same meaning as provided in
section 21a-420;
[(12)] (9) "Micro-cultivator" has the same meaning as provided in
section 21a-420;
[(13)] (10) "Municipality" has the same meaning as provided in
section 21a-420;
[(14)] (11) "Palliative use" has the same meaning as provided in
section 21a-408;
[(15)] (12) "Producer" has the same meaning as provided in section
21a-420;
[(16)] (13) "Product manufacturer" has the same meaning as provided
in section 21a-420;
Public Act No. 26-68 406 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
[(17)] (14) "Product packager" has the same meaning as provided in
section 21a-420; and
[(18) "Social Equity Council" has the same meaning as provided in
section 21a-420;
(19) "Total THC" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-
240; and]
[(20)] (15) "Transporter" has the same meaning as provided in section
21a-420.
(b) (1) For the privilege of making any sales of cannabis in this state,
a tax is hereby imposed on each cannabis retailer, hybrid retailer or
micro-cultivator at the [following rates:] rate of ten and seventy-five-
hundredths per cent of the gross receipts from the sale of cannabis.
[(A) Cannabis plant material, at the rate of six hundred twenty-five-
thousandths of one cent per milligram of total THC, as reflected on the
product label;
(B) Cannabis edible products, at the rate of two and seventy-five-
hundredths cents per milligram of total THC, as reflected on the product
label; and
(C) Cannabis, other than cannabis plant material or cannabis edible
products, at the rate of nine-tenths of one cent per milligram of total
THC, as reflected on the product label.]
(2) The tax under this section:
(A) Shall be collected from the consumer, except as provided under
subparagraphs (B) and (D) of this subdivision, by the cannabis retailer,
hybrid retailer or micro-cultivator at the time of sale and such tax
reimbursement, termed "tax" in this section, shall be paid by the
consumer to the cannabis retailer, hybrid retailer or micro-cultivator.
Public Act No. 26-68 407 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Each cannabis retailer, hybrid retailer or micro-cultivator shall collect
from the consumer the full amount of the tax imposed by this section or
an amount equal to the average equivalent thereof to the nearest amount
practicable. Such tax shall be a debt from the consumer to the cannabis
retailer, hybrid retailer or micro-cultivator, when so added to the
original sales price, and shall be recoverable at law in the same manner
as other debts except as provided in section 12-432a; [.]
(B) Shall not apply to the sale of cannabis for palliative use;
(C) Shall not apply to the transfer of cannabis to a transporter for
transport to any other cultivator, micro-cultivator, food and beverage
manufacturer, product manufacturer, product packager, dispensary
facility, cannabis retailer, hybrid retailer or producer;
(D) Shall not apply to the sale of cannabis by a delivery service to a
consumer;
(E) Shall be in addition to the taxes imposed under section 12-330mm
and chapter 219; and
(F) When so collected, shall be deemed to be a special fund in trust
for the state until remitted to the state.
(c) On or before the last day of each month in which a cannabis
retailer, hybrid retailer or micro-cultivator may legally sell cannabis
other than cannabis for palliative use, each such cannabis retailer,
hybrid retailer or micro-cultivator shall file a return with the
Department of Revenue Services. Such return shall be in such form and
contain such information as the Commissioner of Revenue Services
prescribes as necessary for administration of the tax under this section
and shall be accompanied by a payment of the amount of the tax shown
to be due thereon. Each cannabis retailer, hybrid retailer and micro-
cultivator shall file such return electronically with the department and
make such payment by electronic funds transfer in the manner provided
Public Act No. 26-68 408 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
by chapter 228g, to the extent possible.
(d) If any cannabis retailer, hybrid retailer or micro-cultivator fails to
pay the amount of tax reported due on its return within the time
specified under this section, there shall be imposed a penalty equal to
twenty-five per cent of such amount due and unpaid, or two hundred
fifty dollars, whichever is greater. Such amount shall bear interest at the
rate of one per cent per month or fraction thereof, from the due date of
such tax until the date of payment. Subject to the provisions of section
12-3a, the commissioner may waive all or part of the penalties provided
under this section when it is proven to the commissioner's satisfaction
that the failure to pay any tax was due to reasonable cause and was not
intentional or due to neglect. Any penalty that is waived shall be applied
as a credit against tax liabilities owed by the cannabis retailer, hybrid
retailer or micro-cultivator.
(e) Each person, other than a cannabis retailer, hybrid retailer or
micro-cultivator, who is required, on behalf of such cannabis retailer,
hybrid retailer or micro-cultivator, to collect, truthfully account for and
pay over a tax imposed on such cannabis retailer, hybrid retailer or
micro-cultivator under this section and who wilfully fails to collect,
truthfully account for and pay over such tax or who wilfully attempts in
any manner to evade or defeat the tax or the payment thereof, shall, in
addition to other penalties provided by law, be liable for a penalty equal
to the total amount of the tax evaded, or not collected, or not accounted
for and paid over, including any penalty or interest attributable to such
wilful failure to collect or truthfully account for and pay over such tax
or such wilful attempt to evade or defeat such tax, provided such
penalty shall only be imposed against such person in the event that such
tax, penalty or interest cannot otherwise be collected from such cannabis
retailer, hybrid retailer or micro-cultivator. The amount of such penalty
with respect to which a person may be personally liable under this
section shall be collected in accordance with the provisions of section
Public Act No. 26-68 409 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
12-555a and any amount so collected shall be allowed as a credit against
the amount of such tax, penalty or interest due and owing from the
cannabis retailer, hybrid retailer or micro-cultivator. The dissolution of
the cannabis retailer, hybrid retailer or micro-cultivator shall not
discharge any person in relation to any personal liability under this
section for wilful failure to collect or truthfully account for and pay over
such tax or for a wilful attempt to evade or defeat such tax prior to
dissolution, except as otherwise provided in this section. For purposes
of this section, "person" includes any individual, corporation, limited
liability company or partnership and any officer or employee of any
corporation, including a dissolved corporation, and a member of or
employee of any partnership or limited liability company who, as such
officer, employee or member, is under a duty to file a tax return under
this section on behalf of a cannabis retailer, hybrid retailer or micro-
cultivator or to collect or truthfully account for and pay over a tax
imposed under this section on behalf of such cannabis retailer, hybrid
retailer or micro-cultivator.
(f) The provisions of sections 12-548, 12-551 to 12-554, inclusive, and
12-555a shall apply to the provisions of this section in the same manner
and with the same force and effect as if the language of said sections had
been incorporated in full into this section and had expressly referred to
the tax under this section, except to the extent that any provision is
inconsistent with a provision in this section.
(g) The commissioner shall not issue a refund of any tax paid by a
cannabis retailer, hybrid retailer or micro-cultivator under this section.
(h) The commissioner may adopt regulations, in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54, to implement the provisions of this section and
sections 12-330mm and 12-330nn. Notwithstanding the provisions of
sections 4-168 to 4-172, inclusive, prior to adopting any such regulations,
the commissioner shall issue policies and procedures, which shall have
the force and effect of law, to implement the [taxes] tax imposed under
Public Act No. 26-68 410 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
this section and sections 12-330mm and 12-330nn. At least fifteen days
prior to the effective date of any policy or procedure issued pursuant to
this subsection, the commissioner shall post such policy or procedure
on the department's Internet web site and submit such policy or
procedure to the Secretary of the State for posting on the eRegulations
System. Any such policy or procedure shall no longer be effective upon
the adoption of such policy or procedure as a final regulation in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 54 or forty-eight months of
July 1, 2021, whichever is earlier.
(i) The tax received by the state under this section shall be deposited
as follows:
(1) For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2022, and June 30, 2023, in the
cannabis regulatory and investment account established under section
21a-420f of the general statutes, revision of 1958, revised to January 1,
2025;
(2) For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2024, and June 30, 2025, sixty
per cent of such tax received in the Cannabis Social Equity and
Innovation Fund established under section 21a-420f of the general
statutes, revision of 1958, revised to January 1, 2025, twenty-five per cent
of such tax received in the Cannabis Prevention and Recovery Services
Fund established under section 21a-420f of the general statutes, revision
of 1958, revised to January 1, 2025, and fifteen per cent in the General
Fund;
(3) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, sixty per cent of such tax
received in the social equity and innovation account established under
section 21a-420f, twenty-five per cent of such tax received in the
Cannabis Prevention and Recovery Services Fund established under
section 21a-420f and fifteen per cent in the General Fund;
(4) For the fiscal years ending June 30, 2027, and June 30, 2028, [sixty-
Public Act No. 26-68 411 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
five] seventy per cent of such tax received in the social equity and
innovation account established under section 21a-420f, twenty-five per
cent of such tax received in the Cannabis Prevention and Recovery
Services Fund established under section 21a-420f and [ten] five per cent
in the General Fund; and
(5) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2029, and each fiscal year
thereafter, seventy-five per cent of such tax received in the social equity
and innovation account established under section 21a-420f and twenty-
five per cent of such tax received in the Cannabis Prevention and
Recovery Services Fund established under section 21a-420f.
Sec. 265. Subsection (b) of section 12-217 of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(b) (1) For purposes of determining net income under this section, the
deduction allowed for depreciation shall be determined as provided
under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or any subsequent
corresponding internal revenue code of the United States, as from time
to time amended, provided in making such determination, the
provisions of Section 168(k) of said code and, for income years
commencing on or after January 1, 2026, the provisions of Section 168(n)
of said code, shall not apply.
(2) (A) For purposes of determining net income under this section for
taxable years ending after December 31, 2008, and to the extent any
income from the discharge of indebtedness, under Section 108 of the
Internal Revenue Code, as amended by Section 1231 of the American
Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, in connection with any
reacquisition, after December 31, 2008, and [before] prior to January 1,
2011, of an applicable debt instrument or instruments, as those terms are
defined in said Section 108, as amended by said Section 1231, is not
properly includable in gross income for federal income tax purposes for
Public Act No. 26-68 412 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
the taxable year, any deferral of the recognition of any such income shall
not be allowed.
(B) To the extent that any income from the discharge of indebtedness
in connection with any reacquisition, after December 31, 2008, and
[before] prior to January 1, 2011, of an applicable debt instrument or
instruments, as those terms are defined in Section 108 of the Internal
Revenue Code, as amended by Section 1231 of the American Recovery
and Reinvestment Act of 2009, is properly includable in gross income
for federal income tax purposes for the taxable year, any such income
shall be deductible in computing net income under this section for a
taxable year ending after December 31, 2008, to the extent that the
deferral of recognition of such income from such discharge was not
allowed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this subdivision in computing
net income for a preceding taxable year.
(C) For income years commencing on or after January 1, 2018, eighty
per cent of any deduction claimed under Section 179 of the Internal
Revenue Code for federal income tax purposes shall be disallowed. To
the extent such a deduction is disallowed for purposes of computing the
tax under this chapter, twenty-five per cent of the disallowed portion of
the deduction shall be allowed as a deduction in each of the four
succeeding income years.
(D) For purposes of determining net income under this section:
(i) For income years commencing on or after January 1, 2022, the
deduction under Section 70302(f) of P.L. 119-21 is disallowed;
(ii) For income years commencing on or after January 1, 2025, and
prior to January 1, 2026, the deduction under Section 174A of the
Internal Revenue Code is disallowed; and
(iii) For income years commencing on or after January 1, 2022, and
prior to January 1, 2026, any research or experimental expenditures paid
Public Act No. 26-68 413 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
or incurred for said income years shall be deducted as permitted under
Section 174 of the Internal Revenue Code, as in effect on July 3, 2025.
Sec. 266. (Effective from passage) (a) The provisions of section 12-242d
of the general statutes shall not apply to any additional tax due as a
result of (1) the changes made to subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of
section 12-217 of the general statutes pursuant to section 265 of this act,
for income years commencing on or after January 1, 2026, but prior to
the effective date of section 265 of this act, or (2) the enactment of
subparagraph (D) of subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of section 12-217
of the general statutes pursuant to section 265 of this act, for income
years commencing on or after January 1, 2022, but prior to January 1,
2026.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 12-3a and 12-229 of
the general statutes, the Commissioner of Revenue Services shall waive
any penalty or interest imposed on the portion of any underpayment for
an income year commencing on or after January 1, 2022, but prior to
January 1, 2026, that results from any additional tax due as a result of
the enactment of subparagraph (D) of subdivision (2) of subsection (b)
of section 12-217 of the general statutes pursuant to section 265 of this
act. The waiver under this subsection shall not apply to such additional
tax that remains underpaid after the later of (1) November 15, 2026, or
(2) the due date, without regard to any extension of time to file, of the
return on which such additional tax is reported. Taxpayers shall submit
information, in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner, that
evidences their eligibility for a waiver under this subsection.
Sec. 267. (NEW) (Effective from passage and applicable to taxable years
commencing on or after January 1, 2026) (a) For purposes of this section:
(1) "Research and development expenses" means research or
experimental expenditures deductible under Section 174 of the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as in effect on May 28, 1993, determined without
Public Act No. 26-68 414 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
regard to Section 280C(c) of said code or to any elections made by a
taxpayer to amortize such expenditures that were otherwise deductible
on its federal income tax return; and basic research payments, as defined
in Section 41 of said code; that (A) are paid or incurred for such research
and experimentation and basic research conducted in the state, and (B)
are not funded by a grant, contract or governmental entity or a person
other than the taxpayer;
(2) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Economic and
Community Development;
(3) "Qualified small business" means a partnership or an S
corporation, as both terms are defined in section 12-699 of the general
statutes, that (A) has gross income for the previous taxable year that
does not exceed seventy million dollars, and (B) has not, in the
determination of the commissioner, exceeded such gross income
threshold through transactions with a related person, as defined in
section 12-217w of the general statutes; and
(4) "Biotechnology business" means a qualified small business
engaged in the business of applying technologies, such as recombinant
DNA techniques, biochemistry, molecular and cellular biology, genetics
and genetic engineering, biological cell fusion techniques, and new
bioprocesses, using living organisms, or parts of organisms, to produce
or modify products, to improve plants or animals, to develop
microorganisms for specific uses, to identify targets for small molecule
pharmaceutical development, or to transform biological systems into
useful processes and products.
(b) (1) The Department of Economic and Community Development
shall administer a system of tax credit vouchers, within available
appropriations, to allow qualified small businesses to earn and utilize
credits for research and development expenses.
Public Act No. 26-68 415 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(2) For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2026, there
shall be allowed a credit for qualified small businesses against the tax
imposed under chapter 229 of the general statutes, other than the
liability imposed by section 12-707 of the general statutes. Such credit
shall be equal to six per cent of the research and development expenses
paid or incurred by a qualified small business for a taxable year and
shall only be allowed to the extent a qualified small business has applied
for and received a tax credit voucher pursuant to this section.
(c) (1) Any qualified small business may apply to the commissioner,
in a form and manner and at a time prescribed by the commissioner, to
reserve an allocation for a credit based on the amount of research and
development expenses such business intends to pay or incur for a
taxable year. The application shall contain such information as the
commissioner deems necessary to administer the provisions of this
section.
(2) If the commissioner determines that such business is likely to pay
or incur research and development expenses for a taxable year, the
commissioner may issue a notice to such business, reserving a credit
under this section based on the amount the business intends to pay or
incur. In determining whether to issue such a notice, the commissioner
shall prioritize qualified small businesses that, in the commissioner's
opinion, exhibit a likelihood for growth in the state or will best
contribute to the economic ecosystem of the state.
(3) No qualified small business may reserve more than one million
five hundred thousand dollars of credits under this section for any
taxable year. The aggregate amount of credits that may be reserved
under this section shall not exceed twenty-five million dollars for any
taxable year.
(d) (1) Not later than ninety days after the end of a taxable year, any
qualified small business that received a notice under subsection (c) of
Public Act No. 26-68 416 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
this section shall submit verification, in a form and manner prescribed
by the commissioner, of the research and development expenses
actually paid or incurred by such business for such taxable year. If the
commissioner determines, after reviewing such verification, that the
qualified small business paid or incurred such expenses for the taxable
year, the commissioner shall issue a tax credit voucher to such business
in an amount equal to six per cent of such expenses, provided such
amount shall not exceed the amount reserved for such business under
subsection (c) of this section.
(2) The commissioner shall notify the Commissioner of Revenue
Services and the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management of
each tax credit voucher issued under subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(e) If the qualified small business is an S corporation or an entity
treated as a partnership for federal income tax purposes, the credit may
be claimed by the shareholders or partners of such business. If the
qualified small business is a single member liability company that is
disregarded as an entity separate from its owner, the credit may be
claimed by such business's owner, provided such owner is subject to the
tax imposed under chapter 229 of the general statutes.
(f) To the extent the credit exceeds a taxpayer's liability under chapter
229 of the general statutes, the taxpayer may apply to the Commissioner
of Revenue Services to exchange the credit, at the same time the
taxpayer files the return upon which such credit is claimed, for a credit
refund equal to ninety per cent of the excess if the credit was earned by
a biotechnology business and sixty-five per cent of the excess if the
credit was earned by a qualified small business other than a
biotechnology business.
(g) The credit allowed under this section shall be claimed before any
other credit allowable against the tax imposed under chapter 229 of the
general statutes.
Public Act No. 26-68 417 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(h) The commissioner may adopt regulations, in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes, to carry out the
provisions of this section.
Sec. 268. Section 12-217jj of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective from passage):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Revenue Services.
(2) "Department" means the Department of Economic and
Community Development.
(3) (A) "Qualified production" means entertainment content created
in whole or in part within the state, including motion pictures, except as
otherwise provided in this subparagraph; documentaries; long-form,
specials, mini-series, series, sound recordings, videos and music videos
and interstitials television programming; interactive television;
relocated television production; interactive games; videogames;
commercials; any format of digital media, including an interactive web
site, created for distribution or exhibition to the general public; and any
trailer, pilot, video teaser or demo created primarily to stimulate the
sale, marketing, promotion or exploitation of future investment in either
a product or a qualified production via any means and media in any
digital media format, film or videotape, provided such program meets
all the underlying criteria of a qualified production. For state fiscal years
ending on or after June 30, 2014, "qualified production" shall not include
a motion picture that has not been designated as a state-certified
qualified production prior to July 1, 2013, and no tax credit voucher for
such motion picture may be issued for such motion picture, except, for
state fiscal years ending on or after June 30, 2015, "qualified production"
shall include a motion picture for which twenty-five per cent or more of
Public Act No. 26-68 418 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
the principal photography shooting days are in this state at a facility that
receives not less than twenty-five million dollars in private investment
and opens for business on or after July 1, 2013, and a tax credit voucher
may be issued for such motion picture.
(B) "Qualified production" shall not include any ongoing television
program created primarily as news, weather or financial market reports;
a production featuring current events, other than a relocated television
production, sporting events, an awards show or other gala event; a
production whose sole purpose is fundraising; a long-form production
that primarily markets a product or service; a production used for
corporate training or in-house corporate advertising or other similar
productions; or any production for which records are required to be
maintained under 18 USC 2257, as amended from time to time, with
respect to sexually explicit content.
(4) "Eligible production company" means a corporation, partnership,
limited liability company, or other business entity engaged in the
business of producing qualified productions on a one-time or ongoing
basis, and qualified by the Secretary of the State to engage in business
in the state.
(5) "Production expenses or costs" means all expenditures clearly and
demonstrably incurred in the state in the preproduction, production or
postproduction costs of a qualified production, including:
(A) Expenditures incurred in the state in the form of either
compensation or purchases including production work, production
equipment not eligible for the infrastructure tax credit provided in
section 12-217kk, production software, postproduction work,
postproduction equipment, postproduction software, set design, set
construction, props, lighting, wardrobe, makeup, makeup accessories,
special effects, visual effects, audio effects, film processing, music,
sound mixing, editing, location fees, soundstages and any and all other
Public Act No. 26-68 419 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
costs or services directly incurred in connection with a state-certified
qualified production;
(B) Expenditures for distribution, including preproduction,
production or postproduction costs relating to the creation of trailers,
marketing videos, commercials, point-of-purchase videos and any and
all content created on film or digital media, including the duplication of
films, videos, CDs, DVDs and any and all digital files now in existence
and those yet to be created for mass consumer consumption; the
purchase, by a company in the state, of any and all equipment relating
to the duplication or mass market distribution of any content created or
produced in the state by any digital media format which is now in use
and those formats yet to be created for mass consumer consumption;
and
(C) "Production expenses or costs" does not include the following: (i)
On and after January 1, 2008, compensation in excess of fifteen million
dollars paid to any individual or entity representing an individual, for
services provided in the production of a qualified production and on or
after January 1, 2010, compensation subject to Connecticut personal
income tax in excess of twenty million dollars paid in the aggregate to
any individuals or entities representing individuals, for star talent
provided in the production of a qualified production; (ii) media buys,
promotional events or gifts or public relations associated with the
promotion or marketing of any qualified production; (iii) deferred,
leveraged or profit participation costs relating to any and all personnel
associated with any and all aspects of the production, including, but not
limited to, producer fees, director fees, talent fees and writer fees; (iv)
costs relating to the transfer of the production tax credits; (v) any
amounts paid to persons or businesses as a result of their participation
in profits from the exploitation of the qualified production; and (vi) any
expenses or costs relating to an independent certification, as required by
subsection (h) of this section, or as the department may otherwise
Public Act No. 26-68 420 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
require, pertaining to the amount of production expenses or costs set
forth by an eligible production company in its application for a
production tax credit.
(6) "Sound recording" means a recording of music, poetry or spoken-
word performance, but does not include the audio portions of dialogue
or words spoken and recorded as part of a motion picture, video,
theatrical production, television news coverage or athletic event.
(7) "State-certified qualified production" means a qualified
production produced by an eligible production company that (A) is in
compliance with regulations adopted pursuant to subsection (l) of this
section, (B) is authorized to conduct business in this state, and (C) has
been approved by the department as qualifying for a production tax
credit under this section.
(8) "Interactive web site" means a web site, the production expenses
or costs of which (A) exceed five hundred thousand dollars per income
year, and (B) is primarily (i) interactive games or end user applications,
or (ii) animation, simulation, sound, graphics, story lines or video
created or repurposed for distribution over the Internet. An interactive
web site does not include a web site primarily used for institutional,
private, industrial, retail or wholesale marketing or promotional
purposes, or which contains obscene content.
(9) "Post-certification remedy" means the recapture, disallowance,
recovery, reduction, repayment, forfeiture, decertification or any other
remedy that would have the effect of reducing or otherwise limiting the
use of a tax credit provided by this section.
(10) "Compensation" means base salary or wages and does not
include bonus pay, stock options, restricted stock units or similar
arrangements.
(11) "Relocated television production" means:
Public Act No. 26-68 421 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(A) An ongoing television program all of the prior seasons of which
were filmed outside this state, and may include current events shows,
except those referenced in subparagraph (B)(i) of this subdivision.
(B) An eligible production company's television programming in this
state that (i) is not a general news program, sporting event or game
broadcast, and (ii) is created at a qualified production facility that has
had a minimum investment of twenty-five million dollars made by such
eligible production company on or after January 1, 2012, at which
facility the eligible production company creates ongoing television
programming as defined in subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, and
creates at least two hundred new jobs in Connecticut on or after January
1, 2012. For purposes of this subdivision, "new job" means a full-time
job, as defined in section 12-217ii, that did not exist in this state prior to
January 1, 2012, and is filled by a new employee, and "new employee"
includes a person who was employed outside this state by the eligible
production company prior to January 1, 2012, but does not include a
person who was employed in this state by the eligible production
company or a related person, as defined in section 12-217ii, with respect
to the eligible production company during the prior twelve months.
(C) A relocated television production may be a state-certified
qualified production for not more than ten successive income years,
after which period the eligible production company shall be ineligible
to resubmit an application for certification.
(b) (1) The Department of Economic and Community Development
shall administer a system of tax credit vouchers within the resources,
requirements and purposes of this section for eligible production
companies producing a state-certified qualified production in the state.
(2) Any eligible production company incurring production expenses
or costs shall be eligible for a credit (A) for income years commencing
on or after January 1, 2010, but prior to January 1, 2018, against the tax
Public Act No. 26-68 422 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
imposed under chapter 207 or this chapter, (B) for income years
commencing on or after January 1, 2018, but prior to January 1, 2022,
against the tax imposed under chapter 207 or 211 or this chapter, and
(C) for income years commencing on or after January 1, 2022, against the
tax imposed under chapter 207, 211, 219 or this chapter, as follows: (i)
For any such company incurring such expenses or costs of not less than
one hundred thousand dollars, but not more than five hundred
thousand dollars, a credit equal to ten per cent of such expenses or costs,
(ii) for any such company incurring such expenses or costs of more than
five hundred thousand dollars, but not more than one million dollars, a
credit equal to fifteen per cent of such expenses or costs, and (iii) for any
such company incurring such expenses or costs of more than one million
dollars, a credit equal to thirty per cent of such expenses or costs.
(c) No eligible production company incurring an amount of
production expenses or costs that qualifies for such credit shall be
eligible for such credit unless on or after January 1, 2010, such company
conducts (1) not less than fifty per cent of principal photography days
within the state, or (2) expends not less than fifty per cent of
postproduction costs within the state, or (3) expends not less than one
million dollars of postproduction costs within the state. The provisions
of this subsection shall not apply to an eligible production company that
produces an interactive Internet web site created for distribution or
exhibition to the general public.
(d) For income years commencing on or after January 1, 2010, no
expenses or costs incurred outside the state and used within the state
shall be eligible for a credit, and one hundred per cent of such expenses
or costs shall be counted toward such credit when incurred within the
state and used within the state.
(e) (1) On and after July 1, 2006, and for income years commencing
on or after January 1, 2006, any credit allowed pursuant to this section
may be sold, assigned or otherwise transferred, in whole or in part, to
Public Act No. 26-68 423 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
one or more taxpayers, provided (A) no credit, after issuance, may be
sold, assigned or otherwise transferred, in whole or in part, more than
three times, (B) in the case of a credit allowed for the income year
commencing on or after January 1, 2011, but prior to January 1, 2012,
any entity that is not subject to tax under chapter 207 or this chapter may
transfer not more than fifty per cent of such credit in any one income
year, and (C) in the case of a credit allowed for an income year
commencing on or after January 1, 2012, any entity that is not subject to
tax under chapter 207 or this chapter may transfer not more than
twenty-five per cent of such credit in any one income year.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this
subsection, any entity that is not subject to tax under this chapter or
chapter 207 shall not be subject to the limitations on the transfer of
credits provided in subparagraphs (B) and (C) of said subdivision (1),
provided such entity owns not less than fifty per cent, directly or
indirectly, of a business entity, as defined in section 12-284b.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this
subsection, any qualified production that is created in whole or in
significant part, as determined by the Commissioner of Economic and
Community Development, at a qualified production facility shall not be
subject to the limitations of subparagraph (B) or (C) of said subdivision
(1). For purposes of this subdivision, "qualified production facility"
means a facility (A) located in this state, (B) intended for film, television
or digital media production, and (C) that has had a minimum
investment of three million dollars, or less if the Commissioner of
Economic and Community Development determines such facility
otherwise qualifies.
(4) (A) For the income year commencing on or after January 1, 2018,
but prior to January 1, 2019, any credit that is sold, assigned or otherwise
transferred, in whole or in part, to one or more taxpayers pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this subsection may be claimed against the tax
Public Act No. 26-68 424 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
imposed under chapter 211 only if there is common ownership of at least
fifty per cent between such taxpayer and the eligible production
company that sold, assigned or otherwise transferred such credit. Such
taxpayer may only claim ninety-two per cent of the amount of such
credit entered by the department on the production tax credit voucher.
(B) For income years commencing on or after January 1, 2019, any
credit that is sold, assigned or otherwise transferred, in whole or in part,
to one or more taxpayers pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection,
which credit is claimed against the tax imposed under chapter 211, shall
be subject to the following limits:
(i) The taxpayer may only claim ninety-five per cent of the amount of
such credit entered by the department on the production tax credit
voucher; and
(ii) If there is common ownership of at least fifty per cent between
such taxpayer and the eligible production company that sold, assigned
or otherwise transferred such credit, such taxpayer may only claim
ninety-two per cent of the amount of such credit entered by the
department on the production tax credit voucher.
(5) (A) For income years commencing on or after January 1, 2022, but
prior to January 1, 2024, and on or after January 1, [2026] 2028, any credit
that is claimed against the tax imposed under chapter 219 shall be
subject to the following limits:
(i) Any credit that is sold, assigned or otherwise transferred, in whole
or in part, to one or more taxpayers pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection may be claimed against the tax imposed under chapter 219
only if there is common ownership of at least fifty per cent between such
taxpayer and the eligible production company that sold, assigned or
otherwise transferred such credit; and
(ii) The eligible production company or taxpayer claiming the credit
Public Act No. 26-68 425 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
against the tax imposed under chapter 219 may only claim seventy-eight
per cent of the amount of such credit entered by the department on the
production tax credit voucher.
(B) For income years commencing on or after January 1, 2024, but
prior to January 1, [2026] 2028, any credit that is claimed against the tax
imposed under chapter 219 shall be subject to the following limits:
(i) Any credit that is sold, assigned or otherwise transferred, in whole
or in part, to one or more taxpayers pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection may be claimed against the tax imposed under chapter 219
only if there is common ownership of at least fifty per cent between such
taxpayer and the eligible production company that sold, assigned or
otherwise transferred such credit; and
(ii) The eligible production company or taxpayer claiming the credit
against the tax imposed under chapter 219 may only claim ninety-two
per cent of the amount of such credit entered by the department on the
production tax credit voucher.
(f) (1) On and after July 1, 2006, and for income years commencing on
or after January 1, 2006, but prior to January 1, 2015, all or part of any
such credit allowed under this section may be claimed against the tax
imposed under chapter 207 or this chapter for the income year in which
the production expenses or costs were incurred, or in the three
immediately succeeding income years.
(2) For production tax credit vouchers issued on or after July 1, 2015,
but prior to January 1, 2018, all or part of any such credit may be claimed
against the tax imposed under chapter 207 or this chapter, for the
income year in which the production expenses or costs were incurred,
or in the five immediately succeeding income years.
(3) For production tax credit vouchers issued on or after July 1, 2018,
but prior to January 1, 2022, all or part of any such credit may be claimed
Public Act No. 26-68 426 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
against the tax imposed under chapter 207 or 211 or this chapter, for the
income year in which the production expenses or costs were incurred,
or in the five immediately succeeding income years.
(4) For production tax credit vouchers issued on or after January 1,
2022, all or part of any such credit may be claimed against the tax
imposed under chapter 207, 211, 219 or this chapter, for the income year
in which the production expenses or costs were incurred, or in the five
immediately succeeding income years.
(g) Any production tax credit allowed under this section shall be
nonrefundable.
(h) (1) An eligible production company shall apply to the department
for a tax credit voucher on an annual basis, but not later than ninety days
after the first production expenses or costs are incurred in the
production of a qualified production, and shall provide with such
application such information as the department may require to
determine such company's eligibility to claim a credit under this section.
No production expenses or costs may be listed more than once for
purposes of the tax credit voucher pursuant to this section or section 12-
217kk, and if a production expense or cost has been included in a claim
for a credit, such production expense or cost may not be included in any
subsequent claim for a credit.
(2) Not later than ninety days after the end of the annual period, or
after the completion of the independent certification, an eligible
production company shall apply to the department for a production tax
credit voucher, and shall provide with such application (A) a report that
includes the number of full-time jobs and the number of part-time jobs
created by the eligible production company during the annual period, a
description of each such job and an explanation of what the eligible
production company considers to be job creation for purposes of the
report, and (B) such information and independent certification as the
Public Act No. 26-68 427 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
department may require pertaining to the amount of such company's
production expenses or costs. Such independent certification shall be
provided by an audit professional chosen from a list compiled by the
department. If the department determines that such company is eligible
to be issued a production tax credit voucher, the department shall enter
on the voucher the amount of production expenses or costs that has been
established to the satisfaction of the department and the amount of such
company's credit under this section. The department shall provide a
copy of such voucher to the commissioner, upon request.
(3) The department shall charge a reasonable and nonrefundable
administrative fee sufficient to cover the department's costs to analyze
applications submitted under this section.
(i) If an eligible production company sells, assigns or otherwise
transfers a credit under this section to another taxpayer, the transferor
and transferee shall jointly submit written notification of such transfer
to the department not later than thirty days after such transfer. If such
transferee sells, assigns or otherwise transfers a credit under this section
to a subsequent transferee, such transferee and such subsequent
transferee shall jointly submit written notification of such transfer to the
department not later than thirty days after such transfer. The
notification after each transfer shall include the credit voucher number,
the date of transfer, the amount of such credit transferred, the tax credit
balance before and after the transfer, the tax identification numbers for
both the transferor and the transferee, and any other information
required by the department. Failure to comply with this subsection will
result in a disallowance of the tax credit until there is full compliance on
the part of the transferor and the transferee, and for a second or third
transfer, on the part of all subsequent transferors and transferees. The
department shall provide a copy of the notification of assignment to the
commissioner upon request.
(j) Any eligible production company that submits information to the
Public Act No. 26-68 428 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
department that it knows to be fraudulent or false shall, in addition to
any other penalties provided by law, be liable for a penalty equal to the
amount of such company's credit entered on the production tax credit
voucher issued under this section.
(k) No tax credits transferred pursuant to this section shall be subject
to a post-certification remedy, and the department and the
commissioner shall have no right, except in the case of possible material
misrepresentation or fraud, to conduct any further or additional review,
examination or audit of the expenditures or costs for which such tax
credits were issued. The sole and exclusive remedy of the department
and the commissioner shall be to seek collection of the amount of such
tax credits from the entity that committed the fraud or
misrepresentation.
(l) The department, in consultation with the commissioner, may
adopt regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54, as
may be necessary for the administration of this section.
Sec. 269. Section 472 of public act 25-168, as amended by section 203
of public act 25-174, is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
The Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management shall grant
additional municipal aid, from Other Expenses, as follows: [(1)] To the
city of New Haven, $500,000 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. [;
and (2) to the towns of Ledyard and Montville, $800,000 to each town
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.]
Sec. 270. (Effective July 1, 2026) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 25 of public act 25-168, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027,
the grants paid to the towns of Ledyard and Montville from the moneys
available in the Mashantucket Pequot and Mohegan Fund established
pursuant to section 3-55i of the general statutes shall be as follows: To
Public Act No. 26-68 429 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
the town of Ledyard, $2,191,000; and to the town of Montville,
$2,246,162.
Sec. 271. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027, and applicable to taxable years
commencing on or after January 1, 2027) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Activities of daily living" means basic personal everyday
activities, including, but not limited to, ambulating, feeding, dressing,
personal hygiene, continence and toileting.
(2) "Eligible expenditure" means (A) the improvement or alteration to
the family caregiver's or eligible family member's primary residence to
permit the eligible family member to live in the residence and to remain
mobile, safe and independent, (B) the family caregiver's purchase or
lease of equipment, including, but not limited to, durable medical
equipment that is necessary to assist an eligible family member in
carrying out one or more activities of daily living, and (C) other paid or
incurred expenses by the family caregiver that assist the family
caregiver in providing care to an eligible family member, including, but
not limited to expenditures related to (i) hiring a home health aide, (ii)
respite care, (iii) adult day care, (iv) personal care attendants, (v) health
care equipment, and (vi) technology. "Eligible expenditure" does not
include general household maintenance activities, including, but not
limited to, painting, plumbing, electrical repairs and exterior
maintenance.
(3) "Eligible family member" means a person who (A) requires
assistance with at least two activities of daily living, as certified in
writing by a licensed health care provider, as defined in section 19a-106a
of the general statutes, (B) qualifies as a dependent, spouse, parent or
other relation by blood or marriage to the family caregiver, and (C) lives
in a private residential home and not in a long-term care facility, as
defined in section 19a-535e of the general statutes.
Public Act No. 26-68 430 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(4) "Family caregiver" means a person who (A) provides care and
support for an eligible family member, (B) has a federal adjusted gross
income of less than fifty thousand dollars for an individual who files a
return under the federal income tax as an unmarried individual, a
married individual filing separately or a head of household, and less
than one hundred thousand dollars for individuals who file a return
under the federal income tax as married individuals filing jointly, and
(C) has personally incurred uncompensated expenses directly related to
the care of an eligible family member.
(b) (1) There shall be allowed, for the taxable years commencing on
or after January 1, 2027, a credit against the tax imposed by chapter 229
of the general statutes, other than the liability imposed by section 12-707
of the general statutes, for eligible expenditures incurred by a family
caregiver for the care and support of an eligible family member.
(2) The amount of the credit allowed shall be fifty per cent of the
eligible expenditures incurred by such family caregiver in a taxable year
and shall not exceed two thousand dollars for any taxable year. If two
or more family caregivers claim the credit authorized by this section for
the same eligible family member, the maximum allowable credit shall
be allocated in equal amounts between each of the family caregivers.
(c) (1) The Department of Revenue Services shall administer a system
of tax credit vouchers within the resources, requirements and purposes
of this section. A family caregiver may apply to the Commissioner of
Revenue Services, in a form and manner prescribed by the
commissioner, for a tax credit voucher in an amount as provided in this
section. The application shall contain such information the
commissioner deems necessary to administer the provisions of this
section.
(2) The commissioner shall approve applications on a first-come,
first-served basis and shall notify an applicant in writing not later than
Public Act No. 26-68 431 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
thirty days after the date of receipt of an application of the
commissioner's approval or rejection of the application.
(3) The total amount of tax credit vouchers that may be issued under
this section shall not exceed one million eight hundred thousand dollars
in any one taxable year.
(d) Any credit allowed under this section shall be nonrefundable.
Sec. 272. Section 12-412 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is amended by adding subdivision (128) as follows (Effective July 1, 2026,
and applicable to sales occurring on or after July 1, 2026):
(NEW) (128) Nonelectronic school supplies, such as backpacks,
lunchboxes, notebooks, pens and pencils, crayons, rulers and paper.
Sec. 273. Section 12-7e of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July
1, 2026):
Commencing July 1, 2025, the Commissioner of Revenue Services
shall track and record the source of the revenue received by the state
each fiscal year from the tax imposed under chapters 207, 208, 219 and
229, for the purpose of accurately and fairly attributing to each
municipality revenue received from each such tax. The commissioner
shall determine the sourcing method for the revenue from the tax
imposed under said chapters, provided the revenue from the taxes
imposed under chapters 207, 208 and 219 is sourced to each
municipality in which the taxpayer has an office or facility in the state
and the revenue from the tax imposed under chapter 229 from earned
income shall be sourced, to the extent possible, to the municipality in
which the employer's office or facility is located, for the employees who
work primarily at such location. Taxpayers paying a tax specified in this
subsection shall provide disaggregated information and such other data
the commissioner requests to carry out the provisions of this section. On
Public Act No. 26-68 432 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
or before October 31, 2026, and annually thereafter, the commissioner
shall post on the Department of Revenue Services' Internet web site a
list of all municipalities and the amount of revenue from each such tax
attributed to the municipality for the applicable fiscal year.
Sec. 274. (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Augmented productivity" means the portion of gross revenue
that exceeds an employer's three-year historical average, provided such
increase is achieved through the integration of collaborative technology
while maintaining a stable workforce;
(2) "Collaborative technology" means any hardware, software or
algorithmic system, including artificial intelligence, designed to be
operated by or to assist an employee in the performance of such
employee's duties, where the technology serves as a multiplier of the
employee's individual productivity rather than as a stand-alone
replacement of the employee;
(3) "Productivity gap" means the measurable increase in revenue-per-
employee hours that occurs when Connecticut payroll is reduced
materially while gross revenue remains stable or increases; and
(4) "Stable workforce" means a Connecticut-domiciled workforce
where the total headcount and aggregate payroll expenses for such
workforce remain at or above ninety-five per cent of the three-year
historical average of the employer.
(b) (1) Not later than January 1, 2027, the Secretary of the Office of
Policy and Management shall, in consultation with the Commissioner
of Revenue Services, the Labor Commissioner and the Chief Workforce
Officer, submit a plan to the General Assembly, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to ensure that
technological advancements serve to augment worker capability rather
than render it obsolete and productivity gains lead to a more skilled
Public Act No. 26-68 433 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
workforce, by developing (A) a mechanism to reinvest capital when
business output and labor costs become materially decoupled, (B) steps
to be actively taken by the state to minimize such decoupling by
fostering collaborative productivity models that increase output
without a corresponding decline in the workforce, and (C) a workforce
and productivity gap contribution from employers.
(2) The workforce and productivity gap contribution plan shall
include:
(A) A formula for a surcharge to be assessed annually for each income
or taxable year in which an employer maintains a productivity gap.
Such surcharge shall reflect the financial delta between an employer's
baseline productivity levels and its reduced payroll expenses for the
applicable income or taxable year, and shall be structured to ensure that
efficiency gains realized through the displacement of employees are
recaptured by the state on an ongoing basis to mitigate the resulting
economic impact;
(B) An augmented productivity tax exemption that ensures that any
augmented productivity achieved by an employer is permanently
exempt from taxation by the state;
(C) Administrative procedures for the reporting and collection of
such surcharge, based on Connecticut-specific payroll and tax data; and
(D) The establishment of a workforce and economic stability account,
in which the surcharges collected shall be deposited and shall be used
exclusively for the purposes of workforce retraining, technical
education and career transition programs for displaced employees.
Sec. 275. (Effective July 1, 2027, and applicable to income years commencing
on or after January 1, 2027) (a) As used in this section, "eligible production
company", "production expenses or costs" and "state-certified qualified
production" have the same meanings as provided in section 12-217jj of
Public Act No. 26-68 434 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
the general statutes.
(b) (1) For the income years commencing January 1, 2027, and prior
to January 1, 2029, any eligible production company that is eligible for a
credit under subsection (b) of section 12-217jj of the general statutes may
apply to the Department of Economic and Community Development, in
the manner provided under subsection (h) of said section, for a
production tax credit voucher for an additional credit as provided under
this section.
(2) The additional credit for an eligible production company under
this section shall be for production expenses or costs incurred for a state-
certified qualified production for which principal photography
shooting occurs in the city of Bridgeport, Hartford or New Haven, or
any combination thereof, for at least one day, and shall be as follows:
(A) For any such company incurring such expenses or costs of not less
than one hundred thousand dollars, but not more than five hundred
thousand dollars, a credit equal to thirty per cent of such expenses or
costs; (B) for any such company incurring such expenses or costs of more
than five hundred thousand dollars, but not more than one million
dollars, a credit equal to thirty-five per cent of such expenses or costs;
and (C) for any such company incurring such expenses or costs of more
than one million dollars, a credit equal to fifty per cent of such expenses
or costs.
(3) The aggregate amount of all production tax credit vouchers issued
by the Department of Economic and Community Development for the
additional credit under this section shall not exceed one million five
hundred thousand dollars for income years commencing on or after
January 1, 2027, and prior to January 1, 2029.
(c) For production tax credit vouchers issued pursuant to this section,
all or part of any such credit may be claimed against the tax imposed
under chapter 207, 208, 211 or 219 of the general statutes, for the income
Public Act No. 26-68 435 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
year in which the production expenses or costs were incurred, or in the
five immediately succeeding income years, and may be sold, assigned
or otherwise transferred, in whole or in part, in accordance with
subsection (e) of 12-217jj of the general statutes.
Sec. 276. (Effective from passage) Not later than June 30, 2026, the
Comptroller shall transfer one hundred million dollars of the resources
of the Special Transportation Fund for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, to be accounted for as revenue of the Special Transportation Fund
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.
Sec. 277. Subparagraph (B) of subdivision (20) of subsection (a) of
section 12-701 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes is repealed
and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026, and
applicable to taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2026):
(B) There shall be subtracted therefrom:
(i) To the extent properly includable in gross income for federal
income tax purposes, any income with respect to which taxation by any
state is prohibited by federal law;
(ii) To the extent allowable under section 12-718, exempt dividends
paid by a regulated investment company;
(iii) To the extent properly includable in gross income for federal
income tax purposes, the amount of any refund or credit for
overpayment of income taxes imposed by this state, or any other state
of the United States or a political subdivision thereof, or the District of
Columbia;
(iv) To the extent properly includable in gross income for federal
income tax purposes and not otherwise subtracted from federal
adjusted gross income pursuant to clause (x) of this subparagraph in
computing Connecticut adjusted gross income, any tier 1 railroad
Public Act No. 26-68 436 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
retirement benefits;
(v) To the extent any additional allowance for depreciation under
Section 168(k) of the Internal Revenue Code for property placed in
service after September 27, 2017, was added to federal adjusted gross
income pursuant to subparagraph (A)(ix) of this subdivision in
computing Connecticut adjusted gross income, twenty-five per cent of
such additional allowance for depreciation in each of the four
succeeding taxable years;
(vi) To the extent properly includable in gross income for federal
income tax purposes, any interest income from obligations issued by or
on behalf of the state of Connecticut, any political subdivision thereof,
or public instrumentality, state or local authority, district or similar
public entity created under the laws of the state of Connecticut;
(vii) To the extent properly includable in determining the net gain or
loss from the sale or other disposition of capital assets for federal income
tax purposes, any gain from the sale or exchange of obligations issued
by or on behalf of the state of Connecticut, any political subdivision
thereof, or public instrumentality, state or local authority, district or
similar public entity created under the laws of the state of Connecticut,
in the income year such gain was recognized;
(viii) Any interest on indebtedness incurred or continued to purchase
or carry obligations or securities the interest on which is subject to tax
under this chapter but exempt from federal income tax, to the extent that
such interest on indebtedness is not deductible in determining federal
adjusted gross income and is attributable to a trade or business carried
on by such individual;
(ix) Ordinary and necessary expenses paid or incurred during the
taxable year for the production or collection of income which is subject
to taxation under this chapter but exempt from federal income tax, or
Public Act No. 26-68 437 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
the management, conservation or maintenance of property held for the
production of such income, and the amortizable bond premium for the
taxable year on any bond the interest on which is subject to tax under
this chapter but exempt from federal income tax, to the extent that such
expenses and premiums are not deductible in determining federal
adjusted gross income and are attributable to a trade or business carried
on by such individual;
(x) (I) For taxable years commencing prior to January 1, 2019, for a
person who files a return under the federal income tax as an unmarried
individual whose federal adjusted gross income for such taxable year is
less than fifty thousand dollars, or as a married individual filing
separately whose federal adjusted gross income for such taxable year is
less than fifty thousand dollars, or for a husband and wife who file a
return under the federal income tax as married individuals filing jointly
whose federal adjusted gross income for such taxable year is less than
sixty thousand dollars or a person who files a return under the federal
income tax as a head of household whose federal adjusted gross income
for such taxable year is less than sixty thousand dollars, an amount
equal to the Social Security benefits includable for federal income tax
purposes;
(II) For taxable years commencing prior to January 1, 2019, for a
person who files a return under the federal income tax as an unmarried
individual whose federal adjusted gross income for such taxable year is
fifty thousand dollars or more, or as a married individual filing
separately whose federal adjusted gross income for such taxable year is
fifty thousand dollars or more, or for a husband and wife who file a
return under the federal income tax as married individuals filing jointly
whose federal adjusted gross income from such taxable year is sixty
thousand dollars or more or for a person who files a return under the
federal income tax as a head of household whose federal adjusted gross
income for such taxable year is sixty thousand dollars or more, an
Public Act No. 26-68 438 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
amount equal to the difference between the amount of Social Security
benefits includable for federal income tax purposes and the lesser of
twenty-five per cent of the Social Security benefits received during the
taxable year, or twenty-five per cent of the excess described in Section
86(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(III) For the taxable year commencing January 1, 2019, and each
taxable year thereafter, for a person who files a return under the federal
income tax as an unmarried individual whose federal adjusted gross
income for such taxable year is less than seventy-five thousand dollars,
or as a married individual filing separately whose federal adjusted gross
income for such taxable year is less than seventy-five thousand dollars,
or for a husband and wife who file a return under the federal income tax
as married individuals filing jointly whose federal adjusted gross
income for such taxable year is less than one hundred thousand dollars
or a person who files a return under the federal income tax as a head of
household whose federal adjusted gross income for such taxable year is
less than one hundred thousand dollars, an amount equal to the Social
Security benefits includable for federal income tax purposes; and
(IV) For the taxable year commencing January 1, 2019, and each
taxable year thereafter, for a person who files a return under the federal
income tax as an unmarried individual whose federal adjusted gross
income for such taxable year is seventy-five thousand dollars or more,
or as a married individual filing separately whose federal adjusted gross
income for such taxable year is seventy-five thousand dollars or more,
or for a husband and wife who file a return under the federal income tax
as married individuals filing jointly whose federal adjusted gross
income from such taxable year is one hundred thousand dollars or more
or for a person who files a return under the federal income tax as a head
of household whose federal adjusted gross income for such taxable year
is one hundred thousand dollars or more, an amount equal to the
difference between the amount of Social Security benefits includable for
Public Act No. 26-68 439 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
federal income tax purposes and the lesser of twenty-five per cent of the
Social Security benefits received during the taxable year, or twenty-five
per cent of the excess described in Section 86(b)(1) of the Internal
Revenue Code;
(xi) To the extent properly includable in gross income for federal
income tax purposes, any amount rebated to a taxpayer pursuant to
section 12-746;
(xii) To the extent properly includable in the gross income for federal
income tax purposes of a designated beneficiary, any distribution to
such beneficiary from any qualified state tuition program, as defined in
Section 529(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, established and
maintained by this state or any official, agency or instrumentality of the
state;
(xiii) To the extent allowable under section 12-701a, contributions to
accounts established pursuant to any qualified state tuition program, as
defined in Section 529(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, established and
maintained by this state or any official, agency or instrumentality of the
state;
(xiv) To the extent properly includable in gross income for federal
income tax purposes, the amount of any Holocaust victims' settlement
payment received in the taxable year by a Holocaust victim;
(xv) To the extent properly includable in the gross income for federal
income tax purposes of a designated beneficiary, as defined in section
3-123aa, interest, dividends or capital gains earned on contributions to
accounts established for the designated beneficiary pursuant to the
Connecticut Homecare Option Program for the Elderly established by
sections 3-123aa to 3-123ff, inclusive;
(xvi) To the extent properly includable in gross income for federal
income tax purposes, any income received from the United States
Public Act No. 26-68 440 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
government as retirement pay for a retired member of (I) the Armed
Forces of the United States, as defined in Section 101 of Title 10 of the
United States Code, [or] (II) the National Guard, as defined in Section
101 of Title 10 of the United States Code, or (III) the commissioned corps
of the Public Health Service, as defined in Section 101 of Title 10 of the
United States Code;
(xvii) To the extent properly includable in gross income for federal
income tax purposes for the taxable year, any income from the discharge
of indebtedness in connection with any reacquisition, after December
31, 2008, and before January 1, 2011, of an applicable debt instrument or
instruments, as those terms are defined in Section 108 of the Internal
Revenue Code, as amended by Section 1231 of the American Recovery
and Reinvestment Act of 2009, to the extent any such income was added
to federal adjusted gross income pursuant to subparagraph (A)(xi) of
this subdivision in computing Connecticut adjusted gross income for a
preceding taxable year;
(xviii) To the extent not deductible in determining federal adjusted
gross income, the amount of any contribution to a manufacturing
reinvestment account established pursuant to section 32-9zz in the
taxable year that such contribution is made;
(xix) To the extent properly includable in gross income for federal
income tax purposes, (I) for the taxable year commencing January 1,
2015, ten per cent of the income received from the state teachers'
retirement system, (II) for the taxable years commencing January 1,
2016, to January 1, 2020, inclusive, twenty-five per cent of the income
received from the state teachers' retirement system, and (III) for the
taxable year commencing January 1, 2021, and each taxable year
thereafter, fifty per cent of the income received from the state teachers'
retirement system or, for a taxpayer whose federal adjusted gross
income does not exceed the applicable threshold under clause (xx) of
this subparagraph, the percentage pursuant to said clause of the income
Public Act No. 26-68 441 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
received from the state teachers' retirement system, whichever
deduction is greater;
(xx) To the extent properly includable in gross income for federal
income tax purposes, except for retirement benefits under clause (iv) of
this subparagraph and retirement pay under clause (xvi) of this
subparagraph, for a person who files a return under the federal income
tax as an unmarried individual whose federal adjusted gross income for
such taxable year is less than seventy-five thousand dollars, or as a
married individual filing separately whose federal adjusted gross
income for such taxable year is less than seventy-five thousand dollars,
or as a head of household whose federal adjusted gross income for such
taxable year is less than seventy-five thousand dollars, or for a husband
and wife who file a return under the federal income tax as married
individuals filing jointly whose federal adjusted gross income for such
taxable year is less than one hundred thousand dollars, (I) for the taxable
year commencing January 1, 2019, fourteen per cent of any pension or
annuity income, (II) for the taxable year commencing January 1, 2020,
twenty-eight per cent of any pension or annuity income, (III) for the
taxable year commencing January 1, 2021, forty-two per cent of any
pension or annuity income, and (IV) for the taxable years commencing
January 1, 2022, and January 1, 2023, one hundred per cent of any
pension or annuity income;
(xxi) To the extent properly includable in gross income for federal
income tax purposes, except for retirement benefits under clause (iv) of
this subparagraph and retirement pay under clause (xvi) of this
subparagraph, any pension or annuity income for the taxable year
commencing on or after January 1, 2024, and each taxable year
thereafter, in accordance with the following schedule, for a person who
files a return under the federal income tax as an unmarried individual
whose federal adjusted gross income for such taxable year is less than
one hundred thousand dollars, or as a married individual filing
Public Act No. 26-68 442 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
separately whose federal adjusted gross income for such taxable year is
less than one hundred thousand dollars, or as a head of household
whose federal adjusted gross income for such taxable year is less than
one hundred thousand dollars:
Federal Adjusted Gross Income Deduction
Less than $75,000 100.0%
$75,000 but not over $77,499 85.0%
$77,500 but not over $79,999 70.0%
$80,000 but not over $82,499 55.0%
$82,500 but not over $84,999 40.0%
$85,000 but not over $87,499 25.0%
$87,500 but not over $89,999 10.0%
$90,000 but not over $94,999 5.0%
$95,000 but not over $99,999 2.5%
$100,000 and over 0.0%
(xxii) To the extent properly includable in gross income for federal
income tax purposes, except for retirement benefits under clause (iv) of
this subparagraph and retirement pay under clause (xvi) of this
subparagraph, any pension or annuity income for the taxable year
commencing on or after January 1, 2024, and each taxable year
thereafter, in accordance with the following schedule for married
individuals who file a return under the federal income tax as married
individuals filing jointly whose federal adjusted gross income for such
taxable year is less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars:
Federal Adjusted Gross Income Deduction
Less than $100,000 100.0%
$100,000 but not over $104,999 85.0%
$105,000 but not over $109,999 70.0%
$110,000 but not over $114,999 55.0%
Public Act No. 26-68 443 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
$115,000 but not over $119,999 40.0%
$120,000 but not over $124,999 25.0%
$125,000 but not over $129,999 10.0%
$130,000 but not over $139,999 5.0%
$140,000 but not over $149,999 2.5%
$150,000 and over 0.0%
(xxiii) The amount of lost wages and medical, travel and housing
expenses, not to exceed ten thousand dollars in the aggregate, incurred
by a taxpayer during the taxable year in connection with the donation
to another person of an organ for organ transplantation occurring on or
after January 1, 2017;
(xxiv) To the extent properly includable in gross income for federal
income tax purposes, the amount of any financial assistance received
from the Crumbling Foundations Assistance Fund or paid to or on
behalf of the owner of a residential building pursuant to sections 8-442
and 8-443;
(xxv) To the extent properly includable in gross income for federal
income tax purposes, the amount calculated pursuant to subsection (b)
of section 12-704g for income received by a general partner of a venture
capital fund, as defined in 17 CFR 275.203(l)-1, as amended from time to
time;
(xxvi) To the extent any portion of a deduction under Section 179 of
the Internal Revenue Code was added to federal adjusted gross income
pursuant to subparagraph (A)(xiv) of this subdivision in computing
Connecticut adjusted gross income, twenty-five per cent of such
disallowed portion of the deduction in each of the four succeeding
taxable years;
(xxvii) To the extent properly includable in gross income for federal
Public Act No. 26-68 444 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
income tax purposes, for a person who files a return under the federal
income tax as an unmarried individual whose federal adjusted gross
income for such taxable year is less than seventy-five thousand dollars,
or as a married individual filing separately whose federal adjusted gross
income for such taxable year is less than seventy-five thousand dollars,
or as a head of household whose federal adjusted gross income for such
taxable year is less than seventy-five thousand dollars, or for a husband
and wife who file a return under the federal income tax as married
individuals filing jointly whose federal adjusted gross income for such
taxable year is less than one hundred thousand dollars, for the taxable
year commencing January 1, 2023, twenty-five per cent of any
distribution from an individual retirement account other than a Roth
individual retirement account;
(xxviii) To the extent properly includable in gross income for federal
income tax purposes, for a person who files a return under the federal
income tax as an unmarried individual whose federal adjusted gross
income for such taxable year is less than one hundred thousand dollars,
or as a married individual filing separately whose federal adjusted gross
income for such taxable year is less than one hundred thousand dollars,
or as a head of household whose federal adjusted gross income for such
taxable year is less than one hundred thousand dollars, (I) for the taxable
year commencing January 1, 2024, fifty per cent of any distribution from
an individual retirement account other than a Roth individual
retirement account, (II) for the taxable year commencing January 1, 2025,
seventy-five per cent of any distribution from an individual retirement
account other than a Roth individual retirement account, and (III) for
the taxable year commencing January 1, 2026, and each taxable year
thereafter, any distribution from an individual retirement account other
than a Roth individual retirement account. The subtraction under this
clause shall be made in accordance with the following schedule:
Federal Adjusted Gross Income Deduction
Public Act No. 26-68 445 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Less than $75,000 100.0%
$75,000 but not over $77,499 85.0%
$77,500 but not over $79,999 70.0%
$80,000 but not over $82,499 55.0%
$82,500 but not over $84,999 40.0%
$85,000 but not over $87,499 25.0%
$87,500 but not over $89,999 10.0%
$90,000 but not over $94,999 5.0%
$95,000 but not over $99,999 2.5%
$100,000 and over 0.0%
(xxix) To the extent properly includable in gross income for federal
income tax purposes, for married individuals who file a return under
the federal income tax as married individuals filing jointly whose
federal adjusted gross income for such taxable year is less than one
hundred fifty thousand dollars, (I) for the taxable year commencing
January 1, 2024, fifty per cent of any distribution from an individual
retirement account other than a Roth individual retirement account, (II)
for the taxable year commencing January 1, 2025, seventy-five per cent
of any distribution from an individual retirement account other than a
Roth individual retirement account, and (III) for the taxable year
commencing January 1, 2026, and each taxable year thereafter, any
distribution from an individual retirement account other than a Roth
individual retirement account. The subtraction under this clause shall
be made in accordance with the following schedule:
Federal Adjusted Gross Income Deduction
Less than $100,000 100.0%
$100,000 but not over $104,999 85.0%
$105,000 but not over $109,999 70.0%
$110,000 but not over $114,999 55.0%
$115,000 but not over $119,999 40.0%
Public Act No. 26-68 446 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
$120,000 but not over $124,999 25.0%
$125,000 but not over $129,999 10.0%
$130,000 but not over $139,999 5.0%
$140,000 but not over $149,999 2.5%
$150,000 and over 0.0%
(xxx) To the extent properly includable in gross income for federal
income tax purposes, for the taxable year commencing January 1, 2022,
the amount or amounts paid or otherwise credited to any eligible
resident of this state under (I) the 2020 Earned Income Tax Credit
enhancement program from funding allocated to the state through the
Coronavirus Relief Fund established under the Coronavirus Aid, Relief,
and Economic Security Act, P.L. 116-136, and (II) the 2021 Earned
Income Tax Credit enhancement program from funding allocated to the
state pursuant to Section 9901 of Subtitle M of Title IX of the American
Rescue Plan Act of 2021, P.L. 117-2;
(xxxi) For the taxable year commencing January 1, 2023, and each
taxable year thereafter, for a taxpayer licensed under the provisions of
chapter 420f or 420h, the amount of ordinary and necessary expenses
that would be eligible to be claimed as a deduction for federal income
tax purposes under Section 162(a) of the Internal Revenue Code but that
are disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal Revenue Code
because marijuana is a controlled substance under the federal
Controlled Substance Act;
(xxxii) To the extent properly includable in gross income for federal
income tax purposes, for the taxable year commencing on or after
January 1, 2025, and each taxable year thereafter, any common stock
received by the taxpayer during the taxable year under a share plan, as
defined in section 12-217ss;
(xxxiii) To the extent properly includable in gross income for federal
Public Act No. 26-68 447 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
income tax purposes, the amount of any student loan reimbursement
payment received by a taxpayer pursuant to section 10a-19m;
(xxxiv) Contributions to an ABLE account established pursuant to
sections 3-39k to 3-39q, inclusive, not to exceed five thousand dollars for
each individual taxpayer or ten thousand dollars for taxpayers filing a
joint return;
(xxxv) To the extent properly includable in gross income for federal
income tax purposes, the amount of any payment received pursuant to
subsection (c) of section 3-122a;
(xxxvi) For an account holder, as defined in section 12-724b, who files
a return under the federal income tax as an unmarried individual, a
married individual filing separately or a head of household, whose
federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year is less than one
hundred twenty-five thousand dollars or who files a return under the
federal income tax as married individuals filing jointly whose federal
adjusted gross income for the taxable year is less than two hundred fifty
thousand dollars:
(I) To the extent not deductible in determining federal adjusted gross
income, for the taxable year commencing January 1, 2027, an amount
equal to the contributions deposited during the taxable years
commencing January 1, 2026, and January 1, 2027, in a first-time
homebuyer savings account established pursuant to subsection (c) of
section 12-724b, less any amounts withdrawn during said taxable years
by the account holder from such account under subparagraph (D) of
subdivision (2) of subsection (f) of section 12-724b. The amount claimed
under this subclause shall not exceed two thousand five hundred
dollars for each such taxable year for an unmarried individual, a
married individual filing separately or a head of household and five
thousand dollars for each such taxable year for married individuals
filing jointly;
Public Act No. 26-68 448 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(II) To the extent not deductible in determining federal adjusted gross
income, for the taxable year commencing January 1, 2028, and each
taxable year thereafter, an amount equal to the contributions deposited
during the taxable year in a first-time homebuyer savings account
established pursuant to subsection (c) of section 12-724b, less any
amounts withdrawn during the taxable year by the account holder from
such account pursuant to subparagraph (D) of subdivision (2) of
subsection (f) of section 12-724b. The amount allowed to be claimed
under this subclause for the taxable year shall not exceed two thousand
five hundred dollars for an unmarried individual, a married individual
filing separately or a head of household and five thousand dollars for
married individuals filing jointly; and
(III) To the extent properly includable in gross income for federal
income tax purposes, for the taxable year commencing January 1, 2027,
and each taxable year thereafter, an amount equal to the sum of all
interest accrued on a first-time homebuyer savings account, established
pursuant to subsection (c) of section 12-724b, during the taxable year;
and
(xxxvii) To the extent properly includable in gross income for federal
income tax purposes, for the taxable year commencing January 1, 2027,
and each taxable year thereafter, for an account holder who is a qualified
beneficiary of a first-time homebuyer savings account, as those terms
are defined in section 12-724b, and who files a return under the federal
income tax as an unmarried individual, a married individual filing
separately or a head of household, whose federal adjusted gross income
for the taxable year is less than one hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars or who files a return under the federal income tax as married
individuals filing jointly whose federal adjusted gross income for the
taxable year is less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars, an amount
equal to any withdrawal from such account that is used to pay or
reimburse such qualified beneficiary for eligible costs, as defined in
Public Act No. 26-68 449 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
section 12-724b, incurred by the qualified beneficiary.
Sec. 278. Section 460 of public act 25-168 is amended to read as follows
(Effective July 1, 2026):
The appropriations in section 1 of [this act] public act 25-168, as
amended by section 1 of this act, are supported by the GENERAL FUND
revenue estimates as follows:
2025-2026 2026-2027
TAXES
Personal Income
Withholding $9,287,200,000 [$9,645,100,000]
$9,864,000,000
Estimates and Finals 3,343,700,000 [3,434,700,000]
4,098,300,000
Sales and Use 5,103,100,000 [5,230,300,000]
5,436,500,000
Corporations 1,659,500,000 [1,656,300,000]
1,352,600,000
Pass-Through Entities 2,115,300,000 [2,170,300,000]
2,435,600,000
Public Service 319,400,000 [322,200,000]
347,500,000
Inheritance and Estate 176,000,000 [235,700,000]
200,700,000
Insurance Companies 323,900,000 [328,600,000]
384,400,000
Cigarettes 228,100,000 [215,800,000]
203,800,000
Real Estate Conveyance 295,200,000 [299,300,000]
338,300,000
Alcoholic Beverages 79,100,000 [79,500,000]
76,600,000
Admissions and Dues 39,700,000 [40,200,000]
44,800,000
Health Provider Tax 916,900,000 [1,293,200,000]
121,600,000
Public Act No. 26-68 450 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Miscellaneous 21,900,000 [21,300,000]
19,900,000
TOTAL TAXES 23,909,000,000 [24,972,500,000]
24,924,600,000
Refunds of Taxes (1,966,800,000) [(2,040,800,000)]
(2,073,800,000)
Earned Income Tax Credit (235,400,000) (240,500,000)
R & D Credit Exchange (9,800,000) [(10,100,000)]
(14,800,000)
NET GENERAL FUND REVENUE 21,697,000,000 [22,681,100,000]
22,595,500,000
OTHER REVENUE
Transfers - Special Revenue 376,300,000 [385,700,000]
381,700,000
Indian Gaming Payments 334,600,000 [349,900,000]
380,100,000
Licenses, Permits, Fees 362,900,000 [335,600,000]
340,200,000
Sales of Commodities 17,300,000 [17,600,000]
18,000,000
Rents, Fines and Escheats 203,200,000 [198,300,000]
251,400,000
Investment Income 301,500,000 [251,400,000]
236,400,000
Miscellaneous 189,100,000 [194,100,000]
167,100,000
Refunds of Payments (89,700,000) [(92,100,000)]
(108,900,000)
NET TOTAL OTHER REVENUE 1,695,200,000 [1,640,500,000]
1,666,000,000
OTHER SOURCES
Federal Grants 1,853,200,000 [2,035,300,000]
2,211,800,000
Transfer From Tobacco Settlement 91,800,000 [90,200,000]
86,000,000
Public Act No. 26-68 451 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Transfers (To)/From Other Funds (261,353,800) [89,300,000]
306,300,000
Transfer to Budget Reserve Fund - (730,400,000) [(622,700,000)]
Volatility Cap (1,531,400,000)
NET TOTAL OTHER SOURCES 953,246,200 [1,592,100,000]
1,072,700,000
TOTAL GENERAL FUND 24,345,446,200 [25,913,700,000]
REVENUE 25,334,200,000
Sec. 279. Section 461 of public act 25-168 is amended to read as follows
(Effective July 1, 2026):
The appropriations in section 2 of [this act] public act 25-168, as
amended by section 2 of this act, are supported by the SPECIAL
TRANSPORTATION FUND revenue estimates as follows:
2025-2026 2026-2027
TAXES
Motor Fuels $502,000,000 [$494,400,000]
$504,500,000
Oil Companies 293,800,000 [300,200,000]
358,400,000
Sales and Use 879,150,000 [902,250,000]
916,800,000
Sales Tax DMV 118,100,000 [119,300,000]
110,800,000
Highway Use Tax 61,700,000 [62,600,000]
61,700,000
Refund of Taxes (10,300,000) (10,600,000)
TOTAL TAXES 1,844,450,000 [1,868,150,000]
1,941,600,000
OTHER SOURCES
Motor Vehicle Receipts 282,100,000 [283,400,000]
272,300,000
Public Act No. 26-68 452 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Licenses, Permits, Fees 134,900,000 [137,200,000]
141,100,000
Interest Income 47,000,000 [41,500,000]
64,400,000
Federal Grants - -
Transfers (To)/From Other Funds 11,500,000 [117,500,000]
217,500,000
Refunds of Payments (10,900,000) [(11,100,000)]
(12,300,000)
NET TOTAL OTHER SOURCES 464,600,000 [568,500,000]
683,000,000
TOTAL SPECIAL 2,309,050,000 [2,436,650,000]
TRANSPORTATION FUND 2,624,600,000
REVENUE
Sec. 280. Section 462 of public act 25-168 is amended to read as follows
(Effective July 1, 2026):
The appropriations in section 3 of [this act] public act 25-168, as
amended by section 3 of this act, are supported by the
MASHANTUCKET PEQUOT AND MOHEGAN FUND revenue
estimates as follows:
2025-2026 2026-2027
Transfers from General Fund $52,600,000 [$52,600,000]
$54,300,000
TOTAL MASHANTUCKET 52,600,000 [52,600,000]
PEQUOT AND MOHEGAN FUND 54,300,000
REVENUE
Sec. 281. Section 463 of public act 25-168 is amended to read as follows
(Effective July 1, 2026):
The appropriations in section 4 of [this act] public act 25-168, as
amended by section 4 of this act, are supported by the BANKING FUND
Public Act No. 26-68 453 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
revenue estimates as follows:
2025-2026 2026-2027
Fees and Assessments $36,400,000 [$36,600,000]
33,700,000
TOTAL BANKING FUND 36,400,000 [36,600,000]
REVENUE 33,700,000
Sec. 282. Section 464 of public act 25-168 is amended to read as follows
(Effective July 1, 2026):
The appropriations in section 5 of [this act] public act 25-168, as
amended by section 5 of this act, are supported by the INSURANCE
FUND revenue estimates as follows:
2025-2026 2026-2027
Fees and Assessments $126,400,000 [$128,900,000]
$118,600,000
TOTAL INSURANCE FUND 126,400,000 [128,900,000]
REVENUE 118,600,000
Sec. 283. Section 465 of public act 25-168 is amended to read as follows
(Effective July 1, 2026):
The appropriations in section 6 of [this act] public act 25-168, as
amended by section 6 of this act, are supported by the CONSUMER
COUNSEL AND PUBLIC UTILITY CONTROL FUND revenue
estimates as follows:
2025-2026 2026-2027
Fees and Assessments $37,800,000 [$38,500,000]
$38,400,000
TOTAL CONSUMER COUNSEL 37,800,000 [38,500,000]
AND PUBLIC UTILITY CONTROL 38,400,000
FUND REVENUE
Public Act No. 26-68 454 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 284. Section 466 of public act 25-168 is amended to read as follows
(Effective July 1, 2026):
The appropriations in section 7 of [this act] public act 25-168, as
amended by section 7 of this act, are supported by the WORKERS'
COMPENSATION FUND revenue estimates as follows:
2025-2026 2026-2027
Fees and Assessments $27,300,000 [$27,500,000]
$28,000,000
TOTAL WORKERS' 27,300,000 [27,500,000]
COMPENSATION FUND 28,000,000
REVENUE
Sec. 285. Section 468 of public act 25-168 is amended to read as follows
(Effective July 1, 2026):
The appropriations in section 9 of [this act] public act 25-168, as
amended by section 8 of this act, are supported by the TOURISM FUND
revenue estimates as follows:
2025-2026 2026-2027
Room Occupancy Tax $15,500,000 [$16,000,000]
$17,600,000
Use of Funds From Prior Years 2,500,000 3,000,000
Use of Prior Year's Balance 300,000
TOTAL TOURISM FUND 18,000,000 [19,000,000]
REVENUE 20,900,000
Sec. 286. Section 471 of public act 25-168 is amended to read as follows
(Effective July 1, 2026):
The appropriations in section 12 of [this act] public act 25-168, as
Public Act No. 26-68 455 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
amended by section 9 of this act, are supported by the MUNICIPAL
REVENUE SHARING FUND revenue estimates as follows:
2025-2026 2026-2027
Sales and Use Tax $459,250,000 [$470,550,000]
$482,400,000
Transfers (To)/From Other Funds 101,000,000 [90,000,000]
75,000,000
TOTAL MUNICIPAL REVENUE 560,250,000 [560,550,000]
SHARING FUND REVENUE 557,400,000
Sec. 287. Section 469 of public act 25-168 is amended to read as follows
(Effective July 1, 2026):
The appropriations in section 10 of [this act] public act 25-168 are
supported by the CANNABIS PREVENTION AND RECOVERY
SERVICES FUND revenue estimates as follows:
2025-2026 2026-2027
Cannabis Excise Tax $5,900,000 [$6,200,000]
7,400,000
TOTAL CANNABIS PREVENTION 5,900,000 [6,200,000]
AND RECOVERY SERVICES 7,400,000
FUND REVENUE
Sec. 288. Section 470 of public act 25-168 is amended to read as follows
(Effective July 1, 2026):
The appropriations in section 11 of [this act] public act 25-168 are
supported by the CANNABIS REGULATORY FUND revenue estimates
as follows:
2025-2026 2026-2027
[Cannabis Excise Tax] $10,300,000 $10,500,000
Transfers (To)/From Other Funds
TOTAL CANNABIS 10,300,000 10,500,000
REGULATORY FUND REVENUE
Public Act No. 26-68 456 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 289. (Effective July 1, 2026) The State Bond Commission shall have
power, in accordance with the provisions of this section and sections 290
to 295, inclusive, of this act, from time to time to authorize the issuance
of bonds of the state in one or more series and in principal amounts in
the aggregate not exceeding $231,200,000.
Sec. 290. (Effective July 1, 2026) The proceeds of the sale of bonds
described in sections 289 to 295, inclusive, of this act, to the extent
hereinafter stated, shall be used for the purpose of acquiring, by
purchase or condemnation, undertaking, constructing, reconstructing,
improving or equipping, or purchasing land or buildings or improving
sites for the projects hereinafter described, including payment of
architectural, engineering, demolition or related costs in connection
therewith, or of payment of the cost of long-range capital programming
and space utilization studies as hereinafter stated:
(a) For the Department of Administrative Services: Site acquisition,
planning activities and construction costs to replace the current fleet
garage in Wethersfield, not exceeding $20,000,000.
(b) For the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection:
Purchase, construction and maintenance of a new mesonet system, not
exceeding $1,500,000.
(c) For the Department of Correction:
(1) Security upgrades, including, but not limited to, new doors,
information technology upgrades, security cameras and other work to
ensure the safety of the department's employees and inmates, not
exceeding $10,000,000;
(2) Electronic health records systems, including digital medical care
request systems, devices and access points, not exceeding $10,000,000.
Public Act No. 26-68 457 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(d) For the Department of Energy and Environmental Protection:
Natural diversity data base mapping enhancements and other
information technology resources to streamline the department's
permitting and environmental review processes, not exceeding
$5,000,000.
(e) For the Department of Children and Families: Internet web site
with a public, online dashboard to provide real-time information
concerning the department's state-wide program of services described
in section 17a-3 of the general statutes, not exceeding $1,500,000.
(f) For the Connecticut State Colleges and Universities, Naugatuck
Valley Community College: Construction of Kinney Hall, not exceeding
$63,200,000.
(g) For the Technical Education and Career System:
(1) Design and construction of Vinal Technical High School, not
exceeding $50,000,000;
(2) A new technology center, not exceeding $70,000,000.
Sec. 291. (Effective July 1, 2026) All provisions of section 3-20 of the
general statutes or the exercise of any right or power granted thereby
which are not inconsistent with the provisions of sections 289 to 295,
inclusive, of this act are hereby adopted and shall apply to all bonds
authorized by the State Bond Commission pursuant to sections 289 to
295, inclusive, of this act and temporary notes issued in anticipation of
the money to be derived from the sale of any such bonds so authorized
may be issued in accordance with said section 3-20 and from time to
time renewed. Such bonds shall mature at such time or times not
exceeding twenty years from their respective dates as may be provided
in or pursuant to the resolution or resolutions of the State Bond
Commission authorizing such bonds.
Public Act No. 26-68 458 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 292. (Effective July 1, 2026) None of the bonds described in
sections 289 to 295, inclusive, of this act shall be authorized except upon
a finding by the State Bond Commission that there has been filed with
it a request for such authorization, which is signed by the Secretary of
the Office of Policy and Management or by or on behalf of such state
officer, department or agency and stating such terms and conditions as
said commission, in its discretion, may require.
Sec. 293. (Effective July 1, 2026) For the purposes of sections 289 to 295,
inclusive, of this act, "state moneys" means the proceeds of the sale of
bonds authorized pursuant to said sections 289 to 295, inclusive, or of
temporary notes issued in anticipation of the moneys to be derived from
the sale of such bonds. Each request filed as provided in section 292 of
this act for an authorization of bonds shall identify the project for which
the proceeds of the sale of such bonds are to be used and expended and,
in addition to any terms and conditions required pursuant to said
section 292, shall include the recommendation of the person signing
such request as to the extent to which federal, private or other moneys
then available or thereafter to be made available for costs in connection
with any such project should be added to the state moneys available or
becoming available hereunder for such project. If the request includes a
recommendation that some amount of such federal, private or other
moneys should be added to such state moneys, then, if and to the extent
directed by the State Bond Commission at the time of authorization of
such bonds, such amount of such federal, private or other moneys then
available, or thereafter to be made available for costs in connection with
such project, may be added to any state moneys available or becoming
available hereunder for such project and shall be used for such project.
Any other federal, private or other moneys then available or thereafter
to be made available for costs in connection with such project shall,
upon receipt, be used by the State Treasurer, in conformity with
applicable federal and state law, to meet the principal of outstanding
bonds issued pursuant to sections 289 to 295, inclusive, of this act, or to
Public Act No. 26-68 459 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
meet the principal of temporary notes issued in anticipation of the
money to be derived from the sale of bonds theretofore authorized
pursuant to said sections 289 to 295, inclusive, for the purpose of
financing such costs, either by purchase or redemption and cancellation
of such bonds or notes or by payment thereof at maturity. Whenever
any of the federal, private or other moneys so received with respect to
such project are used to meet the principal of such temporary notes or
whenever principal of any such temporary notes is retired by
application of revenue receipts of the state, the amount of bonds
theretofore authorized in anticipation of which such temporary notes
were issued, and the aggregate amount of bonds which may be
authorized pursuant to section 289 of this act, shall each be reduced by
the amount of the principal so met or retired. Pending use of the federal,
private or other moneys so received to meet principal as hereinabove
directed, the amount thereof may be invested by the State Treasurer in
bonds or obligations of, or guaranteed by, the state or the United States
or agencies or instrumentalities of the United States, shall be deemed to
be part of the debt retirement funds of the state, and net earnings on
such investments shall be used in the same manner as the moneys so
invested.
Sec. 294. (Effective July 1, 2026) Any balance of proceeds of the sale of
said bonds authorized for any project described in section 290 of this act
in excess of the cost of such project may be used to complete any other
project described in said section 290, if the State Bond Commission shall
so determine and direct. Any balance of proceeds of the sale of said
bonds in excess of the costs of all the projects described in said section
290 shall be deposited to the credit of the General Fund.
Sec. 295. (Effective July 1, 2026) The bonds issued pursuant to this
section and sections 289 to 294, inclusive, of this act shall be general
obligations of the state and the full faith and credit of the state of
Connecticut are pledged for the payment of the principal of and interest
Public Act No. 26-68 460 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
on said bonds as the same become due, and accordingly and as part of
the contract of the state with the holders of said bonds, appropriation of
all amounts necessary for punctual payment of such principal and
interest is hereby made, and the State Treasurer shall pay such principal
and interest as the same become due.
Sec. 296. (Effective July 1, 2026) The State Bond Commission shall have
power, in accordance with the provisions of this section and sections 297
to 303, inclusive, of this act, from time to time to authorize the issuance
of bonds of the state in one or more series and in principal amounts in
the aggregate, not exceeding $64,000,000.
Sec. 297. (Effective July 1, 2026) The proceeds of the sale of the bonds
described in sections 296 to 303, inclusive, of this act shall be used for
the purpose of providing grants-in-aid and other financing for the
projects, programs and purposes hereinafter stated:
(a) For the Department of Economic and Community Development:
(1) Grants-in-aid to municipalities and nonprofit providers of human
or social services for capital expenditure projects to place or maintain
war or veterans' memorials or monuments, not exceeding $2,000,000;
(2) Grant-in-aid to the town of East Haven for costs associated with
the planning, design, acquisition, construction, reconstruction,
renovation, expansion, improvement, furnishing and equipping one or
more public safety facilities, including, but not limited to, the
construction of one or more new facilities or the acquisition, renovation,
conversion or improvement of one or more existing buildings for use as
public safety facilities, together with any related site acquisition, site
preparation, utilities, infrastructure improvements and appurtenances,
not exceeding $40,000,000;
(3) Grant-in-aid to the town of East Haven to support infrastructure,
transportation, traffic safety, environmental remediation or other public
Public Act No. 26-68 461 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
improvement projects located on the East Haven shoreline and in the
neighborhood areas adjacent to Tweed-New Haven Airport, including,
but not limited to, roadway and pedestrian safety improvements,
stormwater and drainage infrastructure, streetscape enhancements,
environmental mitigation projects and related public infrastructure
improvements for the benefit of residents, businesses and visitors to
said shoreline and neighborhoods, not exceeding $5,000,000;
(4) Grant-in-aid to the Tweed-New Haven Airport Authority for the
design, construction, reconstruction and improvement of external roads
servicing the Tweed-New Haven Airport and for property acquisition,
easements or other real property interests necessary to facilitate ingress
and egress to such airport, but not including the construction of a new
passenger terminal facility, new parking spaces, access from any new
parking spaces to Proto Drive in the town of East Haven or any
connections to South End Road in said town, not exceeding $5,000,000;
(5) Grant-in-aid to the city of New Haven to support infrastructure,
transportation, traffic safety, environmental remediation or other public
improvement projects located in the East Shore and Annex
neighborhoods of said city, including, but not limited to, roadway and
pedestrian safety improvements, stormwater and drainage
infrastructure, streetscape enhancements, environmental mitigation
projects and related public infrastructure improvements for the benefit
of residents, businesses and visitors to said neighborhoods, not
exceeding $5,000,000.
(b) For the Office of Policy and Management: Grants-in-aid to
municipalities for the purchase of nonlethal equipment and crisis
response tools for municipal police departments to use for mental health
crisis responses, not exceeding $5,000,000.
(c) For the Department of Education: Grants-in-aid to the American
School for the Deaf for alterations, renovations and improvements to the
Public Act No. 26-68 462 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
buildings and grounds, not exceeding $2,000,000.
Sec. 298. (Effective July 1, 2026) All provisions of section 3-20 of the
general statutes or the exercise of any right or power granted thereby
that are not inconsistent with the provisions of sections 296 to 303,
inclusive, of this act are hereby adopted and shall apply to all bonds
authorized by the State Bond Commission pursuant to sections 296 to
303, inclusive, of this act and temporary notes issued in anticipation of
the money to be derived from the sale of any such bonds so authorized
may be issued in accordance with said sections 296 to 303, inclusive, and
from time to time renewed. Such bonds shall mature at such time or
times not exceeding twenty years from their respective dates as may be
provided in or pursuant to the resolution or resolutions of the State
Bond Commission authorizing such bonds.
Sec. 299. (Effective July 1, 2026) None of the bonds described in
sections 296 to 303, inclusive, of this act shall be authorized except upon
a finding by the State Bond Commission that there has been filed with
it a request for such authorization, which is signed by the Secretary of
the Office of Policy and Management or by or on behalf of such state
officer, department or agency and stating such terms and conditions as
said commission, in its discretion, may require.
Sec. 300. (Effective July 1, 2026) For the purposes of sections 296 to 303,
inclusive, of this act, "state moneys" means the proceeds of the sale of
bonds authorized pursuant to said sections 296 to 303, inclusive, or of
temporary notes issued in anticipation of the moneys to be derived from
the sale of such bonds. Each request filed as provided in section 299 of
this act for an authorization of bonds shall identify the project for which
the proceeds of the sale of such bonds are to be used and expended and,
in addition to any terms and conditions required pursuant to said
section 299, include the recommendation of the person signing such
request as to the extent to which federal, private or other moneys then
available or thereafter to be made available for costs in connection with
Public Act No. 26-68 463 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
any such project should be added to the state moneys available or
becoming available under said sections 296 to 303, inclusive, for such
project. If the request includes a recommendation that some amount of
such federal, private or other moneys should be added to such state
moneys, then, if and to the extent directed by the State Bond
Commission at the time of authorization of such bonds, such amount of
such federal, private or other moneys then available or thereafter to be
made available for costs in connection with such project may be added
to any state moneys available or becoming available hereunder for such
project and be used for such project. Any other federal, private or other
moneys then available or thereafter to be made available for costs in
connection with such project upon receipt shall, in conformity with
applicable federal and state law, be used by the State Treasurer to meet
the principal of outstanding bonds issued pursuant to said sections 296
to 303, inclusive, or to meet the principal of temporary notes issued in
anticipation of the money to be derived from the sale of bonds
theretofore authorized pursuant to said sections 296 to 303, inclusive,
for the purpose of financing such costs, either by purchase or
redemption and cancellation of such bonds or notes or by payment
thereof at maturity. Whenever any of the federal, private or other
moneys so received with respect to such project are used to meet the
principal of such temporary notes or whenever the principal of any such
temporary notes is retired by application of revenue receipts of the state,
the amount of bonds theretofore authorized in anticipation of which
such temporary notes were issued, and the aggregate amount of bonds
which may be authorized pursuant to section 296 of this act shall each
be reduced by the amount of the principal so met or retired. Pending
use of the federal, private or other moneys so received to meet the
principal as directed in this section, the amount thereof may be invested
by the State Treasurer in bonds or obligations of, or guaranteed by, the
state or the United States or agencies or instrumentalities of the United
States, shall be deemed to be part of the debt retirement funds of the
state, and net earnings on such investments shall be used in the same
Public Act No. 26-68 464 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
manner as the moneys so invested.
Sec. 301. (Effective July 1, 2026) The bonds issued pursuant to sections
296 to 303, inclusive, of this act shall be general obligations of the state
and the full faith and credit of the state of Connecticut are pledged for
the payment of the principal of and interest on said bonds as the same
become due, and accordingly and as part of the contract of the state with
the holders of said bonds, appropriation of all amounts necessary for
punctual payment of such principal and interest is hereby made, and
the State Treasurer shall pay such principal and interest as the same
become due.
Sec. 302. (Effective July 1, 2026) In accordance with section 297 of this
act, the state, through the state agencies specified in said section 297,
may provide grants-in-aid and other financings to or for the agencies for
the purposes and projects as described in said section 297. All financing
shall be made in accordance with the terms of a contract at such time or
times as shall be determined within authorization of funds by the State
Bond Commission.
Sec. 303. (Effective July 1, 2026) In the case of any grant-in-aid made
pursuant to subsection (a), (b) or (c) of section 297 of this act that is made
to any entity which is not a political subdivision of the state, the contract
entered into pursuant to section 297 of this act shall provide that if the
premises for which such grant-in-aid was made ceases, within ten years
of the date of such grant, to be used as a facility for which such grant
was made, an amount equal to the amount of such grant, minus ten per
cent per year for each full year which has elapsed since the date of such
grant, shall be repaid to the state and that a lien shall be placed on such
land in favor of the state to ensure that such amount shall be repaid in
the event of such change in use, provided if the premises for which such
grant-in-aid was made are owned by the state, a municipality or a
housing authority, no lien need be placed.
Public Act No. 26-68 465 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 304. Section 10-287d of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective July 1, 2026):
For the purposes of funding (1) grants to projects that have received
approval of the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to
section 10-287, subsection (a) of section 10-65 and section 10-76e, and (2)
grants to assist school building projects to remedy safety and health
violations and damage from fire and catastrophe, the State Treasurer is
authorized and directed, subject to and in accordance with the
provisions of section 3-20, to issue bonds of the state from time to time
in one or more series in an aggregate amount not exceeding [fourteen
billion nine hundred sixty-two million one hundred sixty thousand
dollars, provided five hundred fifty million dollars of said authorization
shall be effective July 1, 2026] fifteen billion twelve million one hundred
sixty thousand dollars. Bonds of each series shall bear such date or dates
and mature at such time or times not exceeding thirty years from their
respective dates and be subject to such redemption privileges, with or
without premium, as may be fixed by the State Bond Commission. They
shall be sold at not less than par and accrued interest and the full faith
and credit of the state is pledged for the payment of the interest thereon
and the principal thereof as the same shall become due, and accordingly
and as part of the contract of the state with the holders of said bonds,
appropriation of all amounts necessary for punctual payment of such
principal and interest is hereby made, and the State Treasurer shall pay
such principal and interest as the same become due. The State Treasurer
is authorized to invest temporarily in direct obligations of the United
States, United States agency obligations, certificates of deposit,
commercial paper or bank acceptances such portion of the proceeds of
such bonds or of any notes issued in anticipation thereof as may be
deemed available for such purpose.
Sec. 305. Section 10a-110n of the general statutes is repealed. (Effective
Public Act No. 26-68 466 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
July 1, 2026)
Sec. 306. Subdivision (10) of subsection (a) of section 10a-109d of the
2026 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(10) To borrow money and issue securities to finance the acquisition,
construction, reconstruction, improvement or equipping of any one
project, or more than one, or any combination of projects, or to make
loans or provide grants from the proceeds of such securities to any
subsidiary or joint venture established pursuant to The University of
Connecticut Health Center Joint Venture Initiative, or to refund
securities issued after June 7, 1995, or to refund any such refunding
securities or for any one, or more than one, or all of those purposes, or
any combination of those purposes, and to provide for the security and
payment of those securities and for the rights of the holders of them,
except that the amount of any such borrowing, the special debt service
requirements for which are secured by the state debt service
commitment, exclusive of the amount of borrowing to refund securities,
or to fund issuance costs or necessary reserves, may not exceed the
aggregate principal amount of (A) for the fiscal years ending June 30,
1996, to June 30, 2005, inclusive, one billion twelve million dollars, (B)
for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2006, to June 30, 2031, inclusive, [four
billion three hundred two million nine hundred thousand] four billion
five hundred fifty-three million dollars, and (C) such additional amount
or amounts: (i) Required from time to time to fund any special capital
reserve fund or other debt service reserve fund in accordance with the
financing transaction proceedings, and (ii) to pay or provide for the
costs of issuance and capitalized interest, if any; the aggregate amounts
of subparagraphs (A), (B) and (C) of this subdivision are established as
the authorized funding amount, and no borrowing within the
authorized funding amount for a project or projects may be effected
unless the project or projects are included in accordance with subsection
Public Act No. 26-68 467 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(a) of section 10a-109e;
Sec. 307. Subsection (a) of section 10a-109e of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) The university may administer, manage, schedule, finance,
further design and construct UConn 2000, to operate and maintain the
components thereof in a prudent and economical manner and to reserve
for and make renewals and replacements thereof when appropriate, it
being hereby determined and found to be in the best interest of the state
and the university to provide this independent authority to the
university along with providing assured revenues therefor as the
efficient and cost effective course to achieve the objective of avoiding
further decline in the physical infrastructure of the university and to
renew, modernize, enhance and maintain such infrastructure, the
particular project or projects, each being hereby approved as a project of
UConn 2000, and the presently estimated cost thereof being as follows:
UConn 2000 Project Phase I Phase II Phase III
Fiscal Years Fiscal Years Fiscal Years
1996-1999 2000-2005 2005-2031
Academic and Research
Facilities 450,000,000
Agricultural Biotechnology
Facility 9,400,000
Agricultural Biotechnology
Facility Completion 10,000,000
Alumni Quadrant
Public Act No. 26-68 468 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Renovations 14,338,000
Arjona and Monteith
(new classroom buildings) 66,100,000
Avery Point Campus
Undergraduate and
Library Building 35,000,000
Avery Point Marine
Science Research Center –
Phase I 34,000,000
Avery Point Marine
Science Research Center –
Phase II 16,682,000
Avery Point Renovation 5,600,000 15,000,000
Babbidge Library 0
Balancing Contingency 5,506,834
Beach Hall Renovations 10,000,000
Benton State Art Museum
Addition 1,400,000 3,000,000
Biobehavioral Complex
Replacement 4,000,000
Bishop Renovation 8,000,000
Public Act No. 26-68 469 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Budds Building
Renovation 2,805,000
Business School
Renovation 4,803,000
Chemistry Building 53,700,000
Commissary Warehouse 1,000,000
Deferred Maintenance/
Code Compliance/
ADA Compliance/
Infrastructure
Improvements &
Renovation Lump Sum and
Utility, Administrative
and Support Facilities 39,332,000 863,500,000
Deferred Maintenance &
Renovation Lump Sum
Balance 104,668,000
Digital learning
infrastructure
improvements at a regional
campus 3,000,000
East Campus North
Renovations 11,820,000
Public Act No. 26-68 470 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Engineering Building
(with Environmental
Research Institute) 36,700,000
Equine Center 1,000,000
Equipment, Library
Collections &
Telecommunications 60,500,000 [470,000,000]
480,000,000
Equipment, Library
Collections &
Telecommunications
Completion 182,118,146
Family Studies (DRM)
Renovation 6,500,000
Farm Buildings Repairs/
Replacement 6,000,000
Fine Arts Phase II 20,000,000
Floriculture Greenhouse 3,000,000
Gant Building Renovations
and
New Life Sciences Building 403,500,000
Gant Plaza Deck 0
Public Act No. 26-68 471 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Gentry Completion 10,000,000
Gentry Renovation 9,299,000
Grad Dorm Renovations 7,548,000
Gulley Hall Renovation 1,416,000
Harry A. Gampel Pavilion
and
Hugh S. Greer Field House [164,000,000]
204,000,000
Hartford Relocation
Acquisition/Renovation 56,762,020 70,000,000
Hartford Relocation Design 1,500,000
Hartford Relocation
Feasibility Study 500,000
Heating Plant Upgrade 10,000,000
Hilltop Dormitory New 30,000,000
Hilltop Dormitory
Renovations 3,141,000
Ice Rink Enclosure 2,616,000
Incubator Facilities 10,000,000
Public Act No. 26-68 472 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
International House
Conversion 800,000
Intramural, Recreational
and Intercollegiate
Facilities 31,000,000
Jorgensen Renovation 7,200,000
Koons Hall Renovation/
Addition 7,000,000
Lakeside Renovation 3,800,000
Lab renovations and
equipment 20,000,000
Law School Renovations/
Improvements 15,000,000
Library Storage Facility 5,000,000
Litchfield Agricultural
Center – Phase I 1,000,000
Litchfield Agricultural
Center – Phase II 700,000
Manchester Hall
Renovation 6,000,000
Mansfield Apartments
Public Act No. 26-68 473 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Renovation 2,612,000
Mansfield Training School
Improvements 27,614,000 29,000,000
Natural History Museum
Completion 4,900,000
North Campus Renovation 2,654,000
North Campus Renovation
Completion 21,049,000
North Hillside Road
Completion 11,500,000
North Superblock Site
and Utilities 8,000,000
Northwest Quadrant
Renovation 2,001,000
Northwest Quadrant
Renovation 15,874,000
Observatory 1,000,000
Old Central Warehouse 18,000,000
Parking Garage #3 78,000,000
Parking Garage – North 10,000,000
Public Act No. 26-68 474 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Parking Garage – South 15,000,000
Pedestrian Spinepath 2,556,000
Pedestrian Walkways 3,233,000
Program to recruit eminent
faculty and research staff
established pursuant to
section 10a-104c 46,100,000
Psychology Building
Renovation/Addition 20,000,000
Residential Life Facilities 162,000,000
Roadways 10,000,000
School of Business 20,000,000
School of Pharmacy/
Biology 3,856,000
School of Pharmacy/
Biology Completion 61,058,000
Shippee/Buckley
Renovations 6,156,000
Social Science K Building 20,964,000
Public Act No. 26-68 475 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
South Campus Complex 13,127,000
Stamford Campus
Improvements/Housing 13,000,000
Stamford Downtown
Relocation – Phase I 45,659,000
Stamford Downtown
Relocation – Phase II 17,392,000
Storrs Hall Addition 4,300,000
Student Health Services 12,000,000
Student Union Addition 23,000,000
Support Facility
(Architectural and
Engineering Services) 2,000,000
Technology Quadrant –
Phase IA 38,000,000
Technology Quadrant –
Phase IB 16,611,000
Technology Quadrant –
Phase II 72,000,000
Technology Quadrant –
Phase III 15,000,000
Public Act No. 26-68 476 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Torrey Life Science
Renovation and Demolition 17,000,000 25,000,000
Torrey Renovation
Completion and Biology
Expansion 42,000,000
Torrington Campus
Improvements 1,000,000
Towers Renovation 17,794,000
UConn Products Store 1,000,000
Undergraduate Education
Center 650,000
Undergraduate Education
Center 7,450,000
Underground Steam &
Water Upgrade 3,500,000
Underground Steam &
Water Upgrade
Completion 9,000,000
University Programs
Building – Phase I 8,750,000
University Programs
Public Act No. 26-68 477 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Building – Phase II
Visitors Center 300,000
Waring Building
Conversion 7,888,000
Waterbury Downtown
Campus 3,000,000
Waterbury Property
Purchase 325,000
West Campus Renovations 14,897,000
West Hartford Campus
Renovations/
Improvements 25,000,000
White Building Renovation 2,430,000
Wilbur Cross Building
Renovation 3,645,000
Young Building
Renovation/Addition 17,000,000
HEALTH CENTER
CLAC Renovation
Biosafety Level 3 Lab 14,000,000
Deferred maintenance, code
Public Act No. 26-68 478 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
compliance and
infrastructure
improvements 90,000,000
Deferred Maintenance/
Code Compliance/ADA
Compliance/Infrastructure
& Improvements
Renovation Lump Sum
and Utility, Administrative
and Support Facilities
– Health Center 86,000,000
Dental School Renovation 5,000,000
Equipment, Library
Collections and
Telecommunications –
Health Center [75,000,000]
110,000,000
Library/Student Computer
Center Renovation 5,000,000
Main Building Renovation 125,000,000
Medical School Academic
Building Renovation 9,000,000
Parking Garage – Health
Center 8,400,000
Public Act No. 26-68 479 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Research Tower 60,000,000
Support Building
Addition/Renovation 4,000,000
System telecommunications
infrastructure upgrades,
improvements and
expansions 6,000,000
The University of
Connecticut
Health Center
New Construction and
Renovation 394,900,000
Planning and Design Costs 25,000,000
The University of
Connecticut Health Center
Joint Venture Initiative 390,000,000
Total – Storrs and Regional
Campus Project List [3,200,000,000]
3,319,100,000
Total – Health Center
Project List [1,201,300,000]
1,332,300,000
TOTAL 382,000,000 868,000,000 [4,401,300,000]
4,651,400,000
Public Act No. 26-68 480 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 308. Subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 10a-109g of the
2026 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) (1) The university is authorized to provide by resolution, at one
time or from time to time, for the issuance and sale of securities, in its
own name on behalf of the state, pursuant to section 10a-109f. The board
of trustees of the university is hereby authorized by such resolution to
delegate to its finance committee such matters as it may determine
appropriate other than the authorization and maximum amount of the
securities to be issued, the nature of the obligation of the securities as
established pursuant to subsection (c) of this section and the projects for
which the proceeds are to be used. The finance committee may act on
such matters unless and until the board of trustees elects to reassume
the same. The amount of securities the special debt service requirements
of which are secured by the state debt service commitment that the
board of trustees is authorized to provide for the issuance and sale in
accordance with this subsection shall be capped in each fiscal year in the
following amounts, provided, to the extent the board of trustees does
not provide for the issuance of all or a portion of such amount in a fiscal
year, all or such portion, as the case may be, may be carried forward to
any succeeding fiscal year and provided further, the actual amount for
funding, paying or providing for the items described in subparagraph
(C) of subdivision (10) of subsection (a) of section 10a-109d may be
added to the capped amount in each fiscal year:
Fiscal Year Amount
1996 $112,542,000
1997 112,001,000
1998 93,146,000
1999 64,311,000
2000 130,000,000
Public Act No. 26-68 481 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
2001 100,000,000
2002 100,000,000
2003 100,000,000
2004 100,000,000
2005 100,000,000
2006 79,000,000
2007 89,000,000
2008 115,000,000
2009 140,000,000
2010 0
2011 138,800,000
2012 157,200,000
2013 143,000,000
2014 204,400,000
2015 315,500,000
2016 312,100,000
2017 240,400,000
2018 200,000,000
2019 200,000,000
2020 197,200,000
2021 260,000,000
2022 215,500,000
2023 125,100,000
2024 84,700,000
2025 122,000,000
2026 276,000,000
2027 [192,000,000] 442,100,000
2028 158,500,000
2029 156,500,000
2030 156,000,000
2031 25,000,000
Public Act No. 26-68 482 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 309. Subdivision (3) of subsection (c) of section 9 of public act 12-
189, as amended by section 102 of public act 13-239, section 212 of public
act 15-1 of the June special session and section 157 of public act 16-4 of
the May special session, is amended to read as follows (Effective July 1,
2026):
(3) For the Department of Housing: Grant-in-aid to the Connecticut
Housing Finance Authority for the purposes of sections 8-265cc to 8-
265ii, inclusive, and section 8-265kk of the general statutes, and to
capitalize down payment assistance issued under the homeownership
loan program established pursuant to sections 8-283 to 8-289, inclusive,
of the general statutes, not exceeding $38,000,000.
Sec. 310. Section 306 of public act 22-118, as amended by section 83 of
public act 23-205, is amended to read as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
The State Bond Commission shall have power, in accordance with the
provisions of this section and sections 307 to 312, inclusive, of public act
22-118, from time to time to authorize the issuance of bonds of the state
in one or more series and in principal amounts in the aggregate not
exceeding [$135,800,000] $60,800,000.
Sec. 311. Subsection (b) of section 307 of public act 22-118, as amended
by section 84 of public act 23-205, is repealed. (Effective July 1, 2026)
Sec. 312. Subdivision (2) of subsection (c) of section 314 of public act
22-118 is amended to read as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
(2) Grants-in-aid to support food systems or food resource
organizations for capital improvements, not exceeding $10,000,000.
Sec. 313. Subdivision (1) of subsection (d) of section 314 of public act
22-118, as amended by section 86 of public act 23-205, is amended to
read as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
Public Act No. 26-68 483 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(1) Grants-in-aid to provide [matching] a portion of the funds
necessary for municipalities, local and regional boards of education and
school bus operators to [submit federal grant applications in order to]
maximize federal, state or other sources of funding or financing for the
purchase or lease of zero-emission school buses and electric vehicle
charging or fueling infrastructure, not exceeding $20,000,000;
Sec. 314. Section 1 of public act 23-205, as amended by section 103 of
public act 25-174, is amended to read as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
The State Bond Commission shall have power, in accordance with the
provisions of this section and sections 2 to 7, inclusive, of public act 23-
205, from time to time to authorize the issuance of bonds of the state in
one or more series and in principal amounts in the aggregate not
exceeding [$741,290,000] $745,890,000.
Sec. 315. Subdivision (3) of subsection (d) of section 2 of public act 23-
205 is amended to read as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
(3) Upgrades and modernization of the Capital Area System,
including, but not limited to, planning, engineering and feasibility
studies to support system decarbonization, including thermal energy
network implementation and geothermal resource exploration, not
exceeding $19,000,000;
Sec. 316. Subsection (j) of section 2 of public act 23-205 is amended to
read as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
(j) For the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner: For design,
alteration, renovation, additions and construction of facilities for the
Office of the Chief Medical Examiner, including land acquisition, not
exceeding [$28,000,000] $62,600,000.
Sec. 317. Subdivision (1) of subsection (n) of section 2 of public act 23-
205 is repealed. (Effective July 1, 2026)
Public Act No. 26-68 484 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 318. Subdivision (5) of subsection (c) of section 13 of public act
23-205 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective July 1, 2026):
(5) Grants-in-aid to provide [matching] a portion of the funds
necessary for municipalities, local and regional boards of education and
school bus operators to [submit federal grant applications in order to]
maximize federal, state or other sources of funding or financing for the
purchase or lease of zero-emission school buses and electric vehicle
charging or fueling infrastructure, not exceeding $10,000,000;
Sec. 319. Subdivision (2) of subsection (e) of section 13 of public act
23-205 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective July 1, 2026):
(2) Grants-in-aid to local and regional boards of education and
municipalities for the purchase, installation and maintenance of water
bottle filling stations and automated external defibrillators at schools
designated to receive services pursuant to Title I of the Federal
Elementary and Secondary Education Act and at buildings owned or
leased by a municipality, not exceeding $3,500,000.
Sec. 320. Section 20 of public act 23-205, as amended by section 46 of
public act 24-151, is amended to read as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
The State Bond Commission shall have power, in accordance with the
provisions of this section and sections 21 to 26, inclusive, of public act
23-205, from time to time to authorize the issuance of bonds of the state
in one or more series and in principal amounts in the aggregate not
exceeding [$514,345,000] $484,345,000.
Sec. 321. Subdivision (1) of subsection (k) of section 21 of public act
23-205 is repealed. (Effective July 1, 2026)
Sec. 322. Subdivision (5) of subsection (b) of section 32 of public act
Public Act No. 26-68 485 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
23-205 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective July 1, 2026):
(5) Grants-in-aid to provide [matching] a portion of the funds
necessary for municipalities, local and regional boards of education and
school bus operators to [submit federal grant applications in order to]
maximize federal, state or other sources of funding for the purchase or
lease of zero-emission school buses and electric vehicle charging or
fueling infrastructure, not exceeding $10,000,000;
Sec. 323. Subsections (a) and (b) of section 92 of public act 23-205, as
amended by section 106 of public act 25-174, are amended to read as
follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) For the purposes described in subsection (b) of this section, the
State Bond Commission shall have the power from time to time to
authorize the issuance of bonds of the state in one or more series and in
principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate [ninety] one hundred
fifteen million dollars.
(b) The proceeds of the sale of said bonds, to the extent of the amount
stated in subsection (a) of this section, shall be used by the Connecticut
Municipal Redevelopment Authority for the purpose of capitalization.
Sec. 324. Subsection (b) of section 99 of public act 23-205 is amended
to read as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
(b) The proceeds of the sale of such bonds, to the extent of the amount
stated in subsection (a) of this section, shall be used by the [Connecticut
Higher Education Supplemental Loan Authority] Office of Higher
Education for the purpose of a [nursing student loan subsidy]
Department of Correction nurse and social worker student loan
reimbursement program.
Sec. 325. Section 1 of public act 25-174 is amended to read as follows
Public Act No. 26-68 486 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(Effective July 1, 2026):
The State Bond Commission shall have power, in accordance with the
provisions of this section and sections 2 to 7, inclusive, of [this act] public
act 25-174, from time to time to authorize the issuance of bonds of the
state in one or more series and in principal amounts in the aggregate,
not exceeding [$787,405,019] $906,405,019.
Sec. 326. Subdivision (3) of subsection (n) of section 2 of public act 25-
174 is amended to read as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
(3) For the design and construction of a new Windham Technical
High School, not exceeding [$113,705,019] $263,705,019.
Sec. 327. Subsection (o) of section 2 of public act 25-174 is repealed.
(Effective July 1, 2026)
Sec. 328. Subdivision (2) of subsection (t) of section 2 of public act 25-
174 is repealed. (Effective July 1, 2026)
Sec. 329. Subdivision (8) of subsection (b) of section 13 of public act
25-174 is amended to read as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
(8) Grants-in-aid to municipalities [for renovations and expansion of,
and equipment for, solid waste facilities] to support solid waste
reduction strategies, not exceeding $15,000,000.
Sec. 330. Section 20 of public act 25-174 is amended to read as follows
(Effective July 1, 2026):
The State Bond Commission shall have power, in accordance with the
provisions of this section and sections 21 to 26, inclusive, of [this act]
public act 25-174, from time to time to authorize the issuance of bonds
of the state in one or more series and in principal amounts in the
aggregate, not exceeding [$552,500,000] $546,500,000.
Public Act No. 26-68 487 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 331. Subdivision (2) of subsection (c) of section 21 of public act
25-174 is amended to read as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
(2) For the purchase of equipment, minor improvements and other
associated costs for a new data center, not exceeding [$16,000,000]
$48,000,000;
Sec. 332. Subsection (i) of section 21 of public act 25-174 is amended
to read as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
(i) For the Department of Developmental Services: Fire, safety and
environmental improvements to regional facilities and intermediate
care facilities for client and staff needs, including improvements in
compliance with current codes, site improvements, handicapped access
improvements, utilities, repair or replacement of roofs, air conditioning
and other interior and exterior building renovations and additions at all
state-owned facilities, not exceeding [$7,000,000] $12,000,000.
Sec. 333. Subsection (l) of section 21 of public act 25-174 is repealed.
(Effective July 1, 2026)
Sec. 334. Section 45 of public act 25-174 is amended to read as follows
(Effective July 1, 2026):
The State Bond Commission shall have power, in accordance with the
provisions of this section and sections 46 to 50, inclusive, of [this act]
public act 25-174, from time to time to authorize the issuance of special
tax obligation bonds of the state in one or more series and in principal
amounts in the aggregate, not exceeding [$1,580,954,214] $1,589,954,214.
Sec. 335. Subsection (c) of section 46 of public act 25-174 is amended
to read as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
(c) For the Bureau of Administration: Department facilities, not
exceeding [$127,060,000] $136,060,000.
Public Act No. 26-68 488 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 336. Section 55 of public act 25-174 is amended to read as follows
(Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) For the purposes described in subsection (b) of this section, the
State Bond Commission shall have the power from time to time to
authorize the issuance of bonds of the state in one or more series and in
principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate three hundred million
dollars, provided one hundred [fifty] fifty-two million dollars of said
authorization shall be effective July 1, 2026.
(b) The proceeds of the sale of said bonds, to the extent of the amount
stated in subsection (a) of this section, shall be used by the Office of
Policy and Management for grants-in-aid to municipalities for the
purposes set forth in subsection (a) of section 13a-175a of the general
statutes, as amended by [this act] public act 25-174, for the fiscal years
ending June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027. Such grant payments shall be
made annually as follows:
Municipalities FY 2026 FY 2027
Andover 2,620 2,620
Ansonia 85,419 85,419
Ashford 3,582 3,582
Avon 261,442 261,442
Barkhamsted 41,462 41,462
Beacon Falls 43,809 43,809
Berlin 1,593,642 1,593,642
Bethany 67,229 67,229
Bethel 282,660 282,660
Bethlehem 7,945 7,945
Bloomfield 3,201,687 3,201,687
Bolton 24,859 24,859
Bozrah 138,521 138,521
Branford 374,850 374,850
Bridgeport 13,531,564 13,531,564
Bridgewater 587 587
Bristol 4,856,624 4,856,624
Public Act No. 26-68 489 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Brookfield 118,281 118,281
Brooklyn 10,379 10,379
Burlington 15,300 15,300
Canaan 20,712 20,712
Canterbury 2,022 2,022
Canton 7,994 7,994
Chaplin 601 601
Cheshire 736,700 736,700
Chester 89,264 89,264
Clinton 191,674 191,674
Colchester 39,009 39,009
Colebrook 550 550
Columbia 26,763 26,763
Cornwall - -
Coventry 10,533 10,533
Cromwell 31,099 31,099
Danbury 15,027,544 15,027,544
Darien - -
Deep River 104,136 104,136
Derby 14,728 14,728
Durham 153,897 153,897
East Granby 1,096,577 1,096,577
East Haddam 1,696 1,696
East Hampton 18,943 18,943
East Hartford 8,052,926 8,052,926
East Haven 43,500 43,500
East Lyme 22,442 22,442
East Windsor 295,024 295,024
Eastford 54,564 54,564
Easton 2,660 2,660
Ellington 223,527 223,527
Enfield 256,875 256,875
Essex 74,547 74,547
Fairfield 96,747 96,747
Farmington 545,804 545,804
Franklin 23,080 23,080
Glastonbury 240,799 240,799
Goshen 2,648 2,648
Granby 35,332 35,332
Public Act No. 26-68 490 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Greenwich 89,022 89,022
Griswold 31,895 31,895
Groton (Town of) 2,362,532 2,362,532
Guilford 64,848 64,848
Haddam 3,554 3,554
Hamden 286,689 286,689
Hampton - -
Hartford 9,419,161 9,419,161
Hartland 955 955
Harwinton 21,506 21,506
Hebron 2,216 2,216
Kent - -
Killingly 1,228,578 1,228,578
Killingworth 5,148 5,148
Lebanon 30,427 30,427
Ledyard 421,085 421,085
Lisbon 3,683 3,683
Litchfield 3,432 3,432
Lyme - -
Madison 6,795 6,795
Manchester 2,981,068 2,981,068
Mansfield 6,841 6,841
Marlborough 7,313 7,313
Meriden 1,663,015 1,663,015
Middlebury 84,264 84,264
Middlefield 248,652 248,652
Middletown 3,966,295 3,966,295
Milford 2,257,853 2,257,853
Monroe 179,106 179,106
Montville 528,644 528,644
Morris 3,528 3,528
Naugatuck 341,656 341,656
New Britain 2,864,920 2,864,920
New Canaan 200 200
New Fairfield 1,149 1,149
New Hartford 139,174 139,174
New Haven 10,214,643 [10,214,643]
12,214,643
New London 2,033,169 2,033,169
Public Act No. 26-68 491 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
New Milford 1,298,881 1,298,881
Newington 1,785,740 1,785,740
Newtown 235,371 235,371
Norfolk 7,207 7,207
North Branford 301,074 301,074
North Canaan 359,719 359,719
North Haven 2,249,113 2,249,113
North Stonington - -
Norwalk 10,402,915 10,402,915
Norwich 187,132 187,132
Old Lyme 1,888 1,888
Old Saybrook 46,717 46,717
Orange 104,962 104,962
Oxford 84,313 84,313
Plainfield 144,803 144,803
Plainville 541,936 541,936
Plymouth 152,434 152,434
Pomfret 27,820 27,820
Portland 90,840 90,840
Preston - -
Prospect 70,942 70,942
Putnam 171,800 171,800
Redding 1,329 1,329
Ridgefield 561,986 561,986
Rocky Hill 221,199 221,199
Roxbury 602 602
Salem 4,699 4,699
Salisbury 83 83
Scotland 7,681 7,681
Seymour 281,186 281,186
Sharon - -
Shelton 584,121 584,121
Sherman - -
Simsbury 77,648 77,648
Somers 82,324 82,324
South Windsor 2,187,387 2,187,387
Southbury 20,981 20,981
Southington 1,427,348 1,427,348
Sprague 386,528 386,528
Public Act No. 26-68 492 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Stafford 437,917 437,917
Stamford 1,154,179 1,154,179
Sterling 24,398 24,398
Stonington 100,332 100,332
Stratford 5,784,708 5,784,708
Suffield 180,663 180,663
Thomaston 395,346 395,346
Thompson 76,733 76,733
Tolland 85,064 85,064
Torrington 605,345 605,345
Trumbull 189,309 189,309
Union - -
Vernon 151,598 151,598
Voluntown 2,002 2,002
Wallingford 3,481,872 3,481,872
Warren 288 288
Washington 158 158
Waterbury 9,935,497 9,935,497
Waterford 34,255 34,255
Watertown 642,281 642,281
West Hartford 805,784 805,784
West Haven 147,516 147,516
Westbrook 267,405 267,405
Weston 453 453
Westport - -
Wethersfield 21,785 21,785
Willington 20,018 20,018
Wilton 842,618 842,618
Winchester 306,204 306,204
Windham 454,575 454,575
Windsor 2,075,052 2,075,052
Windsor Locks 2,784,595 2,784,595
Wolcott 234,916 234,916
Woodbridge 29,920 29,920
Woodbury 56,908 56,908
Woodstock 68,767 68,767
Jewett City (Bor.) 4,195 4,195
Barkhamsted FD 2,500 2,500
Berlin - Kensington FD 11,389 11,389
Public Act No. 26-68 493 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Berlin - Worthington FD 941 941
Bloomfield Center FD 4,173 4,173
Bloomfield Blue Hills FD 103,086 103,086
Cromwell FD 1,832 1,832
Enfield FD 1 14,636 14,636
Enfield Thompsonville FD 2 3,160 3,160
Enfield Hazardville Fire #3 1,373 1,373
Enfield N Thompsonville FD 4 69 69
Enfield Shaker Pines FD 5 6,403 6,403
Groton City 164,635 164,635
Groton Sewer 1,688 1,688
Groton Old Mystic FD 5 1,695 1,695
Groton Poq. Bridge FD 22,300 22,300
Killingly Attawaugan FD 1,836 1,836
Killingly Dayville FD 42,086 42,086
Killingly Dyer Manor 1,428 1,428
E. Killingly FD 95 95
So. Killingly FD 189 189
Killingly Williamsville FD 6,710 6,710
Middletown South FD 207,080 207,080
Middletown Westfield FD 10,801 10,801
Middletown City Fire 33,838 33,838
New Htfd. Village FD #1 7,259 7,259
New Htfd South End FD 10 10
Plainfield Central Village FD 1,466 1,466
Plainfield - Moosup FD 2,174 2,174
Plainfield Plainfield FD 1,959 1,959
Plainfield Wauregan FD 5,136 5,136
Pomfret FD 1,032 1,032
Putnam: E. Putnam FD 10,109 10,109
Simsbury FD 2,638 2,638
Stafford Springs Service Dist. 15,246 15,246
Sterling FD 1,293 1,293
Stonington Mystic FD 600 600
Stonington Old Mystic FD 2,519 2,519
Stonington Pawcatuck FD 5,500 5,500
Stonington Quiambaug FD 72 72
Stonington Wequetequock FD 73 73
Trumbull Center 555 555
Public Act No. 26-68 494 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Trumbull Long Hill FD 1,105 1,105
Trumbull Nichols FD 3,435 3,435
W. Haven: West Shore FD 34,708 34,708
W. Haven: Allingtown FD 21,515 21,515
West Haven First Ctr FD 1 4,736 4,736
Windsor Wilson FD 214 214
Windsor FD 14 14
Windham First 8,929 8,929
Total 150,000,000 [150,000,000]
152,000,000
(c) All provisions of section 3-20 of the general statutes, or the exercise
of any right or power granted thereby, that are not inconsistent with the
provisions of this section are hereby adopted and shall apply to all
bonds authorized by the State Bond Commission pursuant to this
section, and temporary notes in anticipation of the money to be derived
from the sale of any such bonds so authorized may be issued in
accordance with said section 3-20 and from time to time renewed. Such
bonds shall mature at such time or times not exceeding twenty years
from their respective dates as may be provided in or pursuant to the
resolution or resolutions of the State Bond Commission authorizing
such bonds. None of said bonds shall be authorized except upon a
finding by the State Bond Commission that there has been filed with it
a request for such authorization which is signed by or on behalf of the
Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management and states such terms
and conditions as said commission, in its discretion, may require. Said
bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be general obligations of the
state and the full faith and credit of the state of Connecticut are pledged
for the payment of the principal of and interest on said bonds as the
same become due, and accordingly and as part of the contract of the
state with the holders of said bonds, appropriation of all amounts
necessary for punctual payment of such principal and interest is hereby
made, and the State Treasurer shall pay such principal and interest as
the same become due.
Public Act No. 26-68 495 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 337. Section 132 of public act 25-174 is amended to read as follows
(Effective July 1, 2026):
Not later than October 1, [2025] 2026, and [quarterly] semiannually
thereafter until the completion of the construction of the facilities for the
Office of the Chief Medical Examiner, the Department of Administrative
Services shall submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing committees of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to finance,
revenue and bonding and government administration and elections,
concerning the status of the design, alteration, renovation and
construction of such facilities.
Sec. 338. Section 134 of public act 25-174 is amended to read as follows
(Effective July 1, 2026):
Not later than October 1, [2025] 2026, and [quarterly] semiannually
thereafter, the chancellor of the Connecticut State Colleges and
Universities, in consultation with the Commissioner of Early
Childhood, shall submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to finance,
revenue and bonding, describing the coordination of efforts between the
Connecticut State Colleges and Universities and the Office of Early
Childhood to construct, improve or equip child care centers on or near
college and university campuses in the state.
Sec. 339. Section 135 of public act 25-174 is amended to read as follows
(Effective July 1, 2026):
On or before January 1, 2027, and biennially thereafter, the Technical
Education and Career System shall develop a five-year capital plan for
such system and submit such plan, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing [committee]
Public Act No. 26-68 496 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to education and finance, revenue and bonding.
Sec. 340. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Authority loans" has the same meaning as provided in section
10a-223 of the general statutes; and
(2) "Eligible graduate program" means an advanced academic or
professional degree program that is (A) pursued after earning a
bachelor's degree, and (B) determined by the Connecticut Higher
Education Supplemental Loan Authority to be an eligible program in
accordance with subsection (c) of this section.
(b) The Connecticut Higher Education Supplemental Loan Authority
shall establish, subject to available funding pursuant to subsection (d)
of this section, a Supplemental Graduate Loan Program for the purpose
of providing authority loans to students who are enrolled in eligible
graduate programs and who meet the eligibility criteria as established
by the authority.
(c) The Connecticut Higher Education Supplemental Loan Authority
shall determine eligible graduate programs and establish the eligibility
criteria and administrative guidelines for the Supplemental Graduate
Loan Program in accordance with the authority's written procedures
adopted pursuant to subdivision (6) of subsection (f) of section 10a-224
of the general statutes.
(d) The Connecticut Higher Education Supplemental Loan Authority
shall maintain a separate, nonlapsing account to hold funds for the
Supplemental Graduate Student Loan Program. The account shall
contain any moneys required by law to be deposited in the account,
including, but not limited to, any state appropriation or proceeds from
the sale of state bonds issued for the purpose of the program. Moneys
in the account shall be used (1) for the purpose of the program and for
Public Act No. 26-68 497 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
reasonable and necessary expenses for the administration of the
program, and (2) for the issuance of authority loans to students enrolled
in eligible graduate programs.
Sec. 341. (Effective from passage) (a) For the purposes described in
subsection (b) of this section, the State Bond Commission shall have the
power from time to time to authorize the issuance of bonds of the state
in one or more series and in principal amounts not exceeding in the
aggregate thirty million dollars.
(b) The proceeds of the sale of such bonds, to the extent of the amount
stated in subsection (a) of this section, shall be used by the Connecticut
Higher Education Supplemental Loan Authority for the purpose of the
Supplemental Graduate Student Loan Program established pursuant to
section 340 of this act.
(c) All provisions of section 3-20 of the general statutes, or the exercise
of any right or power granted thereby, that are not inconsistent with the
provisions of this section are hereby adopted and shall apply to all
bonds authorized by the State Bond Commission pursuant to this
section. Temporary notes in anticipation of the money to be derived
from the sale of any such bonds so authorized may be issued in
accordance with section 3-20 of the general statutes and from time to
time renewed. Such bonds shall mature at such time or times not
exceeding twenty years from their respective dates as may be provided
in or pursuant to the resolution or resolutions of the State Bond
Commission authorizing such bonds. None of such bonds shall be
authorized except upon a finding by the State Bond Commission that
there has been filed with it a request for such authorization that is signed
by or on behalf of the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management
and states such terms and conditions as said commission, in its
discretion, may require. Such bonds issued pursuant to this section shall
be general obligations of the state and the full faith and credit of the state
of Connecticut are pledged for the payment of the principal of and
Public Act No. 26-68 498 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
interest on such bonds as the same become due, and accordingly and as
part of the contract of the state with the holders of such bonds,
appropriation of all amounts necessary for punctual payment of such
principal and interest is hereby made, and the State Treasurer shall pay
such principal and interest as the same become due.
Sec. 342. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) The Department of Economic
and Community Development shall administer a program to provide
grants to municipalities and nonprofit providers of human or social
services for capital expenditure projects to place or maintain war or
veterans' memorials or monuments. The department shall develop
eligibility criteria to be used in selecting among applicants for such
grants, develop application forms and deadlines and post in a
conspicuous location on the department's Internet web site a description
of the grant program that includes, but is not limited to, such criteria,
forms and deadlines.
Sec. 343. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) For the purposes of this
section:
(1) "Eligible homeowner" means a person who (A) owns and occupies
a residential property in the state as such individual's primary
residence, (B) is sixty years of age or older or a person with a disability,
and (C) has a household income at or below sixty per cent of the median
household income for the area in which such individual resides, as
determined by the Commissioner of Aging and Disability Services; and
(2) "Accessibility modification" means physical alteration made to
residential property to improve usability, safety and independence for
a person who is elderly or a person with a disability.
(b) The Department of Aging and Disability Services, in consultation
with the Department of Housing, shall establish an aging-in-place
program to provide grants-in-aid to an eligible homeowner for the
Public Act No. 26-68 499 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
purpose of making accessibility modifications that enable such
homeowner to remain in such homeowner's primary residence. Any
grant awarded under this section shall not exceed ten thousand dollars
per eligible homeowner. The Department of Aging and Disability
Services shall establish (1) the application form and process for such
program, and (2) the criteria for accessibility modifications and for
awarding grants.
(c) The Department of Aging and Disability Services may adopt
regulations, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54 of the
general statutes, to administer the program established pursuant to this
section.
Sec. 344. Section 10a-232 of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective from passage):
(a) Revenue bonds or notes issued under the provisions of this
chapter shall not be deemed to constitute a debt or liability of the state
or of any political subdivision thereof or a pledge of the full faith and
credit of the state or of any such political subdivision, but shall be
payable solely from the revenues and funds herein provided therefor.
All such revenue bonds or notes shall contain on the face thereof a
statement to the effect that: (1) The state of Connecticut shall not be
obligated to pay the same or the interest thereon and (2) the authority
shall not be obligated to pay the same or the interest thereon except from
revenues of the education loan program or programs or the portion
thereof for which they are issued, and that neither the full faith and
credit nor the taxing power of the state of Connecticut or of any political
subdivision thereof is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the
interest on such bonds or notes.
(b) Notwithstanding the foregoing, (1) the constituent units of the
state system of higher education may participate in one or more
Public Act No. 26-68 500 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
education loan programs with the authority and may incur
indebtedness pursuant to authority loans, and (2) the authority may
create and establish one or more reserve funds to be known as special
capital reserve funds and may fund such special capital reserve funds
with (A) any moneys appropriated and made available by the state for
the purposes of such funds, (B) any proceeds of the sale of notes or
bonds, to the extent provided in the resolution of the authority
authorizing the issuance thereof, (C) any other moneys that may be
made available to the authority for the purpose of such funds from any
other source or sources, and (D) any surety policy or other similar
instrument valued at par and payable or available to be drawn upon on
or before any date by which debt service on the bonds secured thereby
is required to be paid and issued by a financial institution that, at the
time of issuance of such surety policy or similar instrument, is rated
"AA" or better by any nationally recognized statistical rating
organization and approved by the State Treasurer. The assets held in or
credited to any special capital reserve fund established under this
section, except as hereinafter provided, shall be used solely for the
payment of the principal of notes and bonds of the authority secured by
such capital reserve fund as the same become due, the purchase of such
notes and bonds of the authority, the payment of interest on such notes
and bonds of the authority or the payment of any redemption premium
required to be paid when such bonds are redeemed prior to maturity or
released by the authority; provided, the authority shall have power to
require that moneys in any such fund shall not be withdrawn therefrom
at any time in such amount as would reduce the amount of such funds
to less than the maximum amount of principal and interest becoming
due by reason of maturity or a required sinking fund installment in any
succeeding calendar year on the bonds of the authority then outstanding
and secured by such special capital reserve fund, or such lesser amount
specified by the authority in its resolution authorizing the issuance of
any such bonds, such amount being herein referred to as the "required
minimum capital reserve", except for the purpose of paying such
Public Act No. 26-68 501 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
principal of, redemption premium and interest on such bonds of the
authority secured by such special capital reserve becoming due and for
the payment of which other moneys of the authority are not available.
The authority may provide that it shall not issue bonds at any time if the
required minimum capital reserve on outstanding bonds secured by a
special capital reserve fund and the bonds then to be issued and secured
by a special capital reserve fund will exceed the amount of such special
capital reserve fund at the time of issuance, unless the authority, at the
time of the issuance of such bonds, shall deposit in such special capital
reserve fund from the proceeds of the bonds so to be issued, or
otherwise, an amount which, together with the amount then in such
special capital reserve fund, will be not less than the required minimum
capital reserve. The authority may, as part of the contract of the
authority with the owners of such bonds, provide that on or before
December first, annually, there is deemed to be appropriated from the
state General Fund such sums, if any, as shall be certified by the
chairman of the authority to the Secretary of the Office of Policy and
Management and the Treasurer of the state, as necessary to restore each
such special capital reserve fund to the amount equal to the required
minimum capital reserve of such fund, and such amounts shall be
allotted and paid to the authority. For the purpose of evaluation of any
such special capital reserve fund, obligations acquired as an investment
for any such fund shall be valued at amortized cost. Nothing contained
in this section shall preclude the authority from establishing and
creating other debt service reserve funds in connection with the issuance
of bonds or notes of the authority. Subject to any agreement or
agreements with owners of outstanding notes and bonds of the
authority, any amount or amounts allotted and paid to the authority
pursuant to this section shall be repaid to the state from moneys of the
authority at such time as such moneys are not required for any other of
its corporate purposes and in any event shall be repaid to the state on
the date one year after all bonds and notes of the authority theretofore
issued on the date or dates such amount or amounts are allotted and
Public Act No. 26-68 502 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
paid to the authority or thereafter issued, together with interest on such
bonds and notes, with interest on any unpaid installments of interest
and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceeding
by or on behalf of the owners thereof, are fully met and discharged.
Notwithstanding any other provisions contained in this chapter, the
aggregate amount of bonds outstanding at any time secured by such
special capital reserve funds authorized to be created and established by
this section shall not exceed [three] seven hundred fifty million dollars
and no such bonds shall be issued to pay program costs unless the
authority is of the opinion and determines that the revenues to be
derived from the program shall be sufficient (i) to pay the principal of
and interest on the bonds issued to finance the program, (ii) to establish,
increase and maintain any reserves deemed by the authority to be
advisable to secure the payment of the principal of and interest on such
bonds, (iii) to pay the cost of maintaining and servicing the program and
keeping it properly insured, and (iv) to pay such other costs of the
program as may be required.
Sec. 345. Subdivision (2) of section 8-265ccc of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(2) The loan shall (A) be secured by a mortgage deed on the eligible
borrower's residential buildings and all related improvements under
development by the eligible borrower, (B) be made in accordance with
the eligible financial institution's underwriting policy and standards,
except that the loan may have a loan-to-value ratio in excess of typical
underwriting standards, and (C) bear interest at a rate that does not
exceed the [applicable] prime rate [of the Federal Home Loan Bank of
Boston for short-term or long-term advances through the New England
Fund program. For the purposes of this subdivision, "applicable rate"
means the New England Fund rate that (i) is] published [on the Internet
web site of the Federal Home Loan Bank of Boston] by The Wall Street
Public Act No. 26-68 503 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Journal as of the date the interest rate is locked in by the eligible
borrower and eligible financial institution. [, and (ii) has an advance
term that most closely corresponds to the term of the loan being made
by the participating eligible financial institution.]
Sec. 346. Section 8-265eee of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective July 1, 2026):
Under the program administered by the authority pursuant to
subsection (a) of section 8-265bbb, the authority may, within available
resources allocated by the State Bond Commission, make loans or issue
grants-in-aid to eligible borrowers that are in addition to the loans made
to such eligible borrowers by eligible financial institutions pursuant to
section 8-265ccc. The loans made by the authority (1) may be (A)
amortizing, (B) deferred, or (C) forgivable as to principal and interest,
and (2) shall be [(1)] (A) subordinate to the loans made by eligible
financial institutions, and [(2)] (B) subject to such terms as the authority
may establish, including, but not limited to, loan amounts, interest rates
and terms to maturity. The grants-in-aid issued by the authority shall be
subject to such terms as the authority may establish.
Sec. 347. Section 13a-175a of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) For each fiscal year there shall be allocated twelve million five
hundred thousand dollars out of the funds appropriated to the
Department of Transportation, or from any other source, not otherwise
prohibited by law, to be used by the towns for (1) [for] the construction,
reconstruction, improvement and maintenance of highways, sections of
highways, bridges and structures incidental to highways and bridges,
including (A) construction, reconstruction, improvements and
maintenance intended to increase resiliency against increased
Public Act No. 26-68 504 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
precipitation, flooding, sea level rise and extreme heat, and (B) the
plowing of snow, the sanding of icy pavements, the trimming and
removal of trees, the installation, replacement and maintenance of traffic
signs, signals and markings, (2) [for] the purchase and maintenance of
equipment used for the purposes described in subdivision (1) of this
subsection, including, but not limited to, street sweepers, roadside
mowing and vegetation management equipment, snow removal and
de-icing equipment and equipment to clean catch basins, (3) traffic
control and vehicular safety programs, traffic and parking planning and
administration, and other purposes and programs related to highways,
traffic and parking, and [(3) for] (4) the purposes of providing and
operating essential public transportation services and related facilities.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section,
the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, in the secretary's
discretion, may approve the use of funds by a town for purposes other
than those enumerated in said subsection.
(c) Not later than September 1, 2022, and annually thereafter, each
town or district that received funds pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section in the preceding fiscal year shall submit a report to the
Commissioner of Transportation, in the form and manner prescribed by
the commissioner, detailing the amount of such funds expended in such
fiscal year for each of the usages enumerated in said subsection or
approved pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
(d) The Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management shall reduce
the grant payable to a town or district in accordance with subsection (a)
of this section by ten per cent in any fiscal year that the town or district
fails to timely submit the report required by subsection (c) of this
section. The secretary shall waive such reduction if the town or district
submits such report after the due date and provides proof of such
submission to the secretary.
Public Act No. 26-68 505 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 348. Section 13b-78 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section, unless the context clearly indicates a
different meaning or intent:
(1) "Debt service requirements" has the same meaning as provided in
section 13b-75;
(2) "Federal program" means any program of financial assistance
made by the United States Department of Transportation to the state,
including, but not limited to, RRIF, TIFIA or programs established
under RRIF or TIFIA;
[(2)] (3) "Federal transportation bonds" means one or more special tax
obligation bonds authorized to be issued pursuant to subsection (c) of
this section;
[(3)] (4) "Pledged revenues" has the same meaning as provided in
section 13b-75;
[(4)] (5) "RRIF" means the Railroad Rehabilitation and Improvement
Financing program established by the Transportation Equity Act for the
21st Century, P.L. 105-178, as amended from time to time;
[(5)] (6) "RRIF loan agreement" means a loan agreement or other
credit agreement by and between the state as the borrower and the
United States Department of Transportation as the lender, pursuant to
which a loan or other form of financial assistance is made by said
department to the state in accordance with RRIF;
[(6)] (7) "Special Transportation Fund" means the Special
Transportation Fund established pursuant to section 13b-68;
[(7)] (8) "State officials" means the Treasurer, the Commissioner of
Transportation and the Secretary of the Office of Policy and
Public Act No. 26-68 506 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Management;
[(8)] (9) "TIFIA" means the Transportation Infrastructure Finance and
Innovation Act, P.L. 105-178, as amended from time to time; and
[(9)] (10) "TIFIA loan agreement" means a loan agreement or other
credit agreement by and between the state as the borrower and the
United States Department of Transportation as the lender, pursuant to
which a loan or other form of financial assistance is made by said
department to the state in accordance with TIFIA.
(b) The state, acting through the state officials, may enter into loan
agreements or other credit agreements, including, but not limited to,
RRIF loan agreements and TIFIA loan agreements, with the United
States Department of Transportation. The state officials (1) may execute
and deliver any documents, certificates and instruments related to such
agreements and the obligations issued thereunder, (2) shall determine
the terms, conditions, covenants and other provisions of such
agreements in the best interest of the state, and (3) may take all other
actions, including, but not limited to, the preparation, execution and
submission of loan applications, necessary to enter into such agreements
or receive loans or other financial assistance from said department
under any federal program.
(c) Special tax obligation bonds may be issued pursuant to sections
13b-74 to 13b-77, inclusive, to evidence and secure loans or other forms
of financial assistance made [by the United States Department of
Transportation] to the state under [one or more] any federal program.
[programs, including, but not limited to, RRIF or programs established
under TIFIA.] Such bonds may be secured by a trust indenture by and
between the state and a corporate trustee in accordance with the
provisions of subsection (g) of section 13b-76.
(d) The debt service requirements and any other obligations with
Public Act No. 26-68 507 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
respect to any federal transportation bonds shall be secured by a lien on
the pledged revenues as they are received by the state and credited to
the Special Transportation Fund. Such lien shall be subordinate and
junior in all respects to every lien on pledged revenues securing any
special tax obligation bonds issued pursuant to sections 13b-74 to 13b-
77, inclusive, that are not federal transportation bonds.
(e) Whenever the General Assembly authorizes special tax obligation
bonds pursuant to any bond act taking effect before, on or after the
effective date of this section, such authorization shall be deemed to
authorize the issuance of federal transportation bonds. Such federal
transportation bonds shall be subject to the requirements, covenants and
conditions applicable to special tax obligation bonds as set forth in
sections 13b-74 to 13b-77, inclusive, except as otherwise provided in this
section.
(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (o) of section 13b-
76, federal transportation bonds may be issued as taxable bonds,
whereby the interest on such bonds may be includable in the gross
income of the holders or owners of such bonds under the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, or any subsequent corresponding internal
revenue code of the United States, as amended from time to time.
(g) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of section 13b-
76, federal transportation bonds issued under any federal program may
mature at such time or times as allowable under such federal program
but not longer than the useful life of the projects being financed.
Sec. 349. Subsections (b) and (c) of section 32-285a of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(b) (1) There is established a Community Investment Fund 2030
Board, which shall be within the Department of Economic and
Public Act No. 26-68 508 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Community Development. The board shall consist of the following
members:
(A) The speaker of the House of Representatives and the president
pro tempore of the Senate;
(B) The majority leader of the House of Representatives, the majority
leader of the Senate, the minority leader of the House of Representatives
and the minority leader of the Senate;
(C) One appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives
and one appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate, each of
whom shall be a member of the Black and Puerto Rican Caucus of the
General Assembly;
(D) The two chairpersons of the general bonding subcommittee of the
joint standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to finance, revenue and bonding;
(E) Two appointed by the Governor; and
(F) The Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, the
Attorney General, the Treasurer, the Comptroller, the Secretary of the
State and the Commissioners of Economic and Community
Development, Administrative Services, Social Services and Housing, or
their designees.
(2) All initial appointments shall be made not later than sixty days
after June 30, 2021. The terms of the members appointed by the
Governor shall be coterminous with the term of the Governor or until
their successors are appointed, whichever is later. Any vacancy in
appointments shall be filled by the appointing authority. Any vacancy
occurring other than by expiration of term shall be filled for the balance
of the unexpired term.
Public Act No. 26-68 509 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, it shall not
constitute a conflict of interest for a trustee, director, partner, officer,
stockholder, proprietor, counsel or employee of any person to serve as
a member of the board, provided such trustee, director, partner, officer,
stockholder, proprietor, counsel or employee abstains and absents
himself or herself from any deliberation, action and vote by the board in
specific respect to such person. The members appointed by the
Governor shall be deemed public officials and shall adhere to the code
of ethics for public officials set forth in chapter 10.
(4) The speaker of the House of Representatives and the president pro
tempore of the Senate shall serve as the chairpersons of the board and
shall schedule the first meeting of the board, which shall be held not
later than January 1, 2022. The board shall meet at least quarterly.
(5) Any member of the board serving pursuant to subparagraphs (A)
to (E), inclusive, of subdivision (1) of this subsection who is unable to
attend a meeting may, by notifying the administrator in writing,
designate another person to act as a proxy in such member's absence.
[(5)] (6) Eleven members of the board shall constitute a quorum for
the transaction of any business.
[(6)] (7) The members of the board shall serve without compensation,
but shall, within the limits of available funds, be reimbursed for
expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties.
[(7)] (8) The board shall have the following powers and duties: (A) To
review eligible projects to be recommended to the Governor under
subsection (c) of this section for approval; (B) to establish bylaws to
govern its procedures; (C) to review and provide comments to the
Department of Economic and Community Development on projects
funded through the state's Economic Action Plan as provided under
section 32-4p; and (D) to perform such other acts as may be necessary
Public Act No. 26-68 510 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
and appropriate to carry out its duties described in this section.
[(8)] (9) The administrator shall hire such employee or employees as
may be necessary to assist the board to carry out its duties described in
this section.
(c) (1) The Community Investment Fund 2030 Board shall establish
an application and review process with guidelines and terms for funds
provided from the bond proceeds under subsection (d) of this section
for eligible projects. Such funds shall be used for costs related to an
eligible project recommended by the board and approved by the
Governor pursuant to this subsection but shall not be used to pay or to
reimburse the administrator for administrative costs under this section.
The Department of Economic and Community Development shall pay
for administrative costs within available appropriations.
(2) The chairpersons of the board shall notify the chief elected official
of each municipality when the application and review process has been
established and shall publicize the availability of any funds available
under this section. Each such official or any community development
corporation or nonprofit organization may submit an application to the
board requesting funds for an eligible project. The board shall meet to
consider applications submitted and determine which, if any, the board
will recommend to the Governor for approval.
(3) (A) The board shall give priority to eligible projects (i) that are
proposed by a municipality that (I) has implemented local hiring
preferences pursuant to section 7-112, or (II) has or will leverage
municipal, private, philanthropic or federal funds for such project, (ii)
that have a project labor agreement or employ or will employ ex-
offenders or individuals with physical, intellectual or developmental
disabilities, and (iii) on and after the date the ten-year plan developed
under section 32-7z is submitted to the General Assembly, that are
included in such plan. The board shall give additional priority to an
Public Act No. 26-68 511 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
application submitted by a municipality that includes a letter of support
for the proposed eligible project from a member or members of the
General Assembly in whose district the eligible project is or will be
located.
(B) In evaluating applications for an eligible project described in
subparagraph (A)(ii) of subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of this section,
the board shall (i) consider the impact of the eligible project on job
creation or retention in the municipality, (ii) consider the impact of the
eligible project on blighted properties in the municipality, and (iii)
consider the overall impact of the eligible project on the community.
(4) (A) Whenever the board deems it necessary or desirable, the
chairpersons of the board shall submit to the Governor a list of the
board's recommendations of eligible projects to be funded from bond
proceeds under subsection (d) of this section. The board may
recommend state funding for eligible projects, provided the total cost of
such recommendations shall not exceed [one hundred seventy-five
million dollars] the funds available in any fiscal year. Such list shall
include, at a minimum for each eligible project described in
subparagraph (A) of subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of this section, a
description of such project, the municipality in which such project is
located, the amount of funds sought for such project, any cost estimates
for such project, any schematics or plans for such project, the total
estimated project costs and the applicable fiscal year to which such
disbursement will be attributed.
(B) The Governor shall review the eligible projects on the list and may
recommend changes to any eligible project on the list. The Governor
shall determine the most appropriate method of funding for each
eligible project and shall provide to the members of the board, in
writing, such determination for each eligible project on the list and the
reasons therefor. The board may reconsider at a future meeting any
eligible project for which the Governor recommends a change. Each
Public Act No. 26-68 512 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
eligible project for which the Governor recommends the allocation of
bond funds shall be considered at a State Bond Commission meeting not
later than two months after the date such eligible project was submitted
to the Governor pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this subdivision.
(5) Funds for an eligible project approved under this section may be
administered on behalf of the board by a state agency, as determined by
the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, provided a
memorandum of understanding between the administrator of the
Community Investment Fund 2030 Board and the state, acting by and
through the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, has been
entered into with respect to such funds and project.
(6) Not later than October 15, 2025, the board shall submit a report, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a, to the General
Assembly, the Black and Puerto Rican caucus of the General Assembly,
the Auditors of Public Accounts and the Governor, for the preceding
fiscal year, that includes (A) a list of the eligible projects recommended
by the board and approved by the Governor pursuant to this section, (B)
the total amount of funds provided for such eligible projects, (C) for
each such eligible project, a description of the project and the amounts
and terms of the funds provided, (D) the status of the project and any
balance remaining of the allocated funds, and (E) any other information
the board deems relevant or necessary. The board shall submit such
report annually for each fiscal year in which the funds specified in
subparagraph (A) of subdivision (3) of this subsection are disbursed for
eligible projects.
(7) The Auditors of Public Accounts shall audit, on a biennial basis,
all eligible projects funded under this section and shall report their
findings to the Governor, the Secretary of the Office of Policy and
Management and the General Assembly.
Sec. 350. Section 32-7x of the general statutes is repealed and the
Public Act No. 26-68 513 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section, (1) "concentrated poverty census tract"
means a United States census tract in which thirty per cent or more of
the households within such census tract have incomes below the federal
poverty level, according to the most recent five-year United States
Census Bureau American Community Survey, and (2) "certified
community development corporation" has the same meaning as
provided in section 32-7s.
(b) The Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management shall
compile a list of concentrated poverty census tracts in the state and the
municipalities in which such census tracts are located and shall, not later
than July 31, 2023, submit such list to the General Assembly in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a. The secretary shall post
such list to the Internet web site of the Office of Policy and Management
and shall review and update such list as necessary. Whenever the
secretary updates such list, the secretary shall submit such updated list
to the General Assembly in accordance with the provisions of section
11-4a.
(c) (1) The Commissioner of Economic and Community Development
shall establish a grant program to fund eligible projects within
concentrated poverty census tracts, or undertaken by a certified
community development corporation. An eligible project shall seek to
reduce concentrated poverty within such tracts and the effects of such
poverty, including, but not limited to, the lower lifetime income of
residents within such tracts, the lower lifetime income expectations of
future generations within such tracts, increased crime and risk of
incarceration for residents within such tracts and educational
deficiencies within such tracts. An eligible project includes:
(A) Construction, renovation or rehabilitation of mixed-income rental
housing and owner-occupied housing, in order to retain individuals and
Public Act No. 26-68 514 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
families of different income levels and to increase the percentage of
owner-occupied housing within such census tract or tracts;
(B) The establishment or improvement of workforce development
programs, including, but not limited to, programs that partner with
organizations to identify unemployed or underemployed individuals
and at-risk youth residing in such census tracts, identify workforce
training opportunities and other resources for such individuals and link
such individuals with the appropriate training and resources that will
increase the skills and earning potential of such individuals; and
(C) Construction, renovation or rehabilitation of public
infrastructure, in order to support and improve the private investment
opportunities, quality of life and public safety within such census tract
or tracts.
(2) Beginning on January 1, 2024, and not later than January 1, 2030,
each municipality in which a concentrated poverty census tract is
located may apply to the commissioner, in a form and manner
prescribed by the commissioner, to receive a grant for an eligible project
or any combination of eligible projects. An application may target one
concentrated poverty census tract or more than one such census tract if
such census tracts are geographically contiguous or within reasonable
proximity of each other. An applicant shall not be prohibited from filing
more than one application for different concentrated poverty census
tracts or groups of such census tracts.
(3) Beginning on July 1, 2026, and not later than January 1, 2030, a
certified community development corporation may apply to the
commissioner, in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner,
to receive a grant for an eligible project or any combination of eligible
projects undertaken by such certified community development
corporation.
Public Act No. 26-68 515 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(d) (1) Not later than January 1, 2024, the commissioner shall establish
criteria for the awarding of grants as described in subdivision (2) of this
subsection, requirements for documents and information as described
in subdivision (4) of this subsection and deadlines for submitting
applications and revised and modified applications under subsection (e)
of this section. The commissioner shall post such criteria, requirements
and deadlines on the Internet web site of the Department of Economic
and Community Development, notify each certified community
development corporation and municipality in which a concentrated
poverty census tract is located of such posting and promote the
availability of the grant program established by this section in each such
census tract.
(2) Criteria for the awarding of grants pursuant to this section shall
include, but need not be limited to:
(A) The likelihood that a proposal will reduce adult or child poverty
within a concentrated poverty census tract;
(B) The likelihood that a proposal will reduce the likelihood that
children currently residing within a concentrated poverty census tract
will live in poverty after reaching adulthood;
(C) The likelihood that a proposal will produce persistent and
meaningful improvements in residents' wealth, financial security,
employability or quality of life beyond the duration of the proposal;
(D) The feasibility of the initiatives in a proposal and the
demonstrated or perceived capacity to execute upon the scope of work
in a proposal, including, but not limited to, adequate staffing levels of
entities involved with the proposal; and
(E) The interconnectivity and mutual reinforcement among all
proposed initiatives in the same concentrated poverty census tract area
or areas, such as providing workforce training programs to parents of
Public Act No. 26-68 516 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
children enrolled in a supported early childhood program.
(3) On and after the date the ten-year plan developed under section
32-7z is submitted to the General Assembly, priority shall be given to
projects included in such plan.
(4) Requirements for documents and information to be submitted by
municipalities to evaluate applications shall include, but need not be
limited to:
(A) A description of how the proposal intends to address each type
of eligible project described in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of
subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of this section, and whether there are
existing projects or programs to address such eligible projects;
(B) A description of each initiative within the proposal, which may
include multiple simultaneous initiatives, and how each initiative will
meet one of the criteria established pursuant to subdivision (2) of this
subsection;
(C) A description of sufficient efforts, as determined by the
commissioner, to engage residents of the concentrated poverty census
tract in formulating a proposal;
(D) For an initiative that is an eligible project described in
subparagraph (B) of subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of this section, a
description of the municipality's consultations with the regional
workforce development board that serves the municipality regarding
the development of such project and efforts to coordinate such project
with the board's activities;
(E) A description of each organization that will participate in an
eligible project described in subparagraph (B) of subdivision (1) of
subsection (c) of this section, and information on each organization's
commitment to provide continuous, sustained engagement with
Public Act No. 26-68 517 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
residents of such tract throughout the project;
(F) A description of the entity or organization responsible for
coordinating the implementation of each component of the application
and overseeing the various projects and programs outlined in such
application;
(G) A description of plans for ongoing engagement with residents of
such census tracts and solicitation of feedback on the progress of a
proposal during its implementation; and
(H) A description of plans to provide residents of such census tract
with opportunities to become involved in implementation of a proposal.
(e) (1) The department shall review and evaluate each application
submitted not later than ninety days after the date of submission and
shall work with the applicant municipality or certified community
development corporation to revise the application if the department
believes such revisions will improve or strengthen the application. The
department shall assist an applicant in identifying and applying for
funding under other programs in order to maximize the amount of
funding available for an applicant, including seeking funding under
section 4-66c. For a proposal for an eligible project described in
subparagraph (A) of subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of this section, the
commissioner shall evaluate such project in consultation with the
Commissioner of Housing and the Commissioner of Housing shall
assist the applicant with obtaining funding for such project through
programs operated by the Department of Housing.
(2) The commissioner shall submit to the Governor all applications
that are deemed to satisfy the requirements of subsection (d) of this
section. The Governor shall review such applications and may approve
or disapprove an application or return an application to the
commissioner for modifications. If an application is returned to the
Public Act No. 26-68 518 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
commissioner, the commissioner shall work with the applicant to
modify the application and shall resubmit such application with
modifications to the Governor. If the Governor approves an application,
the Governor shall make a grant award from bond proceeds under
section 32-7y, provided the Governor may use funds from other bond
proceeds authorized for the general purposes described in
subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of subdivision (1) of subsection (c)
of this section for such grants. Grants awarded under this section shall
be for a period of three years, and in an amount sufficient to carry out
the objectives of the application, but not less than five hundred
thousand dollars. Each application that the Governor approves shall be
considered at a State Bond Commission meeting not later than two
months after the date the application was approved by the Governor.
(f) At the conclusion of the initial grant period, the commissioner
shall evaluate the municipality's progress toward reducing the number
of households within the applicable concentrated poverty census tract
who have incomes below the federal poverty level to less than thirty per
cent of the households of such census tract. Such evaluation shall
consider, among other factors, any change in the percentage of
households within such census tract who have incomes below the
federal poverty level, and whether the actions taken pursuant to such
grant during the initial grant period: (1) May reasonably result in a
future reduction in the percentage of households within such census
tract who have incomes below the federal poverty level, (2) have
resulted in a reduction in child poverty within such census tract, (3) may
reasonably result in a future reduction in child poverty within such
census tract, or (4) may reasonably decrease the likelihood that children
who are currently living within such census tract will have incomes
below the federal poverty level after they reach adulthood. Upon a
determination by the commissioner that reasonable progress has been
made, the municipality shall be eligible for subsequent grants under this
section, provided, at the conclusion of each subsequent grant period of
Public Act No. 26-68 519 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
three years, each applicant municipality shall be subject to an evaluation
and determination under this subsection prior to being eligible to apply
for a subsequent grant. An application for a subsequent grant and the
awarding of a subsequent grant shall be in accordance with the
provisions of subsections (c) to (e), inclusive, of this section.
(g) Not later than August 1, 2024, and annually thereafter until and
including August 1, 2029, the commissioner shall submit a report, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a, to the General
Assembly, that includes the municipalities that submitted applications
and that were awarded grants under this section in the prior fiscal year,
a description of each purpose and eligible project a municipality
awarded a grant under this section is seeking to accomplish or
undertaking, a progress report, if applicable, for each such purpose or
eligible project and any other information the commissioner deems
relevant.
Sec. 351. (Effective July 1, 2026) The Commissioner of Housing and the
executive director of the Connecticut Housing Finance Authority shall
seek a partnership with one or more municipalities or hospitals located
in the state to increase workforce housing options. Not later than
January 1, 2028, the commissioner and executive director shall submit,
in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
a report detailing the status of any such partnership and any
recommendations on other methods to increase such housing options to
the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to finance, revenue and bonding.
Sec. 352. (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) For the purposes described in
subsection (b) of this section, the State Bond Commission shall have the
power from time to time to authorize the issuance of bonds of the state
in one or more series and in principal amounts not exceeding in the
aggregate twenty million dollars.
Public Act No. 26-68 520 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(b) The proceeds of the sale of such bonds, to the extent of the amount
stated in subsection (a) of this section, shall be used by the Department
of Economic and Community Development for the purpose of
supporting tuition for medical students at the Frank H. Netter MD
School of Medicine at Quinnipiac University.
(c) All provisions of section 3-20 of the general statutes, or the exercise
of any right or power granted thereby, that are not inconsistent with the
provisions of this section are hereby adopted and shall apply to all
bonds authorized by the State Bond Commission pursuant to this
section. Temporary notes in anticipation of the money to be derived
from the sale of any such bonds so authorized may be issued in
accordance with section 3-20 of the general statutes and from time to
time renewed. Such bonds shall mature at such time or times not
exceeding twenty years from their respective dates as may be provided
in or pursuant to the resolution or resolutions of the State Bond
Commission authorizing such bonds. None of such bonds shall be
authorized except upon a finding by the State Bond Commission that
there has been filed with it a request for such authorization that is signed
by or on behalf of the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management
and states such terms and conditions as said commission, in its
discretion, may require. Such bonds issued pursuant to this section shall
be general obligations of the state and the full faith and credit of the state
of Connecticut are pledged for the payment of the principal of and
interest on such bonds as the same become due, and accordingly and as
part of the contract of the state with the holders of such bonds,
appropriation of all amounts necessary for punctual payment of such
principal and interest is hereby made, and the State Treasurer shall pay
such principal and interest as the same become due.
Sec. 353. (Effective from passage) (a) Not later than September 1, 2026,
and prior to the final selection of a site for the replacement or relocation
of the technical high school serving the Windham, Willimantic and
Public Act No. 26-68 521 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Mansfield region, the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management
shall provide an opportunity for the chief elected official of the town of
Windham, city of Willimantic and town of Mansfield and members of
the General Assembly representing such town and city to submit
written recommendation for alternative sites for consideration. The
secretary shall evaluate any such alternative site located closer to the
existing school than the site previously identified by the Office of Policy
and Management for consideration.
(b) Such evaluation shall (1) be conducted using uniform, objective
criteria applied equally to each proposed site, including the site
identified by the office and any alternative site submitted for
consideration pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section,
and (2) determine whether each site satisfies the minimum educational,
operational and facility requirements for the project, including, but not
limited to:
(A) Sufficient acreage, configuration and developable area to
accommodate instructional space, trade programs, parking, circulation,
outdoor training needs and reasonable future expansion;
(B) Physical site conditions, including wetlands, topography, ledge,
soil conditions, environmental contamination, flood risk, drainage and
other constraints affecting construction or use;
(C) Access, transportation and safety considerations, including
roadway access traffic capacity, bus circulation, pedestrian access,
student transportation, proximity to public transit where available,
sidewalks and any required off-site improvements;
(D) Availability and adequacy of public utilities and infrastructure,
including water, sewer, electric service, stormwater management and
road improvements;
(E) Estimated land acquisition, site preparation, infrastructure,
Public Act No. 26-68 522 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
construction and transportation costs;
(F) The likely effect of each site on the project schedule, permitting
design complexity and risk; and
(G) The impact of each site on current and projected students,
including travel time, transportation burden and access for students
residing in the town of Windham, city of Willimantic or town of
Mansfield.
(c) The Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management shall
prepare a written comparative analysis identifying, for each site: (1)
Whether the site meets the minimum requirements for the project, (2)
any conditions that limit or prevent use of the site, (3) the estimated cost
and schedule impact of addressing such conditions, (4) whether such
conditions are reasonably manageable within the normal course of
project development or would materially impair the project, and (5) the
basis for recommending or rejecting the site. The analysis shall
distinguish between conditions that can be reasonably mitigated and
conditions that render a site impracticable. Not later than November 1,
2026, the secretary shall submit the results of such evaluation and
analysis to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to finance, revenue and bonding.
(d) The Office of Policy and Management shall not proceed with final
site selection for the replacement or relocation of the technical high
school serving the Windham, Willimantic and Mansfield region, unless
the evaluation demonstrates that no alternative site located closer to the
existing school than the site previously identified by the office, is both
feasible and capable of meeting program requirements without causing
an unreasonable delay, cost increase or operational limitation.
Sec. 354. (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) For the purposes described in
subsection (b) of this section, the State Bond Commission shall have the
Public Act No. 26-68 523 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
power from time to time to authorize the issuance of bonds of the state
in one or more series and in principal amounts not exceeding in the
aggregate ten million dollars.
(b) The proceeds of the sale of such bonds, to the extent of the amount
stated in subsection (a) of this section, shall be used by the Office of
Policy and Management for the purpose of providing a grant-in-aid to
the town of Hamden, provided the mayor of the town of Hamden
appears before the Municipal Finance Advisory Commission pursuant
to the provisions of subsection (d) of this section.
(c) All provisions of section 3-20 of the general statutes, or the exercise
of any right or power granted thereby, that are not inconsistent with the
provisions of this section are hereby adopted and shall apply to all
bonds authorized by the State Bond Commission pursuant to this
section. Temporary notes in anticipation of the money to be derived
from the sale of any such bonds so authorized may be issued in
accordance with section 3-20 of the general statutes and from time to
time renewed. Such bonds shall mature at such time or times not
exceeding twenty years from their respective dates as may be provided
in or pursuant to the resolution or resolutions of the State Bond
Commission authorizing such bonds. None of such bonds shall be
authorized except upon a finding by the State Bond Commission that
there has been filed with it a request for such authorization that is signed
by or on behalf of the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management
and states such terms and conditions as said commission, in its
discretion, may require. Such bonds issued pursuant to this section shall
be general obligations of the state and the full faith and credit of the state
of Connecticut are pledged for the payment of the principal of and
interest on such bonds as the same become due, and accordingly and as
part of the contract of the state with the holders of such bonds,
appropriation of all amounts necessary for punctual payment of such
principal and interest is hereby made, and the State Treasurer shall pay
Public Act No. 26-68 524 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
such principal and interest as the same become due.
(d) (1) Notwithstanding section 7-395 of the general statutes, prior to
receiving any grant-in-aid pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the
mayor of the town of Hamden shall submit a report to the Municipal
Finance Advisory Commission established under section 7-394b of the
general statutes and appear before the commission in accordance with
the provisions of this section.
(2) Not later than September 1, 2026, the mayor of the town of
Hamden shall submit to the commission a report, in writing, that
includes a plan for corrective actions to ensure the town will not require
supplemental municipal aid in future fiscal years. Such plan shall
include, but need not be limited to, (A) cost containment that may be
adopted by the town, (B) adjustments to fiscal policies, (C) collaboration
with one or more municipalities to obtain shared services, (D) ways to
maximize federal funding, (E) the identification of possible efficiencies
in the provision of services, and (F) the prioritization of core services
identified by the town.
(3) Not later than December 31, 2026, the mayor of the town of
Hamden shall appear before the commission, at a time and place to be
determined by the commission, to present such report and answer any
questions from the commission.
Sec. 355. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Hospital" has the same meaning as provided in section 19a-490
of the general statutes; and
(2) "Hospital financial assistance" has the same meaning as provided
in section 38a-1053 of the general statutes.
(b) (1) Each hospital shall include, on or with each billing statement,
submitted in paper copy or electronic form to a patient, a clear and
Public Act No. 26-68 525 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
conspicuous notice that:
(A) Hospital financial assistance may be available for eligible
patients; and
(B) Any patient may apply for such assistance without a fee.
(2) Such notice provided pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall be written in plain language in English and Spanish and
made available, upon request, in any language consistent with state and
federal law, and with subsection (d) of this section, and include the
following information:
(A) A telephone number the patient may call for additional
information about the hospital's financial assistance policy and
procedures for such patient to apply for financial assistance;
(B) An Internet web site address where the patient may access
information about the hospital's financial assistance policy and
procedures for applying for financial assistance;
(C) A summary of the hospital's financial assistance policy, or an
Internet web site where the patient may access such summary;
(D) Instructions for requesting a paper copy of the hospital's financial
assistance policy; and
(E) Instructions on where to access an application for financial
assistance and instructions for filing such application.
(3) In addition to the requirements of subdivisions (1) and (2) of this
subsection, each hospital shall post such notice in a prominent location
on such hospital's Internet web site.
(c) Consistent with 26 CFR 1.501(r)–(4), as amended from time to
time, each hospital shall have a written financial assistance policy that
Public Act No. 26-68 526 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
includes:
(1) Eligibility criteria for financial assistance and whether such
financial assistance includes services offered at a discount or free of
charge;
(2) The methodology used to calculate the amounts charged to
patients;
(3) Instructions for filing an application for financial assistance;
(4) An explanation of whether the hospital uses a patient's prior
financial assistance eligibility determination as a basis for establishing
eligibility for current financial assistance, and, if so, the circumstances
under which such prior determination is applied; and
(5) A list of any health care providers, other than the hospital,
delivering emergency or other medically necessary services in the
hospital that specifies which health care providers are covered by such
hospital's financial assistance policy.
(d) Consistent with 26 CFR 1.501(r)–(4), as amended from time to
time, each notice required pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall
have the following statement printed on the first page of such notice:
"If a language is spoken by at least one thousand individuals or five
per cent of the community served by the hospital facility or likely to be
affected or encountered by the hospital facility, then the hospital shall
translate the notice into such other language.".
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(1) Provide financial assistance that is in addition to financial
assistance required by a hospital pursuant to state or federal law;
(2) Create a private right of action; or
Public Act No. 26-68 527 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(3) Limit a hospital's ability to collect payment from, or bill any
patient for, services provided by the hospital, provided such collection
or billing complies with state or federal law.
Sec. 356. Section 38a-1053 of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is amended by adding subsection (e) as follows (Effective October
1, 2026):
(NEW) (e) (1) On and after January 1, 2027, any hospital maintaining
a financial assistance program shall deem any patient enrolled in the
federal (A) Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, (B) Special
Supplemental Food Program for Women, Infants and Children, or (C)
Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program to have satisfied the
income-based eligibility requirements of such hospital's financial
assistance program.
(2) Verification of enrollment pursuant to the provisions of
subdivision (1) of this subsection may be based on reasonable evidence,
including, but not limited to, electronic verification, attestation or other
documentation.
(3) For any patient deemed eligible for a hospital's financial assistance
program pursuant to this subsection, a hospital shall determine such
patient's level of financial assistance in accordance with the hospital's
financial assistance policy.
(4) A hospital may require any such patient deemed eligible for the
financial assistance program to provide additional information for such
hospital to determine the amount of financial assistance to be provided
to such patient, and, if applicable, such hospital may require that (A)
such patient apply for the Medicaid or Medicare programs, or other
government-funded health coverage, including, but not limited to,
coverage offered through the Connecticut Health Insurance Exchange,
established pursuant to section 38a-1081, as a condition of receiving
Public Act No. 26-68 528 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
such financial assistance.
(5) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require any
hospital to (A) provide financial assistance beyond the income levels or
discount tiers established in such hospital's financial assistance policy,
or (B) amend or modify such hospital's financial assistance policy.
Sec. 357. Section 12-263p of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes, as amended by section 359 of public act 25-168, is repealed and
the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
As used in sections 12-263p to 12-263x, inclusive, and section 362 of
this act, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Revenue Services;
(2) "Department" means the Department of Revenue Services;
(3) "Taxpayer" means any health care provider subject to any tax or
fee under section 12-263q or 12-263r;
(4) "Health care provider" means an individual or entity that receives
any payment or payments for health care items or services provided;
(5) "Gross receipts" means the amount received, whether in cash or in
kind, from patients, third-party payers and others for taxable health care
items or services provided by the taxpayer in the state, including
retroactive adjustments under reimbursement agreements with third-
party payers, without any deduction for any expenses of any kind;
(6) "Net revenue" means gross receipts less payer discounts, charity
care and bad debts, to the extent the taxpayer previously paid tax under
section 12-263q on the amount of such bad debts;
(7) "Payer discounts" means the difference between a health care
provider's published charges and the payments received by the health
Public Act No. 26-68 529 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
care provider from one or more health care payers for a rate or method
of payment that is different than or discounted from such published
charges. "Payer discounts" does not include charity care or bad debts;
(8) "Charity care" means free or discounted health care services
rendered by a health care provider to an individual who cannot afford
to pay for such services, including, but not limited to, health care
services provided to an uninsured patient who is not expected to pay all
or part of a health care provider's bill based on income guidelines and
other financial criteria set forth in the general statutes or in a health care
provider's charity care policies on file at the office of such provider.
"Charity care" does not include bad debts or payer discounts;
(9) "Received" means "received" or "accrued", construed according to
the method of accounting customarily employed by the taxpayer;
(10) "Hospital" means any health care facility, as defined in section
19a-630, that (A) is licensed by the Department of Public Health as a
short-term general hospital or children's general hospital; (B) is
maintained primarily for the care and treatment of patients with
disorders other than mental diseases; (C) meets the requirements for
participation in Medicare as a hospital; and (D) has in effect a utilization
review plan, applicable to all Medicaid patients, that meets the
requirements of 42 CFR 482.30, as amended from time to time, unless a
waiver has been granted by the Secretary of the United States
Department of Health and Human Services;
(11) "Inpatient hospital services" means, in accordance with federal
law, all services that are (A) ordinarily furnished in a hospital for the
care and treatment of inpatients; (B) furnished under the direction of a
physician or dentist; and (C) furnished in a hospital. "Inpatient hospital
services" does not include skilled nursing facility services and
intermediate care facility services furnished by a hospital with swing
bed approval;
Public Act No. 26-68 530 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(12) "Inpatient" means a patient who has been admitted to a medical
institution as an inpatient on the recommendation of a physician or
dentist and who (A) receives room, board and professional services in
the institution for a twenty-four-hour period or longer, or (B) is expected
by the institution to receive room, board and professional services in the
institution for a twenty-four-hour period or longer, even if the patient
does not actually stay in the institution for a twenty-four-hour period or
longer;
(13) "Outpatient hospital services" means, in accordance with federal
law, preventive, diagnostic, therapeutic, rehabilitative or palliative
services that are (A) furnished to an outpatient; (B) furnished by or
under the direction of a physician or dentist; and (C) furnished by a
hospital;
(14) "Outpatient" means a patient of an organized medical facility or
a distinct part of such facility, who is expected by the facility to receive,
and who does receive, professional services for less than a twenty-four-
hour period regardless of the hour of admission, whether or not a bed
is used or the patient remains in the facility past midnight;
(15) "Nursing home" means any licensed chronic and convalescent
nursing home or a rest home with nursing supervision;
(16) "Intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual
disabilities" or "intermediate care facility" means a residential facility for
persons with intellectual disability that is certified to meet the
requirements of 42 CFR 442, Subpart C, as amended from time to time,
and, in the case of a private facility, licensed pursuant to section 17a-227;
(17) "Medicare day" means a day of nursing home care service
provided to an individual who is eligible for payment, in full or with a
coinsurance requirement, under the federal Medicare program,
including fee for service and managed care coverage;
Public Act No. 26-68 531 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(18) "Nursing home resident day" means a day of nursing home care
service provided to an individual and includes the day a resident is
admitted and any day for which the nursing home is eligible for
payment for reserving a resident's bed due to hospitalization or
temporary leave and for the date of death. For purposes of this
subdivision, a day of nursing home care service shall be the period of
time between the census-taking hour in a nursing home on two
successive calendar days. "Nursing home resident day" does not include
a Medicare day or the day a resident is discharged;
(19) "Intermediate care facility resident day" means a day of
intermediate care facility residential care provided to an individual and
includes the day a resident is admitted and any day for which the
intermediate care facility is eligible for payment for reserving a
resident's bed due to hospitalization or temporary leave and for the date
of death. For purposes of this subdivision, a day of intermediate care
facility residential care shall be the period of time between the census-
taking hour in a facility on two successive calendar days. "Intermediate
care facility resident day" does not include the day a resident is
discharged;
(20) "Nursing facility service revenue" means, in accordance with
federal law, revenue for which a nursing home provides nursing home
care services to an individual and that are covered services for Medicaid
payment under section 17b-262-705 of the regulations of Connecticut
state agencies, whether or not such services were provided to Medicaid
recipients. "Nursing facility service revenue" does not include Medicare
payments;
(21) "Intermediate care facility service revenue" means, in accordance
with federal law, revenue for which an intermediate care facility
provides services to its residents and that are covered services for
Medicaid payment under section 17b-262-303 of the regulations of
Connecticut state agencies, whether or not such services were provided
Public Act No. 26-68 532 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
to Medicaid recipients. "Intermediate care facility service revenue" does
not include Medicare payments;
(22) "Medicaid" means the program operated by the Department of
Social Services pursuant to section 17b-260 and authorized by Title XIX
of the Social Security Act, as amended from time to time; [and]
(23) "Medicare" means the program operated by the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services in accordance with Title XVIII of the
Social Security Act, as amended from time to time; and
(24) "Health system" has the same meaning as provided in section
19a-508c.
Sec. 358. Section 12-263q of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes, as amended by section 360 of public act 25-168, is repealed and
the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) (1) For each calendar quarter commencing on or after July 1, 2017,
each hospital shall pay a tax on the total net revenue received by such
hospital for the provision of inpatient hospital services and a tax on the
total net revenue received by such hospital for the provision of
outpatient hospital services.
(A) (i) On and after July 1, 2017, through June 30, 2026, the rate of tax
for the provision of inpatient hospital services shall be six per cent of
each hospital's audited net revenue for fiscal year 2016 attributable to
inpatient hospital services.
(ii) On and after July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2031, the rate of tax for
the provision of inpatient hospital services shall be [six] four per cent of
each hospital's audited net revenue for the applicable federal fiscal year
attributable to inpatient hospital services.
(iii) On and after July 1, 2031, the tax rate for the provision of inpatient
Public Act No. 26-68 533 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
hospital services shall be three and one-half per cent of each hospital's
audited net revenue for the applicable federal fiscal year attributable to
inpatient hospital services.
(B) (i) On and after July 1, 2017, and prior to July 1, 2019, the rate of
tax for the provision of outpatient hospital services shall be nine
hundred million dollars less the total tax imposed on all hospitals for
the provision of inpatient hospital services, which sum shall be divided
by the total audited net revenue for fiscal year 2016 attributable to
outpatient hospital services, of all hospitals that are required to pay such
tax, resulting in an effective rate of twelve and three thousand three
hundred twenty-five ten thousandths (12.3325) per cent of each
hospital's audited net revenue for fiscal year 2016 attributable to
outpatient hospital services.
(ii) On and after July 1, 2019, and prior to July 1, 2020, the rate of tax
for the provision of outpatient hospital services shall be eight hundred
ninety million dollars less the total tax imposed on all hospitals for the
provision of inpatient hospital services, which sum shall be divided by
the total audited net revenue for fiscal year 2016 attributable to
outpatient hospital services, of all hospitals that are required to pay such
tax, resulting in an effective rate of twelve and nine hundred forty-two
ten thousandths (12.0942) per cent of each hospital's audited net revenue
for fiscal year 2016 attributable to outpatient hospital services, subject to
any hospital dissolutions or cessation of operations pursuant to
subparagraph (D) of this subdivision or disallowed exemptions
pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this section.
(iii) On and after July 1, 2020, and prior to July 1, 2021, the rate of tax
for the provision of outpatient hospital services shall be eight hundred
eighty-two million dollars less the total tax imposed on all hospitals for
the provision of inpatient hospital services, which sum shall be divided
by the total audited net revenue for fiscal year 2016 attributable to
outpatient hospital services, of all hospitals that are required to pay such
Public Act No. 26-68 534 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
tax, resulting in an effective rate of eleven and seven thousand five
hundred three ten thousandths (11.7503) per cent of each hospital's
audited net revenue for fiscal year 2016 attributable to outpatient
hospital services, subject to any hospital dissolutions or cessation of
operations pursuant to subparagraph (D) of this subdivision or
disallowed exemptions pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this
section.
(iv) On and after July 1, 2021, and prior to July 1, 2025, the rate of tax
for the provision of outpatient hospital services shall be eight hundred
fifty million dollars less the total tax imposed on all hospitals for the
provision of inpatient hospital services, which sum shall be divided by
the total audited net revenue for fiscal year 2016 attributable to
outpatient hospital services, of all hospitals that are required to pay such
tax, resulting in an effective rate of eleven and nine hundred seventy-six
ten thousandths (11.0976) per cent of each hospital's audited net revenue
for fiscal year 2016 attributable to outpatient hospital services, subject to
any hospital dissolutions or cessation of operations pursuant to
subparagraph (D) of this subdivision or disallowed exemptions
pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this section.
(v) On and after July 1, 2025, and prior to July 1, 2026, the rate of tax
for the provision of outpatient hospital services shall be eight hundred
twenty million dollars less the total tax imposed on all hospitals for the
provision of inpatient hospital services, which sum shall be divided by
the total audited net revenue for fiscal year 2016 attributable to
outpatient hospital services, of all hospitals that are required to pay such
tax, resulting in an effective rate of ten and four thousand eight hundred
fifty-eight ten thousandths (10.4858) per cent of each hospital's audited
net revenue for fiscal year 2016 attributable to outpatient hospital
services, subject to any hospital dissolutions or cessation of operations
pursuant to subparagraph (D) of this subdivision or disallowed
exemptions pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this section.
Public Act No. 26-68 535 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(vi) (I) On and after July 1, 2026, the rate of tax for the provision of
outpatient hospital services shall be equal to the amount specified under
clause (vi)(II) of this subparagraph less the total tax imposed on all
hospitals for the provision of inpatient hospital services, which sum
shall be divided by the total audited net revenue for the applicable
federal fiscal year attributable to outpatient hospital services as
determined in accordance with section 362 of this act, of all hospitals
that are required to pay such tax, subject to any hospital dissolutions or
cessation of operations or changes in taxpayer status pursuant to
subparagraph (D) of this subdivision or disallowed exemptions
pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this section.
(II) [For the state fiscal year commencing July 1, 2026, the amount
shall be one billion one hundred ninety-five million dollars. For the state
fiscal year commencing July 1, 2027, and each state fiscal year thereafter,
such amount shall be increased by twenty-five million dollars from the
prior state fiscal year.] For the state fiscal years commencing July 1, 2026,
to the state fiscal year commencing July 1, 2030, inclusive, the amount
shall be:
Fiscal Year Commencing Total Amount
July 1, 2026 $974,000,000
July 1, 2027 $997,756,916
July 1, 2028 $1,022,172,694
July 1, 2029 $1,047,265,629
July 1, 2030 $1,073,054,525
For state fiscal years commencing on and after July 1, 2031, the amount
shall be one billion seventy-three million fifty-four thousand five
hundred twenty-five dollars, unless modified through any provision of
the general statutes.
(C) (i) (I) For each state fiscal year commencing on or after July 1,
2019, and prior to July 1, 2026, the total audited net revenue for fiscal
year 2016 attributable to inpatient hospital services, of all hospitals that
Public Act No. 26-68 536 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
are required to pay the tax under this section, shall be five billion ninety-
seven million eight hundred twenty thousand one hundred ninety-
seven dollars, subject to any hospital dissolutions or cessation of
operations pursuant to subparagraph (D) of this subdivision or
disallowed exemptions pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this
section.
(II) For each state fiscal year commencing on or after July 1, 2026, the
total audited net revenue for the applicable federal fiscal year
attributable to inpatient hospital services, of all hospitals that are
required to pay the tax under this section, shall be the total amount of
net revenue attributable to inpatient hospital services reported to the
commissioner for the applicable federal fiscal year by all hospitals
subject to the tax or, if applicable, as adjusted by the commissioner, in
accordance with the provisions of subparagraph (A) of subdivision (4)
of this subsection, subject to any hospital dissolutions or cessation of
operations or changes in taxpayer status pursuant to subparagraph (D)
of this subdivision, disallowed exemptions pursuant to subsections (b)
and (c) of this section or the provisions of subdivision (4) of this
subsection. For purposes of this clause, the total audited net revenue
shall be calculated as though any children's general hospital subject to a
pending request for removal of exemption under subdivision (2) of
subsection (b) of this section were subject to the tax, unless and until the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services denies such request.
(ii) (I) For the state fiscal year commencing on or after July 1, 2019,
and prior to July 1, 2020, the total audited net revenue for fiscal year
2016 attributable to outpatient hospital services, of all hospitals that are
required to pay the tax under this section shall be four billion eight
hundred twenty-nine million eight hundred fifty-nine thousand three
hundred ninety-nine dollars, subject to any hospital dissolutions or
cessation of operations pursuant to subparagraph (D) of this
subdivision or disallowed exemptions pursuant to subsections (b) and
Public Act No. 26-68 537 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(c) of this section.
(II) For each state fiscal year commencing on or after July 1, 2020, and
prior to July 1, 2026, the total audited net revenue for fiscal year 2016
attributable to outpatient hospital services, of all hospitals that are
required to pay the tax under this section, shall be four billion nine
hundred three million one hundred twenty-seven thousand one
hundred thirty-three dollars, subject to any hospital dissolutions or
cessation of operations pursuant to subparagraph (D) of this
subdivision or disallowed exemptions pursuant to subsections (b) and
(c) of this section.
(III) For each state fiscal year commencing on or after July 1, 2026, the
total audited net revenue for the applicable federal fiscal year
attributable to outpatient hospital services, of all hospitals that are
required to pay the tax under this section, shall be the total amount of
net revenue attributable to outpatient hospital services reported to the
commissioner for the applicable federal fiscal year by all hospitals
subject to the tax or, if applicable, as adjusted by the commissioner, in
accordance with the provisions of subparagraph (A) of subdivision (4)
of this subsection, subject to any hospital dissolutions or cessation of
operations or changes in taxpayer status pursuant to subparagraph (D)
of this subdivision, disallowed exemptions pursuant to subsections (b)
and (c) of this section or the provisions of subdivision (4) of this
subsection.
(D) (i) If a hospital or hospitals subject to the tax imposed under this
subdivision merge, consolidate, are acquired or otherwise reorganize,
the surviving hospital shall assume and be liable for the total tax
imposed under this subdivision on the merged, consolidated, acquired
or reorganized hospitals, including any outstanding liabilities from
periods prior to such merger, consolidation, acquisition or
reorganization.
Public Act No. 26-68 538 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(ii) [If] On or before July 1, 2026, if a hospital ceases to operate as a
hospital for any reason other than a merger, consolidation, acquisition
or reorganization, or ceases for any reason to be subject to the tax
imposed under this subdivision, the amount of tax due from each
taxpayer under this subdivision shall not be recalculated to take into
account such occurrence for the state fiscal year in which the hospital
dissolves or ceases to operate. The amount of tax that would be due from
the dissolved hospital after its dissolution or cessation of operations
shall not be collected by the commissioner for the state fiscal year in
which such hospital dissolves or ceases to operate. In the next
succeeding state fiscal year after the hospital dissolves or ceases to
operate and in each subsequent state fiscal year, the total audited net
revenue for the applicable federal fiscal year shall be adjusted to exclude
such hospital's audited net revenue for the applicable federal fiscal year
and the effective rate of the tax due under this section shall be adjusted
to ensure that the total amount of such tax to be collected under
subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this subdivision is redistributed among
the surviving hospitals in proportion to the reduced total audited net
revenue for the applicable federal fiscal year attributable to inpatient
hospital services and outpatient hospital services, of all hospitals.
(iii) Commencing on July 1, 2026, if a hospital ceases to operate as a
hospital for any reason other than a merger, consolidation, acquisition
or reorganization, or ceases for any reason to be subject to the tax
imposed under this subdivision, including if the tax exemption for
children's general hospitals is not eliminated, the amount of tax
attributable to such hospital under subparagraph (B)(vi) of this
subdivision shall not be collected by the commissioner for the state fiscal
year in which such event occurs or for any state fiscal year thereafter.
For the state fiscal year in which such event occurs and for each state
fiscal year thereafter, the total amount specified in subparagraph
(B)(vi)(II) of this subdivision shall be deemed reduced, without further
action, by the amount of tax attributable to such hospital under
Public Act No. 26-68 539 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
subparagraph (B)(vi) of this subdivision for such fiscal year such that
the tax rate applicable to outpatient services for the remaining taxpaying
hospitals shall not change.
(E) (i) For each state fiscal year commencing on or after July 1, 2026,
if the Commissioner of Social Services determines for any fiscal year that
the effective rate of tax for the tax imposed on net revenue for the
provision of inpatient hospital services exceeds the rate permitted under
the provisions of 42 CFR 433.68(f), as amended from time to time, the
amount of tax collected that exceeds the permissible amount shall be
refunded to hospitals, in proportion to the amount of net revenue for
the provision of inpatient hospital services upon which the hospitals
were taxed. The effective rate of tax shall be calculated by comparing
the amount of tax paid by hospitals on net revenue for the provision of
inpatient hospital services in a state fiscal year with the amount of net
revenue received by hospitals subject to the tax for the provision of
inpatient hospital services for the equivalent fiscal year.
(ii) On or before July 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, each hospital
subject to the [tax] taxes imposed under this subdivision shall report to
the Commissioner of Social Services, in the manner prescribed by and
on forms provided by said commissioner, the amount of tax paid
pursuant to this subsection by such hospital and the amount of net
revenue received by such hospital for the provision of inpatient hospital
services, in the state fiscal year commencing two years prior to each such
reporting date. Not later than ninety days after said commissioner
receives completed reports from all hospitals required to submit such
reports, said commissioner shall notify the Commissioner of Revenue
Services of the amount of any refund due each hospital to be in
compliance with 42 CFR 433.68(f), as amended from time to time. Not
later than thirty days after receiving such notice, the Commissioner of
Revenue Services shall notify the Comptroller of the amount of each
such refund and the Comptroller shall draw an order on the Treasurer
Public Act No. 26-68 540 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
for payment of each such refund. No interest shall be added to any
refund issued pursuant to this subparagraph.
(2) Except as provided in subdivision (3) of this subsection, each
hospital subject to the tax imposed under subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall be required to pay the total amount due in four
quarterly payments consistent with section 12-263s, with the first
quarter commencing with the first day of each state fiscal year and the
last quarter ending on the last day of each state fiscal year. Hospitals
shall make all payments required under this subsection in accordance
with procedures established by and on forms provided by the
commissioner.
(3) (A) For the state fiscal year commencing July 1, 2017, each hospital
required to pay tax on inpatient hospital services or outpatient hospital
services shall make an estimated tax payment on December 15, 2017,
which estimated payment shall be equal to one hundred thirty-three per
cent of the tax due under chapter 211a for the period ending June 30,
2017. If a hospital was not required to pay tax under chapter 211a on
either inpatient hospital services or outpatient hospital services, such
hospital shall make its estimated payment based on its unaudited net
patient revenue.
(B) Each hospital required to pay tax pursuant to this subdivision on
inpatient hospital services or outpatient hospital services shall pay the
remaining balance determined to be due in two equal payments, which
shall be due on April 30, 2018, and July 31, 2018, respectively.
(C) (i) (I) For each state fiscal year commencing on or after July 1,
2017, and prior to July 1, 2026, each hospital required to pay tax on
inpatient hospital services or outpatient hospital services shall calculate
the amount of tax due on forms prescribed by the commissioner by
multiplying the applicable rate set forth in subdivision (1) of this
subsection by its audited net revenue for fiscal year 2016.
Public Act No. 26-68 541 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(II) For each state fiscal year commencing on or after July 1, 2026, each
hospital required to pay tax on inpatient hospital services or outpatient
hospital services shall calculate the amount of tax due on forms
prescribed by the commissioner under this section.
(ii) For the state fiscal year commencing July 1, 2019, the payment
made for the period ending September 30, 2019, by each hospital
required to pay tax on inpatient hospital services or outpatient hospital
services shall be considered an estimated payment for purposes of the
tax due for said state fiscal year. Each hospital required to pay the tax
under this section on inpatient hospital services or outpatient hospital
services shall pay the remaining balance due in three equal payments,
which shall be due on January 31, 2020, April 30, 2020, and July 31, 2020,
respectively.
(D) The commissioner shall apply any payment made by a hospital
in connection with the tax under chapter 211a for the period ending
September 30, 2017, as a partial payment of such hospital's estimated tax
payment due on December 15, 2017, under subparagraph (A) of this
subdivision. The commissioner shall return to a hospital any credit
claimed by such hospital in connection with the tax imposed under
chapter 211a for the period ending September 30, 2017, for assignment
as provided under section 12-263s.
(4) (A) (i) Each hospital required to pay tax on inpatient hospital
services or outpatient hospital services shall submit to the commissioner
such information as the commissioner requires in order to calculate the
audited net inpatient revenue for fiscal year 2016, the audited net
outpatient revenue for fiscal year 2016 and the audited net revenue for
fiscal year 2016 of all such health care providers. Such information shall
be provided to the commissioner not later than January 1, 2018. The
commissioner shall make additional requests for information as
necessary to fully audit each hospital's net revenue. Upon completion of
the commissioner's examination, the commissioner shall notify, prior to
Public Act No. 26-68 542 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
February 28, 2018, each hospital of its audited net inpatient revenue for
fiscal year 2016, audited net outpatient revenue for fiscal year 2016 and
audited net revenue for fiscal year 2016.
(ii) (I) Not later than [January 1, 2026, and January 1, 2029, and
quadrennially thereafter] June 1, 2030, and quinquennially thereafter,
each hospital required to pay tax on inpatient hospital services or
outpatient hospital services shall submit to the commissioner such
information as the commissioner requires in order to calculate, for the
applicable federal fiscal year, the audited net inpatient revenue, the
audited net outpatient revenue and the audited net revenue of all such
hospitals. The amounts reported by each hospital shall be deemed
accepted on the first day of the [state] federal fiscal year, provided the
commissioner has not initiated an audit of the hospital before such first
day.
(II) If the commissioner initiates an audit of a hospital, such hospital
shall comply with all additional requests by the commissioner for
information necessary to enable the commissioner to fully audit the
hospital within [fourteen] thirty days of the date the commissioner
requests such information. If requested by a hospital, the commissioner
may grant an extension of the deadline to comply with requests for
information.
(III) The commissioner shall issue any notice setting forth additional
audited net revenue not later than the first day of the state fiscal year.
Such additional audited net revenue shall be final [fourteen] thirty days
after the date such notice is mailed to the taxpayer, except for any
amounts as to which the taxpayer files a written protest with the
commissioner. If a protest is filed, the commissioner shall reconsider the
additional audited net revenue and, if the taxpayer or the taxpayer's
authorized representative has requested a hearing, shall grant or deny
such hearing. The commissioner shall mail notice of the commissioner's
determination to the taxpayer, which notice shall briefly set forth the
Public Act No. 26-68 543 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
commissioner's findings of fact and the basis of the commissioner's
decision in each case decided adversely, in whole or in part, to the
taxpayer. The commissioner's action on the taxpayer's protest shall be
final upon the expiration of one month from the date the commissioner
mails the notice of the commissioner's determination to the taxpayer,
unless the taxpayer seeks judicial review of such determination within
such period.
(IV) If any protest or appeal is pending on the first day of the next
succeeding state fiscal year, the amounts reported by the protesting or
appealing taxpayer shall be used to tentatively calculate the tax due
under this section until such protest or appeal is finally resolved. If any
amount is revised pursuant to such protest or appeal from the amount
originally reported by a hospital, the commissioner shall recalculate for
each hospital the amounts due under this section and shall issue
assessments or refunds, as applicable, with respect to any affected
calendar quarter.
(V) A notice under this clause shall not be required for any hospital
for which an audit has not been issued.
(B) Any hospital that fails to provide the requested information by
the dates specified in subparagraph (A) of this subdivision or fails to
comply with a request for additional information made under this
subdivision shall be subject to a penalty of one thousand dollars per day
for each day the hospital fails to provide the requested information or
additional information.
(C) The commissioner may engage an independent auditor to assist
in the performance of the commissioner's duties and responsibilities
under this subdivision.
(5) Net revenue derived from providing a health care item or service
to a patient shall be taxed only one time under this section.
Public Act No. 26-68 544 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(6) (A) For purposes of this section:
(i) "Audited net inpatient revenue for fiscal year 2016" means the
amount of revenue that the commissioner determines, in accordance
with federal law, that a hospital received for the provision of inpatient
hospital services during the 2016 federal fiscal year;
(ii) "Audited net outpatient revenue for fiscal year 2016" means the
amount of revenue that the commissioner determines, in accordance
with federal law, that a hospital received for the provision of outpatient
hospital services during the 2016 federal fiscal year;
(iii) "Audited net revenue for fiscal year 2016" means net revenue, as
reported in each hospital's audited financial statements, less the amount
of revenue that the commissioner determines, in accordance with
federal law, that a hospital received from other than the provision of
inpatient hospital services and outpatient hospital services. The total
audited net revenue for fiscal year 2016 shall be the sum of all audited
net revenue for the 2016 fiscal year for all hospitals required to pay tax
on inpatient hospital services and outpatient hospital services;
(iv) "Audited net inpatient revenue for the applicable federal fiscal
year" means the amount of revenue that a hospital reports to the
commissioner that such hospital received for the provision of inpatient
hospital services during the applicable federal fiscal year, subject to the
provisions of subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of this section;
(v) "Audited net outpatient revenue for the applicable federal fiscal
year" means the amount of revenue that a hospital reports to the
commissioner that such hospital received for the provision of outpatient
hospital services during the applicable federal fiscal year, subject to the
provisions of subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of this section;
(vi) "Audited net revenue for the applicable federal fiscal year" means
net revenue, as reported in each hospital's audited financial statements,
Public Act No. 26-68 545 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
less the amount of revenue a hospital received from other than the
provision of inpatient hospital services and outpatient hospital services.
The total audited net revenue shall be the sum of all audited net revenue
for the applicable federal fiscal year for all hospitals required to pay tax
on inpatient hospital services and outpatient hospital services; and
(vii) "Applicable federal fiscal year" means (I) for state fiscal years
commencing on or after July 1, 2017, and through June 30, 2026, federal
fiscal year 2016, (II) for state fiscal years commencing on July 1, 2026,
and prior to July 1, [2029] 2031, federal fiscal year 2024, [(II)] (III) for state
fiscal years commencing on or after July 1, [2029] 2031, and prior to July
1, [2033] 2036, federal fiscal year [2027] 2029, and [(III)] (IV) for the
periods commencing with the state fiscal year commencing July 1, [2033]
2036, and [quadrennially] quinquennially thereafter, the federal fiscal
year that concluded in the calendar year that is two years prior to the
start of such [quadrennial] quinquennial period.
(B) For purposes of this section, if a hospital's audited financial
statements for the applicable federal fiscal year does not report revenue
for the entire fiscal year, such hospital's audited net revenue for the
applicable federal fiscal year shall be calculated by projecting the
amount of revenue such hospital would have received for the entire
fiscal year based proportionally on the audited net revenue reported on
its audited financial statements.
(C) Audited net inpatient revenue and audited net outpatient
revenue shall be based on information provided by each hospital
required to pay tax on inpatient hospital services or outpatient hospital
services.
(b) (1) The Commissioner of Social Services shall seek approval from
the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to exempt from the net
revenue tax imposed under subsection (a) of this section the following:
(A) Specialty hospitals; (B) children's general hospitals; and (C)
Public Act No. 26-68 546 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
hospitals owned and operated exclusively by the state other than a
short-term general hospital operated by the state as a receiver pursuant
to chapter 920. Any hospital for which the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services grants an exemption shall be exempt from the net
revenue tax imposed under subsection (a) of this section. Any hospital
for which the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services denies an
exemption shall be deemed to be a hospital for purposes of this section
and shall be required to pay the net revenue tax imposed under
subsection (a) of this section on inpatient hospital services and
outpatient hospital services at the same effective rates set forth in
subsection (a) of this section.
(2) [The] Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this
subsection, the Commissioner of Social Services shall seek approval
from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to remove the
exemption approved pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection for
children's general hospitals from the net revenue tax imposed under
subsection (a) of this section. If the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services approves the removal of such exemption, any children's
general hospitals that were exempt prior to July 1, 2026, from the net
revenue tax imposed under subsection (a) of this section shall be
required, on and after July 1, 2026, to pay such tax on inpatient hospital
services and outpatient hospital services at the [same effective] rates set
forth in subsection (a) of this section. Children's general hospitals shall
be required to pay the taxes on inpatient hospital services and
outpatient hospital services commencing July 1, 2026, notwithstanding
that federal approval has not yet been obtained, provided that such
hospitals shall be entitled to a refund if such approval is not ultimately
obtained.
(3) Each hospital shall provide to the Commissioner of Social
Services, upon request, such information as said commissioner may
require to make any computations necessary to seek approval for
Public Act No. 26-68 547 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
exemption under this subsection.
(4) As used in this subsection, (A) "specialty hospital" means a health
care facility, as defined in section 19a-630, other than a facility licensed
by the Department of Public Health as a short-term general hospital or
a short-term children's hospital. "Specialty hospital" includes, but is not
limited to, a psychiatric hospital or a chronic disease hospital, and (B)
"children's general hospital" means a health care facility, as defined in
section 19a-630, that is licensed by the Department of Public Health as a
short-term children's hospital. "Children's general hospital" does not
include a specialty hospital.
(c) (1) (A) For each state fiscal year commencing on or after July 1,
2017, and prior to July 1, 2020, the Commissioner of Social Services shall
seek approval from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to
exempt financially distressed hospitals from the net revenue tax
imposed on outpatient hospital services. Any such hospital for which
the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services grants an exemption
shall be exempt from the net revenue tax imposed on outpatient hospital
services under subsection (a) of this section. Any hospital for which the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services denies an exemption shall
be required to pay the net revenue tax imposed on outpatient hospital
services under subsection (a) of this section.
(B) For purposes of this subdivision, "financially distressed hospital"
means a hospital that has experienced over the five-year period from
October 1, 2011, through September 30, 2016, an average net loss of more
than five per cent of aggregate revenue. A hospital has an average net
loss of more than five per cent of aggregate revenue if such a loss is
reflected in the applicable years of financial reporting that have been
made available by the Health Systems Planning Unit of the Office of
Health Strategy for such hospital in accordance with section 19a-670.
Upon said commissioner's receipt of a determination by the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services that a hospital is not exempt, the total
Public Act No. 26-68 548 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
audited net revenue from the provision of outpatient hospital services
for fiscal year 2016 shall be increased by such hospital's audited net
revenue from the provision of outpatient hospital services for fiscal year
2016 and the effective rate of the tax due under this section shall be
adjusted to ensure that the total amount of such tax to be collected under
subsection (a) of this section is redistributed, commencing with the
calendar quarter next succeeding the date of the determination by the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
(2) (A) For each state fiscal year commencing on or after July 1, 2020,
the Commissioner of Social Services shall seek approval from the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to exempt sole community
hospitals from the net revenue tax imposed on outpatient hospital
services. Any such hospital for which the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services grants an exemption shall be exempt from the net
revenue tax imposed on outpatient hospital services under subsection
(a) of this section. Any hospital for which the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services denies an exemption shall be required to pay the net
revenue tax imposed on outpatient hospital services under subsection
(a) of this section.
(B) For purposes of this subdivision, "sole community hospital"
means a hospital that is classified by the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services for purposes of Medicare as a sole community
hospital under 42 CFR 412.92. Upon said commissioner's receipt of a
determination by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that
a hospital is not exempt, the total audited net revenue from the
provision of outpatient hospital services for the applicable federal fiscal
year shall be increased by such hospital's audited net revenue from the
provision of outpatient hospital services for the applicable federal fiscal
year and the effective rate of the tax due under this section shall be
adjusted to ensure that the total amount of such tax to be collected under
subsection (a) of this section is redistributed, commencing with the
Public Act No. 26-68 549 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
calendar quarter next succeeding the date of the determination by the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
(3) Upon receipt of a determination by the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services under this subsection that a hospital is not exempt,
said commissioner shall notify all hospitals subject to the tax under this
section of such determination, the corresponding increase to the total
audited net revenue for the applicable federal fiscal year and the change
in any effective rate of the tax to be collected under subsection (a) of this
section. Such notice shall be provided prior to the end of the calendar
quarter next succeeding the date of the determination by the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services. If a state fiscal year has commenced
when such determination is made, the adjusted audited net revenue for
the applicable federal fiscal year and the change in any effective rate of
the tax to be collected under subsection (a) of this section shall be
prorated to take into account the amount of the tax already paid during
the state fiscal year.
(d) The commissioner shall issue guidance regarding the
administration of the tax on inpatient hospital services and outpatient
hospital services. Such guidance shall be issued upon completion of a
study of the applicable federal law governing the administration of tax
on inpatient hospital services and outpatient hospital services. The
commissioner shall conduct such study in collaboration with the
Commissioner of Social Services, the Secretary of the Office of Policy
and Management, the Connecticut Hospital Association and the
hospitals subject to the tax imposed on inpatient hospital services and
outpatient hospital services.
(e) (1) The commissioner shall determine, in consultation with the
Commissioner of Social Services, the Secretary of the Office of Policy
and Management, the Connecticut Hospital Association and the
hospitals subject to the tax imposed on inpatient hospital services and
outpatient hospital services, if there is any underreporting of revenue
Public Act No. 26-68 550 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
on hospitals' audited financial statements. Such consultation shall only
be as authorized under section 12-15. The commissioner shall issue
guidance, if necessary, to address any such underreporting.
(2) If the commissioner determines, in accordance with this
subsection, that a hospital underreported net revenue on its audited
financial statements, the amount of underreported net revenue shall be
added to the amount of net revenue reported on such hospital's audited
financial statements so as to comply with federal law and the revised
net revenue amount shall be used for purposes of calculating the
amount of tax owed by such hospital under this section. For purposes
of this subsection, "underreported net revenue" means any revenue of a
hospital subject to the tax imposed under this section that is required to
be included in net revenue from the provision of inpatient hospital
services and net revenue from the provision of outpatient hospital
services to comply with 42 CFR 433.56, as amended from time to time,
42 CFR 433.68, as amended from time to time, and Section 1903(w) of
the Social Security Act, as amended from time to time, but that was not
reported on such hospital's audited financial statements. Underreported
net revenue shall only include revenue of the hospital subject to such
tax.
(f) On or before November 15, 2026, and quarterly thereafter, the
commissioner shall report to the Commissioner of Social Services and
the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management the amount of tax
paid under this section by each hospital for the most recently completed
calendar quarter and the amount of any delinquent tax, plus penalty
and interest thereon, owed by a hospital and due under this section.
(g) Nothing in this section shall affect the commissioner's obligations
under section 12-15 regarding disclosure and inspection of returns and
return information.
(h) The provisions of section 17b-8 shall not apply to any exemption
Public Act No. 26-68 551 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
or exemptions sought by the Commissioner of Social Services from the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services under this section.
(i) With respect to any calendar quarter commencing on or after July
1, 2026, the rate of tax on the net revenue for the provision of inpatient
hospital services set forth in subsection (a) of this section shall be
automatically lowered to the extent necessary to ensure that such rate
does not exceed the indirect hold harmless safe harbor rate that is
approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in a
written decision in response to a tax waiver submitted by the
Commissioner of Social Services pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section. The rates of tax on the net revenue for the provision of
outpatient hospital services shall be automatically modified to ensure
that the same amount of revenue is collected as set forth in subsection
(a) of this section. If the hold harmless rate for the tax on net revenue for
the provision of inpatient hospital services is less than the amount set
forth in subsection (a) of this section, each hospital shall be required to
file an amended return with the Commissioner of Revenue Services
reporting the modified amount of inpatient and outpatient hospital tax
due in accordance with this subsection.
Sec. 359. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) There is established an
account to be known as the "hospital supplemental payment account",
which shall be a separate nonlapsing account. The account shall contain
any moneys required by law to be deposited in the account. Moneys in
the account shall be expended by the Commissioner of Social Services
for the purpose of making payments to hospitals, hospital-affiliated
medical groups and faculty practice plans, as such terms are defined in
subsection (a) of section 17b-239e of the general statutes, during the
fiscal years commencing on or after July 1, 2026, in accordance with
subsection (c) of section 17b-239e of the general statutes.
(b) All revenue received from the tax imposed under section 12-263q
of the general statutes for a calendar quarter commencing on or after
Public Act No. 26-68 552 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
July 1, 2026, shall be deposited into the hospital supplemental payment
account established by subsection (a) of this section.
(c) In the event that the Secretary of the Office of Policy and
Management determines that such account will have insufficient funds
to make all payments due to hospitals under subsection (c) of section
17b-239e of the general statutes during a fiscal year commencing on or
after July 1, 2026:
(1) The secretary shall consult with the Commissioners of Revenue
Services and Social Services to determine, after considering any
delinquent hospital's ability to pay and any resultant impact on patient
health, the feasibility of collecting such unpaid taxes from the
delinquent hospital;
(2) If it is determined that it is feasible to collect all or a portion of the
tax pursuant to the offset provisions of subdivision (4) of subsection (c)
of section 12-263s of the general statutes or other collections methods,
the Commissioner of Revenue Services shall take such collections
actions; and
(3) If, after taking the steps required by subdivisions (1) and (2) of this
subsection, the secretary still determines that the account will have
insufficient funds to make all payments due to hospitals under
subsection (c) of section 17b-239e of the general statutes during a fiscal
year commencing on or after July 1, 2026, the secretary shall certify the
amount of the shortfall and shall request that the Finance Advisory
Committee approve a transfer of such certified amount from the General
Fund to the account established by this section. The Comptroller shall
transfer the amount certified by the secretary and approved by the
Finance Advisory Committee from the unappropriated resources of the
General Fund to the account established by this section.
Sec. 360. (Effective July 1, 2026) Not later than June 30, 2027, the
Public Act No. 26-68 553 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Comptroller shall transfer the sum of ten million seven hundred
thousand dollars from the resources of the hospital supplemental
payment account established by section 359 of this act for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, to be accounted for as revenue of the General Fund
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.
Sec. 361. Section 12-263aa of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes, as amended by section 364 of public act 25-168, is repealed and
the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) For the state fiscal years ending June 30, 2020, through June 30,
2026, the tax imposed under section 12-263q on the provision of
inpatient hospital services and outpatient hospital services shall cease
to be imposed if the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (1)
determines that such tax is an impermissible tax under Section 1903(w)
of the Social Security Act, as amended from time to time, or (2) does not
approve the applicable Medicaid state plan amendments necessary for
the state to receive federal financial participation under the Medicaid
program for the payments set forth in subsection (i) of section 17b-239
and subsection (c) of section 17b-239e. In the event of such a
determination or disapproval, the General Assembly shall consider,
during the next occurring regular or special session, whichever is
sooner, such amendments to the general statutes as are necessary to
comply with federal law regarding such tax.
(b) For the state fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2026, the
taxes imposed under section 12-263q on the provision of inpatient
hospital services and outpatient hospital services as well as the
supplemental payments to hospitals set forth in subsection (c) of section
17b-239e shall revert in all respects to the structure and amounts set
forth in said sections, as they existed on June 1, 2025, if any of the
following occur: (1) The Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
determines that either tax is impermissible under Section 1903(w) of the
Social Security Act, as amended from time to time, or declines to issue
Public Act No. 26-68 554 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
any tax waiver that may be required; (2) the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services does not approve, without material modification, the
applicable Medicaid state plan amendments necessary for the state to
receive federal financial participation under the Medicaid program for
the payments set forth in subsection (c) of section 17b-239e; or (3) any
aspect of the amendments to the taxes on inpatient hospital services or
outpatient services or changes to the amounts of supplemental
payments to hospitals pursuant to the provisions of this act are found to
be invalid. In the event of such a determination or disapproval, the
General Assembly shall consider, during the next occurring regular or
special session, whichever is sooner, such amendments to the general
statutes as are necessary to comply with federal law regarding such tax
and such payments. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection,
reversion to the June 1, 2025, tax and payment structure shall not be
required if the taxes on the provision of inpatient hospital services and
outpatient hospital services are permissible under federal law and the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services approves state plan
amendments or other federal authorities necessary to implement
payment methodologies that, in the aggregate, produce a total state-
wide level of payments under subsection (c) of section 17b-239e that is
not materially less than the total state-wide level of payments
contemplated under this act, and that results in the combined value of
supplemental payments, disproportionate share hospital payments,
faculty practice plan payments and hospital-affiliated medical group
payments to each health system and its affiliates being as nearly
equivalent as practicable to the payment levels contemplated under this
act, with variation permitted only to the extent necessary to obtain
federal approval or comply with federal law. For purposes of this
subsection, "faculty practice plan", "hospital-affiliated medical group"
and "health system" have the same meaning as provided in section 17b-
239e.
[(b)] (c) On and after July 1, 2026, the tax imposed under subdivision
Public Act No. 26-68 555 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(2) of subsection (a) of section 12-263r shall cease to be imposed if the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services determines that such tax is
an impermissible tax under Section 1903(w) of the Social Security Act,
as amended from time to time. In the event of such a determination, the
quarterly fee under subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 12-263r
shall be reinstated and applicable to the calendar quarter during which
such determination was made and each calendar quarter thereafter. If
the state successfully appeals such determination, such quarterly fee
shall cease and the tax under subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section
12-263r shall be reinstated and applicable to the calendar quarter
commencing immediately after the date of the final decision of such
appeal and each calendar quarter thereafter.
Sec. 362. (Effective from passage) (a) (1) Not later than thirty days after
the effective date of this section, each hospital required to pay tax on
inpatient hospital services or outpatient hospital services for the fiscal
year commencing on July 1, 2026, in accordance with section 12-263q of
the general statutes, shall submit to the Commissioner of Revenue
Services such information as the commissioner requires in order to
calculate, for the federal fiscal year 2024, the audited net inpatient
revenue, the audited net outpatient revenue and the audited net
revenue of all such hospitals. The amounts reported by each hospital
shall be deemed accepted on the first day of the state fiscal year,
provided the commissioner has not initiated an audit of the hospital
before such first day.
(2) If the commissioner initiates an audit of a hospital, such hospital
shall comply with all additional requests by the commissioner for
information necessary to enable the commissioner to fully audit the
hospital within thirty days of the date the commissioner requests such
information. If requested by a hospital, the commissioner may grant an
extension of the deadline to comply with requests for information.
(3) The commissioner shall issue any notice setting forth additional
Public Act No. 26-68 556 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
audited net revenue not later than the first day of the state fiscal year.
Such additional audited net revenue shall be final thirty days after the
date such notice is mailed to the taxpayer, except for any amounts as to
which the taxpayer files a written protest with the commissioner. If a
protest is filed, the commissioner shall reconsider the additional audited
net revenue and, if the taxpayer or the taxpayer's authorized
representative has requested a hearing, shall grant or deny such hearing.
The commissioner shall mail notice of the commissioner's determination
to the taxpayer, which notice shall briefly set forth the commissioner's
findings of fact and the basis of the commissioner's decision in each case
decided adversely, in whole or in part, to the taxpayer. The
commissioner's action on the taxpayer's protest shall be final upon the
expiration of one month from the date the commissioner mails the notice
of the commissioner's determination to the taxpayer, unless the
taxpayer seeks judicial review of such determination within such
period.
(4) If any protest or appeal is pending on the first day of the next
succeeding state fiscal year, the amounts reported by the protesting or
appealing taxpayer shall be used to tentatively calculate the tax due
under this section until such protest or appeal is finally resolved. If any
amount is revised pursuant to such protest or appeal from the amount
originally reported by a hospital, the commissioner shall recalculate for
each hospital the amounts due under this section and shall issue
assessments or refunds, as applicable, with respect to any affected
calendar quarter.
(5) A notice under this subsection shall not be required for any
hospital for which an audit has not been issued.
(b) Any hospital that fails to provide the requested information
within thirty days of the date of the request by the commissioner or fails
to comply with a request for additional information made under this
section shall be subject to a penalty of one thousand dollars per day for
Public Act No. 26-68 557 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
each day the hospital fails to provide the requested information or
additional information.
(c) The commissioner may engage an independent auditor to assist in
the performance of the commissioner's duties and responsibilities under
this section.
Sec. 363. Section 17b-239e of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes, as amended by section 362 of public act 25-168, is repealed and
the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) [For the purposes of] As used in this section [, "settlement
agreement" has the same meaning as provided in section 12-263z.] and
section 359 of this act:
(1) "Faculty practice plan" means a medical group controlled or
operated by a university or medical school whose primary affiliation is
with a nongovernmental hospital;
(2) "Faculty practice plan physician and mid-level services" means
professional services provided by physicians or mid-level practitioners
billed under the federal identification number assigned to the faculty
practice plan;
(3) "Health system" has the same meaning as provided in section 19a-
508c;
(4) "Hospital" has the same meaning as provided in section 12-263p;
(5) "Hospital-affiliated medical group" means a medical foundation
or medical group practice organized or controlled by a hospital or health
system or any subsidiary thereof;
(6) "Hospital-affiliated medical group physician and mid-level
services" means professional services provided by physicians and mid-
level practitioners billed under the federal employer identification
Public Act No. 26-68 558 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
number assigned to the hospital-affiliated medical group;
(7) "Hospital-based physician and mid-level services" means
professional services provided by physicians or mid-level practitioners
billed under the federal employer identification number assigned to the
hospital;
(8) "Independent nongovernmental hospital" means a
nongovernmental hospital that is not part of a health system that
includes multiple hospitals and is not included with other hospitals in
consolidated financial statements at the system level;
(9) "Inpatient" has the same meaning as provided in section 12-263p;
(10) "Inpatient hospital services" has the same meaning as provided
in section 12-263p;
(11) "Mid-level practitioner" means: (A) An advanced practice
registered nurse licensed pursuant to chapter 378, or (B) a physician
assistant licensed pursuant to chapter 370;
(12) "Nongovernmental hospital" means a hospital that is not owned
and operated exclusively by the state;
(13) "Outpatient" has the same meaning as provided in section 12-
263p;
(14) "Outpatient hospital services" has the same meaning as provided
in section 12-263p;
(15) "Received" has the same meaning as provided in section 12-263p;
and
(16) "Settlement agreement" has the same meaning as provided in
section 12-263z.
Public Act No. 26-68 559 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(b) Subject to federal approval, from July 1, 2019, through June 30,
2026, the Department of Social Services shall establish supplemental
pools for certain hospitals in accordance with the terms of the settlement
agreement, including any court order issued in accordance with the
provisions of section 12-263z. Such pools shall include, but not be
limited to, as applicable, general, small hospital, mid-sized hospital and
large hospital supplemental pools.
(c) (1) From July 1, 2019, through June 30, 2026, the department shall
distribute supplemental payments to applicable hospitals in accordance
with the settlement agreement, including any court order issued in
accordance with the provisions of section 12-263z. The commissioner
shall diligently pursue the federal approvals required for the
supplemental pools and payments set forth in this section.
(2) To the extent required by the settlement agreement, including any
court order issued in accordance with the provisions of section 12-263z,
the Department of Social Services shall pay Medicaid supplemental
payments to nongovernmental licensed short-term general hospitals
located in the state as follows: (A) For the fiscal years ending June 30,
2020, and June 30, 2021, five hundred forty-eight million three hundred
thousand dollars in each such fiscal year; and (B) for the fiscal years
ending June 30, 2022, through June 30, 2026, five hundred sixty-eight
million three hundred thousand dollars in each such fiscal year.
(3) (A) For the fiscal [year] years commencing on or after July 1, 2026,
the Department of Social Services shall pay Medicaid supplemental
payments to nongovernmental [licensed short-term general hospitals
located in the state in the amount of seven hundred eight million three
hundred thousand dollars. For fiscal years commencing on or after July
1, 2027, the total amount of such supplemental payments paid to such
hospitals each fiscal year shall be increased twenty-five million dollars
over the total amount of such supplemental payments paid to such
hospitals in the immediately preceding fiscal year, provided such
Public Act No. 26-68 560 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
supplemental payments shall not be increased for any fiscal year unless
the total amount collected for the immediately preceding fiscal year
from the tax imposed on inpatient hospital services and outpatient
hospital services under section 12-263q, across all hospitals subject to
such tax, exceeds such amounts collected for the fiscal year prior to the
immediately preceding fiscal year by at least twenty-five million
dollars.] hospitals located in the state for inpatient hospital services,
outpatient hospital services and hospital-based physician and mid-level
services; hospital-affiliated medical groups; and faculty practice plans,
as set forth in subparagraph (B) of this subdivision. The commissioner
shall diligently pursue the federal approvals required for the
supplemental pools and payments set forth in this subdivision and shall
make such payments while federal approval is being pursued. During
the pendency of any request for approval to remove the exemption for
children's general hospitals under section 12-263q(b)(2), any children's
general hospital that would be eligible for payments under this
subdivision if such approval were granted shall be treated as eligible for
such payments unless and until the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services denies such request.
(B) (i) There is established a General Inpatient Supplemental Payment
Pool. All nongovernmental hospitals that do not receive
disproportionate share hospital payments shall participate in a pro rata
distribution of the pool based on each hospital's proportionate share of
total Medicaid inpatient revenue as reported to the Office of Health
Strategy for federal fiscal year 2024. The total amount available for
distribution under this subsection shall be: (I) For the state fiscal year
commencing July 1, 2026, $202,823,819; (II) for the state fiscal year
commencing July 1, 2027, $220,864,276; (III) for the state fiscal year
commencing July 1, 2028, $239,696,267; (IV) for the state fiscal year
commencing July 1, 2029, $258,122,646; and (V) for the state fiscal years
commencing on or after July 1, 2030, $277,597,027. To the extent a
hospital that was eligible for distributions from this pool dissolves or is
Public Act No. 26-68 561 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
no longer a nongovernmental hospital, the available funds for each year
shall be reduced by the amount that the hospital would have received
absent the change in status.
(ii) There is established a Small Hospital Inpatient Supplemental
Payment Pool for nongovernmental hospitals that do not receive
disproportionate share hospital payments and that have one hundred
eighty or fewer licensed inpatient beds. Payments shall be made on a
tiered basis according to total Medicaid inpatient revenue as reported
by such hospital to the Office of Health Strategy for federal fiscal year
2024. The supplemental payment amounts shall be: (I) For the state fiscal
year commencing July 1, 2026, $3,425,000 for each hospital with less than
$10,000,000 in Medicaid inpatient revenue and $9,675,000 for each
hospital with $10,000,000 or more in Medicaid inpatient revenue; (II) for
the state fiscal year commencing on July 1, 2027, $3,600,000 for each
hospital with less than $10,000,000 in Medicaid inpatient revenue and
$10,150,000 for each hospital with $10,000,000 or more in Medicaid
inpatient revenue; (III) for the state fiscal year commencing on July 1,
2028, $3,775,000 for each hospital with less than $10,000,000 in Medicaid
inpatient revenue and $10,650,000 for each hospital with $10,000,000 or
more in Medicaid inpatient revenue; (IV) for the state fiscal year
commencing July 1, 2029, $3,975,000 for each hospital with less than
$10,000,000 in Medicaid inpatient revenue and $11,175,000 for each
hospital with $10,000,000 or more in Medicaid inpatient revenue; and
(V) for state fiscal years on or after July 1, 2030, $4,175,000 for each
hospital with less than $10,000,000 in Medicaid inpatient revenue and
$11,700,000 for each hospital with $10,000,000 or more in Medicaid
inpatient revenue.
(iii) There is established a Mid-Sized Hospital Inpatient
Supplemental Payment Pool for nongovernmental hospitals that do not
receive disproportionate share hospital payments, have between one
hundred eighty-one and four hundred ninety-nine licensed inpatient
Public Act No. 26-68 562 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
beds, and have Medicaid gross revenue between six per cent and
eighteen per cent of total hospital revenue as reported by such hospital
to the Office of Health Strategy for federal fiscal year 2024. Payments
shall be tiered based on whether total Medicaid inpatient revenue is less
than or greater than $18,000,000 for federal fiscal year 2024. The
supplemental payment amounts shall be: (I) For the state fiscal year
commencing on July 1, 2026, $9,250,000 for each hospital with less than
$18,000,000 in Medicaid inpatient revenue and $19,000,000 for each
hospital with $18,000,000 or more in Medicaid inpatient revenue; (II) for
the state fiscal year commencing on July 1, 2027, $9,650,000 for each
hospital with less than $18,000,000 in Medicaid inpatient revenue and
$20,050,000 for each hospital with $18,000,000 or more in Medicaid
inpatient revenue; (III) for the state fiscal year commencing on July 1,
2028, $10,075,000 for each hospital with less than $18,000,000 in
Medicaid inpatient revenue and $21,125,000 for each hospital with
$18,000,000 or more in Medicaid inpatient revenue; (IV) for the state
fiscal year commencing on July 1, 2029, $10,550,000 for each hospital
with less than $18,000,000 in Medicaid inpatient revenue and
$22,225,000 for each hospital with $18,000,000 or more in Medicaid
inpatient revenue; and (V) for state fiscal years commencing on or after
July 1, 2030, $11,025,000 for each hospital with less than $18,000,000 in
Medicaid inpatient revenue and $23,350,000 for each hospital with
$18,000,000 or more in Medicaid inpatient revenue.
(iv) There is established an Independent Mid-Sized Hospital
Inpatient Supplemental Payment Pool for independent
nongovernmental hospitals that meet the criteria set forth in clause (iii)
of this subparagraph. Payments shall be tiered based on whether total
Medicaid inpatient revenue is less than or greater than $30,000,000 as
reported by such hospital to the Office of Health Strategy for federal
fiscal year 2024. The supplemental payment amounts shall be: (I) For the
state fiscal year commencing on July 1, 2026, $2,225,000 for each hospital
with less than $30,000,000 in Medicaid inpatient revenue and $6,700,000
Public Act No. 26-68 563 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
for each hospital with $30,000,000 or more in Medicaid inpatient
revenue; (II) for the state fiscal year commencing on July 1, 2027,
$2,400,000 for each hospital with less than $30,000,000 in Medicaid
inpatient revenue and $7,075,000 for each hospital with $30,000,000 or
more in Medicaid inpatient revenue; (III) for the state fiscal year
commencing on July 1, 2028, $2,575,000 for each hospital with less than
$30,000,000 in Medicaid inpatient revenue and $7,475,000 for each
hospital with $30,000,000 or more in Medicaid inpatient revenue; (IV)
for the state fiscal year commencing on July 1, 2029, $2,725,000 for each
hospital with less than $30,000,000 in Medicaid inpatient revenue and
$7,950,000 for each hospital with $30,000,000 or more in Medicaid
inpatient revenue; and (V) for state fiscal years commencing on or after
July 1, 2030, $2,875,000 for each hospital with less than $30,000,000 in
Medicaid inpatient revenue and $8,400,000 for each hospital with
$30,000,000 or more in Medicaid inpatient revenue. This pool shall be in
addition to and not in lieu of the supplemental payment pool set forth
in clause (iii) of this subparagraph.
(v) There is established a Large Hospital Inpatient Supplemental
Payment Pool for nongovernmental hospitals that do not receive
disproportionate share hospital payments, have five hundred or more
licensed inpatient beds, and have Medicaid inpatient revenue greater
than $150,000,000. Payments shall be tiered based on whether total
Medicaid inpatient revenue is less than or greater than $300,000,000 as
reported by such hospital to the Office of Health Strategy by such
hospital for federal fiscal year 2024. The supplemental payment
amounts shall be: (I) For the state fiscal year commencing on July 1, 2026,
$63,000,000 for each hospital with less than $300,000,000 in Medicaid
inpatient revenue and $117,000,000 for each hospital with $300,000,000
or more in Medicaid inpatient revenue; (II) for the state fiscal year
commencing on July 1, 2027, $65,900,000 for each hospital with less than
$300,000,000 in Medicaid inpatient revenue and $127,100,000 for each
hospital with $300,000,000 or more in Medicaid inpatient revenue; (III)
Public Act No. 26-68 564 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
for the state fiscal year commencing on July 1, 2028, $68,675,000 for each
hospital with less than $300,000,000 in Medicaid inpatient revenue and
$137,325,000 for each hospital with $300,000,000 or more in Medicaid
inpatient revenue; (IV) for the state fiscal year commencing on July 1,
2029, $71,800,000 for each hospital with less than $300,000,000 in
Medicaid inpatient revenue and $148,200,000 for each hospital with
$300,000,000 or more in Medicaid inpatient revenue; and (V) for the state
fiscal years commencing on or after July 1, 2030, $74,850,000 for each
hospital with less than $300,000,000 in Medicaid inpatient revenue and
$159,150,000 for each hospital with $300,000,000 or more in Medicaid
inpatient revenue.
(vi) There is established a General Outpatient Supplemental Payment
Pool. All nongovernmental hospitals that do not receive
disproportionate share hospital payments shall participate in a pro rata
distribution based on total Medicaid outpatient revenue as reported by
such hospitals to the Office of Health Strategy for federal fiscal year
2024. The total amount available for distribution under this subsection
shall be: (I) For the state fiscal year commencing July 1, 2026,
$194,995,425; (II) for the state fiscal year commencing July 1, 2027,
$221,565,186; (III) for the state fiscal year commencing July 1, 2028,
$248,852,236; (IV) for the state fiscal year commencing July 1, 2029,
$276,805,190; and (V) for state fiscal years commencing on or after July
1, 2030, $305,623,328. To the extent a hospital that was eligible for
distributions from this pool dissolves or is no longer a nongovernmental
hospital, the available funds for each year shall be reduced by the
amount that the hospital would have received absent the change in
status.
(vii) There is established a Mid-Sized Hospital Outpatient
Supplemental Payment Pool for nongovernmental hospitals that do not
receive disproportionate share hospital payments with between 50,000
and 90,000 annual emergency department visits and with Medicaid
Public Act No. 26-68 565 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
gross revenue between six per cent and eighteen per cent of total
revenue as reported by such hospital to the Office of Health Strategy for
federal fiscal year 2024. Payments shall be tiered based on whether total
Medicaid outpatient revenue is less than or greater than $30,000,000 for
federal fiscal year 2024. The supplemental payment amounts shall be:
(I) For the state fiscal year commencing on July 1, 2026, $9,250,000 for
each hospital with less than $30,000,000 in Medicaid outpatient revenue
and $19,000,000 for each hospital with $30,000,000 or more in Medicaid
outpatient revenue; (II) for the state fiscal year commencing on July 1,
2027, $9,650,000 for each hospital with less than $30,000,000 in Medicaid
outpatient revenue and $20,050,000 for each hospital with $30,000,000 or
more in Medicaid outpatient revenue; (III) for the state fiscal year
commencing on July 1, 2028, $10,075,000 for each hospital with less than
$30,000,000 in Medicaid outpatient revenue and $21,125,000 for each
hospital with $30,000,000 or more in Medicaid outpatient revenue; (IV)
for the state fiscal year commencing on July 1, 2029, $10,550,000 for each
hospital with less than $30,000,000 in Medicaid outpatient revenue and
$22,225,000 for each hospital with $30,000,000 or more in Medicaid
outpatient revenue; and (V) for state fiscal years commencing on or after
July 1, 2030, $11,025,000 for each hospital with less than $30,000,000 in
Medicaid outpatient revenue and $23,350,000 for each hospital with
$30,000,000 or more in Medicaid outpatient revenue.
(viii) There is established an Independent Mid-Sized Hospital
Outpatient Supplemental Payment Pool for independent
nongovernmental hospitals meeting the criteria in clause (vii) of this
subparagraph. Payments shall be tiered based on whether total
Medicaid outpatient revenue is less than or greater than $30,000,000 as
reported by such hospital to the Office of Health Strategy for federal
fiscal year 2024. The supplemental payment amounts shall be: (I) For the
state fiscal year commencing on July 1, 2026, $2,225,000 for each hospital
with less than $30,000,000 in Medicaid outpatient revenue and
$6,700,000 for each hospital with $30,000,000 or more in Medicaid
Public Act No. 26-68 566 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
outpatient revenue; (II) for the state fiscal year commencing on July 1,
2027, $2,400,000 for each hospital with less than $30,000,000 in Medicaid
outpatient revenue and $7,075,000 for each hospital with $30,000,000 or
more in Medicaid outpatient revenue; (III) for the state fiscal year
commencing on July 1, 2028, $2,575,000 for each hospital with less than
$30,000,000 in Medicaid outpatient revenue and $7,475,000 for each
hospital with $30,000,000 or more in Medicaid outpatient revenue; (IV)
for the state fiscal year commencing on July 1, 2029, $2,725,000 for each
hospital with less than $30,000,000 in Medicaid outpatient revenue and
$7,950,000 for each hospital with $30,000,000 or more in Medicaid
outpatient revenue; and (V) for state fiscal years commencing on or after
July 1, 2030, $2,875,000 for each hospital with less than $30,000,000 in
Medicaid outpatient revenue and $8,400,000 for each hospital with
$30,000,000 or more in Medicaid outpatient revenue. This pool shall be
in addition to and not in lieu of the supplemental payment pool set forth
in clause (vii) of this subparagraph.
(ix) For state fiscal years commencing on or after July 1, 2026, the
Commissioner of Social Services shall make disproportionate share
hospital payments in accordance with section 1923 of the Social Security
Act, 42 USC 1396r-4, as amended from time to time, and subject to the
state's annual federal disproportionate share hospital payment
allotment. Disproportionate share hospital payments shall be made to
the following qualifying hospitals, subject to federal eligibility
requirements and hospital-specific disproportionate share hospital
payment limits based on uncompensated care costs: (I) Private acute
care hospitals located in a municipality with a population greater than
one hundred forty-five thousand and having a federal fiscal year 2024
Medicaid charges as a percentage of total charges greater than twenty-
five per cent. The disproportionate share hospital payment amounts for
such hospital shall be: For the state fiscal year commencing July 1, 2026,
$45,792,235; for the state fiscal year commencing July 1, 2027,
$45,648,705; for the state fiscal year commencing July 1, 2028,
Public Act No. 26-68 567 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
$45,516,217; for the state fiscal year commencing July 1, 2029,
$45,395,510; and for the state fiscal years commencing on or after July 1,
2030, $45,282,754; (II) for a private acute care hospital within a state-
sponsored corporate structure located in a large urban municipality and
having federal fiscal year 2024 Medicaid charges as a percentage of total
charges between twenty per cent and twenty-five per cent, the
disproportionate share hospital payment amounts for such hospital
shall be: For the state fiscal year commencing July 1, 2026, $7,706,981; for
the state fiscal year commencing July 1, 2027, $8,541,956; for the state
fiscal year commencing July 1, 2028, $9,393,031; for the state fiscal year
commencing July 1, 2029, $10,260,616; and for the state fiscal years
commencing on or after July 1, 2030, $11,146,556; and (III) for licensed
freestanding private acute care children's hospitals having federal fiscal
year 2024 Medicaid charges as a percentage of total charges greater than
thirty-five per cent, the disproportionate share hospital payment
amounts for such hospital shall be: For the state fiscal year commencing
July 1, 2026, $40,000,784; for the state fiscal year commencing July 1,
2027, $42,020,839; for the state fiscal year commencing July 1, 2028,
$44,092,385; for the state fiscal year commencing July 1, 2029,
$46,216,555; and for the state fiscal year commencing on or after July 1,
2030, $48,397,679. The disproportionate share hospital payments
authorized under this subclause shall be supplemental to, and not in
lieu of, the thirteen million one hundred thirty-eight thousand seven
hundred thirty-seven dollars in disproportionate share hospital
payment amounts otherwise appropriated, allotted or otherwise
provided to the hospitals eligible under this subclause in the state
budget for the state fiscal year commencing July 1, 2026, which amount
shall serve as a funding baseline for each state fiscal year during the five-
year period commencing July 1, 2026. Such baseline amount shall not be
reduced, offset, supplanted or otherwise taken into account in
determining the payments authorized under this subclause. All
disproportionate share hospital payments made pursuant to this
subsection shall remain subject to hospital-specific limits based on each
Public Act No. 26-68 568 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
hospital's uncompensated care costs, as required under federal law. For
state fiscal years commencing on or after July 1, 2026, the Commissioner
of Social Services shall adjust aggregate disproportionate share hospital
payments for hospitals owned and operated exclusively by the state so
that these amounts, when combined with payments pursuant to this
subclause and with existing disproportionate share hospital payments
to nongovernmental hospitals, do not exceed the state's federal
disproportionate share hospital payment allotment for the applicable
federal fiscal year.
(x) For state fiscal years commencing on or after July 1, 2026, there
shall be established a supplemental pool in the total amount of
$72,750,000 to be distributed to hospital-affiliated medical groups for
hospital-affiliated medical group physician and mid-level practitioner
services and to hospitals for hospital-based physician and mid-level
practitioner services, who apply for funds in consultation with their
controlling hospital or health system and are deemed eligible for such
payments by the Department of Social Services on or before June 30,
2026. Such payments shall be apportioned among eligible entities in
proportion to the difference, referred to as the gap, between (I) the
Medicaid payments received by the entity for physician and mid-level
practitioner services for the state fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, and
(II) the amount the entity would have received for such services if paid
under the Medicare Physician Fee Schedule adopted by the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services for calendar year 2026, calculated in
accordance with applicable federal law and regulations. The
commissioner shall distribute the available funds so that each entity
receives the same percentage of its gap, subject to the total amount
available for such payments. For fiscal years commencing on or after
July 1, 2027, the amount of payments set forth in this section shall be
made in each subsequent fiscal year, unless modified through any
provision of the general statutes. This section shall not apply to hospital-
affiliated medical groups primarily affiliated with a children's hospital
Public Act No. 26-68 569 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
or to a children's hospital directly. To the extent an entity or group that
was eligible for distributions from this pool dissolves or is no longer
affiliated with a nongovernmental hospital, the available funds for each
year shall be reduced by the amount that the entity or group would have
received absent the change in status.
(xi) For state fiscal years commencing on or after July 1, 2026, there
shall be established a supplemental pool in the total amount of
$32,250,000 to be distributed to faculty practice plans, who apply for and
are deemed eligible for such payments by the Department of Social
Services on or before June 30, 2026, because they meet all of the
following criteria for the state fiscal year ending June 30, 2025: (I) The
faculty practice plan consists of more than 1,300 Medicaid enrolled
physicians and mid-level practitioners; and (II) the faculty practice plan
has annual Medicaid revenue attributable to physician and mid-level
practitioner services exceeding fifty million dollars. Such payments
shall be apportioned among eligible faculty practice plans in proportion
to the difference, referred to as the gap, between the Medicaid payments
received by the entity for physician and mid-level practitioner services
for the state fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, and the amount the plan
would have received for such services if paid under the Medicare
Physician Fee Schedule adopted by the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services for calendar year 2026, calculated in accordance with
applicable federal law and regulations. The Commissioner of Social
Services shall distribute the available funds so that each entity receives
the same percentage of its gap, subject to the total amount available for
such payments. For fiscal years commencing on or after July 1, 2027, the
amount of payments set forth in this section shall be made in each
subsequent fiscal year, unless modified through any provision of the
general statutes. To the extent a faculty practice plan that was eligible
for distributions from this pool dissolves or is no longer affiliated with
a nongovernmental hospital, the available funds for each year shall be
reduced by the amount that the faculty practice plan would have
Public Act No. 26-68 570 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
received absent the change in status.
(xii) If the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services does not
approve the use of Medicaid payments for the state fiscal year ending
June 30, 2025, or the Medicare Physician Fee Schedule for calendar year
2026 for purposes of calculating the applicable upper payment limit gap
as specified in clauses (x) and (xi) of this subparagraph, the
Commissioner of Social Services may instead use the Medicaid
payments or Medicare Physician Fee Schedule for the most recent
calendar year approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services for such purpose or any other methodology approved by the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that results in the same
total aggregate pool amounts, and, to the greatest extent feasible,
comparable distribution set forth in clauses (x) and (xi) of this
subparagraph, and such substitution shall not require further legislative
action.
(xiii) Supplemental payment amounts established in accordance with
clauses (x) and (xi) of this subparagraph shall apply for the state fiscal
year commencing July 1, 2026, and for each state fiscal year thereafter,
notwithstanding any requirement to update, refresh or rebase the upper
payment limit demonstration to comply with federal law or guidance.
Any adjustment required to ensure compliance with applicable upper
payment limit requirements shall be made solely in accordance with
subparagraph (C) of subdivision (4) of this subsection.
(xiv) Commencing upon the beginning of any state fiscal year in
which the base year used to calculate the net patient revenue for the tax
on the provision of inpatient hospital services and the tax on outpatient
hospital services pursuant to subdivision (4) of subsection (a) of section
12-263q occurs, the Commissioner of Social Services shall, after
conferring with the Connecticut Hospital Association, revise, to the
extent necessary, the supplemental payment pool structure, pool
amounts, disproportionate share hospital payment amounts and
Public Act No. 26-68 571 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
distribution methodologies set forth in this subdivision so that the
combined value of supplemental payments, disproportionate share
hospital payments, hospital-based physician and mid-level practitioner
payments, hospital-affiliated medical group payments and faculty
practice plan payments to each health system and its affiliates is
maintained in a manner as proportionate as practicable in relation to the
updated all-payer revenue data used for such rebasing and anticipated
total tax liability, with such variation as may be necessary to reflect
updated provider status changes, federal approval requirements or
compliance with federal law. In making such revisions, the
commissioner shall consider the aggregate value of payments
attributable to each health system and its affiliates, including payments
made directly to hospitals, hospital-affiliated medical groups, faculty
practice plans and hospital-based physician and mid-level practitioner
services. For purposes of this clause, such aggregate value shall include
the value of historical rate-based payment increases, which, solely for
purposes of this clause, are assumed to be in the amount of three
hundred seventy-five million four hundred forty-seven thousand three
dollars, reallocated to reflect utilization for the applicable base year.
(4) (A) All supplemental payments made pursuant to subdivision (3)
of this subsection shall be made in compliance with applicable federal
law governing Medicaid payments and federal financial participation,
including, but not limited to: (i) Sections 1902(a)(30)(A), 1903 and 1923
of the Social Security Act; and (ii) 42 CFR Part 447, including the
Medicaid Upper Payment Limit regulations, as amended from time to
time.
(B) The Commissioner of Social Services shall calculate and monitor
applicable aggregate and provider-specific upper payment limits for
each class of providers to ensure compliance with federal requirements.
Subject to approval by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services,
on or before June thirtieth of each fiscal year, the Department of Social
Public Act No. 26-68 572 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Services shall calculate and submit the inpatient and outpatient hospital
upper payment limit demonstrations for the upcoming fiscal year to the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or, if not approved by the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the inpatient and
outpatient hospital upper limit demonstrations for the current fiscal
year. The Department of Social Services shall consult with the
Connecticut Hospital Association at least fifteen days before submission
to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
(C) (i) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, if, at
any time during a state fiscal year, the Commissioner of Social Services
determines that one or more of the supplemental payments and other
payments set forth in this subsection scheduled for a future quarter may
exceed an applicable aggregate or provider-specific upper payment
limit or violate any federal requirement in a manner that makes any
extent of payments ineligible for federal financial participation or
otherwise fails to maximize federal financial participation, as
determined by the commissioner, the commissioner may, in
consultation with the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management
and the Connecticut Hospital Association, to the extent feasible, revise
the payment structure in a manner that ensures ongoing compliance
with all applicable federal requirements and which, in aggregate,
produces a total state-wide level of payments that is not materially less
than the total state-wide level of payments contemplated under this
subsection, and that result in the combined value of supplemental
payments, disproportionate share hospital payments, faculty practice
plan payments and hospital-affiliated medical group payments to each
health system and its affiliates being as nearly equivalent as practicable
to the payment levels contemplated under this subsection, with
variation permitted only to the extent necessary to obtain federal
approval, comply with federal law or maximize federal financial
participation.
Public Act No. 26-68 573 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(ii) If the Commissioner of Social Services determines that it is not
possible to make the adjustments set forth in clause (i) of this
subparagraph, then, notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of subdivision
(4) of this subsection, if, at any time during a state fiscal year, the
commissioner determines that supplemental payments scheduled for a
future quarter may exceed an applicable aggregate or provider-specific
upper payment limit or any other federal requirement that makes any
portion of such payments ineligible for federal financial participation,
the commissioner shall continue to make the scheduled supplemental
payments to eligible providers and adjust such payments solely to the
extent necessary to account for any portion of federal financial
participation that is disallowed, deferred, or otherwise unavailable as a
result of the upper payment limit determination.
(iii) Any adjustment made pursuant to clause (ii) of this
subparagraph, whether implemented prospectively through payment
reductions or retrospectively through recoupment, shall be limited to
the amount of federal financial participation that is disallowed or
deferred due to upper payment limit requirements; and, in the case of
hospital supplemental payments, be applied on a pro rata basis across
the affected provider or service class or classes in proportion to each
provider's share of the applicable supplemental payment pool for the
relevant period. In no event shall the state reduce or recover amounts
exceeding the federal share disallowed as a result of upper payment
limit requirements.
(5) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to relieve the state
of its obligation to ensure compliance with federal Medicaid
requirements or to prevent the Commissioner of Social Services from
adopting policies, procedures or regulations necessary to maintain
federal approval of the state Medicaid plan.
(6) Payments authorized under subdivision (3) of this subsection
shall be based on each entity's characteristics as of January 1, 2025,
Public Act No. 26-68 574 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
absent dissolution or a change in status from a nongovernmental entity.
Payments under this subsection shall continue to be made to any
successor organization resulting from a merger, consolidation or
acquisition, provided such successor organization remains a
nongovernmental hospital eligible for Medicaid enrollment. In the event
that an entity existing as of January 1, 2025, was acquired by more than
one entity thereafter, payments that would be due to that entity will be
equitably apportioned among the acquirors.
[(B) The Department of Social Services shall not pay Medicaid
supplemental payments in a manner that does not comply with
applicable federal requirements and required federal approvals,
including, but not limited to, payments that cause total hospital
payments in an applicable category to exceed the upper payment limit,
as defined in section 17b-239.]
[(4)] (7) From July 1, 2019, through June 30, 2026, the Department of
Social Services shall make supplemental payments to the applicable
hospitals on or before the last day of the first month of each calendar
quarter, except that payments scheduled to be made before December
19, 2019, shall be made not later than thirty days after December 19,
2019.
[(5)] (8) If a nongovernmental licensed short-term general hospital
located in the state merges or consolidates with or is acquired by another
hospital, such that the hospital does not continue to maintain a separate
short-term general hospital license, the supplemental payments that
would have been paid to the hospital that no longer maintains such
license shall be paid instead to the surviving hospital, beginning with
the first calendar quarter that commences on or after the effective date
of the merger, consolidation or acquisition. If a nongovernmental
licensed short-term general hospital located in the state dissolves, ceases
to operate or otherwise terminates licensed short-term general hospital
services, the supplemental payments that would have been paid to such
Public Act No. 26-68 575 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
hospital shall not be paid to any other hospital for the remainder of the
fiscal year in which such hospital dissolves, ceases operations or
otherwise terminates such services and for any fiscal year thereafter.
[Commencing with the fiscal year after the hospital dissolved, ceased to
operate or otherwise terminated such services, the supplemental
payments that would have been made to such hospital shall be
redistributed to all other nongovernmental licensed short-term general
hospitals located in the state in accordance with the distribution
methodology set forth in the settlement agreement for each
supplemental pool.]
[(6)] (9) Both the state and federal share of supplemental payments
set forth in this subsection shall be appropriated to the Department of
Social Services. Such supplemental payments shall not be subject to
rescissions or holdbacks. Nothing in this section shall affect the
authority of the state to recover overpayments and collect unpaid
liabilities, as authorized by law.
[(d) To the extent required by the settlement agreement, including
any court order issued in accordance with the provisions of section 12-
263z, the commissioner shall make the supplemental payments set forth
in this section effective for the dates of service set forth in this section,
including payment adjustments to reconcile, in accordance with this
section, supplemental payments made to hospitals for the calendar
quarter ending September 30, 2019, as interim payments. Such
reconciliation shall ensure that, after accounting for such payment
adjustments, the actual supplemental payments made to each hospital
shall be the amounts due to each hospital pursuant to the settlement
agreement, even if federal approvals are received after each applicable
date that supplemental payments are required to be made, provided the
supplemental payments remain subject to federal approval. If federal
approval of such payments is not obtained, such payments may later be
recovered by the commissioner by recoupment against other Medicaid
Public Act No. 26-68 576 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
payments due to a hospital or in any manner authorized by law.]
Sec. 364. Section 19a-754f of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
For the purposes of this section and sections 19a-754g to 19a-754k,
inclusive:
(1) "All-payer claims database" means the database established under
section 19a-755a;
(2) "Drug manufacturer" means the manufacturer of a drug that is:
(A) Included in the information and data submitted by a health carrier
pursuant to section 38a-479qqq, (B) studied or listed pursuant to
subsection (c) or (d) of section 19a-754b, or (C) in a therapeutic class of
drugs that the [Commissioner of Health Strategy] Secretary of the Office
of Policy and Management determines, through public or private
reports, has had a substantial impact on prescription drug expenditures,
net of rebates, as a percentage of total health care expenditures;
[(2) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Health Strategy;]
(3) "Health care cost growth benchmark" means the annual
benchmark established pursuant to section 19a-754g;
(4) "Health care quality benchmark" means an annual benchmark
established pursuant to section 19a-754g;
(5) "Health care provider" has the same meaning as provided in
subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 19a-17b;
(6) "Hospital payment growth benchmark" means a benchmark value
to measure annual hospital payment growth that is equal to the cost
growth benchmark value established in section 19a-754g;
(7) "Hospital payment growth methodology" means a methodology
Public Act No. 26-68 577 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
developed by the secretary to measure a hospital's annual change in
standardized payment per unit of service, by market or service category,
or both, while holding utilization constant and adjusting for, or
otherwise taking into consideration, the factors set forth in subdivision
(2) of subsection (a) of section 19a-754i to distinguish payment growth
from changes in utilization, clinical risk, service volume, service mix and
payer reimbursement practices;
[(6)] (8) "Net cost of private health insurance" means the difference
between premiums earned and benefits incurred, and includes insurers'
costs of paying bills, advertising, sales commissions, and other
administrative costs, net additions or subtractions from reserves, rate
credits and dividends, premium taxes and profits or losses;
[(7)] (9) "Office" means the Office of [Health Strategy established
under section 19a-754a] Policy and Management;
[(8)] (10) "Other entity" means a drug manufacturer, pharmacy
benefits manager or other health care provider that is not considered a
provider entity;
[(9)] (11) "Payer" means a payer, including Medicaid, Medicare and
governmental and nongovernment health plans, and includes any
organization acting as payer that is a subsidiary, affiliate or business
owned or controlled by a payer that, during a given calendar year, pays
health care providers for health care services or pharmacies or provider
entities for prescription drugs designated by the [Commissioner of
Health Strategy] Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management;
[(10)] (12) "Performance year" means the most recent calendar year
for which data were submitted for the applicable health care cost growth
benchmark, primary care spending target or health care quality
benchmark;
[(11)] (13) "Pharmacy benefits manager" has the same meaning as
Public Act No. 26-68 578 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
provided in subdivision (10) of section 38a-479ooo;
[(12)] (14) "Primary care spending target" means the annual target
established pursuant to section 19a-754g;
[(13)] (15) "Provider entity" means an organized group of clinicians
that come together for the purposes of contracting, or are an established
billing unit that, at a minimum, includes primary care providers, and
that collectively, during any given calendar year, has enough attributed
lives to participate in total cost of care contracts, even if they are not
engaged in a total cost of care contract;
[(14)] (16) "Potential gross state product" means a forecasted measure
of the economy that equals the sum of the (A) expected growth in
national labor force productivity, (B) expected growth in the state's labor
force, and (C) expected national inflation, minus the expected state
population growth;
(17) "Secretary" means the Secretary of the Office of Policy and
Management;
[(15)] (18) "Total health care expenditures" means the sum of all
health care expenditures in this state from public and private sources
for a given calendar year, including: (A) All claims-based spending paid
to providers, net of pharmacy rebates, (B) all patient cost-sharing
amounts, and (C) the net cost of private health insurance; and
[(16)] (19) "Total medical expense" means the total cost of care for the
patient population of a payer or provider entity for a given calendar
year, where cost is calculated for such year as the sum of (A) all claims-
based spending paid to providers by public and private payers, and net
of pharmacy rebates, (B) all nonclaims payments for such year,
including, but not limited to, incentive payments and care coordination
payments, and (C) all patient cost-sharing amounts expressed on a per
capita basis for the patient population of a payer or provider entity in
Public Act No. 26-68 579 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
this state.
Sec. 365. Section 19a-754g of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective July 1, 2026):
[(a) Not later than July 1, 2022, the commissioner shall publish (1) the
health care cost growth benchmarks and annual primary care spending
targets as a percentage of total medical expenses for the calendar years
2021 to 2025, inclusive, and (2) the annual health care quality
benchmarks for the calendar years 2022 to 2025, inclusive, on the office's
Internet web site.]
[(b) (1) (A)] (a) (1) Not later than July 1, 2025, and every five years
thereafter, the [commissioner] secretary shall develop and adopt annual
health care cost growth benchmarks and annual primary care spending
targets for the succeeding five calendar years for provider entities and
payers.
[(B) In developing the health care cost growth benchmarks and
primary care spending targets pursuant to this subdivision, the
commissioner shall consider (i) any historical and forecasted changes in
median income for individuals in the state and the growth rate of
potential gross state product, (ii) the rate of inflation, and (iii) the most
recent report prepared by the commissioner pursuant to subsection (b)
of section 19a-754h.]
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this
subsection, not later than July 1, 2027, the secretary shall establish the
annual cost growth benchmark as follows:
(A) For calendar years 2028 to 2032, inclusive, the health care cost
growth benchmark shall be equal to three and nine-tenths per cent.
(B) For calendar year 2033, and every five years thereafter, the
Public Act No. 26-68 580 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
secretary shall develop and adopt annual health care cost growth
benchmarks for the succeeding five calendar years for provider entities
and payers that shall be equal to the sum of twenty per cent of the
projected growth in median Connecticut household income and eighty
per cent of the greater of: (i) Growth in Connecticut potential gross state
product for such year, or (ii) the annual growth in the employment cost
index for total compensation for private industry workers in the New
England Census Region published by the United States Bureau of Labor
Statistics, or any successor regional labor cost index designated by the
secretary, for such year.
[(C) (i)] (b) The [commissioner] secretary shall hold at least one
informational public hearing prior to adopting the health care cost
growth benchmarks and primary care spending targets for each
succeeding five-year period described in this subdivision. The
[commissioner] secretary may hold informational public hearings
concerning any annual health care cost growth benchmark and primary
care spending target set pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. [or
subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of this section.] Such informational
public hearings shall be held at a time and place designated by the
[commissioner] secretary in a notice prominently posted by the
[commissioner] secretary on the office's Internet web site and in a form
and manner prescribed by the commissioner. The [commissioner]
secretary shall make available on the office's Internet web site a
summary of any such informational public hearing and include the
[commissioner's] secretary's recommendations, if any, to modify or not
to modify any such annual quality benchmark or target.
[(ii) If the commissioner determines, after any informational public
hearing held pursuant to this subparagraph, that a modification to any
health care cost growth benchmark or annual primary care spending
target is, in the commissioner's discretion, reasonably warranted, the
commissioner may modify such benchmark or target.]
Public Act No. 26-68 581 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(c) (1) Not later than July 1, 2027, the secretary, in consultation with
an association of hospitals in the state, shall develop and adopt hospital
payment growth methodology to measure a hospital's annual change in
payment per unit. Such methodology shall be effective for performance
year 2028, and shall, to the maximum extent feasible, adjust for or
otherwise take into consideration the factors set forth in subdivision (2)
of subsection (a) of section 19a-754i.
(2) Before finalizing the methodology, the secretary shall provide
each hospital with its hospital-specific preliminary results, the data and
assumptions used to calculate such results and a period of not less than
ninety days to validate, verify or challenge such methodology, data,
assumptions and preliminary results. The secretary shall consider all
timely corrections or challenges submitted by a hospital and shall
amend the methodology or preliminary results as appropriate.
(3) Not later than January 1, 2029, the secretary shall publish the final
hospital payment growth methodology on the office's Internet web site,
together with a written response to material comments received, a
description of any changes made to the methodology following testing
and validation and an explanation of how the methodology accounts for
material changes in patient acuity, clinical complexity, severity of
illness, case mix, service intensity, payer mix, service mix, coding
guidance, payer claims adjudication practices and services provided.
[(iii)] (4) The [commissioner] secretary shall annually [(I)] (A) review
the current and projected rate of inflation, and [(II)] (B) include on the
office's Internet web site the [commissioner's] secretary's findings of
such review, including the reasons for making or not making a
modification to any applicable health care cost growth benchmark. If the
[commissioner] secretary determines that the rate of inflation requires
modification of any health care cost growth benchmark adopted under
this section, the [commissioner] secretary may modify such benchmark.
In such event, the [commissioner] secretary shall not be required to hold
Public Act No. 26-68 582 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
an informational public hearing concerning such modified health care
cost growth benchmark.
[(D) The commissioner shall post each adopted health care cost
growth benchmark and annual primary care spending target on the
office's Internet web site.
(E) Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraphs (A) to (D),
inclusive, of this subdivision, if the average annual health care cost
growth benchmark for a succeeding five-year period described in this
subdivision differs from the average annual health care cost growth
benchmark for the five-year period preceding such succeeding five-year
period by more than one-half of one per cent, the commissioner shall
submit the annual health care cost growth benchmarks developed for
such succeeding five-year period to the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to insurance
for the committee's review and approval. The committee shall be
deemed to have approved such annual health care cost growth
benchmarks for such succeeding five-year period, except upon a vote to
reject such benchmarks by the majority of committee members at a
meeting of such committee called for the purpose of reviewing such
benchmarks and held not later than thirty days after the commissioner
submitted such benchmarks to such committee. If the committee votes
to reject such benchmarks, the commissioner may submit to the
committee modified annual health care cost growth benchmarks for
such succeeding five-year period for the committee's review and
approval in accordance with the provisions of this subparagraph. The
commissioner shall not be required to hold an informational public
hearing concerning such modified benchmarks. Until the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to insurance approves annual health care cost growth
benchmarks for the succeeding five-year period, such benchmarks shall
be deemed to be equal to the average annual health care cost growth
Public Act No. 26-68 583 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
benchmark for the preceding five-year period.]
(d) In developing and adopting primary care spending targets
pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of this section, the secretary
shall:
(1) Use total medical expense as the denominator and include in
primary care spending both claims-based and nonclaims-based
payments attributable to primary care providers, primary care services
and primary care infrastructure, including, but not limited to, primary
care capitation, care management and care coordination payments, as
determined by the secretary, and may exclude market-specific factors,
such as long-term care, as determined by the secretary;
(2) Establish separate market-specific primary care spending targets
for the commercial market, Medicaid, Medicare and Medicare
Advantage, to the extent feasible and practicable, and adjust the
calculation and assessment of each payer and provider against the
market-specific primary care spending target to account for material
differences in age and sex distribution;
(3) Adopt annual market-specific targets for the succeeding five
calendar years that reflect progressive improvement toward a market-
specific reference percentage determined by the secretary based on
primary care access needs, workforce capacity, health equity and
comparable market data, provided the cumulative increase in any such
target over such five-year period shall not exceed five per cent of such
adjusted baseline; and
(4) Calculate the state-wide annual primary care spending target as
the member-month weighted average of the market-specific targets
established pursuant to this subdivision.
[(2) (A)] (e) (1) Not later than July 1, 2025, and every five years
thereafter, the [commissioner] secretary shall develop and adopt annual
Public Act No. 26-68 584 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
health care quality benchmarks for the succeeding five calendar years
for provider entities and payers.
[(B)] (2) In developing annual health care quality benchmarks
pursuant to this subdivision, the [commissioner] secretary shall
consider [(i)] (A) quality measures endorsed by nationally recognized
organizations, including, but not limited to, the National Quality
Forum, the National Committee for Quality Assurance, the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services, the National Centers for Disease
Control and Prevention, the Joint Commission and expert organizations
that develop health equity measures, and [(ii)] (B) measures that: [(I)] (i)
Concern health outcomes, overutilization, underutilization and patient
safety, [(II)] (ii) meet standards of patient-centeredness and ensure
consideration of differences in preferences and clinical characteristics
within patient subpopulations, and [(III)] (iii) concern community
health or population health.
[(C) (i)] (f) (1) The [commissioner] secretary shall hold at least one
informational public hearing prior to adopting the health care quality
benchmarks for each succeeding five-year period described in this
subdivision. The [commissioner] secretary may hold informational
public hearings concerning the quality measures the [commissioner]
secretary proposes to adopt as health care quality benchmarks. Such
informational public hearings shall be held at a time and place
designated by the [commissioner] secretary in a notice prominently
posted by the [commissioner] secretary on the office's Internet web site
and in a form and manner prescribed by the [commissioner] secretary.
The [commissioner] secretary shall make available on the office's
Internet web site a summary of any such informational public hearing
and include the recommendations, if any, to modify or not modify any
such health care quality benchmark.
[(ii)] (2) If the [commissioner] secretary determines, after any
informational public hearing held pursuant to this subparagraph, that
Public Act No. 26-68 585 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
modifications to any health care quality benchmarks are, in the
[commissioner's] secretary's discretion, reasonably warranted, the
[commissioner] secretary may modify such quality benchmarks. The
[commissioner] secretary shall not be required to hold an additional
informational public hearing concerning such modified quality
benchmarks.
[(D)] (3) The [commissioner] secretary shall post each adopted health
care quality benchmark on the office's Internet web site.
[(c)] (g) The [commissioner] secretary may enter into such contractual
agreements as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this section,
including, but not limited to, contractual agreements with actuarial,
economic and other experts and consultants.
(h) In implementing the provisions of this section, the secretary shall
not later than July 1, 2028, perform the following functions:
(1) Adopt and make available on the office's Internet web site a
revised methodology for analyzing data from the all-payer claims
database and for identifying entities that are significant contributors to
health care cost growth. Such methodology shall use data analytics that
examine the contribution of material changes in clinical risk payment
methodologies that have a material change on cost growth measures;
(2) Adopt and make available on the office's Internet web site a
revised methodology for assessing compliance with the health care cost
growth benchmark. Such methodology shall assess cost growth for each
provider entity and hospital in the aggregate across governmental and
private payers and shall adjust for clinical risk, and account for changes
in payment methodologies that have a material change on cost growth
measures; and
(3) Nothing in this subsection shall prevent the secretary from
reporting the cost growth performance of each provider at the market
Public Act No. 26-68 586 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
level.
Sec. 366. Section 19a-754h of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) Not later than August [15, 2022, and] fifteenth annually,
[thereafter,] each payer and hospital shall report to the [commissioner]
secretary, in a form and manner prescribed by the [commissioner]
secretary, for the preceding or prior years, if the [commissioner]
secretary so requests based on material changes to data previously
submitted, aggregated data, including aggregated self-funded data as
applicable, necessary for the [commissioner] secretary to calculate total
health care expenditures, primary care spending as a percentage of total
medical expenses, [and] net cost of private health insurance, and
performance toward the hospital payment growth benchmark, as
applicable. The secretary shall seek to limit the burden of reporting
requirements and rely on data sources available to the secretary before
seeking data reporting from hospitals. Each payer shall also disclose, as
requested by the [commissioner] secretary, payer data required for
adjusting total medical expense calculations to reflect changes in the
patient population.
(b) Not later than March [31, 2023, and] thirty-first annually,
[thereafter, the commissioner] the secretary shall prepare and post on
the office's Internet web site, a report concerning the total health care
expenditures utilizing the total aggregate medical expenses reported by
payers pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, including, but not
limited to, a breakdown of such population-adjusted total medical
expenses by payer and provider entities. The report may include, but
[shall] need not be limited to, information regarding the following:
(1) Trends in major service category spending;
(2) [Primary care spending as a percentage of total medical expenses]
Public Act No. 26-68 587 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
For each market and payer, both (A) the percentage of total medical
expense devoted to primary care, and (B) primary care spending
expressed on a per-member-per-month basis;
(3) The net cost of private health insurance by payer by market
segment, including individual, small group, large group, self-insured,
student and Medicare Advantage markets; and
(4) Any other factors the [commissioner] secretary deems relevant to
providing context on such data, which shall include, but not be limited
to, the following factors: (A) The impact of the rate of inflation and rate
of medical inflation; (B) impacts, if any, on access to care; and (C)
responses to public health crises or similar emergencies.
(c) Not later than March 31, 2029, and annually thereafter, the
secretary shall prepare and post on the office's Internet web site a report
concerning each hospital's payment growth compared to the hospital
payment growth benchmark in applicable markets, as determined by
the secretary, using the hospital payment growth methodology for
inpatient and outpatient services.
[(c)] (d) The [commissioner] secretary shall annually submit a request
to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for the
unadjusted total medical expenses of Connecticut residents.
[(d)] (e) Not later than August [15, 2023, and] fifteenth annually,
[thereafter,] each payer or provider entity shall report to the
[commissioner] secretary, in a form and manner prescribed by the
[commissioner] secretary, for the preceding year, and for prior years if
the [commissioner] secretary so requests based on material changes to
data previously submitted, on the health care quality benchmarks
adopted pursuant to section 19a-754g.
[(e)] (f) Not later than March [31, 2024, and] thirty-first annually,
[thereafter, the commissioner] the secretary shall prepare and post on
Public Act No. 26-68 588 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
the office's Internet web site, a report concerning health care quality
benchmarks reported by payers and provider entities pursuant to
subsection (d) of this section.
[(f)] (g) The [commissioner] secretary may enter into such contractual
agreements as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this section,
including, but not limited to, contractual agreements with actuarial,
economic and other experts and consultants.
(h) Not later than July 1, 2028, the secretary shall establish and
coordinate a process by which payers and provider entities may review
data submitted and provide information and feedback that may
improve the accuracy of the data prior to release of the report required
by subsection (b) of this section.
Sec. 367. Section 19a-754i of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) (1) For each calendar year, beginning on January 1, 2023, the
[commissioner] secretary shall, if the payer or provider entity subject to
the cost growth benchmark, quality benchmarking or primary care
spending target [so] requests [,] a meeting, meet with such payer or
provider entity to review and validate the total medical expenses data
collected pursuant to section 19a-754h for such payer or provider entity.
The [commissioner] secretary shall review information provided by the
payer or provider entity and, if deemed necessary, amend findings for
such payer or provider prior to the identification of payer or provider
entities that exceeded the health care cost growth benchmark or failed
to meet the primary care spending target for the performance year as set
forth in section 19a-754h. Not later than July 1, 2028, in assessing
compliance with the health care cost growth benchmark and
determining whether to identify a payer or provider entity as exceeding
such benchmark, the secretary shall use the revised methodology
adopted pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection (c) of section 19a-
Public Act No. 26-68 589 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
754g, and shall not identify any payer or provider entity as exceeding
such benchmark based solely on commercial payment growth, or on
commercial trends viewed in isolation. In assessing compliance with the
hospital payment growth benchmark and in determining whether to
identify a hospital as exceeding such benchmark, the secretary shall use
the hospital payment growth methodology, including consideration of
the factors set forth in subdivision (2) of this subsection, and shall not
identify any hospital as exceeding the hospital payment growth
benchmark based solely on commercial payment growth, or on
commercial trends viewed in isolation. Such assessment shall
specifically consider unique circumstances applicable to pediatric
providers. The [commissioner] secretary shall identify, not later than
May first of such calendar year, each payer or provider entity that
exceeded the health care cost growth benchmark or failed to meet the
primary care spending target or quality benchmarks for the
performance year.
(2) Not later than July 1, 2028, the following factors shall, to the extent
feasible and practicable, be considered in assessing compliance with the
hospital payment growth benchmark:
(A) Changes in patient acuity, clinical complexity, case mix, service
intensity, severity of illness, social risk factors and shifts in services
provided;
(B) Regional labor market conditions, workforce shortages,
inflationary pressures, pharmaceutical and medical supply costs, capital
expenditures, governmental mandates and changes in federal or state
law, regulation or reimbursement policy materially affecting hospital
costs or payments;
(C) Services, payment changes, utilization changes or cost increases
attributable to public health emergencies, new technologies, new service
lines, changes in coding guidance, payer claims adjudication practices,
Public Act No. 26-68 590 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
including downcoding, downgrading, bundling, denials, payment edits
and other payer coding or reimbursement policies, changes in payer
mix, supplemental or directed payments, graduate medical education
payments, disproportionate share hospital payments, uncompensated
care or other factors determined by the secretary to materially distort
year-to-year comparisons; and
(D) Payment growth separately and in the aggregate across
governmental and nongovernmental payers and the extent to which
governmental payer payment growth lags hospital input cost growth or
contributes to nongovernmental payment growth.
[(2)] (3) For each calendar year beginning on or after January 1, 2024,
the [commissioner] secretary shall, if the payer or provider entity subject
to the health care quality benchmarks for the performance year [so]
requests [,] a meeting, meet with such payer or provider entity to review
and validate the quality data collected pursuant to section 19a-754h for
such payer or provider entity. The [commissioner] secretary shall
review information provided by the payer or provider entity and, if
deemed necessary, amend findings for such payer or provider prior to
the identification of payer or provider entities that exceeded the health
care quality benchmark as set forth in section 19a-754h. The
[commissioner] secretary shall identify, not later than May first of such
calendar year, each payer or provider entity that exceeded the health
care quality benchmark for the performance year.
[(3)] (4) Not later than thirty days after the [commissioner] secretary
identifies each payer or provider entity pursuant to subdivisions (1) and
(2) of this subsection, the [commissioner] secretary shall send a notice to
each such payer or provider entity. Such notice shall be in a form and
manner prescribed by the [commissioner] secretary, and shall disclose
to each such payer or provider entity:
(A) That the [commissioner] secretary has identified such payer or
Public Act No. 26-68 591 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
provider entity pursuant to subdivision [(1) or] (2) or (3) of this
subsection; and
(B) The factual basis for the [commissioner's] secretary's
identification of such payer or provider entity pursuant to subdivision
[(1) or] (2) or (3) of this subsection.
(b) (1) For each calendar year beginning on and after January 1, 2023,
if the [commissioner] secretary determines that the annual percentage
change in total health care expenditures for the performance year
exceeded the health care cost growth benchmark for such year, the
[commissioner] secretary shall identify, not later than May first of such
calendar year, any other entity that significantly contributed to
exceeding such benchmark. Each identification [shall] may be based on:
(A) The report prepared by the [commissioner] secretary pursuant to
subsection (b) of section 19a-754h for such calendar year;
(B) The report filed pursuant to section 38a-479ppp for such calendar
year;
(C) The information and data reported to the office pursuant to
subsection (d) of section 19a-754b for such calendar year;
(D) Information obtained from the all-payer claims database;
[established under section 19a-755a;] and
(E) Any other information that the [commissioner] secretary, in the
[commissioner's] secretary's discretion, deems relevant for the purposes
of this section.
(2) The [commissioner] secretary shall account for costs, net of rebates
and discounts, when identifying other entities pursuant to this section.
(c) The secretary shall provide notice to all payers, provider entities,
other entities and hospitals that have been identified as exceeding the
Public Act No. 26-68 592 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
health care cost growth benchmark or hospital benchmark, as
applicable, for any given year. Beginning with the performance of a
provider entity or hospital in calendar year 2029, unless otherwise set
forth in specific elements of an approval or agreement with the state,
such as a certificate of need approval, the secretary may, beginning in
the calendar year in which 2029 performance is assessed, require any
provider entity that is identified as exceeding the health care cost
growth benchmark, or any hospital that is identified as exceeding the
hospital payment growth benchmark, to file a cost growth benchmark
plan with the secretary, in a form and manner prescribed by the
secretary. The secretary shall provide written notice to such provider
entity or hospital, including supporting data, that such provider entity
or hospital is required to file a cost growth benchmark plan. Not later
than forty-five days after receipt of such written notice, such provider
entity or hospital shall:
(1) File a complete cost growth benchmark plan with the secretary;
(2) File an application to waive or extend the requirement to file a cost
growth benchmark plan; or
(3) File information based on the supporting data provided by the
secretary to dispute the finding that the provider entity or hospital
exceeded the cost growth benchmark in the given year, in a form and
manner prescribed by the secretary.
(d) The provider entity or hospital may file any documentation or
supporting evidence with the secretary to support the provider entity's
or hospital's application to waive or extend the requirement to file a cost
growth benchmark plan. The secretary shall require the provider entity
or hospital to submit any other relevant information the secretary deems
necessary in considering the waiver or extension application, provided
such information, except propriety information or information subject
to state or federal confidentiality requirements, shall be made public at
Public Act No. 26-68 593 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
the discretion of the secretary.
(e) The secretary may (1) deny the dispute of the findings that the
provider entity or hospital has exceeded the cost growth benchmark or
hospital payment growth benchmark, (2) accept the provider entity's or
hospital's data and justification that the provider entity or hospital has
not exceeded the relevant growth benchmark for such year, (3) waive
the requirement for a provider entity or hospital to file a cost growth
benchmark plan, or (4) delay the requirement for a provider entity or
hospital to file a cost growth benchmark plan in response to a waiver or
extension request filed under subsection (c) of this section in light of all
information received from the provider entity or hospital, based on a
consideration of the following factors:
(A) The costs, price and utilization trends of the provider entity or
hospital over time, and any demonstrated improvement to reduce
health status total medical expenses;
(B) Any ongoing strategies or investments that the provider entity or
hospital is implementing to improve future long-term efficiency and
reduce cost growth;
(C) Whether the factors that led to increased costs for the provider
entity or hospital can reasonably be considered to be unanticipated and
outside of the control of the provider entity or hospital. Such factors may
include, but need not be limited to, age and other health-status-adjusted
factors and other cost inputs such as pharmaceutical expenses and
medical device expenses, or any catastrophic event, whether manmade
or natural;
(D) The overall financial condition of the provider entity or hospital;
(E) The annual growth in the inpatient hospital market basket
published by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, or any
successor hospital input price index designated by the secretary, for
Public Act No. 26-68 594 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
such year;
(F) The annual growth in the Employment Cost Index for total
compensation for private industry workers in the New England Census
Region published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics, or any
successor regional labor cost index designated by the secretary, for such
year;
(G) The performance across all markets in the aggregate; and
(H) The factors identified in subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of
section 19a-754i and any other factors the secretary considers relevant.
(f) If the secretary declines to waive or extend the requirement for the
provider entity or hospital to file a cost growth benchmark plan, the
secretary shall provide written notice to the provider entity or hospital
that its application for a waiver or extension was denied and the
provider entity or hospital shall file a cost growth benchmark plan.
(g) A provider entity or hospital shall file a cost growth benchmark
plan: (1) Not later than forty-five days after receipt of a notice under
subsection (c) of this section; (2) if the provider entity or hospital has
requested a waiver or extension, not later than forty-five days after
receipt of a notice that such waiver or extension has been denied; or (3)
if the provider entity or hospital is granted an extension, on the date
given on such extension. The provider entity or hospital shall generate
the cost growth benchmark plan that shall identify the causes of the
provider entity's or hospital's cost growth and include, but need not be
limited to, specific strategies, adjustments and action steps the provider
entity or hospital proposes to implement to improve cost performance.
The cost growth benchmark plan shall include specific identifiable and
measurable expected outcomes and a timetable for implementation that
shall not exceed eighteen months.
(h) The secretary shall approve any cost growth benchmark plan that
Public Act No. 26-68 595 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
the secretary determines is reasonably likely to address the underlying
cause of the provider entity's or hospital's cost growth and has
reasonable expectations for successful implementation.
(i) If the secretary determines that the cost growth benchmark plan is
unacceptable or incomplete, the secretary may provide consultation on
the criteria that have not been met and may allow an additional time
period, up to thirty calendar days, for resubmission, provided all
aspects of the cost growth benchmark plan shall be proposed by the
provider entity or hospital and the secretary shall not require specific
elements for approval.
(j) Upon approval of the cost growth benchmark plan, the secretary
shall notify the provider entity or hospital to begin immediate
implementation of the cost growth benchmark plan. The secretary shall
provide public notice on the office's Internet web site stating that the
provider entity or hospital is implementing a cost growth benchmark
plan. All provider entities and hospitals implementing an approved cost
growth benchmark plan may be subject to additional reasonable
reporting requirements and compliance monitoring, as determined by
the secretary.
(k) Each provider entity and hospital shall, in good faith, work to
implement the cost growth benchmark plan. At any point during the
implementation of the cost growth benchmark plan, the provider entity
or hospital may file one or more amendments to the cost growth
benchmark plan, subject to approval of the secretary.
(l) At the conclusion of the timetable established in the cost growth
benchmark plan, the provider entity or hospital shall report to the
secretary regarding the outcome of the cost growth benchmark plan. If
the cost growth benchmark plan was found to be unsuccessful, the
secretary shall (1) extend the implementation timetable of the existing
cost growth benchmark plan; (2) approve any amendment to the cost
Public Act No. 26-68 596 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
growth benchmark plan as proposed by the provider entity or hospital;
(3) require the provider entity or hospital to submit a new cost growth
benchmark plan; (4) waive or delay the requirement to file any
additional cost growth benchmark plans; or (5) implement the financial
penalty under subsection (n) of this section.
(m) Upon the successful completion of the cost growth benchmark
plan, the identity of the provider entity or hospital shall be removed
from the office's Internet web site.
(n) If the secretary determines that a provider entity or hospital has
(1) wilfully neglected to file a cost growth benchmark plan with the
secretary not later than forty-five days after receipt of the notice
required under subsection (c) of this section, (2) failed to file an
acceptable cost growth benchmark plan in good faith with the secretary,
(3) failed to implement the cost growth benchmark plan in good faith,
or (4) knowingly failed to provide information required by this section
to the secretary or knowingly falsified such information, the secretary
may require the provider entity or hospital to submit for review a one-
time community investment project with a focus on addressing
population health to the Commissioner of Social Services. In the case of
a hospital, such project shall be informed by the most recently
completed community health needs assessment and have a focus on
addressing population health. The value of the project shall be up to one
hundred thousand dollars for a small hospital with fewer than one
hundred eighty licensed beds, up to two hundred thousand dollars for
a midsize hospital with one hundred eighty or more licensed beds and
fewer than five hundred licensed beds, and up to four hundred
thousand dollars for a large hospital with five hundred or more licensed
beds. The secretary shall consider waiving the submission of a one-time
community investment project by financially distressed provider
entities or hospitals. For purposes of this subsection, "financially
distressed provider entity or hospital" means a provider entity or
Public Act No. 26-68 597 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
hospital that has an operating margin of less than one per cent.
Sec. 368. Section 19a-754j of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) (1) Not later than June [30, 2023, and] thirtieth annually,
[thereafter, the commissioner] the secretary shall hold an informational
public hearing to compare the growth in total health care expenditures
in the performance year to the health care cost growth benchmark
established pursuant to section 19a-754g for such year. Such hearing
shall involve an examination of:
(A) The report most recently prepared by the [commissioner]
secretary pursuant to subsection (b) of section 19a-754h;
(B) The expenditures of provider entities and payers, including, but
not limited to, health care cost trends, primary care spending as a
percentage of total medical expenses and the factors contributing to
such costs and expenditures; and
(C) Any other matters that the [commissioner] secretary, in the
[commissioner's] secretary's discretion, deems relevant for the purposes
of this section.
(2) The [commissioner] secretary may require any payer or provider
entity that, for the performance year, is found to be a significant
contributor to health care cost growth in the state or has failed to meet
the primary care spending target, to participate in such hearing. Each
such payer or provider entity that is required to participate in such
hearing shall provide testimony on issues identified by the
[commissioner] secretary and provide additional information on actions
taken to reduce such payer's or entity's contribution to future state-wide
health care costs and expenditures or to increase such payer's or
provider entity's primary care spending as a percentage of total medical
expenses.
Public Act No. 26-68 598 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(3) The [commissioner] secretary may require that any other entity
that is found to be a significant contributor to health care cost growth in
this state during the performance year participate in such hearing. Any
other entity that is required to participate in such hearing shall provide
testimony on issues identified by the [commissioner] secretary and
provide additional information on actions taken to reduce such other
entity's contribution to future state-wide health care costs. If such other
entity is a drug manufacturer, and the [commissioner] secretary requires
that such drug manufacturer participate in such hearing with respect to
a specific drug or class of drugs, such hearing may, to the extent
possible, include representatives from at least one brand-name
manufacturer, one generic manufacturer and one innovator company
that is less than ten years old.
(4) Not later than [October 15, 2023, and] January fifteenth annually,
[thereafter, the commissioner] the secretary shall prepare and submit a
report, in accordance with section 11-4a, to the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to insurance and public health. Such report shall be based on
the [commissioner's] secretary's analysis of the information submitted
during the most recent informational public hearing conducted
pursuant to this subsection and any other information that the
[commissioner] secretary, in the [commissioner's] secretary's discretion,
deems relevant for the purposes of this section, and shall:
(A) Describe health care spending trends in this state, including, but
not limited to, trends in primary care spending as a percentage of total
medical expense, and the factors underlying such trends;
(B) Include the findings from the report prepared pursuant to
subsection (b) of section 19a-754h; and
[(C) Describe a plan for monitoring any unintended adverse
consequences resulting from the adoption of cost growth benchmarks
Public Act No. 26-68 599 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
and primary care spending targets and the results of any findings from
the implementation of such plan; and]
[(D)] (C) Disclose the [commissioner's] secretary's recommendations,
if any, concerning strategies to increase the efficiency of the state's health
care system, including, but not limited to, any recommended legislation
concerning the state's health care system.
(b) (1) Not later than June [30, 2024, and] thirtieth annually,
[thereafter, the commissioner] the secretary shall hold an informational
public hearing to compare the performance of payers and provider
entities in the performance year to the quality benchmarks established
for such year pursuant to section 19a-754g. Such hearing shall include
an examination of:
(A) The report most recently prepared by the [commissioner]
secretary pursuant to subsection (e) of section 19a-754h; and
(B) Any other matters that the [commissioner] secretary, in the
[commissioner's] secretary's discretion, deems relevant for the purposes
of this section.
(2) The [commissioner] secretary may require any payer or provider
entity that failed to meet any health care quality benchmarks in this state
during the performance year to participate in such hearing. Each such
payer or provider entity that is required to participate in such hearing
shall provide testimony on issues identified by the [commissioner]
secretary and provide additional information on actions taken to
improve such payer's or provider entity's quality benchmark
performance.
(3) Not later than [October 15, 2024, and] January fifteenth annually,
[thereafter, the commissioner] the secretary shall prepare and submit a
report, in accordance with section 11-4a, to the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
Public Act No. 26-68 600 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
relating to insurance and public health. Such report shall be based on
the [commissioner's] secretary's analysis of the information submitted
during the most recent informational public hearing conducted
pursuant to this subsection and any other information that the
[commissioner] secretary, in the [commissioner's] secretary's discretion,
deems relevant for the purposes of this section, and shall:
(A) Describe health care quality trends in this state and the factors
underlying such trends;
(B) Include the findings from the report prepared pursuant to
subsection (e) of section 19a-754h; and
(C) Disclose the [commissioner's] secretary's recommendations, if
any, concerning strategies to improve the quality of the state's health
care system, including, but not limited to, any recommended legislation
concerning the state's health care system.
(c) Not later than March first annually, the secretary shall notify any
payer, provider entity, hospital or other entity that exceeded the cost
growth benchmark, primary care spending target, quality benchmarks
or hospital payment growth benchmark, as applicable. Upon the request
of such payer, provider entity, hospital or other entity, including a drug
manufacturer identified as a significant contributor, the secretary shall
make available to such payer, provider entity, hospital or other entity
(1) the all-payer claims database data sets, analytic files and
methodology used to determine such benchmarks or targets, as
applicable, provided the payer, provider entity, hospital or other entity
receives approval from the all-payer claims database release committee,
(2) payment of any required fees, and (3) an executed data release
agreement for raw data to the extent permitted by law and sufficient to
enable such entity to assess, verify or challenge the secretary's
determination. The all payer claims database release committee shall
expedite any release requests made by an entity under this section. Not
Public Act No. 26-68 601 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
later than January 1, 2027, the secretary shall establish an expedited all-
payer claims database data request process for payers, provider entities,
hospitals and other entities identified as exceeding the cost growth
benchmark, primary care spending target or hospital payment growth
benchmark. Such process shall require the chairperson of such release
committee, or the chairperson's designee, to meet with the secretary and
approve or disapprove an application from an identified entity not later
than ten days after such meeting. Not later than five days after any
approval of an application, the secretary shall send a data use agreement
to the identified entity. Not later than ten days after receiving an
approved data use agreement from such identified entity, the secretary
shall provide the data to such identified entity. Identified entities shall
be exempt from payment of a data release fee. The secretary shall
consider any timely challenge submitted by an identified entity. In
making and publicly presenting a cost-driver assessment, the secretary
shall use the revised methodology adopted pursuant to subdivision (1)
of subsection (d) of section 19a-754g and examine the contribution of
material changes in clinical risk and payment methodologies.
Sec. 369. Section 19a-754k of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
The [Commissioner of Health Strategy] Secretary of the Office of
Policy and Management may adopt regulations, in accordance with
chapter 54, to implement the provisions of [section 19a-754a and]
sections 19a-754f to 19a-754j, inclusive.
Sec. 370. (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) There is established a Medicaid
Value-Based Payment Working Group for the purpose of
collaboratively designing, evaluating readiness for, and recommending
scalable, voluntary, value-based payment models for the Medicaid
population that advance quality, cost efficiency, access, health system
sustainability and health equity across the health care delivery system.
Public Act No. 26-68 602 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(b) The working group shall include members appointed by the
Commissioner of Social Services, including representatives of hospitals,
physicians, federally qualified health centers, behavioral health care
providers, health carriers or managed care organizations participating
in the Medicaid program, consumer advocates and any other
stakeholders deemed appropriate by the commissioner.
(c) The working group shall evaluate and develop recommendations
concerning:
(1) Voluntary value-based payment arrangements for Medicaid
providers, including, but not limited to, shared savings models,
population-based payment models, quality incentive arrangements and
other alternative payment methodologies;
(2) Strategies to improve quality outcomes, promote access to care
and address health disparities within the Medicaid population;
(3) The operational, technological, workforce and infrastructure
investments necessary to support participation in value-based payment
arrangements, including consideration of up-front funding, technical
assistance, data-sharing capabilities and administrative simplification;
and
(4) Opportunities to align Medicaid value-based payment initiatives
with state and federal delivery system reform efforts.
(d) Any value-based payment model developed pursuant to this
section shall be voluntary for participating providers.
(e) Not later than January 1, 2028, the working group shall submit
recommendations, including opportunities for pilot implementation, to
the joint standing committees of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to public health and human services.
Public Act No. 26-68 603 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 371. Section 54 of public act 26-12 is repealed. (Effective from
passage)
Sec. 372. Subsection (d) of section 31-53 of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective January 1, 2027):
(d) For the purpose of predetermining the prevailing rate of wage on
an hourly basis and the amount of payment, contributions and member
benefits paid or payable on behalf of each person to any employee
welfare fund, as defined in subsection (i) of this section, in each town
where such contract is to be performed, the Labor Commissioner shall
adopt the rate of wages on an hourly basis in accordance with the
provisions of this section and section 31-76c, and the amount, at the
journeyman rate, of payment, contributions and member benefits,
including health, pension, annuity and apprenticeship funds, as
recognized by the United States Department of Labor and the Labor
Commissioner paid or payable on behalf of each person to any
employee welfare fund, as defined in subsection (i) of this section, as
established in the collective bargaining agreements or understandings
between employers or employer associations and bona fide labor
organizations for the same work in the same trade or occupation in the
town in which the applicable public works project, as defined in section
31-56a, is being constructed. For each trade or occupation for which
more than one collective bargaining agreement is in effect for the town
in which such project is being constructed, the collective bargaining
agreement of historical jurisdiction shall prevail. For each trade or
occupation for which there is no collective bargaining agreement in
effect for the town in which the public works project is being
constructed, the Labor Commissioner shall adopt and use such
appropriate and applicable prevailing wage rate determinations as have
been made by the Secretary of Labor of the United States under the
provisions of the Davis-Bacon Act, as amended.
Public Act No. 26-68 604 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 373. Section 31-53 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is amended by adding subsection (j) as follows (Effective October 1, 2026):
(NEW) (j) (1) Each employer subject to the provisions of this section,
section 31-53c, subsection (f) of section 31-53d or section 31-54 shall
complete a daily record of each person performing the work of any
mechanic, laborer or worker at a work site. Such daily record shall
include (A) the name and location of the project, (B) the current date, (C)
the printed name or signature and, where applicable, the trade license
number of each person performing the work of a mechanic, laborer or
worker, and (D) the arrival and departure time to the work site of each
person performing the work of a mechanic, laborer or worker.
(2) An employer shall (A) keep, maintain and preserve such daily
records, and (B) submit such daily records weekly to the contracting
agency or the Department of Economic and Community Development,
pursuant to section 31-53c, or to the developer of a covered project, as
defined in section 31-53d, as applicable, by mail, electronic mail or other
method accepted by such agency, the Department of Economic and
Community Development or such developer.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1-210, the daily records
required pursuant to this subsection shall be considered a public record
and every person shall have the right to inspect and copy such daily log
or sign-in sheet in accordance with the provisions of section 1-212.
(4) Failure to file the daily records required pursuant to this
subsection is a class C misdemeanor for which the employer may be
fined up to five hundred dollars, imprisoned for up to three months, or
both.
Sec. 374. (Effective from passage) The Labor Commissioner shall study
the rights of workers under economic pressure in this contentious day
and age. Not later than January 1, 2028, the commissioner shall submit
Public Act No. 26-68 605 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
a report on the findings of the study and submit recommendations for
legislation, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the
general statutes, to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to labor and public
employees.
Sec. 375. Section 10-512a of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, based on an estimate
prepared by the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management
between June 15, 2025, to June 30, 2025, inclusive, of the amount of
current unappropriated surplus for [such] said fiscal year, the amount
of such estimated surplus, if any, up to a maximum of three hundred
million dollars shall be transferred on or before June 30, 2025, by the
Treasurer from the General Fund to the Early Childhood Education
Endowment established under section 10-512.
(b) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, and each fiscal year
thereafter, based on such estimated amount of current unappropriated
surplus described in subsection (a) of this section, if any, the entire
amount of such estimated surplus for each such fiscal year shall be
transferred by the Treasurer from the General Fund to the Early
Childhood Education Endowment on or before June thirtieth of such
fiscal year, except that if the amount in the Budget Reserve Fund is
estimated by the secretary to be less than eighteen per cent of the
estimated net General Fund appropriations for the ensuing fiscal year,
the amount of such transfer shall be reduced by the amount necessary
to increase the amount in the Budget Reserve Fund to eighteen per cent
of the estimated net General Fund appropriations for the ensuing fiscal
year, or by the maximum amount of [the projected] such estimated
surplus, whichever is less, and an amount equal to such reduction shall
be transferred to the Budget Reserve Fund.
Public Act No. 26-68 606 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(c) If the Comptroller determines that a deficit [will exist] exists for
the preceding fiscal year, before the appropriation required by
subdivision (1) of subsection (f) of section 4-30a is made, the amount
necessary to fund such deficit shall be [deducted from the amount
transferred in such preceding fiscal year pursuant to this section]
transferred from the Early Childhood Education Endowment and
credited to the General Fund effective June thirtieth of such preceding
fiscal year, provided the amount of such transfer shall not exceed the
amount transferred in such preceding fiscal year pursuant to subsection
(a) or (b) of this section, as applicable. If the amount necessary to fund
such deficit exceeds the amount transferred in such preceding fiscal
year, no additional funds from the body of the endowment shall be
[used] transferred to fund such deficit.
Sec. 376. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 10-15 of the general statutes requiring public schools be
maintained in each town for at least one hundred eighty days of actual
school sessions during each year, the local board of education for the
town of Waterbury may reduce the number of actual school sessions to
one hundred seventy-six days for the school year commencing July 1,
2025.
Sec. 377. (Effective July 1, 2026) The sum of $225,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by section 1
of this act, to the Department of Education, for Charter Schools, for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in said fiscal
year and expended as follows: (1) $75,000 of such amount shall be used
to provide a planning grant for the OLAM Public Charter School in
Stamford; (2) $75,000 of such amount shall be used to provide a planning
grant for the PROUD Academy in Ansonia; and (3) $75,000 of such
amount shall be used to provide a planning grant for the Taino CoLAB
Academy in Waterbury.
Sec. 378. Subsection (i) of section 10-217a of the 2026 supplement to
Public Act No. 26-68 607 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(i) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, for the fiscal years
ending June 30, 2008, to June 30, [2026] 2027, inclusive, the amount of
the grants payable to local or regional boards of education in accordance
with this section shall be reduced proportionately if the total of such
grants in such year exceeds the amount appropriated for purposes of
this section.
Sec. 379. Section 224 of public act 25-174 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, [twelve million] six million
two hundred fifty thousand dollars of the Magnet Schools
appropriation provided to the Department of Education for said fiscal
year shall be distributed proportionally based on the share of students
enrolled in interdistrict magnet school programs operated by entities
that are (1) not a local or regional board of education, (2) the board of
governors for an independent institution of higher education, as defined
in subsection (a) of section 10a-173 of the general statutes, or the
equivalent of such a board, on behalf of the independent institution of
higher education, or (3) any other third-party, not-for-profit corporation
approved by the Commissioner of Education.
Sec. 380. Subsection (d) of section 10a-173 of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes, as amended by section 263 of public act 25-168, is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(d) (1) The Roberta B. Willis Scholarship need-based grant shall be
available to any eligible student at any public or independent institution
of higher education. The amount of the annual funds to be allocated to
each institution of higher education shall be determined by its actual
Public Act No. 26-68 608 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
full-time equivalent enrollment of eligible students with a student aid
index during the fall semester of the fiscal year two years prior to the
grant year of an amount not greater than two hundred per cent of the
maximum student aid index eligible for a federal Pell grant award for
the academic year one year prior to the grant year. Not later than July
first, annually, each institution of higher education shall report such
enrollment data to the Office of Higher Education. [Not later than
October first, annually] For the annual allocation of funds for the need-
based grant, the Office of Higher Education: [shall (1)]
(A) Shall, not later than October first, annually, (i) publish such
enrollment data on its Internet web site, [(2)] (ii) notify each institution
of higher education of the proportion of the annual funds that such
institution of higher education will receive for the following fiscal year,
and [(3)] (iii) publish the proportions for each institution of higher
education on its Internet web site. [Not]
(B) Shall, not later than November first, annually, [the Office of
Higher Education shall] notify each institution of higher education of
the estimated amount of funds allocated to such institution for awards
to eligible students during the following fiscal year.
(C) May, on or after January first, annually, subject to the approval of
the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, enter into a
contractual agreement with each institution of higher education to
commit the amount of funds allocated to such institution for awards to
eligible students during the following fiscal year, provided the amount
of such committed funds, in aggregate, does not exceed the need-based
grant portion of the amount appropriated for the Roberta B. Willis
Scholarship program pursuant to subsection (b) of this section for (i) the
current fiscal year if no state budget has been adopted for the following
fiscal year, or (ii) for the following fiscal year upon adoption of a state
budget for such fiscal year.
Public Act No. 26-68 609 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(2) Participating institutions of higher education shall make awards
(A) to eligible full-time students in an amount up to four thousand five
hundred dollars, and (B) to eligible part-time students in an amount that
is prorated according to the number of credits each student will earn for
completing the course or courses in which such student is enrolled, such
that a student enrolled in a course or courses earning (i) at least nine but
less than twelve credits is eligible for up to seventy-five per cent of the
maximum award, and (ii) at least six but less than nine credits is eligible
for up to fifty per cent of the maximum award. Each participating
institution of higher education shall expend all of the moneys received
under the Roberta B. Willis Scholarship program as direct financial
assistance only for eligible educational costs.
Sec. 381. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) For the fiscal year ending June
30, 2027, and each fiscal year thereafter, the Department of Education
shall, within available appropriations, administer a teacher
apprenticeship program.
Sec. 382. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) The Office of Higher Education
shall establish a program to support the establishment of new promise
programs throughout the state, with a goal of establishing eight new
promise programs not later than January 1, 2031, prioritizing the
establishment of promise programs that serve students in alliance
districts, as defined in section 10-262u of the general statutes. The office
shall coordinate with municipalities and regional coalitions interested
in establishing new promise programs. The office shall support each
new promise program through the provision of technical assistance to
start such promise program, including, but not limited to, (1) initial
funding strategies, (2) stakeholder engagement, including, but not
limited to, with each local or regional board of education, legislative
body and local nonprofit organization and business of the municipality
or region in which such new promise program is located, (3) program
design based on the local environment, (4) development of evaluation
Public Act No. 26-68 610 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
metrics, and (5) sustainability planning. The office shall hire a consultant
with expertise in the development and operation of promise programs
to implement the provisions of this section. As used in this section,
"promise program" means a scholarship program that provides a
scholarship in conjunction with services and resources, including, but
not limited to, mentoring, peer support networks and internships, to
scholarship recipients to ensure the postsecondary academic success of
such recipients.
Sec. 383. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section,
"parent organization" means a nonprofit organization whose (1) mission
is to serve families of children with disabilities, and (2) governing board
includes (A) a majority of members who are parents of children with
disabilities, (B) professionals who work in fields related to special
education and early intervention, and (C) individuals with disabilities
or otherwise representative of the populations such organization serves.
(b) The Commissioner of Education may enter into cooperative
agreements with and award grants, in an amount specified by the
commissioner, to one or more parent organizations in the state to
establish parent training and information centers to carry out the duties
specified in subsection (c) of this section. Upon establishing such
program to enter into cooperative agreements with parent
organizations, the commissioner shall post in a conspicuous location on
its Internet web site (1) a description of such program, including, but not
limited to, the amount of grants available under such program, (2) any
eligibility requirements for parent organizations to be eligible for such
program, and (3) the application form for such program.
(c) Each parent training and information center established pursuant
to subsection (b) of this section shall:
(1) Receive, review and attempt to resolve any special education
complaints from students and students' families, including, but not
Public Act No. 26-68 611 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
limited to, attempts to resolve such complaints in collaboration with
schools and educators;
(2) Provide information to the public, agencies, legislators and others
regarding the issues and concerns of students receiving special
education and make recommendations for resolving such issues and
concerns;
(3) Provide training and information to assist parents of children with
disabilities to enable such children to meet developmental, functional
and academic goals, including, but not limited to, parents who are low
income or have limited English proficiency; and
(4) Assist parents in communicating effectively with personnel
responsible for providing special education and related services to their
children.
(d) The Department of Education shall disseminate information
about any parent training and information center established pursuant
to this section by (1) posting such information in a conspicuous location
on its Internet web site, (2) including such information on special
education guides and information published by the department, and (3)
in any other form and manner determined by the department.
(e) Each parent training and information center established pursuant
to this section shall submit an annual report, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to education. Such report shall include, but need not be limited
to, (1) the number and demographics of families served by such center,
(2) the effectiveness of strategies used to reach and serve such families,
including, but not limited to, families who are low income or have
limited English proficiency, and (3) the number of families such center
assisted in resolving special education complaints.
Public Act No. 26-68 612 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 384. Section 10-15o of the general statutes is repealed. (Effective
from passage)
Sec. 385. Section 36a-25 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) There is established an Office of the Student Loan Ombudsman,
which shall be within the [Department of Banking] Office of Higher
Education for administrative purposes only, to provide timely
assistance to any student loan borrower, as defined in section 36a-846,
of any student education loan, as defined in section 36a-846. The
[Banking Commissioner] Governor shall appoint a Student Loan
Ombudsman who shall be selected from among individuals with
expertise and experience in a field concerning student loans to head the
office.
(b) The Office of the Student Loan Ombudsman shall:
(1) Receive, review and attempt to resolve any complaints from
student loan borrowers, including, but not limited to, attempts to
resolve such complaints in collaboration with institutions of higher
education, student loan servicers, as defined in section 36a-846, and any
other participants in student loan lending, including, but not limited to,
The University of Connecticut, the Board of Regents for Higher
Education, the Office of Higher Education or the Connecticut Higher
Education Supplemental Loan Authority;
(2) Compile and analyze data on student loan borrower complaints
as described in subdivision (1) of this subsection;
(3) Assist student loan borrowers to understand their rights and
responsibilities under the terms of student education loans;
(4) Provide information to the public, agencies, legislators and others
regarding the problems and concerns of student loan borrowers and
Public Act No. 26-68 613 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
make recommendations for resolving those problems and concerns;
(5) Analyze and monitor the development and implementation of
federal, state and local laws, regulations and policies relating to student
loan borrowers and recommend any changes the Student Loan
Ombudsman deems necessary;
(6) Review the complete student education loan history for any
student loan borrower who has provided written consent for such
review;
(7) Disseminate information concerning the availability of the Office
of the Student Loan Ombudsman to assist student loan borrowers and
potential student loan borrowers, as well as public institutions of higher
education, student loan servicers and any other participant in student
education loan lending, with any student loan servicing concerns; and
(8) Take any other actions necessary to fulfill the duties of the Office
of the Student Loan Ombudsman and the Student Loan Ombudsman as
set forth in this subsection.
(c) (1) [On or before October 1, 2016, the] The Student Loan
Ombudsman [, in consultation with the commissioner,] shall, within
available appropriations, establish and maintain a student loan
borrower education course that shall include educational presentations
and materials regarding student education loans. Such program shall
include, but not be limited to, key loan terms, documentation
requirements, monthly payment obligations, income-based repayment
options, loan forgiveness and disclosure requirements.
(2) [Beginning on October 1, 2024, the] The Office of the Student Loan
Ombudsman shall maintain the student loan borrower education course
established pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection.
[(d) (1) On or before January 1, 2016, and annually thereafter until
Public Act No. 26-68 614 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
January 1, 2023, the Banking Commissioner shall submit a report, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a, to the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to banking and higher education. The commissioner shall
report on: (A) The implementation of this section; (B) the overall
effectiveness of the Student Loan Ombudsman position; and (C)
additional steps that need to be taken for the Department of Banking to
gain regulatory control over the licensing and enforcement of student
loan servicers.]
[(2)] (d) Beginning on January 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, the
Student Loan Ombudsman shall submit [the] a report [required under
subdivision (1) of this subsection,] in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a, to the joint standing committees of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to banking and higher education.
The ombudsman shall report on: [(A)] (1) The implementation of this
section; [(B)] (2) the overall effectiveness of the Office of the Student
Loan Ombudsman; and [(C)] (3) additional steps that need to be taken
for the Department of Banking to gain regulatory control over the
licensing and enforcement of student loan servicers.
(e) (1) There is established an account to be known as the "student
loan ombudsman account" which shall be a separate, nonlapsing
account. [within the Banking Fund.] The account shall contain the
moneys described in subdivision (2) of this subsection and any other
moneys required by law to be deposited in the account. Moneys in the
account shall be expended by the [Banking Commissioner] Student
Loan Ombudsman for the purpose of administering the provisions of
this section.
(2) The account established under subdivision (1) of this subsection
shall contain any licensing or investigation fees collected pursuant to
subsection (b) of section 36a-847.
Public Act No. 26-68 615 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 386. (Effective July 1, 2026) Not later than January 1, 2027, the
Student Loan Ombudsman, appointed pursuant to section 36a-25 of the
general statutes, shall report, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing committees of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to banking,
higher education and appropriations and the budgets of state agencies
concerning the activities of the Office of the Student Loan Ombudsman
during the calendar years 2025 and 2026.
Sec. 387. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) The Commissioner of Early
Childhood shall annually develop a proposed spending plan for the
fiscal year for funds released from the Early Childhood Education
Endowment, pursuant to section 10-512b of the general statutes. Such
proposed spending plan shall be in accordance with the provisions of
section 10-512c of the general statutes and include a list of the amounts
and expenditures of such funds and the policy goals of the
commissioner for the expenditure of such funds, which shall include,
but need not be limited to, a statement of how each amount and
expenditure of such funds will meet such goals.
(b) The commissioner shall present such proposed spending plan to
the Early Childhood Education Endowment Advisory Board,
established pursuant to section 10-512g of the general statutes, at the
first meeting of the board on or after July first of the fiscal year for such
proposed spending plan.
Sec. 388. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) A local or regional board of
education may, by a majority vote of such board, submit an application
to the Commissioner of Education to participate in a fiscal intervention
and oversight plan in accordance with this section. Such application
shall be in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner.
(b) Upon receipt of an application by a local or regional board of
education submitted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the
Public Act No. 26-68 616 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Commissioner of Education, in consultation with the Secretary of the
Office of Policy and Management, shall conduct an initial review of such
board of education's financial condition, which may include, but need
not be limited to, (1) meeting with local officials, (2) assessing such
board's budget deficit and the underlying causes of such deficit, and (3)
assessing the financial condition of the municipality or municipalities of
such board.
(c) After conducting an initial review pursuant to subsection (b) of
this section, the Commissioner of Education shall develop a fiscal
intervention and oversight plan for such board of education, which shall
(1) account for any legal mandates, orders or settlements affecting such
board's costs, and (2) include, but need not be limited to, requiring such
board to appear before the Municipal Accountability Review Board
established pursuant to section 7-576d of the general statutes to discuss
such board's financial condition and compliance with such plan.
(d) The Commissioner of Education shall submit any fiscal
intervention and oversight plan developed pursuant to this section to
the Municipal Accountability Review Board. The Municipal
Accountability Review Board shall review such plan and may
recommend revisions to such plan to support the long-term financial
sustainability of such board of education and the municipality or
municipalities served by such board of education. Such review shall
include, but need not be limited to, confirming that such plan (1) ensures
accuracy in the accounting of the expenses and liabilities of such board,
(2) improves financial reporting systems of such board as necessary, (3)
establishes and maintains transparency in such board of education's
fiscal operations, (4) requires such board of education to notify the
Department of Education of any contracts to which such board is a party
and exceed one hundred thousand dollars, (5) requires the application
of LEAN practices and principles, and (6) includes a comprehensive
school facilities and administrative optimization initiative. The
Public Act No. 26-68 617 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Municipal Accountability Review Board may require such board of
education to appear before it to discuss such board of education's
financial condition and compliance with such plan.
(e) The Municipal Accountability Review Board shall submit any
fiscal intervention and oversight plan developed pursuant to this
section and reviewed by such board, with any revisions to such plan
recommended by such board, to the Secretary of the Office of Policy and
Management. The secretary shall approve such plan or require the
Commissioner of Education to revise such plan. After approval or
revision of such plan pursuant to this subsection, the commissioner shall
submit such plan to the State Board of Education for approval. Such plan
shall be implemented upon the approval of the State Board of
Education.
(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of
the State Board of Education over local and regional boards of education
under state or federal law.
Sec. 389. Subsection (a) of section 7-576d of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(a) There is established a Municipal Accountability Review Board,
which shall be in the Office of Policy and Management for
administrative purposes only and which shall be comprised of the
Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, or the secretary's
designee, who shall be the chairperson of such board, the State
Treasurer, or the State Treasurer's designee, who shall be the
cochairperson of such board, the Commissioner of Education, or the
commissioner's designee, five members appointed by the Governor, one
of whom shall be a municipal finance director, one of whom shall be a
municipal bond or bankruptcy attorney, one of whom shall be a town
manager, one of whom shall have significant experience in representing
Public Act No. 26-68 618 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
organized labor and who shall be selected from a list of three
recommendations by the American Federation of State, County and
Municipal Employees and one of whom shall have significant
experience as a teacher or representing a teacher's organization and who
shall be selected from a list of three joint recommendations by the
Connecticut Education Association and the American Federation of
Teachers-Connecticut, and one member appointed by the president pro
tempore of the Senate, one member appointed by the speaker of the
House of Representatives, one member appointed by the minority
leader of the Senate and one member appointed by the minority leader
of the House of Representatives. Each member appointed by the
president pro tempore of the Senate, the speaker of the House of
Representatives, the minority leader of the Senate and the minority
leader of the House of Representatives shall have experience in
business, finance or municipal management. All appointed members
shall serve for terms of six years and until a successor is appointed
except that two of the five initial appointments by the Governor shall
each be for a term of three years with all subsequent appointments being
for a term of six years. The filling of any vacancy shall be for the
remainder of the applicable member's terms. If there are two or more
designated tier II, III or IV municipalities, the Governor may appoint
alternates for one or more of the appointments made by the Governor
pursuant to this section. Such alternates shall have the same
qualifications as the member for whom they serve as an alternate and
the term of each such alternate shall coincide with the term of such
member. The members of the board shall serve without compensation,
but shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in performance of their
duties. Expenses of the board related to its work with designated tier III
or IV municipalities, including any staff, consultants and other expenses
adopted by the board, may, following consultation with such
municipalities, be charged to such municipalities by the board and may
be paid from the proceeds of any deficit obligation or debt restructuring
bonds.
Public Act No. 26-68 619 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 390. (Effective from passage) (a) The sum of $183,000,000 is
appropriated to the Department of Education, for Supplemental
Education, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall be made
available in said fiscal year and expended as follows:
(1) $162,200,000 of such amount shall be used to supplement the
amount appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by
this act, to the Department of Education, for Education Equalization
Grants, and shall be distributed as supplemental education aid grants
by the Department of Education in accordance with the provisions of
section 391 of this act and as follows:
Grant for Fiscal
Year
Town 2026
Andover 40,096
Ansonia 939,494
Ashford 69,181
Avon 173,326
Barkhamsted 29,885
Beacon Falls 253,476
Berlin 581,191
Bethany 35,291
Bethel 200,953
Bethlehem 105,234
Bloomfield 160,957
Bolton 53,664
Bozrah 23,802
Branford 75,457
Bridgeport 15,015,199
Bridgewater 4,415
Bristol 4,528,816
Brookfield 27,584
Brooklyn 139,394
Burlington 280,369
Canaan 2,515
Public Act No. 26-68 620 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Canterbury 80,097
Canton 81,370
Chaplin 33,043
Cheshire 849,486
Chester 125,301
Clinton 103,842
Colchester 240,804
Colebrook 8,078
Columbia 46,324
Cornwall 644
Coventry 159,058
Cromwell 520,405
Danbury 2,952,103
Darien 60,986
Deep River 33,522
Derby 219,809
Durham 65,865
East Granby 255,098
East Haddam 71,119
East Hampton 139,219
East Hartford 6,938,531
East Haven 541,052
East Lyme 121,530
East Windsor 113,382
Eastford 18,944
Easton 8,972
Ellington 206,833
Enfield 1,019,672
Essex 4,311
Fairfield 122,691
Farmington 74,160
Franklin 14,725
Glastonbury 134,346
Goshen 8,065
Granby 655,539
Greenwich 110,062
Griswold 735,679
Groton 500,801
Guilford 35,322
Public Act No. 26-68 621 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Haddam 153,075
Hamden 2,227,363
Hampton 21,168
Hartford 20,530,197
Hartland 21,434
Harwinton 253,904
Hebron 119,954
Kent 1,532
Killingly 311,488
Killingworth 44,145
Lebanon 91,572
Ledyard 240,652
Lisbon 57,990
Litchfield 123,294
Lyme 6,428
Madison 7,909
Manchester 5,247,464
Mansfield 262,244
Marlborough 59,042
Meriden 7,755,320
Middlebury 54,899
Middlefield 42,007
Middletown 2,656,038
Milford 193,465
Monroe 105,459
Montville 256,057
Morris 6,225
Naugatuck 1,438,012
New Britain 13,292,120
New Canaan 59,493
New Fairfield 69,622
New Hartford 172,353
New Haven 7,652,745
New London 1,926,108
New Milford 232,906
Newington 928,230
Newtown 89,914
Norfolk 1,108
North Branford 146,627
Public Act No. 26-68 622 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
North Canaan 138,210
North Haven 87,989
North Stonington 53,206
Norwalk 1,959,389
Norwich 5,913,205
Old Lyme 29,897
Old Saybrook 12,132
Orange 20,310
Oxford 73,540
Plainfield 307,289
Plainville 745,435
Plymouth 196,042
Pomfret 53,420
Portland 527,951
Preston 59,050
Prospect 116,728
Putnam 166,806
Redding 19,287
Ridgefield 19,656
Rocky Hill 1,259,142
Roxbury 4,951
Salem 50,502
Salisbury 1,447
Scotland 25,493
Seymour 238,227
Sharon 600
Shelton 317,310
Sherman 38,467
Simsbury 165,475
Somers 113,853
South Windsor 228,162
Southbury 732,698
Southington 416,967
Sprague 66,065
Stafford 191,030
Stamford 1,441,637
Sterling 63,492
Stonington 21,460
Stratford 1,119,920
Public Act No. 26-68 623 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Suffield 699,245
Thomaston 109,625
Thompson 150,694
Tolland 182,111
Torrington 2,752,854
Trumbull 68,341
Union 38,171
Vernon 3,276,608
Voluntown 42,345
Wallingford 425,723
Warren 3,475
Washington 7,401
Waterbury 14,775,836
Waterford 15,582
Watertown 1,454,776
West Hartford 2,824,592
West Haven 4,946,153
Westbrook 3,846
Weston 5,276
Westport 81,474
Wethersfield 1,009,684
Willington 69,132
Wilton 25,737
Winchester 160,499
Windham 3,759,271
Windsor 242,608
Windsor Locks 214,929
Wolcott 247,743
Woodbridge 26,948
Woodbury 250,602
Woodstock 99,811
(2) $5,550,000 of such amount shall be used to supplement the
amount appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by
this act, to the Department of Education, for Magnet Schools, and shall
be expended by the Department of Education for the purpose of
increasing the per student grant amount to operators of interdistrict
magnet school programs that are not local or regional boards of
Public Act No. 26-68 624 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
education in accordance with the provisions of section 10-264l of the
general statutes;
(3) $2,750,000 of such amount shall be used to supplement the
amount appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by
this act, to the Department of Education, for Magnet Schools, and shall
be expended by the Department of Education for the purpose of
increasing the per student grant amount to local and regional boards of
education that operate interdistrict magnet school programs in
accordance with the provisions of section 10-264l of the general statutes;
(4) $8,700,000 of such amount shall be used to supplement the
amount appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by
this act, to the Department of Education, for Charter Schools, and shall
be expended by the Department of Education for the purpose of
providing grants to charter schools in accordance with the provisions of
section 10-66ee of the general statutes;
(5) $800,000 of such amount shall be used to supplement the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to
the Department of Education, for Vocational Agriculture, and shall be
expended by the Department of Education for the purpose of providing
grants to local or regional boards of education that operate an
agricultural science and technology education center approved by the
State Board of Education in accordance with the provisions of section
10-65 of the general statutes; and
(6) $3,000,000 of such amount shall be used by the Department of
Education for administrative costs related to the distribution of
supplemental education grants to local and regional boards of education
and implementation of the oversight activities described in section 388
of this act.
(b) The funds appropriated in subsection (a) of this section to the
Public Act No. 26-68 625 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Department of Education, for Supplemental Education, for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, shall not lapse and shall be available to the
Department of Education for the same purpose for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2027.
Sec. 391. (Effective from passage) (a) (1) For the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the city of Hartford shall be paid a supplemental education aid
grant in an amount equal to five million dollars of its grant amount
listed in section 390 of this act. The amount paid to the city of Hartford
shall be paid by the Comptroller, upon certification of the
Commissioner of Education, to the treasurer of Hartford not later than
June thirtieth of said fiscal year. All aid paid to the city of Hartford
pursuant to the provisions of this subdivision shall be expended for
educational purposes only and shall be expended upon the
authorization of the board of education for Hartford. Such grant shall
not be used to supplant local funding for educational purposes.
(2) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, each town shall be paid a
supplemental education aid grant equal to the amount prescribed in
section 390 of this act. The amount due each town shall be paid by the
Comptroller, upon certification of the Commissioner of Education, to
the treasurer of each town not later than June thirtieth of said fiscal year.
All aid distributed to a town pursuant to the provisions of this
subdivision shall be expended for educational purposes only and shall
be expended upon the authorization of the local or regional board of
education. Such grant shall not be used to supplant local funding for
educational purposes.
(b) Such grant shall not be considered part of the budgeted
appropriation for education for the town for purposes of calculating the
minimum budget requirement for the town pursuant to section 10-262j
of the general statutes.
Sec. 392. (Effective July 1, 2027) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2028,
Public Act No. 26-68 626 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
payments from the Education Equalization Grants account by the
Department of Education shall not be less than the appropriation for
said account for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, plus $152,200,000.
Sec. 393. (Effective from passage) There is established an account to be
known as the "temporary education aid for school districts account",
which shall be a separate, nonlapsing account. The account shall contain
any moneys required by law to be deposited in the account. Moneys in
the account shall be expended by the Department of Education for the
purposes of providing district relief and compensatory use learning aid
grants in accordance with the provisions of section 394 of this act.
Sec. 394. (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) For the fiscal year ending June 30,
2027, each town shall be paid a district relief and compensatory use
learning aid grant equal to the amount prescribed in subsection (b) of
this section. The amount due each town shall be paid by the
Comptroller, upon certification of the Commissioner of Education, to
the treasurer of each town not later than October thirty-first of said fiscal
year.
(b) District relief and compensatory use learning aid grant amounts.
Grant for Fiscal
Year
Town 2027
Andover 40,096
Ashford 69,181
Barkhamsted 29,885
Bethany 35,291
Bethel 200,953
Bloomfield 160,957
Bolton 53,664
Bozrah 23,802
Branford 75,457
Bridgewater 4,415
Public Act No. 26-68 627 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Brookfield 27,584
Brooklyn 139,394
Canaan 2,515
Canterbury 80,097
Canton 81,370
Chaplin 33,043
Clinton 103,842
Colchester 240,804
Colebrook 8,078
Columbia 46,324
Cornwall 644
Coventry 159,058
Deep River 33,522
Derby 219,809
Durham 65,865
East Haddam 71,119
East Hampton 139,219
East Haven 259,186
East Lyme 121,530
East Windsor 113,382
Eastford 18,944
Easton 3,113
Ellington 206,833
Enfield 173,274
Essex 4,311
Farmington 74,160
Franklin 14,725
Glastonbury 134,346
Goshen 8,065
Groton 500,801
Guilford 35,322
Haddam 4,607
Hampton 21,168
Hartland 21,434
Hebron 119,954
Kent 138
Killingly 311,488
Killingworth 44,145
Lebanon 91,572
Public Act No. 26-68 628 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Ledyard 240,652
Lisbon 57,990
Lyme 6,428
Madison 7,909
Mansfield 262,244
Marlborough 59,042
Middlebury 54,899
Middlefield 42,007
Milford 193,465
Monroe 105,459
Montville 256,057
Morris 6,225
New Fairfield 69,622
New Milford 232,906
Newtown 89,914
Norfolk 1,108
North Branford 146,627
North Haven 87,989
North Stonington 53,206
Old Lyme 29,897
Orange 20,310
Oxford 73,540
Plainfield 307,289
Plymouth 196,042
Pomfret 53,420
Preston 59,050
Prospect 116,728
Putnam 166,806
Ridgefield 3,092
Roxbury 4,951
Salem 50,502
Salisbury 1,447
Scotland 25,493
Seymour 238,227
Sharon 600
Shelton 46,190
Simsbury 165,475
Somers 113,853
South Windsor 228,162
Public Act No. 26-68 629 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Southington 416,967
Sprague 42,205
Stafford 191,030
Sterling 63,492
Stonington 21,460
Stratford 92,255
Thomaston 109,625
Thompson 150,694
Tolland 182,111
Trumbull 68,341
Voluntown 42,345
Wallingford 425,723
Warren 3,475
Washington 7,401
Weston 5,276
Willington 69,132
Winchester 160,499
Windsor 242,608
Wolcott 247,743
Woodstock 99,811
(c) All aid distributed to a town pursuant to the provisions of this
section shall be expended for educational purposes only and shall be
expended upon the authorization of the local or regional board of
education. Such grant shall not be used to supplant local funding for
educational purposes.
(d) Such grant shall not be considered part of the budgeted
appropriation for education for the town for purposes of calculating the
minimum budget requirement for the town pursuant to section 10-262j
of the general statutes.
Sec. 395. (Effective from passage) Not later than June 15, 2026, the sum
of ten million nine hundred forty-five thousand five hundred two
dollars shall be transferred from the Probate Court Administration
Fund, established pursuant to section 45a-82 of the general statutes, to
the temporary education aid for school districts account established
Public Act No. 26-68 630 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
pursuant to section 393 of this act.
Sec. 396. (Effective from passage) The Commissioner of Administrative
Services, having reviewed applications for state grants for public school
building projects in accordance with section 10-283 of the general
statutes on the basis of priorities for such projects and standards for
school construction established by the State Board of Education, and
having prepared a listing of all such eligible projects ranked in order of
priority, as determined by said commissioner together with the amount
of the estimated grant with respect to each eligible project, and having
submitted such listing of eligible projects, prior to December 15, 2025, to
a committee of the General Assembly established under section 10-283a
of the general statutes for the purpose of reviewing such listing, is
hereby authorized to enter into grant commitments on behalf of the state
in accordance with said section 10-283a with respect to the priority
listing of such projects and in such estimated amounts as approved by
said committee prior to February 1, 2026, as follows:
School District Estimated Estimated
School Project Costs Grant
Project Number
MILFORD
Jonathan Law High School
084-0217 EA $12,650,000 $4,968,920
NORWICH
Teachers' Memorial Global Studies
Magnet Middle School
104-0122 N $69,367,713 $55,494,170
SEYMOUR
Bungay Elementary School
124-0058 N $60,000,000 $38,748,000
STAMFORD
Public Act No. 26-68 631 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Julia Stark Elementary School
135-0294 A/EC $14,347,081 $8,608,249
WATERBURY
Roberto Clemente International Dual
Language School
151-0318 EA $38,755,850 $30,589,992
WESTPORT
Long Lots Elementary School
158-0101 N $110,472,124 $12,229,264
Sec. 397. Section 10-285a of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) (1) The percentage of school building project grant money a local
board of education may be eligible to receive, under the provisions of
section 10-286, shall be assigned by the Commissioner of Administrative
Services in accordance with the percentage calculated by the
Commissioner of Education as follows: (A) For grants approved
pursuant to section 10-283 for which application is made on and after
July 1, 1991, and before July 1, 2011, (i) each town shall be ranked in
descending order from one to one hundred sixty-nine according to such
town's adjusted equalized net grand list per capita, as defined in section
10-261; and (ii) based upon such ranking, a percentage of not less than
twenty nor more than eighty shall be determined for each town on a
continuous scale; (B) for grants approved pursuant to section 10-283 for
which application is made on and after July 1, 2011, and before July 1,
2017, (i) each town shall be ranked in descending order from one to one
hundred sixty-nine according to such town's adjusted equalized net
grand list per capita, as defined in section 10-261, and (ii) based upon
such ranking, (I) a percentage of not less than ten nor more than seventy
shall be determined for new construction or replacement of a school
Public Act No. 26-68 632 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
building for each town on a continuous scale, and (II) a percentage of
not less than twenty nor more than eighty shall be determined for
renovations, extensions, code violations, roof replacements and major
alterations of an existing school building and the new construction or
replacement of a school building when a town or regional school district
can demonstrate that a new construction or replacement is less
expensive than a renovation, extension or major alteration of an existing
school building for each town on a continuous scale; (C) for grants
approved pursuant to section 10-283 for which application is made on
and after July 1, 2017, and before June 1, 2022, (i) each town shall be
ranked in descending order from one to one hundred sixty-nine
according to the adjusted equalized net grand list per capita, as defined
in section 10-261, of the town two, three and four years prior to the fiscal
year in which application is made, (ii) based upon such ranking, (I) a
percentage of not less than ten nor more than seventy shall be
determined for new construction or replacement of a school building for
each town on a continuous scale, and (II) a percentage of not less than
twenty nor more than eighty shall be determined for renovations,
extensions, code violations, roof replacements and major alterations of
an existing school building and the new construction or replacement of
a school building when a town or regional school district can
demonstrate that a new construction or replacement is less expensive
than a renovation, extension or major alteration of an existing school
building for each town on a continuous scale; (D) except as otherwise
provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, for grants approved
pursuant to section 10-283 for which application is made on and after
June 1, 2022, (i) each town shall be ranked in descending order from one
to one hundred sixty-nine according to the adjusted equalized net grand
list per capita, as defined in section 10-261, of the town two, three and
four years prior to the fiscal year in which application is made, and (ii)
based upon such ranking, (I) a percentage of not less than ten nor more
than seventy shall be determined for new construction or replacement
of a school building for each town on a continuous scale, and (II) a
Public Act No. 26-68 633 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
percentage of not less than twenty nor more than eighty shall be
determined for renovations, extensions, code violations, roof
replacements and major alterations of an existing school building and
the new construction or replacement of a school building when a town
or regional school district can demonstrate that a new construction or
replacement is less expensive than a renovation, extension or major
alteration of an existing school building for each town on a continuous
scale; and (E) except as otherwise provided in subdivision (2) of this
subsection, for grants approved pursuant to section 10-283 for which
application is made on and after July 1, 2024, (i) each town shall be
ranked in descending order from one to one hundred sixty-nine
according to the adjusted equalized net grand list per capita, as defined
in section 10-261, of the town two, three and four years prior to the fiscal
year in which application is made, and (ii) based upon such ranking, (I)
a percentage of not less than ten nor more than eighty shall be
determined for new construction or replacement of a school building for
each town on a continuous scale, and (II) a percentage of not less than
twenty nor more than eighty shall be determined for renovations,
extensions, code violations, roof replacements and major alterations of
an existing school building and the new construction or replacement of
a school building when a town or regional school district can
demonstrate that a new construction or replacement is less expensive
than a renovation, extension or major alteration of an existing school
building for each town on a continuous scale.
(2) For grants approved pursuant to section 10-283 for which
application is made prior to July 1, 2047, the percentage of school
building project grant money a local board of education for (A) any
town with a total population of eighty thousand or greater may be
eligible to receive shall be the greater of the percentage calculated
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection or sixty per cent, and (B)
the town of Cheshire shall be the greater of the percentage calculated
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection or fifty per cent.
Public Act No. 26-68 634 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(b) (1) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (2) of this
subsection, the percentage of school building project grant money a
regional board of education may be eligible to receive under the
provisions of section 10-286 shall be determined by its ranking. Such
ranking shall be determined by (A) multiplying the total population, as
defined in section 10-261, of each town in the district by such town's
ranking, as determined in subsection (a) of this section, (B) adding
together the figures determined under subparagraph (A) of this
subdivision, and (C) dividing the total computed under subparagraph
(B) of this subdivision by the total population of all towns in the district.
The ranking of each regional board of education shall be rounded to the
next higher whole number and each such board shall receive the same
reimbursement percentage as would a town with the same rank plus ten
per cent, except that no such percentage shall exceed eighty-five per
cent.
(2) Any board of education of a regional school district established or
expanded on or after July 1, 2016, that submits an application for a
school building project (A) not later than ten years after the
establishment or expansion of such regional school district, and (B) that
is related to such establishment or expansion, may be eligible to receive
a percentage of school building project grant money, under the
provisions of section 10-286, as follows: The reimbursement percentage
of the town in such regional school district with the greatest
reimbursement percentage, as determined in subsection (a) of this
section, plus ten per cent.
(c) The percentage of school building project grant money a regional
educational service center may be eligible to receive shall be determined
by its ranking. Such ranking shall be determined by (1) multiplying the
population of each member town in the regional educational service
center by such town's ranking, as determined in subsection (a) of this
section; (2) adding together the figures for each town determined under
Public Act No. 26-68 635 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
subdivision (1) of this subsection, and (3) dividing the total computed
under subdivision (2) of this subsection by the total population of all
member towns in the regional educational service center. The ranking
of each regional educational service center shall be rounded to the next
higher whole number and each such center shall receive the same
reimbursement percentage as would a town with the same rank.
(d) The percentage of school building project grant money a
cooperative arrangement pursuant to section 10-158a, may be eligible to
receive shall be determined by its ranking. Such ranking shall be
determined by (1) multiplying the total population, as defined in section
10-261, of each town in the cooperative arrangement by such town's
ranking, as determined in subsection (a) of this section, (2) adding the
products determined under subdivision (1) of this subsection, and (3)
dividing the total computed under subdivision (2) of this subsection by
the total population of all towns in the cooperative arrangement. The
ranking of each cooperative arrangement shall be rounded to the next
higher whole number and each such cooperative arrangement shall
receive the same reimbursement percentage as would a town with the
same rank plus ten percentage points.
(e) (1) If an elementary school building project for a new building or
for the expansion of an existing building includes space for an early
childhood care and education program that provides services for
children from birth to five years, the percentage determined pursuant to
this section for the entire school building project shall be increased by
fifteen percentage points, but shall not exceed [one hundred] ninety-five
per cent. Recipient districts shall maintain such early childhood care and
education program for at least ten years.
(2) The percentage determined pursuant to this section for any school
building project for a building or facility that will be used exclusively by
a local or regional board of education for an early childhood care and
education program that provides services for children from birth to five
Public Act No. 26-68 636 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
years shall be increased by fifteen percentage points, but shall not
exceed [one hundred] ninety-five per cent. Recipient districts shall
maintain such early childhood care and education program for at least
twenty years.
(f) The percentage determined pursuant to this section for a school
building project grant for the expansion, alteration or renovation of an
existing public school building to convert such building for use as a
lighthouse school, as defined in section 10-266cc, shall be increased by
ten percentage points.
(g) The percentage determined pursuant to this section for a school
building project grant shall be increased by the percentage of the total
projected enrollment of the school attributable to the number of spaces
made available for out-of-district students participating in the program
established pursuant to section 10-266aa, provided the maximum
increase shall not exceed ten percentage points.
(h) Subject to the provisions of section 10-285d, if an elementary
school building project for a school in a priority school district or for a
priority school is necessary in order to offer a full-day kindergarten
program or a full-day preschool program or to reduce class size
pursuant to section 10-265f, the percentage determined pursuant to this
section shall be increased by fifteen percentage points, but shall not
exceed [one hundred] ninety-five per cent, for the portion of the
building used primarily for such full-day kindergarten program, full-
day preschool program or such reduced size classes. Recipient districts
that receive an increase pursuant to this subsection in support of a full-
day preschool program shall maintain full-day preschool enrollment for
at least ten years.
(i) For all projects authorized on or after July 1, 2007, all attorneys'
fees and court costs related to litigation shall be eligible for state school
construction grant assistance only if the grant applicant is the prevailing
Public Act No. 26-68 637 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
party in any such litigation.
(j) The percentage determined pursuant to this section for a school
building project grant for a diversity school, approved pursuant to
section 10-286h, shall be increased by ten percentage points.
(k) If a school building project for a new building or for the
renovation or expansion of an existing building includes plans for the
expansion or creation of in-district special education programming and
services, the percentage determined pursuant to this section shall be
increased by fifteen percentage points, but shall not exceed [one
hundred] ninety-five per cent, for the portion of the project used
primarily for such purpose, provided the portion of such school
building project that will be used primarily for such in-district special
education programming and services shall be a part of a school building
that is being used to provide a program of general education for
nonspecial education students and is a part of the school building being
constructed or renovated or expanded; and, provided further, any
additional funding received by the local or regional board of education
resulting from and related to the inclusion of such plans for the
expansion or creation of in-district special education programming and
services shall be expended for such construction or renovation or
expansion.
(l) On and after July 1, 2026, for applications submitted pursuant to
subsection (a) of section 10-283, the reimbursement percentage of school
building project that a local or regional board of education or an
endowed academy approved pursuant to section 10-34 shall be
increased by five percentage points, provided such increase shall not
result in a reimbursement percentage exceeding [one hundred] ninety-
five per cent, if the municipality (1) is in compliance with the provisions
of section 8-13bb regarding its housing growth plan or compliance with
a regional housing growth plan, as applicable, and has demonstrated
steps such municipality has taken to implement its housing growth
Public Act No. 26-68 638 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
policies, (2) is a qualifying transit-oriented community pursuant to
section 8-13hh, or (3) has adopted a development district established
pursuant to a memorandum of agreement with the Connecticut
Municipal Development Authority.
(m) On and after July 1, 2026, if the student enrollment of a school
district has increased by twenty per cent or more over the ten-year
period immediately preceding the date an application is submitted
pursuant to section 10-283, the reimbursement percentage of the town
of such school district shall be increased by twenty percentage points,
provided such increase shall not result in a reimbursement percentage
exceeding ninety-five per cent.
(n) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, the
percentage determined pursuant to this section for a school building
project grant shall not exceed ninety-five per cent.
Sec. 398. Section 10-292q of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) There is established a [School Building Projects Advisory Council]
School Safety and Security Infrastructure Advisory Council. The council
shall consist of: (1) The Secretary of the Office of Policy and
Management, or the secretary's designee, (2) the Commissioner of
Administrative Services, or the commissioner's designee, (3) the
Commissioner of Education, or the commissioner's designee, (4) the
Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection, or the
commissioner's designee, (5) the [chairperson of the Technical
Education and Career System board, or the chairperson's] executive
director of the Technical Education and Career System, or the executive
director's designee, and (6) [six] eight members appointed by the
Governor, one of whom shall be a person with experience in school
[building] safety and security planning project matters, one of whom
shall be a person with experience in [architecture] administration of the
Public Act No. 26-68 639 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Connecticut Building Code, one of whom shall be a [person]
Connecticut licensed architect with experience in [engineering] school
planning and design, one of whom shall be a person from higher
education with experience in [school] campus safety and security
planning project matters, one of whom shall be a [person with
experience with the administration of the State Building Code,]
representative of a rural school district with experience in school safety
and security planning project matters, one of whom shall be a
representative of a suburban school district with experience in school
safety and security planning project matters, one of whom shall be a
representative of an urban school district with experience in school
safety and security planning project matters and one of whom shall be
a person with experience and expertise in construction for students with
disabilities and the accessibility provisions of the Americans with
Disabilities Act, 42 USC 12101 et seq. The terms for those members
appointed under subdivision (6) of this subsection before the effective
date of this section shall expire on June 30, 2026, and the members
appointed under said subdivision shall be appointed not later than
September 1, 2026.
(b) (1) Prior to the effective date of this section, (A) the chairperson of
the council shall be the Commissioner of Administrative Services, or the
commissioner's designee; [. A] and (B) a person employed by the
Department of Administrative Services who is responsible for school
building projects shall serve as the administrative staff of the council.
(2) On and after the effective date of this section, (A) the chairperson
of the council shall be the Commissioner of Emergency Services and
Public Protection, or the commissioner's designee; and (B) a person
employed by the Department of Emergency Services and Public
Protection shall serve as the administrative staff of the council.
(3) The council shall meet at least quarterly to discuss matters relating
to school [building] safety and security infrastructure projects.
Public Act No. 26-68 640 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
[(b)] (c) The [School Building Projects Advisory Council] council shall
(1) develop [model blueprints for new school building]
recommendations regarding school safety and security infrastructure
projects that are in accordance with industry standards for school
[buildings and the school safety infrastructure criteria, developed
pursuant to section 10-292r] safety and security infrastructure, (2)
conduct studies, research and analyses related to school safety and
security infrastructure, (3) make recommendations for improvements to
the school [building projects] safety and security grant processes,
including eligibility criteria, to the Governor and the joint standing
[committee] committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to [appropriations and the budgets of state agencies,]
education and [finance, revenue and bonding] public safety, and (4)
periodically review and update, as necessary, the school safety
infrastructure criteria developed pursuant to section 10-292r.
Sec. 399. Section 10-292r of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) The [School Building Projects Advisory Council] School Safety
and Security Infrastructure Advisory Council, established pursuant to
section 10-292q, shall periodically review and update, as necessary,
school safety infrastructure criteria for school building projects awarded
grants pursuant to this chapter and the school security infrastructure
competitive grant program, pursuant to section 84 of public act 13-3.
Such school safety infrastructure criteria shall conform to industry
standards for school building safety infrastructure and shall address
areas including, but not be limited to, (1) entryways to school buildings
and classrooms, such as, reinforcement of entryways, ballistic glass,
solid core doors, double door access, computer-controlled electronic
locks, remote locks on all entrance and exits and buzzer systems, (2) the
use of cameras throughout the school building and at all entrances and
exits, including the use of closed-circuit television monitoring, (3)
Public Act No. 26-68 641 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
penetration resistant vestibules, and (4) other security infrastructure
improvements and devices as they become industry standards. The
council shall meet at least annually to review and update, if necessary,
the school safety infrastructure criteria and make such criteria available
to local and regional boards of education.
(b) The [School Building Projects Advisory Council] council shall
submit any updates made to the school safety infrastructure criteria to
the Commissioners of Emergency Services and Public Protection and
Education and the joint standing committees of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to public safety and education, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a.
Sec. 400. Subsections (b) and (c) of section 10-264h of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(b) Subject to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the
applicant shall receive current payments of scheduled estimated eligible
[project] costs for the interdistrict magnet school facility, provided (1)
the applicant files an application for a school building project, in
accordance with section 10-283, by the date prescribed by the
Commissioner of Administrative Services, (2) final plans and
specifications for the project are approved pursuant to sections 10-291
and 10-292, and (3) such applicant submits to the Commissioner of
Education, in such form as the commissioner prescribes, and the
commissioner approves a plan for the operation of the facility which
includes, but need not be limited to: A description of the educational
programs to be offered, the completion date for the project, an estimated
budget for the operation of the facility, written commitments for
participation from the districts that will participate in the school and an
analysis of the effect of the program on the reduction of racial, ethnic
and economic isolation. The Commissioner of Education shall notify the
Commissioner of Administrative Services and the secretary of the State
Public Act No. 26-68 642 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Bond Commission when the provisions of subdivision (3) of this
subsection have been met. Upon application to the Commissioner of
Administrative Services, compliance with the provisions of subdivision
(3) of this subsection and after authorization by the General Assembly
pursuant to section 10-283, the applicant shall be eligible to receive
progress payments in accordance with the provisions of section 10-287i.
(c) (1) If the school building ceases to be used as an interdistrict
magnet school facility and the grant was provided for the purchase or
construction of the facility, the Commissioner of Administrative
Services, in consultation with the Commissioner of Education, shall
determine whether (A) title to the building and any legal interest in
appurtenant land shall revert to the state, or (B) the school district shall
reimburse the state an amount equal to the difference between the
amount received pursuant to this section and the amount the district
would have been eligible to receive based on the percentage determined
pursuant to section 10-285a, multiplied by the estimated eligible
[project] costs.
(2) If the school building ceases to be used as an interdistrict magnet
school facility and the grant was provided for the extension or major
alteration of the facility, the school district shall reimburse the state the
amount determined in accordance with subparagraph (B) of subdivision
(1) of this subsection. A school district receiving a request for
reimbursement pursuant to this subdivision shall reimburse the state
not later than the close of the fiscal year following the year in which the
request is made. If the school district fails to so reimburse the state, the
Department of Administrative Services may request the Department of
Education to withhold such amount from the total sum which is paid
from the State Treasury to such school district or the town in which it is
located or, in the case of a regional school district, the towns which
comprise the school district. If the amount paid from the State Treasury
is less than the amount due, the Department of Administrative Services
Public Act No. 26-68 643 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
shall collect such amount from the school district.
Sec. 401. Subdivision (12) of section 10-282 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
passage):
(12) "Net eligible costs" means eligible [project] costs adjusted for the
state standard education space specifications;
Sec. 402. Subdivisions (5) and (6) of subsection (a) of section 10-286 of
the general statutes are repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(5) In the case of a public school administrative or service facility, one-
half of the eligible percentage for subdivisions (1) and (2) of this
subsection of the eligible [project] cost as determined by the
Commissioner of Administrative Services, or in the case of a regional
educational service center administrative or service facility, the eligible
percentage, as determined pursuant to subsection (c) of section 10-285a,
of the eligible [project] cost as determined by the commissioner;
(6) In the case of the total replacement of a roof or the total
replacement of a portion of a roof which has existed for at least twenty
years, or in the case of the total replacement of a roof or the total
replacement of a portion of a roof which has existed for fewer than
twenty years when it is determined by a registered architect or
registered engineer that such roof was improperly designed or
improperly constructed and the town is prohibited from recovery of
damages or has no other recourse at law or in equity, the eligible
percentage for subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection, of the eligible
cost as determined by the Commissioner of Administrative Services. In
the case of the total replacement of a roof or the total replacement of a
portion of a roof which has existed for fewer than twenty years (A) when
it is determined by a registered architect or registered engineer that such
Public Act No. 26-68 644 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
roof was improperly designed or improperly constructed and the town
has recourse at law or in equity and recovers less than such eligible cost,
the eligible percentage for subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection of
the difference between such recovery and such eligible cost, and (B)
when the roof is at least fifteen years old but less than twenty years old
and it cannot be determined by a registered architect or registered
engineer that such roof was improperly designed or improperly
constructed, the eligible percentage for subdivisions (1) and (2) of this
subsection of the eligible [project] costs provided such costs are
multiplied by the ratio of the age of the roof to twenty years. For
purposes of this subparagraph, the age of the roof shall be determined
in whole years to the nearest year based on the time between the
completed installation of the old roof and the date of the grant
application for the school construction project for the new roof;
Sec. 403. Section 10-287i of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
A grant under this chapter for any school building project authorized
by the General Assembly on or after July 1, 1996, or for any project for
which application is made pursuant to subsection (b) of section 10-283,
on or after July 1, 1997, shall be paid as follows: Applicants shall request
progress payments for the state share of eligible [project] costs
calculated pursuant to sections 10-65, 10-76e and 10-286, at such time
and in such manner as the Commissioner of Administrative Services
shall prescribe provided no payments shall commence until the
applicant has filed a notice of authorization of funding for the local share
of project costs, and provided further no payments other than those for
architectural planning and site acquisition shall be made prior to
approval of the final architectural plans pursuant to section 10-292. For
any project authorized on or after July 1, 2024, the Department of
Administrative Services shall withhold five per cent of a grant if the
commissioner determines that the applicant has failed to comply with
Public Act No. 26-68 645 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
the provisions of subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of section 4a-60g
relating to minority business enterprises. The Department of
Administrative Services shall withhold five per cent of a grant pending
completion of an audit pursuant to section 10-287 provided, if the
department is unable to complete the required audit within six months
of the date a request for final payment is filed, the applicant may have
an independent audit performed and include the cost of such audit in
the eligible [project] costs.
Sec. 404. Section 10-285b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) (1) Any incorporated or endowed high school or academy
approved by the State Board of Education, pursuant to section 10-34,
may apply and be eligible to subsequently be considered for a school
building project grant commitment from the state, provided the school
building project complies with the provisions of this chapter.
(2) Applications pursuant to this subsection shall be filed at such time
and on such forms as the Department of Administrative Services
prescribes. The Commissioners of Education and Administrative
Services shall approve such applications pursuant to the provisions of
section 10-284.
(3) In the case of a school building project, as defined in subparagraph
(A) of subdivision (3) of section 10-282, the amount of the grant
approved by the Commissioner of Administrative Services shall be
computed pursuant to the provisions of section 10-286, and the eligible
percentage shall be computed pursuant to the provisions of subsection
(b) of this section. The calculation of the grant pursuant to this section
shall be made in accordance with the state standard space specifications
in effect at the time of final grant calculation.
(b) The percentage of school building project grant money each
Public Act No. 26-68 646 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
incorporated or endowed high school or academy may be eligible to
receive under the provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall be
determined by its ranking. The ranking shall be determined by (1)
multiplying the total population, as defined in section 10-261, of each
town which at the time of application for such school construction grant
commitment has designated such school as the high school for such
town for a period of not less than five years from the date of such
application, by such town's percentile ranking, as determined in
subsection (a) of section 10-285a, (2) adding together the figures for each
town determined under subdivision (1) of this subsection, and (3)
dividing the total computed under subdivision (2) of this subsection by
the total population of all towns which designate the school as their high
school under subdivision (1) of this subsection. The ranking determined
pursuant to this subsection shall be rounded to the next higher whole
number. Such high school or academy shall receive the reimbursement
percentage of a town with the same rank increased by five per cent,
except that the reimbursement percentage of such high school or
academy shall not exceed eighty-five per cent.
(c) In order for an incorporated or endowed high school or academy
to be eligible for a grant commitment pursuant to this section such high
school or academy shall provide educational services to the town or
towns designating it as the high school for such town or towns for a
period of not less than ten years after completion of grant payments
under this section.
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, for any school
building project for an incorporated or endowed high school or
academy that has been authorized by the General Assembly, the
Commissioner of Administrative Services may waive any provision of
this chapter that is inconsistent or incompatible with the educational or
administrative structure of such high school or academy in order to
provide a grant to such high school or academy under this chapter.
Public Act No. 26-68 647 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 405. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions of
subdivision (1) of subsection (e) of section 10-285a of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
increasing the reimbursement percentage for an entire school building
project that includes the expansion of an existing building to include
space for an early childhood care and education program, the town of
Greenwich shall be eligible for such increased reimbursement
percentage for the entire extension and alteration and roof replacement
project at Old Greenwich School (Project Number 057-0115 EA/RR),
provided the application for such extension and alteration and roof
replacement project submitted by the town of Greenwich on June 21,
2024, includes plans and specifications for space for an early childhood
care and education program that would otherwise be eligible under said
section.
Sec. 406. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 10-283 of the general statutes or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said section requiring a completed grant application be
submitted prior to June 30, 2025, for any school building project that was
previously authorized and that has changed substantially in scope or
cost and is seeking reauthorization, the renovation project at Edgewood
Pre-K Academy (Project Number 24DASY017090RNV0624) in the town
of Bristol with costs not to exceed twenty-eight million eight hundred
thousand dollars shall be included in section 396 of this act and shall
subsequently be considered for a grant commitment from the state,
provided the town of Bristol meets all other provisions of chapter 173 of
the general statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of
Education or the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to
said chapter and is eligible for grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (e) of section 10-
Public Act No. 26-68 648 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
285a of the general statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State
Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said section increasing the reimbursement percentage for a
school building project that includes the expansion of an existing
building to include space for an early childhood care and education
program, the town of Bristol shall be eligible for such increased
reimbursement percentage for the renovation project at Edgewood Pre-
K Academy (Project Number 24DASY017090RNV0624), provided the
application for reauthorization for such renovation project submitted by
the town of Bristol includes plans and specifications for space for an
early childhood care and education program that would otherwise be
eligible under said section.
Sec. 407. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 10-285a of the general statutes, or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said section concerning the reimbursement percentage that
a local board of education may be eligible to receive for a school building
project, the reimbursement percentage determined pursuant to said
section shall be increased by ten percentage points for the town of
Plainville for the renovation project at Middle School of Plainville
(Project Number 110-0064 RNV).
Sec. 408. Section 128 of public act 23-205 is repealed and the following
is inserted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-283 of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section 10-
283 requiring a completed grant application be submitted prior to June
30, 2022, the renovation and extension and alteration project at John
Winthrop Elementary School (Project Number 015-0182 RNV/EA) in
the town of Bridgeport with costs not to exceed seventy-five million
dollars shall be included in subdivision (1) of section 114 of [this act]
Public Act No. 26-68 649 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
public act 23-205 and shall subsequently be considered for a grant
commitment from the state, provided the town of Bridgeport files an
application for such school building project prior to [October 1]
December 30, 2023, and meets all other provisions of chapter 173 of the
general statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of
Education or the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to
said chapter and is eligible for grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (e) of section 10-
285a of the general statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State
Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said section increasing the reimbursement percentage for a
school building project that includes the expansion of an existing
building to include space for an early childhood care and education
program, the town of Bridgeport shall be eligible for such increased
reimbursement percentage for the renovation and extension and
alteration project at John Winthrop Elementary School (Project Number
015-0182 RNV/EA), provided the application for such renovation and
extension and alteration project submitted by the town of Bridgeport on
December 29, 2023, includes plans and specifications for space for an
early childhood care and education program that would otherwise be
eligible under said section.
Sec. 409. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 10-283 of the general statutes, or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said section requiring a completed grant application be
submitted prior to June 30, 2025, the school building project at East End
Elementary School in the town of Bridgeport with costs not to exceed
one hundred thirty-two million dollars shall be included in section 396
of this act and shall subsequently be considered for a grant commitment
from the state, provided the town of Bridgeport files an application for
such school building project prior to September 1, 2026, and meets all
Public Act No. 26-68 650 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
other provisions of chapter 173 of the general statutes or any regulation
adopted by the State Board of Education or the Department of
Administrative Services pursuant to said chapter and is eligible for
grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-285a of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
concerning the reimbursement percentage that a local board of
education may be eligible to receive for a school building project, the
town of Bridgeport may use the reimbursement rate of ninety-five per
cent for the school building project at East End Elementary School,
provided such school building project includes plans and specifications
for space for an early childhood care and education program and results
in a net zero school building facility.
Sec. 410. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 10-286 of the general statutes or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said section concerning the calculation of grants using the
state standard space specifications, the town of Westport shall be
exempt from the state standard space specifications for the purpose of
the calculation of the grant for the new construction project at Long Lots
Elementary School (Project Number 158-0101 N).
Sec. 411. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 10-283 of the general statutes, or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said section requiring a completed grant application be
submitted prior to June 30, 2025, the school building project at Mary T.
Murphy Elementary School in the town of Branford with costs not to
exceed ninety-eight million dollars shall be included in section 396 of
this act and shall subsequently be considered for a grant commitment
from the state, provided the town of Branford files an application for
Public Act No. 26-68 651 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
such school building project prior to October 1, 2026, and meets all other
provisions of chapter 173 of the general statutes or any regulation
adopted by the State Board of Education or the Department of
Administrative Services pursuant to said chapter and is eligible for
grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-285a of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
concerning the reimbursement percentage that a local board of
education may be eligible to receive for a school building project, the
reimbursement percentage determined pursuant to said section shall be
increased by fifteen percentage points for the town of Branford for the
school building project at Mary T. Murphy Elementary School.
Sec. 412. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 10-283 of the general statutes, or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said section requiring a completed grant application be
submitted prior to June 30, 2025, the school building project at Mary R.
Tisko Elementary School in the town of Branford with costs not to
exceed ninety-eight million dollars shall be included in section 396 of
this act and shall subsequently be considered for a grant commitment
from the state, provided the town of Branford files an application for
such school building project prior to October 1, 2026, and meets all other
provisions of chapter 173 of the general statutes or any regulation
adopted by the State Board of Education or the Department of
Administrative Services pursuant to said chapter and is eligible for
grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-285a of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
concerning the reimbursement percentage that a local board of
Public Act No. 26-68 652 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
education may be eligible to receive for a school building project, the
reimbursement percentage determined pursuant to said section shall be
increased by fifteen percentage points for the town of Branford for the
school building project at Mary R. Tisko Elementary School.
Sec. 413. Section 125 of public act 23-205, as amended by section 187
of public act 24-151, is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-283 of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
requiring a completed grant application be submitted prior to June 30,
2022, the renovation project at Jefferson Elementary School in the town
of New Britain with costs not to exceed seventy million dollars shall be
included in subdivision (1) of section 114 of public act 23-205 and shall
subsequently be considered for a grant commitment from the state,
provided the town of New Britain files an application for such school
building project prior to October 1, 2028, and meets all other provisions
of chapter 173 of the general statutes or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said chapter and is eligible for grant assistance pursuant to
said chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-285a of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
concerning the reimbursement percentage that a local board of
education may be eligible to receive for a school building project, the
town of New Britain may use the reimbursement rate of ninety-five per
cent for the renovation project at Jefferson Elementary School, provided
(1) the school district for the town of New Britain is an educational
reform district, as defined in section 10-262u of the general statutes, on
the effective date of this section, and (2) the school building committee
Public Act No. 26-68 653 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
responsible for undertaking such school building project is established
in accordance with the provisions of section 120 of public act 21-111, as
amended by public act 23-205.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-286 of the general
statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
concerning the calculation of grants using the state standard space
specifications, the town of New Britain shall be exempt from the state
standard space specifications for the purpose of the calculation of the
grant for the renovation project at Jefferson Elementary School.
Sec. 414. (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 10-283 of the general statutes, or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said section requiring a completed grant application be
submitted prior to June 30, 2025, the school building project at Prudence
Crandall Elementary School in the town of Enfield with costs not to
exceed one hundred thirteen million nine hundred ninety-six thousand
nine hundred fifty-seven dollars shall be included in section 396 of this
act and shall subsequently be considered for a grant commitment from
the state, provided the town of Enfield files an application for such
school building project prior to October 1, 2026, and meets all other
provisions of chapter 173 of the general statutes or any regulation
adopted by the State Board of Education or the Department of
Administrative Services pursuant to said chapter and is eligible for
grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-284 of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services requiring that a town or
regional school district begin construction on a project not later than two
years after the effective date of the section of the General Assembly
authorizing the Commissioner of Administrative Services to enter into
Public Act No. 26-68 654 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
grant commitments for such project, the town of Enfield shall have until
June 30, 2030, to begin construction on the school building project at
Prudence Crandall Elementary School.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-286 of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
concerning the calculation of grants using the state standard space
specifications, the town of Enfield shall be exempt from the state
standard space specifications for the purpose of the calculation of the
grant for the school building project at Prudence Crandall Elementary
School.
Sec. 415. (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 10-283 of the general statutes, or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said section requiring a completed grant application be
submitted prior to June 30, 2025, the school building project at
Hazardville Memorial Elementary School in the town of Enfield with
costs not to exceed one hundred five million five hundred two thousand
two hundred two dollars shall be included in section 396 of this act and
shall subsequently be considered for a grant commitment from the state,
provided the town of Enfield files an application for such school
building project prior to October 1, 2026, and meets all other provisions
of chapter 173 of the general statutes or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said chapter and is eligible for grant assistance pursuant to
said chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-284 of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services requiring that a town or
regional school district begin construction on a project not later than two
years after the effective date of the section of the General Assembly
Public Act No. 26-68 655 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
authorizing the Commissioner of Administrative Services to enter into
grant commitments for such project, the town of Enfield shall have until
June 30, 2030, to begin construction on the school building project at
Hazardville Memorial Elementary School.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-286 of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
concerning the calculation of grants using the state standard space
specifications, the town of Enfield shall be exempt from the state
standard space specifications for the purpose of the calculation of the
grant for the school building project at Hazardville Memorial
Elementary School.
Sec. 416. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of
subdivision (3) of section 10-282 of the general statutes, or any
regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or the Department
of Administrative Services pursuant to said section concerning the
definition of school building project, the construction, extension or
major alteration of a gymnasium, including an ice rink, at West Haven
High School shall be considered a school building project and
subsequently qualify for a school building project grant under chapter
173 of the general statutes.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-283 of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
requiring a completed grant application be submitted prior to June 30,
2025, the school building project described in subsection (a) of this
section in the town of West Haven with costs not to exceed four million
dollars shall be included in section 396 of this act and shall subsequently
be considered for a grant commitment from the state, provided the town
of West Haven files an application for such school building project prior
to October 1, 2026, and meets all other provisions of chapter 173 of the
Public Act No. 26-68 656 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
general statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of
Education or the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to
said chapter and is eligible for grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (3) of subsection
(a) of section 10-286 of the general statutes or any regulation adopted by
the State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative
Services limiting reimbursement to one-half of the eligible percentage of
the net eligible cost of construction to a town for the construction,
extension or major alteration of a gymnasium, the town of West Haven
shall receive full reimbursement of the eligible percentage for
subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of section 10-286 of the general
statutes of the net eligible cost of the construction of a gymnasium,
including an ice rink, as part of the school building project described in
subsection (a) of this section at West Haven High School.
Sec. 417. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 10-283 of the general statutes or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said section concerning ineligible costs, the town of
Seymour shall be eligible to receive reimbursement under chapter 173
of the general statutes for certain ineligible costs associated with any
existing or future energy or infrastructure improvement projects,
including, but not limited to, photovoltaic, building management
systems, energy conservation, heating, ventilation and air conditioning
systems and roof replacement projects, at any public elementary,
middle or high school in the town that are financed through a tax-
exempt lease purchase agreement entered into between July 1, 2025, and
June 30, 2027.
Sec. 418. (Effective July 1, 2026) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 10-285a of the general statutes, or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said section concerning the reimbursement percentage that
Public Act No. 26-68 657 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
a local board of education may be eligible to receive for a school building
project, the reimbursement percentage determined pursuant to said
section shall be increased by twenty percentage points for the town of
South Windsor for any school building project for South Windsor High
School for which an application is submitted to the Department of
Administrative Services, pursuant to section 10-283 of the general
statutes, on or before June 30, 2027.
Sec. 419. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of
subdivision (6) of subsection (a) of section 10-286 of the general statutes
or any regulations adopted by the State Board of Education or the
Department of Administrative Services regarding eligible costs for roof
replacement projects and requiring that a roof be at least twenty years
old to qualify for a grant for a replacement of such roof, the roof at
Suffield High School shall be deemed to be twenty years old and the
town of Suffield may replace the roof at Suffield High School and be
eligible to receive a grant based on the eligible percentages determined
pursuant to said section of the eligible project costs.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-283 of the general
statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section 10-
283 requiring that the description of a project type for a school building
project be made at the time of application for a school building project
grant, the town of Suffield may change the description of the roof
replacement project at Suffield High School to a roof replacement and
photovoltaic project and subsequently qualify as a roof replacement and
photovoltaic project.
Sec. 420. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 10-283 of the general statutes, or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said section requiring a completed grant application be
submitted prior to June 30, 2025, the school building project at Suffield
Public Act No. 26-68 658 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Middle School in the town of Suffield with costs not to exceed one
hundred nineteen million five hundred thousand dollars shall be
included in section 396 of this act and shall subsequently be considered
for a grant commitment from the state, provided the town of Suffield
files an application for such school building project prior to July 1, 2026,
and meets all other provisions of chapter 173 of the general statutes or
any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or the
Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said chapter and is
eligible for grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-285a of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
concerning the reimbursement percentage that a local board of
education may be eligible to receive for a school building project, the
reimbursement percentage determined pursuant to said section shall be
increased by ten percentage points for the town of Suffield for the school
building project at Suffield Middle School.
Sec. 421. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 10-283 of the general statutes, or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said section requiring a completed grant application be
submitted prior to June 30, 2025, the school building project at Timothy
Dwight Elementary School in the town of Fairfield with costs not to
exceed seventy-six million dollars shall be included in section 396 of this
act and shall subsequently be considered for a grant commitment from
the state, provided the town of Fairfield files an application for such
school building project prior to July 1, 2026, and meets all other
provisions of chapter 173 of the general statutes or any regulation
adopted by the State Board of Education or the Department of
Administrative Services pursuant to said chapter and is eligible for
grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
Public Act No. 26-68 659 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-285a of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
concerning the reimbursement percentage that a local board of
education may be eligible to receive for a school building project, the
town of Fairfield may use the reimbursement rate of seventy-five per
cent for the school building project at Timothy Dwight Elementary
School.
Sec. 422. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 10-292 of the general statutes or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
requiring that a bid not be let out until plans and specifications have
been approved by the Department of Administrative Services, the town
of Fairfield shall be reimbursed for eligible project costs for a project to
update the heating, ventilation and air conditioning system at
Tomlinson Middle School, provided the town of Fairfield meets all other
provisions of chapter 173 of the general statutes or any regulation
adopted by the State Board of Education or the Department of
Administrative Services pursuant to said chapter and is eligible for
grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
Sec. 423. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 10-283 of the general statutes, or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said section requiring a completed grant application be
submitted prior to June 30, 2025, the school building project at Casimir
Pulaski Elementary School in the town of Meriden with costs not to
exceed one hundred twenty-two million dollars shall be included in
section 396 of this act and shall subsequently be considered for a grant
commitment from the state, provided the town of Meriden files an
application for such school building project prior to October 1, 2026, and
meets all other provisions of chapter 173 of the general statutes or any
Public Act No. 26-68 660 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or the Department
of Administrative Services pursuant to said chapter and is eligible for
grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
Sec. 424. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of
subdivision (3) of section 10-282 of the general statutes, or any
regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or the Department
of Administrative Services pursuant to said section concerning the
definition of school building project, the construction of outdoor athletic
facilities, including synthetic turf field replacement, at Cheshire High
School shall be considered a school building project and subsequently
qualify for a school building project grant under chapter 173 of the
general statutes.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-283 of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
requiring a completed grant application be submitted prior to June 30,
2025, the school building project described in subsection (a) of this
section in the town of Cheshire with costs not to exceed one million five
hundred thousand dollars shall be included in section 396 of this act and
shall subsequently be considered for a grant commitment from the state,
provided the town of Cheshire files an application for such school
building project prior to July 1, 2027, and meets all other provisions of
chapter 173 of the general statutes or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said chapter and is eligible for grant assistance pursuant to
said chapter.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (B) of
subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 10-285a of the general statutes
or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or the
Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
concerning the reimbursement percentage that a town may be eligible
Public Act No. 26-68 661 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
to receive for a school building project, the town of Cheshire shall use
the reimbursement rate of ninety-five per cent for the school building
project described in subsection (a) of this section at Cheshire High
School.
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (3) of subsection
(a) of section 10-286 of the general statutes or any regulation adopted by
the State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative
Services limiting reimbursement to one-half of the eligible percentage of
the net eligible cost of construction to a town for the construction,
extension or major alteration of outdoor athletic facilities, the town of
Cheshire shall receive full reimbursement of the reimbursement
percentage described in subsection (c) of this section of the net eligible
cost of the construction of outdoor athletic facilities, including synthetic
turf field replacement, as part of the school building project described
in subsection (a) of this section at Cheshire High School.
Sec. 425. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of
subdivision (3) of section 10-282 of the general statutes, or any
regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or the Department
of Administrative Services pursuant to said section concerning the
definition of school building project, the construction of outdoor athletic
facilities, including the installation or replacement of synthetic turf
fields, replacement of a track and replacement of tennis courts, at
Glastonbury High School shall be considered a school building project
and subsequently qualify for a school building project grant under
chapter 173 of the general statutes.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-283 of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
requiring a completed grant application be submitted prior to June 30,
2025, the school building project described in subsection (a) of this
section in the town of Glastonbury with costs not to exceed five million
Public Act No. 26-68 662 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
five hundred twenty-five thousand dollars shall be included in section
396 of this act and shall subsequently be considered for a grant
commitment from the state, provided the town of Glastonbury files an
application for such school building project prior to July 1, 2027, and
meets all other provisions of chapter 173 of the general statutes or any
regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or the Department
of Administrative Services pursuant to said chapter and is eligible for
grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (3) of subsection
(a) of section 10-286 of the general statutes or any regulation adopted by
the State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative
Services limiting reimbursement to one-half of the eligible percentage of
the net eligible cost of construction to a town for the construction,
extension or major alteration of a gymnasium, the town of Glastonbury
shall receive full reimbursement of the eligible percentage for
subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of section 10-286 of the general
statutes of the net eligible cost of the construction of outdoor athletic
facilities as part of the school building project described in subsection
(a) of this section at Glastonbury High School.
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-292 of the general
statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services requiring that a bid not be
let out until plans and specifications have been approved by the
Department of Administrative Services, the town of Glastonbury shall
be reimbursed for eligible project costs for the construction of outdoor
athletic facilities as part of the school building project described in
subsection (a) of this section at Glastonbury High School, provided the
town of Glastonbury meets all other provisions of chapter 173 of the
general statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of
Education or the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to
said chapter and is eligible for grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
Public Act No. 26-68 663 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 426. Section 127 of public act 23-205 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-283 of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section 10-
283 requiring a completed grant application be submitted prior to June
30, 2022, the alteration and code compliance project at Naubuc
Elementary School (Project Number 054-0099 A/CV) in the town of
Glastonbury with costs not to exceed three million two hundred
thousand dollars shall be included in subdivision (1) of section 114 of
[this act] public act 23-205 and shall subsequently be considered for a
grant commitment from the state, provided the town of Glastonbury
files an application for such school building project prior to October 1,
2023, and meets all other provisions of chapter 173 of the general
statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said chapter and
is eligible for grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-287 of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section 10-
287 requiring a competitive bidding process for orders and contracts for
school building projects receiving state assistance under chapter 173 of
the general statutes, the town of Glastonbury shall be eligible to receive
full reimbursement for the ineligible costs associated with the design
fees for such project.
Sec. 427. (Effective from passage) The Commissioner of Administrative
Services shall waive any audit deficiencies for the town of New Haven
related to costs associated with the projects at (1) Worthington Hooker
School (Project Number 093-0342 PF/EA), (2) Christopher Columbus
School (Project Number 093-0348 EA/RR), (3) Engineering and Science
University Magnet School (Project Number 093-0357), (4) New Haven
Public Act No. 26-68 664 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Academy (Project Number 093-0364), (5) Strong 21st Century
Communication Lab School (Project Number 093-0368), (6) Central
Registration Office (Project Number 093-0366), (7) Helene Grant/Dr.
Mayo (Project Number 093-0365), (8) Roberto Clemente Leadership
Academy for Global Awareness (Project Number 093-0351 N), (9) Hill
Central School (Project Number 093-0353 N), and (10) Bowen Field
(Project Number 093-0367).
Sec. 428. Section 161 of public act 25-174 is repealed. (Effective from
passage)
Sec. 429. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of
subsection (d) of section 10-286 of the general statutes or any regulation
adopted by the State Board of Education or the Department of
Administrative Services pursuant to said section requiring all change
orders or other change directives issued on or after July 1, 2008, to be
submitted not later than six months after the date of such issuance, the
town of North Branford may submit change orders issued after such six-
month time limit for the new construction project at North Branford
High School (Project Number 099-0053 N) for reimbursement of eligible
costs from the state, provided change orders are submitted on or before
January 1, 2027, and have been reviewed and approved by the
Department of Administrative Services.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-283 of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
concerning ineligible costs, the town of North Branford shall be eligible
to receive reimbursement for certain ineligible costs resulting from
premium time and rework associated with the new construction project
at North Branford High School (Project Number 099-0053 N), provided
such reimbursement for such ineligible costs do not exceed five hundred
ninety-five thousand dollars.
Public Act No. 26-68 665 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 430. Section 176 of public act 25-174 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-283 of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
requiring a completed grant application be submitted prior to June 30,
2025, the school building project for a preschool through grade eight
school consolidation project in the town of Willington with costs not to
exceed one hundred ten million dollars shall be included in section 396
of this act and shall subsequently be considered for a grant commitment
from the state, provided the town of Willington files an application for
such school building project prior to October 1, 2027, and meets all other
provisions of chapter 173 of the general statutes or any regulation
adopted by the State Board of Education or the Department of
Administrative Services pursuant to said chapter and is eligible for
grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-285a of the general
statutes, as amended by [this act] public act 25-174, or any regulation
adopted by the State Board of Education or the Department of
Administrative Services pursuant to said section concerning the
reimbursement percentage that a local board of education may be
eligible to receive for a school building project, the reimbursement
percentage determined pursuant to said section shall be increased by
fifteen percentage points for the town of Willington for [any] the school
building project for [which an application is submitted to the
Department of Administrative Services, pursuant to section 10-283 of
the general statutes, on or before June 30, 2027] a preschool through
grade eight school consolidation project.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-286 of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
Public Act No. 26-68 666 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
concerning the calculation of grants using the state standard space
specifications, the town of Willington shall be exempt from the state
standard space specifications for the purpose of the calculation of the
grant for the school building project for a preschool through grade eight
school consolidation project.
Sec. 431. (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 10-283 of the general statutes, or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said section requiring a completed grant application be
submitted prior to June 30, 2025, the school building project at Beecher
Road School in the town of Woodbridge with costs not to exceed one
hundred eighteen million five hundred thousand dollars shall be
included in section 396 of this act and shall subsequently be considered
for a grant commitment from the state, provided the town of
Woodbridge files an application for such school building project prior
to October 1, 2026, and meets all other provisions of chapter 173 of the
general statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of
Education or the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to
said chapter and is eligible for grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (l) of section 10-
285a of the general statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State
Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said section increasing the reimbursement percentage by
five percentage points if the municipality meets the requirements of
section 8-13bb or 8-13hh of the general statutes or has adopted a
development district, the reimbursement rate for the town of
Woodbridge shall be increased by five percentage points for the school
building project at Beecher Road School, provided the town of
Woodbridge meets the requirements of section 8-13bb or 8-13hh of the
general statutes or has adopted a development district and would
otherwise be eligible under subsection (l) of section 10-285a of the
Public Act No. 26-68 667 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
general statutes.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (6) of subsection
(a) of section 10-286 of the general statutes or any regulations adopted
by the State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative
Services regarding eligible costs for roof replacement projects and
requiring that a roof be at least twenty years old to qualify for a grant
for a replacement of such roof, the roof at Beecher Road School shall be
deemed to be twenty years old and the town of Woodbridge may
replace the roof at Beecher Road School and be eligible to receive a grant
based on the eligible percentages determined pursuant to said section
of the eligible project costs.
Sec. 432. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 10-283 of the general statutes or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said section concerning ineligible costs, the town of
Naugatuck shall be eligible to receive reimbursement under chapter 173
of the general statutes for certain ineligible costs associated with any
existing or future energy or infrastructure improvement projects,
including, but not limited to, photovoltaic, building management
systems, energy conservation, heating, ventilation and air conditioning
systems and roof replacement projects, at any public elementary,
middle or high school in the town that are financed through a tax-
exempt lease purchase agreement entered into between July 1, 2025, and
June 30, 2027.
Sec. 433. Section 158 of public act 25-174 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-283 of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
requiring a completed grant application be submitted prior to June 30,
Public Act No. 26-68 668 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
2024, the school building project at King Street Primary School in the
town of Danbury with costs not to exceed seven million dollars shall be
included in subdivision (1) of section 141 of [this act] public act 25-174
and shall subsequently be considered for a grant commitment from the
state, provided the town of Danbury files an application for such school
building project prior to October 1, [2025] 2027, and meets all other
provisions of chapter 173 of the general statutes or any regulation
adopted by the State Board of Education or the Department of
Administrative Services pursuant to said chapter and is eligible for
grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-285a of the general
statutes, as amended by [this act] public act 25-174, or any regulation
adopted by the State Board of Education or the Department of
Administrative Services pursuant to said section concerning the
reimbursement percentage that a local board of education may be
eligible to receive for a school building project, the town of Danbury
may use the reimbursement rate of eighty per cent for the school
building project at King Street Primary School.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-284 of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services requiring that a town or
regional school district begin construction on a project not later than two
years after the effective date of the section of the General Assembly
authorizing the Commissioner of Administrative Services to enter into
grant commitments for such project, the town of Danbury shall have
until October 1, 2029, to begin construction on the school building
project at King Street Primary School.
Sec. 434. Section 5 of public act 20-8 of the September special session,
as amended by section 383 of public act 22-118, is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
Public Act No. 26-68 669 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-283 of the general
statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
requiring a completed grant application be submitted prior to June 30,
2019, the new construction project at Norwalk High School in the town
of Norwalk with costs not to exceed [two hundred thirty-nine million]
two hundred sixty million seven hundred thirty-four thousand eight
hundred twelve dollars shall be included in subdivision (1) of section 1
of public act 20-8 of the September special session and shall
subsequently be considered for a grant commitment from the state,
provided the town of Norwalk files an application for such school
building project prior to December 31, 2020, and meets all other
provisions of chapter 173 of the general statutes or any regulation
adopted by the State Board of Education or the Department of
Administrative Services pursuant to said chapter and is eligible for
grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this
section, notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-285a of the general
statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
concerning the reimbursement percentage that a local board of
education may be eligible to receive for a school building project, the
town of Norwalk may use the reimbursement rate of eighty per cent for
the new construction project at Norwalk High School, provided the local
board of education for the town of Norwalk (1) establishes a pathways
in technology early college high school program at the new Norwalk
High School and such program enrolls students from surrounding
towns with priority given to students from Stamford and Bridgeport,
and (2) does not restrict students who are not enrolled in an arts
pathways program offered at Norwalk High School from joining or
otherwise participating in any arts or music program offered as part of
the regular school curriculum or any extracurricular arts or music-
Public Act No. 26-68 670 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
related program.
(c) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-285a of the
general statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of
Education or the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to
said section concerning the reimbursement percentage that a local board
of education may be eligible to receive for a school building project, the
town of Norwalk may use the reimbursement rate of fifty per cent for
the construction of a natatorium as part of the new construction project
at Norwalk High School.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (3) of subsection
(a) of section 10-286 of the general statutes or any regulation adopted by
the State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative
Services limiting reimbursement to one-half of the eligible percentage of
the net eligible cost of construction to a town for construction, the town
of Norwalk shall receive full reimbursement of the reimbursement
percentage described in subdivision (1) of this subsection of the net
eligible cost of the new construction project at Norwalk High School.
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-285a of the general
statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
concerning the reimbursement percentage that a local board of
education may be eligible to receive for a school building project, the
town of Norwalk may use the reimbursement rate of fifty per cent for
site acquisition costs associated with the purchase of any parcels of land
adjacent to the site of the new construction project at Norwalk High
School.
Sec. 435. Section 149 of public act 25-174, as amended by section 18 of
public act 26-1, is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective from passage):
Public Act No. 26-68 671 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-283 of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
requiring a completed grant application be submitted prior to June 30,
2024, the school building project at Middlefield Memorial School in
Regional District 13 with costs not to exceed seventy-six million one
hundred thirty thousand dollars shall be included in subdivision (1) of
section 141 of public act 25-174 and shall subsequently be considered for
a grant commitment from the state, provided Regional District 13 files
an application for such school building project prior to October 1, 2025,
and meets all other provisions of chapter 173 of the general statutes or
any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or the
Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said chapter and is
eligible for grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-283 of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
requiring that the description of a project type for a school building
project be made at the time of application for a school building project
grant and the provisions of subdivision (18) of section 10-282 of the
general statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of
Education or the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to
said section 10-282 concerning the definition of renovation, Regional
District 13 may change the description of the school building project at
Middlefield Memorial School to a renovation project and subsequently
qualify as a renovation, as defined in subdivision (18) of said section 10-
282.
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of subsection
(e) of section 10-285a of the general statutes, revision of 1958, revised to
January 1, 2025, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of
Education or the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to
Public Act No. 26-68 672 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
said section increasing the reimbursement percentage for a school
building project that includes the expansion of an existing building to
include space for an early childhood care and education program by
fifteen percentage points for the portion of the building used primarily
for such program, the reimbursement percentage for the school building
project at Middlefield Memorial School in Regional District 13 shall be
increased by fifteen percentage points for the entire school building
project.
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-283 of the general
statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
concerning ineligible costs, Regional District 13 shall be eligible to
receive reimbursement for certain ineligible costs relating to the Phase 1
swing space used for students while the school building project at
Middlefield Memorial School was being completed, provided such
ineligible costs do not exceed two million dollars.
(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (B) of
subdivision (3) of subsection (b) of section 10-287 of the general statutes
or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or the
Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
concerning the inclusion of a guaranteed maximum price for the cost of
construction in a construction manager's contract prior to the
commencement of work relating to site preparation and demolition,
Regional District 13 shall be eligible to receive reimbursement for costs
associated with work relating to site preparation and demolition that
was not included as part of the guaranteed maximum price determined
for the construction manager's contract prior to the commencement of
such work for the renovation project at Middlefield Memorial School.
Sec. 436. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 10-283 of the general statutes, or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
Public Act No. 26-68 673 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
pursuant to said section requiring a completed grant application be
submitted prior to June 30, 2025, the new construction project at
Pomperaug Elementary School in Regional District 15 with costs not to
exceed one hundred twelve million three hundred thousand dollars
shall be included in section 396 of this act and shall subsequently be
considered for a grant commitment from the state, provided Regional
District 15 files an application for such school building project prior to
October 1, 2027, and meets all other provisions of chapter 173 of the
general statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of
Education or the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to
said chapter and is eligible for grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-286 of the general
statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
concerning the calculation of grants using the state standard space
specifications, Regional District 15 shall be exempt from the state
standard space specifications for the purpose of the calculation of the
grant for the new construction project at Pomperaug Elementary School.
Sec. 437. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 10-283 of the general statutes, or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said section requiring a completed grant application be
submitted prior to June 30, 2025, the new construction project at
Gainfield Elementary School in Regional District 15 with costs not to
exceed one hundred eleven million nine hundred ten thousand dollars
shall be included in section 396 of this act and shall subsequently be
considered for a grant commitment from the state, provided Regional
District 15 files an application for such school building project prior to
October 1, 2027, and meets all other provisions of chapter 173 of the
general statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of
Education or the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to
Public Act No. 26-68 674 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
said chapter and is eligible for grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-286 of the general
statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
concerning the calculation of grants using the state standard space
specifications, Regional District 15 shall be exempt from the state
standard space specifications for the purpose of the calculation of the
grant for the new construction project at Gainfield Elementary School.
Sec. 438. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 10-283 of the general statutes, or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said section requiring a completed grant application be
submitted prior to June 30, 2025, the school building project at Haddam-
Killingworth High School in Regional District 17 with costs not to
exceed one hundred fifty-one million nine hundred thousand dollars
shall be included in section 396 of this act and shall subsequently be
considered for a grant commitment from the state, provided Regional
District 17 files an application for such school building project prior to
October 1, 2026, and meets all other provisions of chapter 173 of the
general statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of
Education or the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to
said chapter and is eligible for grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-285a of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
concerning the reimbursement percentage that a local board of
education may be eligible to receive for a school building project,
Regional District 17 may use the reimbursement rate of fifty-one and
forty-three hundredths per cent for the school building project at
Haddam-Killingworth High School.
Public Act No. 26-68 675 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-286 of the general
statutes or any regulation adopted by the Department of Administrative
Services or the State Board of Education pursuant to said section
concerning the calculation of grants using the state standard space
specifications, Regional District 17 shall be exempt from the state
standard space specifications for the purpose of the calculation of the
grant for the school building project at Haddam-Killingworth High
School.
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (5) of subsection
(a) of section 10-286 of the general statutes or any regulation adopted by
the State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative
Services limiting reimbursement to one-half of the eligible percentage of
the net eligible cost of construction to a town for the construction,
extension or major alteration of outdoor athletic facilities, tennis courts
or a natatorium, gymnasium or auditorium, Regional District 17 shall
receive full reimbursement of the reimbursement percentage described
in subsection (b) of this section of the net eligible cost of such
construction, extension or major alteration as part of the school building
project at Haddam-Killingworth High School.
Sec. 439. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of
subdivision (3) of section 10-282 of the general statutes, or any
regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or the Department
of Administrative Services pursuant to said section concerning the
definition of school building project, the renovation of a bus loop at The
Gilbert School shall be considered a school building project and
subsequently qualify for a school building project grant under chapter
173 of the general statutes.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-283 of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
requiring a completed grant application be submitted prior to June 30,
Public Act No. 26-68 676 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
2025, the school building project at The Gilbert School with costs not to
exceed four million six hundred eighty-five thousand dollars shall be
included in section 396 of this act and shall subsequently be considered
for a grant commitment from the state, provided The Gilbert School files
an application for such school building project prior to October 1, 2026,
and meets all other provisions of chapter 173 of the general statutes or
any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or the
Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said chapter and is
eligible for grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
Sec. 440. Section 171 of public act 25-174 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-283 of the general
statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section
requiring a completed grant application be submitted prior to June 30,
2024, the alteration project at the Norwich Free Academy campus in the
town of Norwich with costs not to exceed five million six hundred ten
thousand dollars shall be included in subdivision (1) of section 141 of
[this act] public act 25-174 and shall subsequently be considered for a
grant commitment from the state, provided Norwich Free Academy
files an application for such school building project prior to October 1,
2025, and meets all other provisions of chapter 173 of the general
statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said chapter and
is eligible for grant assistance pursuant to said chapter.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (l) of section 10-
285a of the general statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State
Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said section concerning the reimbursement percentage that
an endowed academy approved pursuant to section 10-34 of the general
statutes may be eligible to receive for a school building project, Norwich
Public Act No. 26-68 677 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Free Academy may use the reimbursement rate of ninety-five per cent
for the school building project at Norwich Free Academy.
[(b)] (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-283 of the
general statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of
Education or the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to
said section concerning ineligible costs, Norwich Free Academy shall be
eligible to receive reimbursement for certain ineligible costs for the
alteration project at the Norwich Free Academy campus in the town of
Norwich for ordinary resurfacing, maintenance, repairs and
replacements, repair of site improvements and artificial turf.
[(c)] (d) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-286 of the
general statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of
Education or the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to
said section concerning the calculation of grants using the state standard
space specifications, Norwich Free Academy shall be exempt from the
state standard space specifications for the purpose of the calculation of
the grant for the school building project at the Norwich Free Academy.
(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-287 of the general
statutes, or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to said section 10-
287 requiring a competitive bidding process for orders and contracts for
school building projects receiving state assistance under chapter 173 of
the general statutes, the provisions of said section 10-287 related to all
orders and contracts for school building construction shall not apply to
the school building project at the Norwich Free Academy and Norwich
Free Academy shall be eligible to receive full reimbursement for the
ineligible costs associated with any orders and contracts for such project.
(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10-292 of the general
statutes or any regulation adopted by the State Board of Education or
the Department of Administrative Services requiring that a bid not be
Public Act No. 26-68 678 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
let out until plans and specifications have been approved by the
Department of Administrative Services, Norwich Free Academy shall
be reimbursed for eligible project costs for the school building project at
Norwich Free Academy.
Sec. 441. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions of
section 10-283 of the general statutes or any regulation adopted by the
State Board of Education or the Department of Administrative Services
pursuant to said section concerning ineligible costs, the town of
Cheshire shall be eligible to receive reimbursement under chapter 173
of the general statutes and any related chapters of the general statutes
for certain ineligible costs associated with any existing or future school
building projects for energy or infrastructure improvement, including,
but not limited to, photovoltaic installations on roofs or free-standing
solar carports or free-standing, ground-based solar arrays, building
management systems, energy conservation, heating, ventilation and air
conditioning systems, and roof replacement projects, at any elementary,
middle or high school in the town that are financed through a tax-
exempt lease purchase agreement and part of an overall energy
performance contract that has been previously executed and duly
awarded through a prior procurement process.
Sec. 442. Subsection (b) of section 17b-191 of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(b) The state-administered general assistance program shall provide
cash assistance of [(1)] two hundred sixty-nine dollars per month [for an
unemployable person upon determination of such person's
unemployability; (2) two hundred dollars per month for a transitional
person who is required to pay for shelter; and (3) fifty dollars per month
for a transitional person who is not required to pay for shelter] to
persons eligible for the program. The standard of assistance paid for
individuals residing in rated boarding facilities shall remain at the level
Public Act No. 26-68 679 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
in effect on August 31, 2003. No person shall be eligible for cash
assistance under the program if eligible for cash assistance under any
other state or federal cash assistance program. The standards of
assistance set forth in this subsection shall be subject to annual increases,
as described in subsection (b) of section 17b-104.
Sec. 443. Subsection (f) of section 17b-274d of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(f) Nonpreferred drugs in the classes of drugs included on the
preferred drug lists shall be subject to prior authorization. Prior
authorization is not required for any mental-health-related drug that
has been filled or refilled, in any dosage, at least one time in the one-
year period prior to the date the individual presents a prescription for
the drug at a pharmacy. If prior authorization is granted for a drug not
included on a preferred drug list, the authorization shall be valid for one
year from the date the prescription is first filled. [Antiretroviral classes
of drugs shall not be included on the preferred drug lists.]
Sec. 444. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) The Commissioner of Social
Services may periodically review available data on the clinical
effectiveness of outpatient prescription drugs covered under the
Medicaid program that are projected to exceed (1) a net cost per
consumer, after factoring in rebates, of twenty-five thousand dollars per
year, or (2) an annual aggregate cost, after factoring in rebates to the
medical assistance program, of ten million dollars. The commissioner
may, within available appropriations, contract with a third party to
conduct a comparative effectiveness review of any such outpatient
prescription drug. For purposes of this section, "rebate" means an
amount sent to the state by a prescription drug manufacturer to offset
the cost of outpatient prescription drugs covered by the Medicaid
program.
Public Act No. 26-68 680 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(b) Any such comparative effectiveness review shall include, but
need not be limited to: (1) Clinical efficacy and outcomes; (2)
information relating to the pricing of the outpatient prescription drug,
including, but not limited to, information relating to prices paid by other
states or developed nations; (3) such drug's net price to the Medicaid
program as compared to its therapeutic benefits, including, but not
limited to, the seriousness and prevalence of the disease or condition
that is treated by the drug; (4) the extent of utilization of such drug; (5)
the likelihood that the use of such drug will reduce the need for other
medical care; (6) the number of manufacturers that produce such drug;
and (7) whether there are pharmaceutical equivalents of such drug.
(c) Any such comparative effectiveness review shall not include any
brand-name prescription drug or biologic that is designated for a rare
disease or condition under 21 USC 360bb and for which the only
approved indication is for one or more rare diseases or conditions.
(d) The Commissioner of Social Services may make public and share
the results of any comparative effectiveness review with any entity,
including any multistate prescription drug purchasing collaborative in
which the state is a participating member, in order to help negotiate
additional supplemental rebate agreements beyond any rebates
required under federal law.
Sec. 445. Section 332 of public act 25-168 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 17b-340d of the general
statutes, the Commissioner of Social Services shall, within available
appropriations, increase nursing home facility rates to support wage
increases for [nursing] licensed nurses engaged solely in direct patient
care services and supports and not employed in administrative
functions, nurse's aide, dietary, housekeeping, laundry and
maintenance and plant operation personnel of three per cent effective
Public Act No. 26-68 681 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
July 1, 2025, three per cent effective July 1, 2026, and four per cent
effective January 1, 2027. Facilities that receive a rate adjustment for
wage enhancements for employees but do not provide such
enhancements may be subject to a rate decrease in the same amount as
the adjustment.
Sec. 446. Subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 17b-340d of the
2026 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(2) (A) Beginning July 1, 2022, facilities will be required to comply
with collection and reporting of quality metrics as specified by the
Department of Social Services, after consultation with the nursing home
industry, consumers, employees and the Department of Public Health.
Rate adjustments based on performance on quality metrics will be
phased in, beginning July 1, 2022, with a period of reporting only.
Effective July 1, 2023, the Department of Social Services shall issue
individualized reports annually to each nursing home facility showing
the impact to the Medicaid rate for such home based on the quality
metrics program. A nursing home facility receiving an individualized
quality metrics report may use such report to evaluate the impact of the
quality metrics program on said facility's Medicaid reimbursement. On
or after October 1, 2026, the Department of Social Services may establish
a quality metrics program, within available appropriations designated
for such purpose, to provide payments to nursing home facilities [(A)]
(i) for high-quality outcomes based on performance in the quality
metrics program, and [(B)] (ii) designed to incentivize the provision of
high-quality services to nursing home residents who are Medicaid
beneficiaries, as indicated in the individualized report issued to each
nursing home facility pursuant to the provisions of this subdivision.
Such quality metrics program shall evaluate nursing home facilities
based on national quality measures for nursing home facilities issued by
the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and state-administered
Public Act No. 26-68 682 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
consumer satisfaction measures. Such quality measures may be
weighted higher for desired outcomes, as determined by the
department. Not later than February 1, 2027, the department shall
submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a, to
the joint standing committees of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to appropriations and the budgets of state
agencies and human services on the implementation of the quality
metrics program.
(B) For the fiscal year ending June 30, 2029, and each fiscal year
thereafter, the Department of Social Services shall make distributions,
from an annual pool of ten million dollars of enhanced Medicaid quality
performance payments, to eligible nursing home facilities based on each
nursing home facility's performance in the quality metrics program.
Payments will be determined based on the maximum quality score
points a nursing home facility may be awarded for its performance in
improving its quality metrics. In determining a nursing home facility's
maximum quality score points, the department may use the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services' nursing home quarterly metrics for
patients with stays of one hundred one days or longer, a consumer
satisfaction survey and Department of Public Health data. Nursing
home facilities that have been identified by the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services as special focus facilities for serious quality of care
issues, special focus facility candidates or with an abuse icon on the
centers' Nursing Home Compare Internet web site shall not be eligible
for participation in the quality metrics program and shall not receive
payment. Enhanced Medicaid quality performance payments may be
prorated to stay within available appropriations.
(C) On and after July 1, 2026, the Department of Social Services shall
utilize the nursing component of the Patient Driven Payment Model
resident assessment to calculate quarterly adjustments to the Medicaid
nursing home facility reimbursement case-mix index scores. To align
Public Act No. 26-68 683 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Medicaid cost data with the Patient Driven Payment Model resident
assessment data, the department shall rebase nursing home facility
Medicaid per diem rates using the cost year ending September 30, 2024,
for rates effective July 1, 2026. To incorporate Patient Driven Payment
Model data into the Medicaid per diem payment calculation, the
department shall adjust Medicaid rates over a three-year phase-in
period. The three-year phase-in period shall use phase-in parameters,
including, but not limited to, budget adjustment factors, case-mix
neutrality factors and stop loss and stop gain corridors, as necessary, to
stay within available appropriations.
(D) Not later than July 1, 2026, the Department of Social Services shall
implement a Medicaid utilization pool that provides enhanced
Medicaid payments to nursing home facilities that have a resident payor
mix that comprises more than seventy-five per cent of Medicaid
members. Utilizing annual Medicaid cost reports, the department shall
determine each nursing home facility's payor mix to identify nursing
home facilities eligible to receive enhanced Medicaid payments on an
annual basis. Payments shall be for the purpose of supporting increased
Medicaid utilization and enhanced access and services for Medicaid
members. Eligible nursing home facilities shall receive enhanced
Medicaid funding from a funding pool limited to two million five
hundred thousand dollars for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, and
five million dollars for subsequent fiscal years. The Commissioner of
Social Services may prorate enhanced Medicaid utilization payments to
stay within available appropriations.
Sec. 447. Subdivision (12) of subsection (a) of section 17b-340d of the
2026 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(12) For purposes of computing minimum allowable patient days,
utilization of a facility's certified beds shall be determined at a minimum
of ninety per cent of capacity, except for facilities that have undergone
Public Act No. 26-68 684 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
a change in ownership, new facilities, and facilities which are certified
for additional beds, which may be permitted a lower occupancy rate for
the first three months of operation after the effective date of licensure.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this subdivision, the Commissioner
of Social Services may recalculate the Medicaid rate established for a
licensed chronic and convalescent nursing home for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, and for each fiscal year thereafter, at any time
during the fiscal year to address (A) any temporary licensed bed
reductions due to closure of beds during renovations, (B) prolonged
workforce staffing challenges, or (C) any other impediments to
maintaining full patient census as the commissioner, in the
commissioner's discretion, determines would justify relief from the
minimum allowable patient days requirement.
Sec. 448. (Effective July 1, 2026) The Commissioner of Social Services
shall amend the Medicaid state plan to increase rates of reimbursement
for family planning services and provide not less than five hundred
thousand dollars in Medicaid state share funding to increase such rates
for licensed family planning clinics. The commissioner shall use funds
appropriated for family planning services for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2027, for this purpose.
Sec. 449. Subsection (c) of section 17b-28 of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(c) On and after October 31, 2017, the council shall be composed of
the following members:
(1) The chairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to aging, human services, public health and appropriations and
the budgets of state agencies, or their designees;
Public Act No. 26-68 685 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(2) Five appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives,
one of whom shall be a member of the General Assembly, one of whom
shall be a community provider of adult Medicaid health services, one of
whom shall be a recipient of Medicaid benefits for the aged, blind and
disabled or an advocate for such a recipient, one of whom shall be a
representative of the state's federally qualified health clinics and one of
whom shall be a member of the Connecticut Hospital Association;
(3) Five appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate, one of
whom shall be a member of the General Assembly, one of whom shall
be a representative of the home health care industry, one of whom shall
be a primary care medical home provider, one of whom shall be an
advocate for Department of Children and Families foster families and
one of whom shall be a representative of the business community with
experience in cost efficiency management;
(4) Three appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives, one of whom shall be an advocate for persons with
substance abuse disabilities, one of whom shall be a Medicaid dental
provider and one of whom shall be a representative of the for-profit
nursing home industry;
(5) Three appointed by the majority leader of the Senate, one of whom
shall be a representative of school-based health centers, one of whom
shall be a recipient of benefits under the HUSKY Health program and
one of whom shall be a physician who serves Medicaid clients;
(6) Three appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives, one of whom shall be an advocate for persons with
disabilities, one of whom shall be a dually eligible Medicaid-Medicare
beneficiary or an advocate for such a beneficiary and one of whom shall
be a representative of the not-for-profit nursing home industry;
(7) Three appointed by the minority leader of the Senate, one of
Public Act No. 26-68 686 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
whom shall be a low-income adult recipient of Medicaid benefits or an
advocate for such a recipient, one of whom shall be a representative of
hospitals and one of whom shall be a representative of the business
community with experience in cost efficiency management;
(8) The executive director of the Commission on Women, Children,
Seniors, Equity and Opportunity, or the executive director's designee;
(9) A member of the Commission on Women, Children, Seniors,
Equity and Opportunity, designated by the executive director of said
commission;
(10) A representative of the Long-Term Care Advisory Council;
(11) The Commissioners of Social Services, Children and Families,
Public Health, Developmental Services, Aging and Disability Services
and Mental Health and Addiction Services, or their designees, who shall
be ex-officio nonvoting members;
(12) The Comptroller, or the Comptroller's designee, who shall be an
ex-officio nonvoting member;
(13) The Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, or the
secretary's designee, who shall be an ex-officio nonvoting member;
[and]
(14) One representative of an administrative services organization
which contracts with the Department of Social Services in the
administration of the Medicaid program, who shall be a nonvoting
member; and
(15) A representative of a labor organization, as defined in section 7-
273j, representing health care workers, who shall be appointed by the
House and Senate chairpersons of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to human
Public Act No. 26-68 687 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
services.
Sec. 450. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section, (1)
"Medicaid rate study" means the study commissioned by the
Department of Social Services pursuant to section 1 of public act 23-186;
and (2) "five-state rate benchmark" means the average of rates for the
same health care services in Maine, Massachusetts, New Jersey, New
York and Oregon.
(b) In reviewing Medicaid rates, the Commissioner of Social Services
shall include those rates required to be studied pursuant to the Medicaid
rate study with no corresponding (1) Medicare rate for the same health
care service, or (2) average five-state rate benchmark included in the
Medicaid rate study. If any one state within the five-state rate
benchmark group has a corresponding rate for the same or a
substantially similar health care service, such rate shall be used for
comparison in such review. If two or more states in the benchmark
group have rates for the same or a substantially similar health care
service, an average of the rates shall be used for such comparison.
(c) For purposes of setting Medicaid rates of reimbursement for
behavioral health services, the commissioner shall include medication
administration services delivered by a licensed home health care agency
to individuals with psychiatric diagnoses under a care plan (1)
developed and supervised by a licensed behavioral health clinician or
prescriber, and (2) overseen by the state's behavioral health
administrative services organization.
Sec. 451. Section 19a-521b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) Each licensed chronic and convalescent nursing home, chronic
disease hospital associated with a chronic and convalescent nursing
home, rest home with nursing supervision and residential care home
Public Act No. 26-68 688 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
shall position beds in a manner that promotes resident care and that
provides at least a three-foot clearance at the sides and foot of each bed.
Such bed position shall (1) not act as a restraint to the resident, (2) not
create a hazardous situation, including, but not limited to, an
entrapment possibility, or obstacle to evacuation or being close to or
blocking a heat source, and (3) allow for infection control.
(b) On and after July 1, 2026, no licensed chronic and convalescent
nursing home or rest home with nursing supervision shall place a newly
admitted resident in a room containing more than two beds. A violation
of the requirements of this subsection shall constitute a Class B violation
under section 19a-527, except no licensed chronic and convalescent
nursing home or rest home with nursing supervision shall incur more
than one violation per newly admitted resident in one calendar year.
(c) The Commissioner of Social Services may recalculate a licensed
chronic and convalescent nursing home or rest home with nursing
supervision's Medicaid rate established for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, and for the fiscal years thereafter, reflecting any licensed bed
reductions associated with the elimination of three and four-bed rooms.
Allowable fair rent shall reflect costs for building modifications or other
additions incurred for fiscal year 2025, and for the fiscal years thereafter,
that are associated with the elimination of three and four-bed rooms.
(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this section,
the Commissioner of Public Health may waive the requirements of said
subsection for any licensed chronic and convalescent nursing home or
rest home with nursing supervision that is actively investing in and
developing a new Connecticut small-house style skilled nursing facility
to meet the requirements of said subsection. Any such waiver shall be
limited to one licensed chronic and convalescent nursing home or rest
home with nursing supervision for each small-house style skilled
nursing facility under development. The commissioner may prescribe
documentation requirements for such homes to qualify for such waiver
Public Act No. 26-68 689 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
in the transitional period before the new facility opens. Such waiver
shall not extend beyond July 1, 2027.
Sec. 452. (Effective from passage) On or before January 15, 2027, The
University of Connecticut Health Center shall submit a report, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
to the Governor and the joint standing committees of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to appropriations and
the budgets of state agencies, human services, public health and higher
education. Such report shall include, but need not be limited to: (1) The
most recent payer mix for health center services, (2) efforts taken to
increase the proportion of Medicaid days, including, but not limited to,
increasing the census in the adolescent psychiatric unit and inpatient
services provided to incarcerated individuals at the Department of
Correction, and (3) increasing access to specialists for Medicaid
members. In preparing the report, The University of Connecticut Health
Center shall consult with stakeholders, including, but not limited to,
medical professionals, community groups and labor unions. For
purposes of this section, "Medicaid days" means the total number of in-
patient days a Medicaid-eligible patient stays in a hospital.
Sec. 453. (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Access Health Connecticut" means the Internet web site
maintained by the Connecticut Health Insurance Exchange, established
pursuant to section 38a-1081 of the general statutes, through which
enrollees and prospective enrollees may obtain standardized
comparative information on and enroll in qualified health plans under
the Affordable Care Act;
(2) "Affordable Care Act" has the same meaning as provided in
section 38a-1080 of the general statutes;
(3) "Connecticut Option program" means a plan to lower health care
Public Act No. 26-68 690 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
coverage costs and expand health care coverage;
(4) "Exchange" means the Connecticut Health Insurance Exchange
established under section 38a-1081 of the general statutes;
(5) "Health benefit plan" has the same meaning as provided in section
38a-1080 of the general statutes;
(6) "Secretary" means the Secretary of the Office of Policy and
Management;
(7) "State innovation waiver" means a waiver of one or more
requirements of the Affordable Care Act authorized under Section 1332
of said act; and
(8) "Transitional health care premium assistance" means state-funded
premium subsidies to address the impact of federally funded premium
subsidies for individuals who purchase coverage through Access Health
Connecticut.
(b) The Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management may, within
available appropriations, (1) study the feasibility of establishing the
Connecticut Option program with the goal of reducing health insurance
premiums, and (2) design a plan for providing transitional health care
premium assistance that may be funded from the Federal Cuts Response
Fund established pursuant to section 1 of special act 26-1 or other
potential sources of funding. The study shall include analyses,
conclusions and recommendations sufficient for the secretary, in
consultation with the Insurance Commissioner, to evaluate and
compare design models for the program. The study shall include, but
need not be limited to:
(A) A review of the efficacy, impact and reasonableness of proposed
program design elements, including, but not limited to: (i) Provider
reimbursement methodologies; (ii) value-based or performance-based
Public Act No. 26-68 691 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
contracting arrangements; (iii) enrollee cost-sharing and premium
affordability targets; (iv) incentives or rewards for the delivery of high-
quality, cost-effective health care; and (v) any state-specific premium
assistance programs or risk stabilization programs, including, but not
limited to, a state-operated reinsurance program that may maximize
available federal funding pursuant to a state innovation waiver and
premium support that could facilitate a purchase option leveraging the
state's medical assistance program on or off the exchange for individuals
ineligible for the medical assistance program;
(B) Identification of any necessary statutory or regulatory changes
required for implementation of the Connecticut Option program;
(C) Determination of staffing needs across state agencies to
effectively implement the Connecticut Option program;
(D) Analysis of the state insurance market and projected impacts of
the Connecticut Option program on persons who receive health care
coverage through the exchange; and
(E) Required state action or design elements needed to achieve
multiple premium savings targets.
(c) Not later than January 15, 2027, the secretary may file an interim
report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general
statutes, on the study conducted pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section with the joint standing committees of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to appropriations and the budgets
of state agencies, human services and insurance and real estate. Not later
than January 31, 2028, the secretary shall file a final report, in accordance
with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, on the
feasibility of the Connecticut Option program, any recommendations on
the program, and a summary of stakeholder engagement and feedback
collected pursuant to section 456 of this act with the joint standing
Public Act No. 26-68 692 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to appropriations and the budgets of state agencies, human
services and insurance and real estate.
(d) If the secretary, in consultation with the Insurance Commissioner,
determines a Connecticut Option program is feasible after completion
of the study or related reports pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this
section, the secretary may direct the relevant state agency to develop
and implement a state innovation waiver or Medicaid waiver under
Section 1115 of the Social Security Act or any applicable waiver from
federal law that may be required to maximize federal funding for the
program or any component part of a program design to help achieve
health care savings. Any approval of a Connecticut Option program
shall be subject to legislative review pursuant to section 17b-8 of the
general statutes.
(e) Not later than October 1, 2026, the Secretary of the Office of Policy
and Management shall design a plan for transitional health care
premium assistance to offset premium and cost-sharing increases on
Access Health Connecticut in 2027. Such plan shall include a state health
care premium subsidy to enable an eligible enrollee to obtain an
affordable health plan on Access Health Connecticut until December 31,
2027.
Sec. 454. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section and
sections 455 and 456 of this act:
(1) "Affordable Care Act" has the same meaning as provided
in section 38a-1080 of the general statutes;
(2) "Access Health Connecticut" means the Internet web site
maintained by the Connecticut Health Insurance Exchange, established
pursuant to section 38a-1081 of the general statutes, through which
enrollees and prospective enrollees may obtain standardized
Public Act No. 26-68 693 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
comparative information on and enroll in qualified health plans under
the Affordable Care Act;
(3) "Eligible individual" means a state resident who (A) is under sixty-
five years of age, (B) has a household income exceeding one hundred
thirty-three per cent of the federal poverty level but not exceeding two
hundred per cent of the federal poverty level, (C) is otherwise
ineligible for medical assistance programs established pursuant to
chapter 319v of the general statutes, and (D) is otherwise eligible to
enroll in a qualified health plan, as defined in section 38a-1080 of the
general statutes, on Access Health Connecticut; and
(4) "Basic health program" means a health care program authorized
under Section 1331 of the Affordable Care Act.
(b) (1) Following the submission of an application for approval,
renewal or continuation of the federal waiver approved under Section
1115 of the Social Security Act pursuant to which the Covered
Connecticut program is administered under section 19a-754c of the
general statutes, the Department of Social Services, in consultation with
the Office of Policy and Management, may develop an application to
establish a basic health program pursuant to Section 1331 of the
Affordable Care Act, as amended from time to time.
(2) In the event the application for approval, renewal or continuation
of the federal waiver approved under Section 1115 of the Social Security
Act pursuant to which the Covered Connecticut program is
administered either: (A) Is denied by the federal government, or (B) has
not been approved by the federal government by July 1, 2027, the
Department of Social Services shall either (i) seek any necessary
approvals from the federal government to establish a basic health
program and take all necessary actions to maximize federal funding, or
(ii) take necessary steps to continue Covered Connecticut as a state-
funded program beginning January 1, 2028.
Public Act No. 26-68 694 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(c) If the Commissioner of Social Services proceeds with
establishment of a basic health program pursuant to subdivision (2) of
subsection (b) of this section, the commissioner shall, in accordance
with the Affordable Care Act, coordinate the administration of, and
provision of benefits under, such basic health program.
(d) If the commissioner determines that the cost of medical assistance
provided to eligible individuals in such basic health program will
exceed federal subsidies, or if changes in federal law, regulations or the
administration of federal law or regulations affects funding, eligibility
for or administration of the program, the commissioner, in consultation
with the Office of Policy and Management, may develop a plan to
respond to such changes. To the extent that federal funds received
under the Affordable Care Act for such basic health program exceed the
cost of medical assistance that would otherwise be provided to
eligible individuals, the commissioner shall use such funds to reduce the
premiums and cost-sharing of, or provide additional benefits for,
eligible individuals in accordance with 42 USC 18051, as amended from
time to time.
(e) The Commissioner of Social Services shall forward any
application for federal approval of or changes to such basic health
program to the joint standing committees of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to appropriations and the budgets
of state agencies and human services not later than thirty days before
seeking federal approval for the program.
(f) Not later than January 1, 2027, and every six months thereafter
through January 1, 2029, the commissioner shall submit a report, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
to the joint standing committees of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to appropriations and the budgets of state
agencies, human services and insurance and real estate. The report
shall contain a narrative description of the activities and planning to
Public Act No. 26-68 695 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
sustain the Covered Connecticut program as an affordable coverage
option for qualified individuals, including, but not limited to, a status
report and contingency planning for a renewal of the Covered
Connecticut program Medicaid waiver authority under Section 1115 of
the Social Security Act, and, if necessary, efforts to sustain the program
through the basic health program authority or a state-funded
alternative.
Sec. 455. (Effective from the date of approval of a state basic health program
by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services) There is established an
account to be known as the "basic health program account", which shall
be a separate, nonlapsing account. The account shall contain any
moneys required by law to be deposited in the account. Moneys in the
account shall be expended by the Department of Social Services solely
for the purposes of operating a basic health program in accordance with
the Affordable Care Act.
Sec. 456. (Effective July 1, 2026) In developing a Connecticut Option
program or basic health program, the Secretary of the Office of Policy
and Management shall hold, to the extent possible, a series of
stakeholder engagement meetings with potential stakeholders,
including, but not limited to: (1) Representatives of hospitals, health
centers, other health care providers, health insurers, HUSKY Health
plan enrollees and Access Health Connecticut enrollees, (2) members of
the joint standing committees of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to appropriations and the budgets of state
agencies, human services, public health and insurance and real estate,
and (3) other persons with health equity and health coverage policy
expertise, including representatives from the Commission on Racial
Equity in Public Health.
Sec. 457. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section and
section 458 of this act, "work and community engagement requirements"
means federal requirements for certain Medicaid and supplemental
Public Act No. 26-68 696 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
nutrition assistance program beneficiaries to work, participate in a
work-related program or community service or enroll in an education
program pursuant to the federal Fiscal Responsibility Act of 2023, P.L.
118-5 or Section 71119 of P.L. 119-21. There is established a safety net
mitigation working group that shall advise on, monitor and coordinate
the state's response to significant changes in federal law or policy that
impact public health, social services or other safety net programs.
(b) The working group shall consist of the following members:
(1) The Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, or the
secretary's designee;
(2) The Commissioners of Social Services, Revenue Services, Mental
Health and Addiction Services, Developmental Services and Public
Health, the Insurance Commissioner and the Labor Commissioner, or
their designees;
(3) The chairpersons of the joint standing committees of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to appropriations and
the budgets of state agencies, human services, housing and insurance
and real estate, or their designees, who shall jointly choose the
chairpersons of the working group; and
(4) The chief executive officer of Access Health Connecticut.
(c) The working group shall:
(1) Convene not later than ninety days after the effective date of this
section;
(2) Review any significant changes in federal law or policy that
impact public health, social services or other safety net programs;
(3) Consider regulatory, administrative or legislative measures to
mitigate adverse programmatic, procurement or service outcomes and
Public Act No. 26-68 697 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
recommend such measures to the Office of Policy and Management and
the joint standing committees of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to appropriations and the budgets of state
agencies, human services, housing and insurance and real estate; and
(4) Solicit input from stakeholders, including municipal governments
and community-based providers, and independent experts such as
academic researchers and policy organizations, as necessary.
(d) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to human
services shall provide administrative support to the working group.
(e) Not later than February 1, 2027, and annually thereafter through
February 1, 2029, the working group shall submit a report, in accordance
with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint
standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to appropriations and the budgets of state agencies,
human services, housing and insurance and real estate. Such report shall
include:
(1) The estimated impact of changes to federal policies, guidance or
programs on access to and participation in the Medicaid and
supplemental nutrition assistance programs in the state resulting from
recent or upcoming federal action or inaction;
(2) Implementation of federal law concerning work and community
engagement requirements for Medicaid and supplemental nutrition
assistance beneficiaries under P.L. 119-21;
(3) The estimated number of beneficiaries who have lost and are
expected to lose eligibility for the supplemental nutrition assistance and
Medicaid programs since implementation of such requirements under
P.L. 119-21; and
Public Act No. 26-68 698 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(4) A summary of actions taken to improve user experiences and
streamline communication with Medicaid and supplemental nutrition
assistance program participants, including, but not limited to: (A)
Efforts to engage recipients of such benefits in relevant decision-making
processes; (B) a long-term plan for ongoing dissemination of
information and support for Medicaid and supplemental nutrition
assistance recipients and providers to minimize disenrollment of
eligible individuals; and (C) statistics concerning the Department of
Social Services' customer service telephone call center and actions taken
by the department to improve such statistics.
(f) The working group shall terminate on the date that it submits its
final report or February 1, 2029, whichever is later.
Sec. 458. (Effective from passage) (a) To the extent deemed necessary to
verify exemptions from work and community engagement
requirements for Medicaid as permitted under federal law, the
Commissioner of Social Services shall identify parameters for an
effective assessment of "medical frailty" for any given Medicaid
participant or applicant. In identifying such parameters, the
commissioner may take into consideration existing definitions in state
or federal statutes and regulations relevant to medical frailty, definitions
of medical frailty in other states, and medical codes used to identify
pertinent diagnoses.
(b) The commissioner shall maximize the use of such information and
medical codes to effectuate ex parte eligibility determinations to the
extent permitted by federal law. The commissioner shall provide
regular updates on the development of any such parameters to the
Council on Medical Assistance Program Oversight established pursuant
to section 17b-28 of the general statutes.
Sec. 459. Subsection (a) of section 17b-8 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
Public Act No. 26-68 699 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
2026):
(a) The Commissioner of Social Services shall submit an application
for a federal waiver or renewal of such waiver of any assistance program
requirements, except such application pertaining to routine operational
issues, and any proposed amendment to the Medicaid state plan to
provide medical assistance through a Medicaid managed care
organization pursuant to Section 1932 of the Social Security Act or to
make a change in program requirements that would have required a
waiver were it not for the passage of the Patient Protection and
Affordable Care Act, P.L. 111-148, and the Health Care and Education
Reconciliation Act of 2010, P.L. 111-152 to the joint standing committees
of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
human services and appropriations and the budgets of state agencies,
and, for the waiver application required under section 17b-312, the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to insurance, prior to the submission of such application
or proposed amendment to the federal government. Not later than thirty
days after the date of their receipt of such application or proposed
amendment, the joint standing committees shall: (1) Hold a public
hearing on the waiver application, or (2) in the case of a proposed
amendment to the Medicaid state plan, notify the Commissioner of
Social Services whether or not said joint standing committees intend to
hold a public hearing. Any notice to the commissioner indicating that
the joint standing committees intend to hold a public hearing on a
proposed amendment to the Medicaid state plan shall state the date on
which the joint standing committees intend to hold such public hearing,
which shall not be later than sixty days after the joint standing
committees' receipt of the proposed amendment. At the conclusion of a
public hearing held in accordance with the provisions of this section, the
joint standing committees shall advise the commissioner of their
approval, denial or modifications, if any, of the commissioner's waiver
application or proposed amendment. If the joint standing committees
Public Act No. 26-68 700 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
advise the commissioner of their denial of the commissioner's waiver
application or proposed amendment, the commissioner shall not submit
the application for a federal waiver or proposed amendment to the
federal government. If such committees do not concur, the committee
chairpersons shall appoint a committee of conference which shall be
composed of three members from each joint standing committee. At
least one member appointed from each joint standing committee shall
be a member of the minority party. The report of the committee of
conference shall be made to each joint standing committee, which shall
vote to accept or reject the report. The report of the committee of
conference may not be amended. If a joint standing committee rejects
the report of the committee of conference, that joint standing committee
shall notify the commissioner of the rejection and the commissioner's
waiver application or proposed amendment shall be deemed approved.
If the joint standing committees accept the report, the committee having
cognizance of matters relating to appropriations and the budgets of state
agencies shall advise the commissioner of their approval, denial or
modifications, if any, of the commissioner's waiver application or
proposed amendment. If the joint standing committees do not so advise
the commissioner during the thirty-day period, the waiver application
or proposed amendment shall be deemed approved. Any application
for a federal waiver, waiver renewal or proposed amendment submitted
to the federal government by the commissioner, pursuant to this section,
shall be in accordance with the approval or modifications, if any, of the
joint standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance
of matters relating to human services and appropriations and the
budgets of state agencies, and, for the waiver application required under
section 17b-312, the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to insurance. For purposes of this
section, "medical assistance" shall not include a basic health program
established pursuant to 42 USC 18051.
Sec. 460. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) As used in this section and
Public Act No. 26-68 701 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
section 461 of this act:
(1) "Biological product" has the same meaning as provided in 42 USC
262;
(2) "Biosimilar" means any biological product that is licensed under
42 USC 262(k);
(3) "Brand-name drug" means a drug that is produced or distributed
in accordance with an original new drug application approved under 21
USC 355, as amended from time to time, but does not include an
authorized generic drug as defined in 42 CFR 447.502, as amended from
time to time;
(4) "Formulary" means a list of prescription drugs that are covered by
a specific health insurance plan;
(5) "Generic drug" means (A) a prescription drug product that is
marketed or distributed in accordance with an abbreviated new drug
application approved under 21 USC 355, as amended from time to time,
(B) an authorized generic drug as defined in 42 CFR 447.502, as
amended from time to time, or (C) a drug that entered the market before
calendar year 1962 that was not originally marketed under a new
prescription drug product application;
(6) "Reference product" means (A) with respect to a generic drug, the
listed brand-name drug against which the generic drug is compared, in
accordance with 21 USC 355(j)(2)(A)(i); and (B) with respect to a
biosimilar, the reference biological product as defined in 42 USC 1395w-
3a(c)(6)(I);
(7) "Net drug cost" means the cost to a covered person under the
health benefit plan of (A) a brand-name or generic prescription drug, or
(B) a biological product or biosimilar, net of all applicable discounts and
rebates;
Public Act No. 26-68 702 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(8) "Health benefit plan" has the same meaning as provided in section
38a-1080 of the general statutes; and
(9) "Health carrier" has the same meaning as provided in section 38a-
591a of the general statutes.
Sec. 461. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) If one or more generic
drugs (1) are approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration, (2) are marketed pursuant to such approval, and (3)
have a net drug cost that is less than the net drug cost of the reference
product, a health benefit plan issued or renewed on or after January 1,
2027, that provides coverage for a reference product shall make
available on such health benefit plan's formulary, on a tier with lower
cost sharing, including actual out-of-pocket costs, relative to the
reference product, at least one generic drug meeting these criteria.
(b) If one or more biosimilars (1) are licensed by the United States
Food and Drug Administration, (2) are marketed pursuant to such
licensure, and (3) have a net drug cost that is less than the net drug cost
of the reference product, a health benefit plan issued or renewed on or
after January 1, 2027, that provides coverage for the biosimilar's
reference product, shall make available on such health benefit plan's
formulary, on a tier with lower cost sharing, including actual out-of-
pocket costs, relative to the reference product, at least one biosimilar
meeting these criteria.
(c) Subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall apply as long as the net
drug cost of the generic drug or biosimilar is lower than the net drug
cost of the reference product.
(d) A health benefit plan may not restrict the pharmacy network
through which covered persons may obtain the generic drug or
biosimilar, unless the same restriction applies to the reference product.
(e) If a generic drug or biosimilar has a lower net drug cost than its
Public Act No. 26-68 703 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
reference product, and neither the generic drug or biosimilar nor the
reference product is included on the health benefit plan's formulary, the
health benefit plan issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, shall
not impose a more restrictive formulary exception process for the
generic drug or biosimilar than for the reference product.
(f) Nothing in this section shall:
(1) Require a health benefit plan to provide coverage for a reference
product after a generic drug or biosimilar is approved or licensed, as
applicable and marketed;
(2) Require a health benefit plan to provide coverage for a brand-
name drug, biological product, generic drug or biosimilar if there is a
determination by the pharmacy and therapeutics committee that
develops the plan's formulary that such drug or biological product is no
longer medically appropriate or cost effective;
(3) Interfere with the ability of a pharmacy or pharmacist to comply
with the provisions of chapter 400j of the general statutes; or
(4) Prevent a health benefit plan from including on its formulary
more than one generic drug or biosimilar that has a net drug cost that is
lower than that of its reference product.
(g) The Insurance Commissioner may adopt regulations, in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes, to
implement the provisions of this section.
(h) The requirements of this section:
(1) Apply only with respect to coverage of and cost sharing for
generic drugs, biosimilars and brand-name drugs when dispensed by
pharmacies as outpatient prescription drugs and do not apply to generic
drugs, biosimilars or brand-name drugs when provided by a hospital,
Public Act No. 26-68 704 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
physician or other provider of health care or palliative services, other
than a pharmacy, incident to the services of such provider and paid for
by or on behalf of the relevant health benefit plan as part of the payment
for such services under the medical benefit of the health benefit plan;
(2) Do not apply to the extent that they would require coverage by a
health benefit plan or cost sharing for a generic drug or biosimilar that
is not permitted under any applicable federal law or any law of this
state; and
(3) Do not require that a health benefit plan include on its formulary
a generic drug or biosimilar if the health carrier has not included the
reference product for that generic drug or biosimilar on its formulary
due to a determination by the pharmacy and therapeutics committee for
the health benefit plan that the brand-name drug should not be covered
due to clinical concerns about the safety or efficacy of the brand-name
drug based on the strength of scientific evidence.
Sec. 462. Section 19a-754c of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) For the purposes of this section:
(1) "Affordable Care Act" has the same meaning as provided in
section 38a-1080;
(2) "Covered Connecticut program" means the program established
under subsection (b) of this section;
(3) "Exchange" has the same meaning as provided in section 38a-1080;
(4) "Health carrier" has the same meaning as provided in section 38a-
1080;
(5) "Individual market" has the same meaning as provided in 42 USC
18024(a), as amended from time to time; and
Public Act No. 26-68 705 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
[(6) "Office of Health Strategy" means the Office of Health Strategy
established under section 19a-754a; and]
[(7)] (6) "Silver level" has the same meaning as provided in 42 USC
18022(d), as amended from time to time.
(b) There is established within the Department of Social Services the
Covered Connecticut program for the purpose of reducing the state's
uninsured rate. The Commissioner of Social Services shall administer
said program in consultation with the [Office of Health Strategy,]
Insurance Commissioner and exchange, and, as part of said program,
the Department of Social Services shall:
(1) Provide premium and cost-sharing subsidies that are sufficient to
ensure fully subsidized premium coverage:
(A) On and after July 1, 2021, for parents and needy caretaker
relatives, and their tax dependents not older than twenty-six years of
age, who (i) are eligible for premium and cost-sharing subsidies for a
qualified health plan, (ii) are ineligible for Medicaid because their
income exceeds the Medicaid income limits under chapter 319v, (iii)
have household income up to one hundred seventy-five per cent of the
federal poverty level, (iv) are receiving coverage under a qualified
health plan offered through the exchange in the individual market at a
silver level of coverage, and (v) are utilizing the full amount of
applicable premium subsidies for such plan;
(B) On and after July 1, 2021, for the following additional family
members of parents and caretaker relatives receiving coverage under
such qualified health plan, provided the requirements of subparagraph
(A) of subdivision (1) of this subsection are met: (i) A child over twenty-
six years of age who is permanently and totally disabled, as defined by
the Internal Revenue Service pursuant to 26 USC 152, or (ii) a child who
is over the age of twenty-six and is incapable of self-sustaining
Public Act No. 26-68 706 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
employment by reason of mental or physical handicap and is chiefly
dependent upon the parent or caretaker relative for support and
maintenance, as described in sections 38a-489 and 38a-512a, or (iii) a
child or stepchild receiving coverage under such qualified health plan
as described in sections 38a-497 and 38a-512b;
(C) On and after July 1, 2022, for all parents, needy caretaker relatives
and low-income adults who (i) are at least nineteen but not more than
sixty-four years of age, (ii) are eligible for premium and cost-sharing
subsidies for a qualified health plan, (iii) are ineligible for Medicaid
because their income exceeds the Medicaid income limits under chapter
319v, (iv) have household income up to one hundred seventy-five per
cent of the federal poverty level, (v) are receiving coverage under a
qualified health plan offered through the exchange in the individual
market at a silver level of coverage, and (vi) are utilizing the full amount
of applicable premium subsidies for such plan; and
(D) On and after July 1, 2022, for the following additional family
members of parents, caretaker relatives, and adults receiving coverage
under such qualified health plan, provided the requirements of
subparagraph (C) of subdivision (1) of this subsection are met: (i) A
child over twenty-six years of age who is permanently and totally
disabled, as defined by the Internal Revenue Service pursuant to 26 USC
152, or (ii) a child who is over the age of twenty-six and is incapable of
self-sustaining employment by reason of mental or physical handicap
and is chiefly dependent upon the parent or caretaker relative for
support and maintenance, as described in sections 38a-489 and 38a-512a,
or (iii) a child or stepchild, as described in sections 38a-497 and 38a-512b.
[(2) Not earlier than July 1, 2022, provide dental and nonemergency
medical transportation services, as provided under chapter 319v, to all
eligible individuals described in subdivision (1) of this subsection;]
[(3)] (2) Establish procedures to, on a quarterly basis, pay in
Public Act No. 26-68 707 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
reimbursement to each health carrier offering the qualified health plan
described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of subdivision (1) of this
subsection, as applicable, the premium and cost-sharing subsidies
required under subdivision (1) of this subsection to ensure fully
subsidized coverage; and
[(4)] (3) Consult with the [Office of Health Strategy and] Insurance
Commissioner for the purposes set forth in section 17b-312.
(c) On or after January 1, 2027, the Department of Social Services may,
as part of the Covered Connecticut program, provide dental and
nonemergency medical transportation services, as provided under
chapter 319v, to all eligible individuals described in subsection (b) of
this section.
[(c)] (d) (1) The [Office of Health Strategy] Department of Social
Services may, subject to the approval required under subdivision (3) of
this subsection, seek a waiver pursuant to Section 1332 of the Affordable
Care Act, as amended from time to time, to advance the purpose of the
Covered Connecticut program. The [Office of Health Strategy]
department shall implement such waiver if the federal government
issues such waiver.
(2) The [Office of Health Strategy] Department of Social Services shall
submit a report, in accordance with section 11-4a, to the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to appropriations, human services and insurance containing
any proposed waiver described in subdivision (1) of this subsection
before seeking such waiver from the federal government.
(3) Not later than thirty days after the [Office of Health Strategy]
Department of Social Services submits a report under subdivision (2) of
this subsection, the joint standing committees of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to appropriations, human
Public Act No. 26-68 708 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
services and insurance shall convene a joint public hearing on the
proposed waiver contained in the report, [submitted pursuant to
subdivision (2) of this subsection,] separately vote to approve or reject
such proposed waiver and advise the [Office of Health Strategy]
department of their approval or rejection of such proposed waiver. If
any committee takes no action on such proposed waiver within the
thirty-day period, the proposed waiver shall be deemed rejected.
[(d)] (e) The benefits and subsidies provided for individuals as part
of the Covered Connecticut program shall not be considered income for
such individuals for the purposes of chapter 229.
[(e) Not later than January 1, 2022, every six months thereafter
through January 1, 2024, and annually after January 1, 2024, the] (f) The
Commissioner of Social Services shall annually submit a report, in
accordance with section 11-4a, to the joint standing committees of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to
appropriations, human services and insurance. Such report shall contain
a description of the operations and finances of, and progress made by,
the Covered Connecticut program for the immediately preceding
reporting period.
[(f) Notwithstanding any provision of this section] (g) On or before
January 1, 2028, subject to federal approval, the Covered Connecticut
program shall only include in-network health care providers and in-
network services, unless the health carrier's network is deemed by the
Insurance Commissioner to be inadequate. Benefits described in
subsection (b) of this section and cost-sharing available to all eligible
individuals pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of this section
shall only apply if such eligible individuals use in-network health care
providers or in-network facilities.
(h) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, the Commissioner
of Social Services may make program design changes as necessary to
Public Act No. 26-68 709 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
meet requirements for approval, renewal or continuation of the federal
waiver approved under Section 1115 of the Social Security Act pursuant
to which the Covered Connecticut program is administered. If necessary
federal approvals are not obtained, the commissioner may seek federal
approval for a basic health program in accordance with section 454 of
this act.
Sec. 463. (Effective July 1, 2026) The sum of $250,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 1 of this act to the Department of Housing, for
Rental Assistance Program, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall
be made available for inspections of housing units for compliance with
state and local health, housing, building and safety codes.
Sec. 464. (Effective from passage) (a) The sum of $100,000,006 is
appropriated to the Office of Policy and Management, for Various
Municipal Grants, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, and shall be
made available as a one-time payment in said fiscal year and expended
as follows:
Grant for Fiscal
Year
Town 2026
Andover 17,751
Ansonia 261,746
Ashford 24,858
Avon 60,304
Barkhamsted 20,054
Beacon Falls 32,957
Berlin 75,947
Bethany 21,913
Bethel 95,477
Bethlehem 14,158
Bloomfield 264,102
Bolton 29,551
Bozrah 12,185
Branford 70,511
Public Act No. 26-68 710 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Bridgeport 10,373,486
Bridgewater 1,831
Bristol 991,338
Brookfield 46,102
Brooklyn 106,086
Burlington 44,057
Canaan 29,770
Canterbury 36,403
Canton 29,695
Chaplin 155,805
Cheshire 715,676
Chester 21,671
Clinton 51,998
Colchester 116,408
Colebrook 6,257
Columbia 22,616
Cornwall 7,988
Coventry 61,253
Cromwell 66,024
Danbury 1,592,148
Darien 28,726
Deep River 18,488
Derby 426,691
Durham 25,339
East Granby 30,354
East Haddam 35,476
East Hampton 104,793
East Hartford 1,390,427
East Haven 342,732
East Lyme 536,657
East Windsor 77,422
Eastford 14,635
Easton 20,603
Ellington 64,632
Enfield 575,188
Essex 15,263
Fairfield 818,108
Farmington 1,669,896
Franklin 15,866
Public Act No. 26-68 711 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Glastonbury 76,932
Goshen 7,837
Granby 40,940
Greenwich 161,948
Griswold 171,970
Groton 2,239,466
Guilford 52,719
Haddam 42,348
Hamden 1,572,111
Hampton 14,776
Hartford 13,107,801
Hartland 27,482
Harwinton 25,174
Hebron 30,258
Kent 15,707
Killingly 333,903
Killingworth 30,712
Lebanon 41,770
Ledyard 1,703,834
Lisbon 42,901
Litchfield 35,537
Lyme 7,909
Madison 205,858
Manchester 1,001,403
Mansfield 2,613,732
Marlborough 30,635
Meriden 1,518,429
Middlebury 33,414
Middlefield 16,332
Middletown 2,348,250
Milford 667,970
Monroe 51,404
Montville 2,090,413
Morris 7,647
Naugatuck 418,778
New Britain 4,671,689
New Canaan 14,857
New Fairfield 42,694
New Hartford 22,147
Public Act No. 26-68 712 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
New Haven 12,419,995
New London 2,912,568
New Milford 188,992
Newington 453,379
Newtown 216,181
Norfolk 27,508
North Branford 49,136
North Canaan 36,047
North Haven 265,182
North Stonington 1,336,723
Norwalk 1,432,992
Norwich 3,126,949
Old Lyme 17,974
Old Saybrook 29,797
Orange 86,627
Oxford 103,082
Plainfield 283,649
Plainville 121,099
Plymouth 133,545
Pomfret 32,424
Portland 52,900
Preston 1,807,504
Prospect 47,719
Putnam 164,942
Redding 48,331
Ridgefield 44,831
Rocky Hill 471,899
Roxbury 2,027
Salem 35,835
Salisbury 5,599
Scotland 19,307
Seymour 114,457
Sharon 10,902
Shelton 135,076
Sherman 3,450
Simsbury 76,945
Somers 425,850
South Windsor 77,457
Southbury 115,615
Public Act No. 26-68 713 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Southington 181,419
Sprague 45,613
Stafford 161,510
Stamford 1,550,880
Sterling 56,351
Stonington 40,066
Stratford 406,351
Suffield 516,210
Thomaston 42,738
Thompson 71,358
Tolland 52,389
Torrington 743,529
Trumbull 125,054
Union 37,619
Vernon 325,941
Voluntown 172,490
Wallingford 270,800
Warren 1,732
Washington 8,299
Waterbury 5,114,077
Waterford 171,858
Watertown 278,092
West Hartford 392,543
West Haven 1,336,369
Westbrook 46,507
Weston 6,109
Westport 188,683
Wethersfield 366,924
Willington 55,458
Wilton 45,578
Winchester 136,056
Windham 1,819,472
Windsor 154,121
Windsor Locks 745,276
Wolcott 95,678
Woodbridge 13,949
Woodbury 26,755
Woodstock 32,548
Public Act No. 26-68 714 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(b) The funds appropriated in subsection (a) of this section to the
Office of Policy and Management, for Various Municipal Grants, for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not lapse and shall be available to
the Office of Policy and Management for the same purpose for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2027, each municipality shall report to
the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management concerning the
expenditure of the grant identified in subsection (a) of this section.
Sec. 465. Section 25 of public act 25-168 is repealed and the following
is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
[(a)] Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, for the
fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027, the total grants paid
to municipalities from the moneys available in the Mashantucket Pequot
and Mohegan Fund established pursuant to section 3-55i of the general
statutes shall be as follows:
Grantee Grant Amount For Grant Amount For
Fiscal Year 2026 Fiscal Year 2027
Andover 6,680 6,680
Ansonia 113,045 113,045
Ashford 12,010 12,010
Avon - -
Barkhamsted 6,728 6,728
Beacon Falls 12,467 12,467
Berlin - -
Bethany 881 881
Bethel - -
Bethlehem 4,125 4,125
Bloomfield 94,314 94,314
Bolton 3,244 3,244
Bozrah 9,143 9,143
Branford - -
Bridgeport 5,606,925 5,606,925
Public Act No. 26-68 715 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Bridgewater 3,734 3,734
Bristol 400,282 400,282
Brookfield - -
Brooklyn 191,703 191,703
Burlington - -
Canaan 6,202 6,202
Canterbury 15,208 15,208
Canton - -
Chaplin 73,052 73,052
Cheshire 1,962,440 1,962,440
Chester 3,278 3,278
Clinton - -
Colchester 23,167 23,167
Colebrook 6,045 6,045
Columbia 4,857 4,857
Cornwall 4,434 4,434
Coventry 13,336 13,336
Cromwell - -
Danbury 678,398 678,398
Darien - -
Deep River 4,490 4,490
Derby 207,304 207,304
Durham 1,003 1,003
Eastford 7,529 7,529
East Granby 987 987
East Haddam 3,042 3,042
East Hampton 6,742 6,742
East Hartford 156,898 156,898
East Haven 82,006 82,006
East Lyme 270,204 270,204
Easton - -
East Windsor 1,015,432 1,015,432
Ellington 4,081 4,081
Enfield 1,224,751 1,224,751
Essex - -
Fairfield 114,941 114,941
Farmington - -
Franklin 9,738 9,738
Glastonbury - -
Public Act No. 26-68 716 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Goshen 2,687 2,687
Granby - -
Greenwich - -
Griswold 55,478 55,478
Groton 1,232,069 1,232,069
Guilford - -
Haddam 908 908
Hamden 725,946 725,946
Hampton 8,881 8,881
Hartford 6,136,523 6,136,523
Hartland 6,593 6,593
Harwinton 3,676 3,676
Hebron 3,350 3,350
Kent 1,298 1,298
Killingly 94,184 94,184
Killingworth - -
Lebanon 13,139 13,139
Ledyard 1,391,000 [1,391,000] 2,191,000
Lisbon 11,287 11,287
Litchfield - -
Lyme 1,997 1,997
Madison - -
Manchester 412,450 412,450
Mansfield 179,151 179,151
Marlborough 1,807 1,807
Meriden 698,609 698,609
Middlebury - -
Middlefield 5,616 5,616
Middletown 1,060,747 1,060,747
Milford 236,690 236,690
Monroe - -
Montville 1,446,162 [1,446,162] 2,246,162
Morris 5,059 5,059
Naugatuck 147,899 147,899
New Britain 1,980,822 1,980,822
New Canaan - -
New Fairfield - -
New Hartford 822 822
New Haven 5,503,352 5,503,352
Public Act No. 26-68 717 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Newington 164,924 164,924
New London 1,667,837 1,667,837
New Milford 2,049 2,049
Newtown 829,098 829,098
Norfolk 8,899 8,899
North Branford 2,647 2,647
North Canaan 12,383 12,383
North Haven 86,789 86,789
North Stonington 880,690 880,690
Norwalk 577,059 577,059
Norwich 2,360,229 2,360,229
Old Lyme - -
Old Saybrook - -
Orange 6,408 6,408
Oxford - -
Plainfield 82,099 82,099
Plainville 27,635 27,635
Plymouth 33,955 33,955
Pomfret 9,172 9,172
Portland 2,902 2,902
Preston 1,165,290 1,165,290
Prospect 1,085 1,085
Putnam 75,902 75,902
Redding - -
Ridgefield - -
Rocky Hill 213,545 213,545
Roxbury 2,188 2,188
Salem 7,370 7,370
Salisbury - -
Scotland 11,620 11,620
Seymour 24,111 24,111
Sharon 2,001 2,001
Shelton - -
Sherman 109 109
Simsbury - -
Somers 1,564,515 1,564,515
Southbury - -
Southington 7,160 7,160
South Windsor - -
Public Act No. 26-68 718 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sprague 17,479 17,479
Stafford 60,839 60,839
Stamford 625,635 625,635
Sterling 24,317 24,317
Stonington 30,000 30,000
Stratford 30,567 30,567
Suffield 2,760,598 2,760,598
Thomaston 16,872 16,872
Thompson 38,307 38,307
Tolland - -
Torrington 196,642 196,642
Trumbull - -
Union 19,013 19,013
Vernon 79,820 79,820
Voluntown 80,641 80,641
Wallingford 33,058 33,058
Warren 4,369 4,369
Washington - -
Waterbury 2,637,435 2,637,435
Waterford - -
Watertown 11,631 11,631
Westbrook - -
West Hartford 27,820 27,820
West Haven 807,097 807,097
Weston - -
Westport - -
Wethersfield 137,556 137,556
Willington 17,399 17,399
Wilton - -
Winchester 49,474 49,474
Windham 793,155 793,155
Windsor - -
Windsor Locks 387,713 387,713
Wolcott 16,939 16,939
Woodbridge - -
Woodbury - -
Woodstock 5,694 5,694
Golden Hill 20,000 20,000
Paugussett
Public Act No. 26-68 719 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Paucatuck Eastern 20,000 20,000
Pequot
Schaghticoke 20,000 20,000
TOTALS 52,532,789 [52,532,789] 54,132,789
Sec. 466. (Effective July 1, 2026) The amounts appropriated in section
1 of this act to the Judicial Department, for Youth Services Prevention,
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made available in said
fiscal year for the following grants:
Grantee Grant
100 Black Men of Stamford $40,000
333 Valley Street Center, An Intergenerational
Organization $300,000
6-Love, Inc. $35,000
Abe Prior-Keep 5 Alive, Inc. $40,000
ACCESS Educational Services, Inc. $75,000
ActUp Theater, Inc. $75,000
Alex Breanne Corporation $15,000
Alliance for the Mystic River Watershed $7,500
ALMO Sports $25,000
Aluminum Falcon Robotics, Inc. $5,000
Amplify, Inc. $25,000
Angel of Edgewood, Inc. $10,000
Arte, Inc. $35,000
Artists Collective, Inc. $10,000
Asian Pacific American Coalition of CT $50,000
AskSammy Resources $15,000
Asociacion de Dominicanos de New London $40,000
Athletes R Us, Inc. $50,000
BAGS Foundation, Inc. $5,000
Ball Heads, Inc. $20,000
Bangladesh Society of Connecticut $50,000
Bangladeshi American Association of Connecticut
(BAAC) $25,000
Bangladeshi American Friends & Family of CT $25,000
Barbara's House, Inc. $50,000
Public Act No. 26-68 720 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Be Ye Ready, Inc. $18,125
Beat the Street Community Center, Inc. $20,000
Bloomfield Jr Warhawks, Inc. $18,125
Boriken United of Eastern Connecticut, Inc. $10,000
Boys & Girls Club of Greater Waterbury $80,000
Boys & Girls Club of Meriden $10,000
Boys & Girls Club of New Britain $80,000
Boys and Girls Club of Hartford $30,000
Boys and Girls Club of Stamford, Inc. $20,000
Bregamos Theater $25,000
Bridgeport Caribe Youth Leaders $185,000
Building Leaders and Community Strategies, Inc. $25,000
Building One Community-The Center for
Immigrant Opportunity $35,000
Business Industry Foundation of Middlesex
County, Inc. $20,000
C.O.R.N.E.R.S Community $10,000
Charter Oak Boxing Academy $30,000
Charter Oak Temple Restoration Association, Inc. $50,000
Christ Christian Church, Inc. $12,000
Christian Community Action, Inc. $200,000
City Angel Baseball Academy $25,000
City of New Haven Youth and Rec. $300,000
CO Sports Academy, Inc. $5,000
Community for Generations $25,000
Community Speaks Out, Inc. $7,500
Connect Us, Inc. $25,000
Connecticut Institute for Community Development-
Puerto Rican Parade, Inc. $10,000
Connecticut Scholars, Inc. $10,000
Cook and Grow LLC $20,000
Creative Youth Productions, Inc. $10,000
CT Rebound $10,000
CT Riptide $5,000
CT Violence Intervention Program, Inc. $200,000
Cultural Alliance of Western Connecticut $25,000
Danbury Grassroots Academy $25,000
Danbury Law Enforcement Cadets, Inc. $25,000
Public Act No. 26-68 721 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Danbury Youth Soccer Club, Inc. $10,000
Denison Pequotsepous Nature Center $5,000
DHW Athletics $5,000
DNA Entrepreneurial Pipeline Initiative, Urban
League of Southern Connecticut $75,000
Dominican Community Center, Inc. $15,000
Dr. Martin Luther King Scholarship Fund $30,000
DT Cares $18,125
East End NRZ Market & Cafe $35,000
Ebony Horsewomen, Inc. $12,500
Edgewood PTA Child Care Program, Inc. $35,000
Edmunds Cofield Charter School $25,000
EJ's HEART, Inc. $80,000
Family Centers, Inc. $25,000
Ferguson Library $30,000
Fixing Fathers One Dad at a Time, Inc. $75,000
FRESH New London $10,000
Friends of Bethel Parks and Recreation, Inc. $75,000
Friends of MPMRC, Inc. $15,000
Friends of the Danbury Museum & Historical
Society $50,000
From Quicksand Unto Solid Ground $10,000
Girls, Inc. $20,000
God Provides Ministries International, Inc. $10,000
Good Shepherd Ministries $8,000
Greenwich Alliance for Education $25,000
Groton Little League $15,000
Groton Mystic Youth Football League $10,000
Haitian Community Center, Inc. $10,000
Hartford Communities That Care, Inc. $30,000
Hartford Health Initiative $15,000
Hartford Hurricanes $18,125
Hartford Lions Soccer Academy, Inc. $30,625
Hartford Northend Little League $5,000
Hartford Stage Company, Inc. $50,000
Heavy Hitters USA, Inc. $10,000
Higher Edge, Inc. $10,000
Hip Hop 1001 $10,000
Public Act No. 26-68 722 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Hispanic Alliance of Southeastern Connecticut, Inc. $10,000
Hispanic Coalition of Greater Waterbury, Inc. $20,000
Historically Black College Black Alumni, Inc. $3,000
Hoops 4 Life, Inc. $5,000
HOOPWAVE Sports Mentoring $10,000
Human Resources Agency of New Britain, Inc. $30,000
Integrated Day Charter School Foundation $28,000
INTEMPO Organization, Inc. $30,000
Interdistrict Committee for Project Oceanology (aka
'Project Oceanology') $25,000
Journey 2 Justice, Inc., Law Pipeline Program $25,000
Kind Works, Inc. $75,000
L.I.F.T. Foundation $50,000
LEAF $20,000
Ledyard Little League $8,000
Ledyard Soccer Club $8,000
Ledyard Youth Football $11,000
Left Hearts, Inc. $15,000
Life Center of CT, Inc. $15,000
Manchester Adult & Continuing Education $15,000
McGivney Community Center, Inc. $10,000
Mental Health CT $60,000
Meriden New Britain Berlin YMCA $25,000
Meriden Police Cadets $15,000
Meriden-Wallingford Chrysalis $20,000
Mi Casa (Hispanic Health Council) $25,000
Mill River Collaboration, Inc. $25,000
Montville Education Foundation, Inc. $20,000
Montville Lacrosse, LLC $6,000
Montville Little League, Inc. $8,000
Montville Youth Football League, Inc. $11,000
Montville Youth Soccer Club, Inc. $8,000
Motivate Kids $50,000
Music Haven $100,000
My Architexture Workshops, Inc. $25,000
Mystic Community Bikes Inc. $5,000
Mystic Seaport Museum, Inc. $20,000
New Britain Police Athletic League $25,000
Public Act No. 26-68 723 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
New Britain ROOTS, Inc. $45,000
New England Science & Sailing Foundation $7,500
New Haven Ecology Project $200,000
New Life II Teaching You Another Way $25,000
New London Babe Ruth League, Inc. $10,000
Night Flight Association, Inc. $8,000
North End Little League $15,000
Northern Middlesex YMCA $120,000
Norwalk Jr. Football, Inc. $10,000
Norwich Bully Busters $3,000
Norwich Free Academy $15,000
Norwich Public Schools Education Foundation, Inc. $18,000
Norwich Youth Football League $20,000
Notre Dame West Haven $9,000
Ocean Community YMCA $15,000
Oddfellows Playhouse, Inc. $40,000
OIC New Britain, Inc. $35,000
Organized Parents Make A Difference, Inc. $50,000
Parent Leadership Training Institute (PLTI) and
Children Leadership Training Institute (CLTI) $75,000
Park Central, Inc. $10,000
Park Street Public Library $25,000
Pathways to Employment and Housing, Inc. $25,000
Police Activity League of Middletown, Inc.
(Middletown PAL) $10,000
Project 9 Foundation 8181-369 $45,000
Project LEARN $7,500
PROJECT MUSIC, Inc. $30,000
Puerto Rican Parade of Fairfield County $20,000
Puerto Ricans United $30,000
READY, Inc. $35,000
Rehoboth Church of God $18,125
RF Youth Boxing, Inc. $100,000
Rich Dae Entrepreneur Foundation $168,125
Rivera Memorial Foundation, Inc. $72,500
Rodney Williams $35,000
Safe Futures, Inc. $10,000
Sankofa Education and Leadership, Inc. $40,000
Public Act No. 26-68 724 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Second Chance Re-entry Initiative Program (SCRIP) $10,000
Silver City Girls Softball $10,000
SoundWaters, Inc. $40,000
Sports Academy $50,000
Stamford Alumni Diamond Foundation, Inc. $45,000
Stamford Public Education Foundation, Inc. $15,000
Teach Kids Music, Inc. $20,000
Team West Haven, Inc. $30,000
The Bread Room, Inc. $17,000
The Bridge Family Center, Inc. $150,000
The Color a Positive Thought Organization $82,500
The Cornelia Brown Foundation Corp $25,000
The Dominican American Coalition of Connecticut
Inc. $25,000
The Gifted Onez, Inc. $25,000
The Historically Black College Alumni $10,000
The House of Darla, Inc. $30,000
The Legacy Foundation of Hartford, Inc. $50,000
The Missing Piece LLC $18,125
The Mohegan Tribe of Indians of Connecticut $10,000
The Norwalk Conservatory of the Arts $10,000
The Norwalk Hospital Association, now part of
Northwell $10,000
The Police Activities League of Hartford, Inc. $120,000
The Sonship Institute, Inc. $25,000
The Village Initiative Project, Inc. $70,000
The Walter E. Luckett Jr. Foundation, Inc. $50,000
The Young Women's Christian Association of New
Britain $10,000
Today's Youth Tomorrow's Future, Inc. $10,000
TOPS The Other Persons Shoes $12,500
Town of East Hartford $100,000
Town of East Hartford Youth and Social Services
Department $75,000
Town of Manchester Youth Service Bureau $75,000
Transcend The Trend, Inc. $75,000
Umbrella Impact $10,000
Unique & Unified New Era Youth Movement $55,000
Public Act No. 26-68 725 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
United Way of Greenwich, Inc. $40,000
University of Bridgeport $20,000
University of Connecticut $7,500
UR Community Cares, Inc. $10,000
Village Initiative Project $35,000
Walnut Orange Walsh Neighborhood Revitalization
Zone, Inc. $82,500
West Haven Board of Education $9,000
Whaling City Youth Football League, Inc. $10,000
Women and Families Center $20,000
Yellow Farmhouse Education Center, Inc. $2,500
YMCA of Northern Middlesex County, Inc. $110,000
YMCA-Meriden, Berlin, New Britain $10,000
Young Men's Christian Association of Greenwich $10,000
Youth Business Initiative (YBI) $25,000
Yuke Nation, Inc. $25,000
Sec. 467. (Effective from passage) (a) For the fiscal year ending June 30,
2027, the amount of $3,250,000 shall be transferred from the Citizens'
Election Fund to the Secretary of the State, for Other Expenses.
(b) From the amount transferred pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section, the Secretary of the State shall use $2,250,000 for early voting
grants to municipalities, and $1,000,000 for a public information
campaign.
Sec. 468. (Effective from passage) The memorandum of agreement
between the State of Connecticut Personal Care Attendant (PCA)
Workforce Council and the New England Health Care Employees
Union, District 1199, SEIU, submitted to this assembly for approval May
1, 2026, as provided in subdivisions (7) and (8) of subsection (c) of
section 17b-706b of the general statutes, including any attachments or
appendices thereto, and any provisions that require supersedence of a
law or regulation, is approved.
Public Act No. 26-68 726 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 469. (Effective from passage) The memorandum of agreement
between the State of Connecticut Office of Early Childhood and the
Connecticut State Employees Association SEIU Local 2001, submitted to
this assembly for approval May 1, 2026, as provided in subdivisions (7)
and (8) of subsection (e) of section 17b-705a of the general statutes,
including any attachments or appendices thereto, and any provisions
that require supersedence of a law or regulation, is approved.
Sec. 470. Section 10a-174d of the 2026 supplement to the general
statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
(Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Award" means the greater of: (A) The unpaid portion, if any, of a
qualifying student's eligible institutional costs after subtracting such
student's financial aid, or (B) a minimum award of five hundred dollars
for a full-time student or three hundred dollars for a part-time student;
(2) "Eligible institutional costs" means the tuition and required fees
incurred each semester by an individual student that are established by
the Board of Regents for Higher Education for the Connecticut State
University System and Charter Oak State College;
(3) "Financial aid" means the sum of all scholarships, grants and
federal, state and institutional aid received by a qualifying student.
"Financial aid" does not include any federal, state or private student
loans received by a qualifying student;
(4) "Qualifying student" means any person who (A) participated in
the debt-free community college program, established pursuant to
section 10a-174, and [completed not fewer than sixty credits through
said program] received an associate's degree at the Connecticut State
Community College, (B) enrolls as a full-time or part-time student for
the fall semester of 2026, or any semester thereafter, at a state university
Public Act No. 26-68 727 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
within the Connecticut State University System or Charter Oak State
College in a program leading to a bachelor's degree, (C) is classified as
an in-state student pursuant to section 10a-29, (D) made satisfactory
academic progress while enrolled at the Connecticut State Community
College and continues to make satisfactory academic progress while
enrolled at such state university or Charter Oak State College, (E) has
completed the Free Application for Federal Student Aid, and (F) has
accepted all available financial aid;
(5) "Full-time student" means a student who is enrolled at a state
university within the Connecticut State University System or Charter
Oak State College and (A) is carrying twelve or more credit hours in a
semester, or (B) has a learning disability documented with such
university in which he or she is enrolled and is enrolled in the maximum
number of credit hours that is feasible for such student to attempt in a
semester, as determined by such student's academic advisor;
(6) "Semester" means the fall or spring semester of an academic year.
"Semester" does not include a summer semester or session; and
(7) "Part-time student" means a student who is enrolled at a state
university within the Connecticut State University System or Charter
Oak State College and is carrying not less than six but fewer than twelve
credit hours in a semester.
(b) The Board of Regents for Higher Education shall (1) establish a
finish line scholars program to make awards to qualifying students each
semester, (2) adopt rules, procedures and forms necessary to implement
the finish line scholars program, and (3) submit a report outlining such
rules, procedures and forms, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a, to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to higher education.
(c) For the fall semester of 2026, and each semester thereafter, the
Public Act No. 26-68 728 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Board of Regents for Higher Education shall make awards to qualifying
students within available appropriations. An award shall be available
to a qualifying student for the first seventy-two credit hours earned by
the qualifying student at a state university within the Connecticut State
University System or Charter Oak State College, as applicable, or until
such qualifying student earns a bachelor's degree, whichever is earlier,
provided the qualifying student meets and continues to meet the
requirements of this section. The board shall not use an award to
supplant any financial aid, including, but not limited to, state or
institutional aid, otherwise available to a qualifying student.
(d) Not later than [November 1, 2026, and March 1, 2027, and each
semester] January 1, 2027, June 1, 2027, and quarterly thereafter, the
Board of Regents for Higher Education shall report, in accordance with
the provisions of section 11-4a, to the joint standing committees of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to higher
education and employment advancement and appropriations and the
budgets of the state agencies regarding the finish line scholars program,
including, but not limited to, (1) the number of qualifying students
enrolled at a state university within the Connecticut State University
System and Charter Oak State College during each semester, (2) the
number of qualifying students receiving minimum awards and the
number of qualifying students receiving awards for the unpaid portion
of eligible institutional costs, (3) the average number of credit hours the
qualifying students enrolled in each semester and the average number
of credit hours the qualifying students completed each semester, (4) the
average amount of the award made to qualifying students under this
section for the unpaid portion of eligible institutional costs, [and] (5) the
degree completion rates of qualifying students receiving awards under
this section by subject area, and (6) the average amount of institutional
aid awarded to (A) Finish Line Scholars recipients by Student Aid Index
groupings, and (B) students who did not receive a Finish Line Scholars
award by the same Student Aid Index groupings.
Public Act No. 26-68 729 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Sec. 471. (Effective from passage) The following sums are appropriated
from the GENERAL FUND for the purposes herein specified for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026:
GENERAL FUND 2025-2026
DEPARTMENT OF EMERGENCY SERVICES AND
PUBLIC PROTECTION
Personal Services 4,800,000
Other Expenses 2,765,000
Fleet Purchase 2,620,000
Connecticut State Firefighter's Association 75,000
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
Other Expenses 1,400,000
DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING
Housing/Homeless Services 17,000,000
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH
Other Expenses 700,000
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HEALTH AND
ADDICTION SERVICES
Personal Services 7,500,000
Behavioral Health Medications 1,300,000
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL SERVICES
Medicaid 80,000,000
Old Age Assistance 6,100,000
Aid To The Blind 190,000
Aid To The Disabled 6,400,000
Connecticut Home Care Program 2,900,000
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
Education Equalization Grants 2,000,000
Public Act No. 26-68 730 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
TECHNICAL EDUCATION AND CAREER SYSTEM
Personal Services 2,000,000
Other Expenses 2,300,000
OFFICE OF EARLY CHILDHOOD
Birth to Three 3,500,000
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTION
Personal Services 18,000,000
DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND FAMILIES
Personal Services 2,400,000
JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
Other Expenses 4,100,000
STATE COMPTROLLER - FRINGE BENEFITS
State Employees Health Service Cost 43,000,000
WORKERS' COMPENSATION CLAIMS -
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Workers' Compensation Claims 1,400,000
Workers Comp Claims – UCHC 400,000
Workers Comp Claims – DCF 200,000
Workers Comp Claims – DMHAS 8,000,000
Workers Comp Claims – DESPP 1,400,000
Workers Comp Claims – DOC 9,300,000
TOTAL - GENERAL FUND 231,750,000
Sec. 472. (Effective from passage) The amounts appropriated to the
following agencies in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by this
act, are reduced by the following amounts for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026:
GENERAL FUND 2025-2026
Public Act No. 26-68 731 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT
Personal Services 3,000,000
Other Expenses 2,000,000
SECRETARY OF THE STATE
Personal Services 900,000
ELECTIONS ENFORCEMENT COMMISSION
Elections Enforcement Commission 300,000
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE SERVICES
Personal Services 2,500,000
OFFICE OF GOVERNMENTAL ACCOUNTABILITY
Contracting Standards Board 100,000
Office of the Child Advocate 200,000
Office of the Correction Ombuds 250,000
Office of the Educational Ombudsperson 150,000
OFFICE OF POLICY AND MANAGEMENT
Personal Services 1,000,000
Property Tax Relief for Veterans 1,000,000
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Personal Services 500,000
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Personal Services 3,000,000
Other Expenses 1,200,000
Rents and Moving 100,000
State Insurance and Risk Mgmt Operations 4,000,000
IT Services 1,000,000
ATTORNEY GENERAL
Personal Services 3,500,000
DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE
Personal Services 3,775,000
Public Act No. 26-68 732 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
DEPARTMENT OF CONSUMER PROTECTION
Personal Services 2,250,000
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
Opportunities for Long Term Unemployed 175,000
COMMISSION ON HUMAN RIGHTS AND
OPPORTUNITIES
Personal Services 350,000
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Personal Services 250,000
Other Expenses 250,000
DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT
Personal Services 200,000
Other Expenses 500,000
AGRICULTURAL EXPERIMENT STATION
Personal Services 200,000
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH
Personal Services 900,000
Pancreatic Cancer Screening 100,000
Public Health Response 850,000
School Based Health Clinics 600,000
OFFICE OF HEALTH STRATEGY
Personal Services 350,000
DEPARTMENT OF DEVELOPMENTAL SERVICES
Personal Services 500,000
Behavioral Services Program 1,100,000
Supplemental Payments for Medical Services 300,000
Public Act No. 26-68 733 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HEALTH AND
ADDICTION SERVICES
Home and Community Based Services 650,000
DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL SERVICES
Personal Services 5,500,000
HUSKY B Program 1,400,000
Substance Use Disorder Waiver Reserve 6,570,000
Temporary Family Assistance - TANF 13,900,000
State Administered General Assistance 3,100,000
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
Personal Services 1,150,000
Other Expenses 1,750,000
Sheff Settlement 5,000,000
Sheff Transportation 4,960,000
Aspiring Educators Scholarship Program 4,500,000
Charter Schools 1,200,000
Open Choice Program 1,000,000
Magnet Schools 2,300,000
OFFICE OF EARLY CHILDHOOD
Personal Services 500,000
OFFICE OF HIGHER EDUCATION
Other Expenses 200,000
CT Loan Forgiveness 4,500,000
TEACHERS' RETIREMENT BOARD
Retirees Health Service Cost 300,000
Municipal Retiree Health Insurance Costs 700,000
JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
Personal Services 1,871,496
Alternative Incarceration Program 500,000
Juvenile Alternative Incarceration 375,000
Workers' Compensation Claims 350,000
Youth Violence Initiative 27,022
Public Act No. 26-68 734 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Youth Services Prevention 573,122
Juvenile Justice Outreach Services 375,000
Board and Care for Children - Short-term and 250,000
Residential
PUBLIC DEFENDER SERVICES COMMISSION
Personal Services 1,240,000
Assigned Counsel - Criminal 684,360
STATE COMPTROLLER - FRINGE BENEFITS
Higher Education Alternative Retirement System 32,000,000
Employers Social Security Tax 7,000,000
Other Post Employment Benefits 8,000,000
SERS Defined Contribution Match 1,000,000
WORKERS' COMPENSATION CLAIMS -
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Workers Comp Claims – UConn 450,000
Workers Comp Claims – CSCU 750,000
Workers Comp Claims – DDS 100,000
TOTAL - GENERAL FUND 152,076,000
Sec. 473. (Effective from passage) The following sums are appropriated
from the SPECIAL TRANSPORTATION FUND for the purposes herein
specified for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026:
SPECIAL TRANSPORTATION FUND 2025-2026
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Other Expenses 9,000,000
Highway Planning And Research 1,041,500
STATE COMPTROLLER - FRINGE BENEFITS
Employers Social Security Tax 150,000
State Employees Health Service Cost 7,000,000
Public Act No. 26-68 735 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
WORKERS' COMPENSATION CLAIMS -
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Workers' Compensation Claims 350,000
TOTAL - SPECIAL TRANSPORTATION FUND 17,541,500
Sec. 474. (Effective from passage) The amounts appropriated to the
following agencies in section 2 of public act 25-168, as amended by this
act, are reduced by the following amounts for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026:
SPECIAL TRANSPORTATION FUND 2025-2026
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Personal Services 400,000
State Insurance and Risk Mgmt Operations 750,000
DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES
Personal Services 2,000,000
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Rail Operations 10,041,500
TOTAL - SPECIAL TRANSPORTATION FUND 13,191,500
Sec. 475. (Effective from passage) The amounts appropriated to the
following agencies in section 5 of public act 25-168, as amended by this
act, are reduced by the following amounts for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026:
INSURANCE FUND 2025-2026
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH
Immunization Services 2,000,000
OFFICE OF HEALTH STRATEGY
Other Expenses 1,000,000
Public Act No. 26-68 736 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
TOTAL - INSURANCE FUND 3,000,000
Sec. 476. (Effective from passage) Notwithstanding the provisions of
title 2 of the general statutes and any personnel policies adopted
pursuant to said provisions, the Office of Legislative Management shall
apply terms consistent with those contained in Article 20, except section
3 of said article, of the tentative agreement for a successor collective
bargaining agreement between the State of Connecticut and the
Connecticut Employees Union Independent, NP-2 Bargaining Unit
(CEUI), ratified on January 8, 2026, and approved pursuant to
subsection (f) of section 5-278 of the general statutes, and applicable to
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, to legislative employees for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2027.
Sec. 477. (Effective from passage) Up to $100,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated to Legislative Management, for Statues,
in section 1 of public act 23-204, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024,
carried forward in section 9 of public act 24-81, for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2025, and carried forward in section 30 of public act 25-168, for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and
shall be made available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, to
support removal of the John Mason statue from the State Capitol
building.
Sec. 478. (Effective July 1, 2026) The sum of $100,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 3 of this act, to the Department of Energy and
Environmental Protection, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2027, shall be made available in said fiscal year to the three
state-recognized tribes, the Schaghticoke, the Paucatuck Eastern Pequot
and the Golden Hill Paugussett, for storm damage clean-up and
hazardous tree removal on their reservations.
Sec. 479. (Effective July 1, 2026) The sum of $50,000 of the amount
Public Act No. 26-68 737 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
appropriated in section 3 of this act, to the Department of Energy and
Environmental Protection, for Various Grants, for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2027, shall be made available in said fiscal year to the
Mashantucket Pequot Tribe, the Mohegan Tribe of Indians of
Connecticut and the three state-recognized tribes, the Schaghticoke, the
Paucatuck Eastern Pequot and the Golden Hill Paugussett, for hunting
and fishing license fees.
Sec. 480. (Effective from passage) The sum of $3,000,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to
the Department of Transportation, for Rail Operations, for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, and the sum of $4,000,000 of the amount
appropriated in said section to the Department of Transportation, for
Rail Operations, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, shall be made
available in said fiscal years for Shore Line East.
Sec. 481. (Effective from passage) The sum of $850,000 of the amount
appropriated in section 1 of public act 25-168, as amended by this act, to
the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection, for Social
Work Law Enforcement Training Partnership, for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried
forward for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.
Sec. 482. (Effective from passage) Up to $200,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Economic and
Community Development, for Various Grants, in section 1 of public act
25-168, as amended by this act, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
shall not lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be carried forward and made
available during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, as a grant to the
American Legion Post 17 in Naugatuck.
Sec. 483. (Effective from passage) Up to $250,000 of the unexpended
balance of funds appropriated to the Department of Children and
Families, for Various Grants, in section 1 of public act 25-168, as
Public Act No. 26-68 738 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
amended by this act, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, shall not
lapse on June 30, 2026, and shall be transferred to the Department of
Housing, for Various Grants, and made available during the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, as a grant to Thames River Community Services.
Sec. 484. Section 29-1ll of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July
1, 2026):
(a) The Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection, in
consultation with the Police Officer Standards and Training Council,
shall establish a project to be known as the social work and law
enforcement project to advance the ethical and effective integration of
social work services into law enforcement units by preparing social
workers, social work students and law enforcement professionals to
collaborate in the field of police social work. The project shall be located
at Southern Connecticut State University. The objectives of the project
shall be to: (1) Educate and train the social work and law enforcement
workforce to collaborate by using a model that integrates police and
social work, (2) increase community wellness through training,
research, education and policy advocacy concerning the integration of
police and social work, (3) strengthen the engagement among social
workers, law enforcement officers and community members, and (4)
promote dialogue concerning diversity, disparities and systemic racism
in criminal and juvenile justice settings. For purposes of this section,
"law enforcement unit" has the same meaning as provided in section 7-
294a.
(b) Not later than January 1, 2026, the Commissioner of Emergency
Services and Public Protection shall enter into a memorandum of
understanding with Southern Connecticut State University for the
purpose of establishing the social work and law enforcement project.
Such memorandum shall include, but need not be limited to, a
requirement that any use of funding for the project for a purpose other
Public Act No. 26-68 739 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
than providing training or education to a police officer shall require the
commissioner's written authorization.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the
Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection, the Police
Officer Standards and Training Council and the president of Southern
Connecticut State University shall jointly report, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a, to the joint standing committees of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public safety
and appropriations and the budgets of state agencies on the status of the
project and expenditures associated with the project.
Sec. 485. (Effective July 1, 2026) Not later than January 1, 2027, the
Student Loan Ombudsman, appointed pursuant to section 36a-25 of the
general statutes, shall report, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing committees of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to banking,
higher education and appropriations and the budgets of state agencies
concerning the activities of the Office of the Student Loan Ombudsman
during the calendar years 2025 and 2026.
Sec. 486. Section 27-19d of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
There is established an account to be known as the ["Governor's
Guards account"] "Governor's Foot Guards account", which shall be a
separate, nonlapsing account within the General Fund. The account
shall contain any moneys required by law to be deposited in the account,
which shall include, but not be limited to, the proceeds of Governor's
Foot Guards programs. Moneys in the account shall be expended by the
Adjutant General for the purposes of facilitating the operations of the
Governor's Guards.
Sec. 487. Section 27-19e of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
Public Act No. 26-68 740 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July
1, 2026):
(a) There is established an account to be known as the "Governor's
Guards horse account", which shall be a separate, nonlapsing account.
The account shall contain any moneys required by law to be deposited
in the account, which shall include, but not be limited to, donations for
the specific purpose of offsetting the costs of maintaining Governor's
Guards' horses.
(b) There is established a subaccount within the Governor's Guards
horse account, established pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, to
be known as the "First Company Governor's Horse Guard account" to
be used solely for activities relating to the First Company Governor's
Horse Guard in Avon.
(c) There is established a subaccount within the Governor's Guards
horse account, established pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, to
be known as the "Second Company Governor's Horse Guard account"
to be used solely for activities relating to the Second Company
Governor's Horse Guard in Newtown.
(d) Moneys in the account shall be expended by the Adjutant General
for the purposes of facilitating the operations of the Governor's Guards.
Sec. 488. Subsection (b) of section 12-18b of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 12-19a and 12-20a, on
or before September thirtieth, annually, all funds appropriated for state
grants in lieu of taxes shall be payable to municipalities and fire districts
pursuant to the provisions of this section. On or before January first,
annually, the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management shall
determine the amount due, as a state grant in lieu of taxes, to each
Public Act No. 26-68 741 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
municipality and fire district in this state wherein college and hospital
property is located and to each municipality and fire district in this state
wherein state, municipal or tribal property, except that which was
acquired and used for highways and bridges, but not excepting
property acquired and used for highway administration or maintenance
purposes, is located. Such determination shall be calculated based on
assessed values provided to the Office of Policy and Management prior
to the preceding April first, pursuant to section 12-19b.
(1) The grant payable to any municipality or fire district for state,
municipal or tribal property under the provisions of this section in the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2022, and each fiscal year thereafter, shall be
equal to the total of:
(A) One hundred per cent of the property taxes that would have been
paid with respect to any facility designated by the Commissioner of
Correction, on or before August first of each year, to be a correctional
facility administered under the auspices of the Department of
Correction or a juvenile residential center under direction of the Judicial
Branch that was used for incarcerative purposes during the preceding
fiscal year. If a list containing the name and location of such designated
facilities and information concerning their use for purposes of
incarceration during the preceding fiscal year is not available from the
Secretary of the State on August first of any year, the Commissioner of
Correction shall, on said date, certify to the Secretary of the Office of
Policy and Management a list containing such information;
(B) One hundred per cent of the property taxes that would have been
paid with respect to that portion of the John Dempsey Hospital located
at The University of Connecticut Health Center in Farmington that is
used as a permanent medical ward for prisoners under the custody of
the Department of Correction. Nothing in this section shall be construed
as designating any portion of The University of Connecticut Health
Center John Dempsey Hospital as a correctional facility;
Public Act No. 26-68 742 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
(C) One hundred per cent of the property taxes that would have been
paid on any land [designated within the 1983 Settlement boundary and]
taken into trust by the federal government for the Mashantucket Pequot
Tribal Nation on or after June 8, 1999;
(D) One hundred per cent of the property taxes that would have been
paid with respect to the property and facilities owned by the
Connecticut Port Authority;
(E) Subject to the provisions of subsection (c) of section 12-19a, sixty-
five per cent of the property taxes that would have been paid with
respect to the buildings and grounds comprising Connecticut Valley
Hospital and Whiting Forensic Hospital in Middletown;
(F) With respect to any municipality in which more than fifty per cent
of the property is state-owned real property, one hundred per cent of
the property taxes that would have been paid with respect to such state-
owned property;
(G) Forty-five per cent of the property taxes that would have been
paid with respect to all municipally owned airports; except for the
exemption applicable to such property, on the assessment list in such
municipality for the assessment date two years prior to the
commencement of the state fiscal year in which such grant is payable.
The grant provided pursuant to this section for any municipally owned
airport shall be paid to any municipality in which the airport is located,
except that the grant applicable to Sikorsky Airport shall be paid one-
half to the town of Stratford and one-half to the city of Bridgeport;
(H) One hundred per cent of the property taxes that would have been
paid with respect to any land [designated within the 1983 Settlement
boundary and] taken into trust by the federal government for the
Mashantucket Pequot Tribal Nation prior to June 8, 1999, or taken into
trust by the federal government for the Mohegan Tribe of Indians of
Public Act No. 26-68 743 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Connecticut, provided the real property subject to this subparagraph
shall be the land only, and shall not include the assessed value of any
structures, buildings or other improvements on such land; and
(I) Forty-five per cent of the property taxes that would have been paid
with respect to all other state-owned real property.
(2) The grant payable to any municipality or fire district for college
and hospital property under the provisions of this section in the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2017, and each fiscal year thereafter, shall be equal
to the total of seventy-seven per cent of the property taxes that, except
for any exemption applicable to any college and hospital property under
the provisions of section 12-81, would have been paid with respect to
college and hospital property on the assessment list in such municipality
or fire district for the assessment date two years prior to the
commencement of the state fiscal year in which such grant is payable.
Sec. 489. Section 2-83 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
Such interns shall be appointed for the duration of the spring
semester of such interns' institution of higher education, and may
continue to serve for the duration of the regular session of the General
Assembly or any subsequent special sessions of the General Assembly.
The committee shall (1) appoint a program coordinator, and (2)
authorize the expenses of administration of the program. [, and (3) pay
at least one-half of the stipend awarded to such interns, the remainder
of such stipend to be paid out of appropriations to the committee
therefor.] Each such intern shall be paid a stipend of five hundred
dollars.
Sec. 490. Subsection (a) of section 3 of special act 26-1 is amended to
read as follows (Effective from passage):
(a) The sum of [$330,811,954] $380,811,954 is appropriated from the
Public Act No. 26-68 744 of 745

Substitute Senate Bill No. 1
Federal Cuts Response Fund, established pursuant to section 1 of [this
act] special act 26-1, to the Office of Policy and Management, for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for the purpose of responding to the
policy impacts of P.L. 119-21 and mitigating any action or inaction by
the federal government that results in a reduction in funding for any
program in this state.
Governor's Action:
Approved May 26, 2026
Public Act No. 26-68 745 of 745